Another day in Hollywood; another star in rehab.
Word comes from People magazine and other celebrity news outlets that Tara Reid, 33, who starred in ``American Pie'' and appeared on U.S. TV show ``Scrubs,'' has entered the Promises Treatment Center in Malibu, California - the same facility that in the past has been the rehab facility of choice for many a Hollywood star.
People said Reid's representative Jack Ketsoyan confirmed the actress's stay at Promises.
Perennial party girl Tara Reid checked herself into Promises Treatment Center, her rep told People.
``We appreciate your respect to her and her family's privacy at this time,'' the 33-year-old actress's rep Jack Ketsoyan told the magazine exclusively for their Web site.
Ketsoyan would not say what the ``American Pie'' star was being treated for.
A friend of the actress told People she went to Promises on Tuesday and that her friends and family supported her decision.
Reid launched a new fashion line called Mantra in December.
Tara Reid has entered a rehab program, the American Pie star's rep confirmed to People and Us Weekly on Friday.
The news comes as a shock for everyone who just assumed the seldom-seen actress had been holed up there for a while - at least when she wasn't touring U.S. frat houses and/or tequila conventions.
``Tara Reid has checked herself into Promises Treatment Center,'' Reid's rep told Us.
``We appreciate your respect to her and her family's privacy at this time.''
No specific reason or addiction was given for her treatment.
When Reid wasn't getting attention for her sometimes fun/sometimes scary breasts, the actress was getting attention for her often-shambolic love of partying.
Reid's messy lifestyle led to her short lived E!-series, Taradise, that followed her to exotic locales where she would party.
Somehow, Reid managed to mess up the dream-job/easiest job ever by being too wasted and out of control to film it.
``It was a mess,'' she said of the show.
``I didn't know it was going to ruin my career.
People forget I've done, like, 20 movies.
I'm not just a party girl. ``
While Reid has been out of the cinematic spotlight, she recently launched a clothing line, Mantra, and is dating French fashion designer Julien Jarmoune.
In an interview in October, Reid told People she was a ``social drinker'' who's no longer tempted to fall back into her old habits:
``No.
I've done it.
Trust me.
I've done enough for a lifetime of everything.
I've had a great time.
I partied.
I had fun.
I ate and drank whatever.
I dated a million guys, but I'm so happy with where I'm at right now.
I don't need to do anything anymore.''
Well, here's something that we all knew would happen eventually.
Tara Reid has checked into Promises Treatment Center, a prominent rehab clinic in Los Angeles.
In the late 90s Reid was a pop bubblegum princess with a starring role in the American Pie franchise and a relationship with Carson Daly.
Now she's known primarily for partying far too hard and accidentally exposing her naughty bits to the paparazzi.
It's too late for her to salvage a Hollywood career, but at least she can keep her liver from shriveling into a little grey ball.
Well, it isn't even released yet, but apparently the positive buzz surrounding the trailers for Terminator Salvation is enough to warrant making a sequel.
McG made the announcement in Dubai over the weekend, stating that the project was shooting for a 2011 release date.
Now, I'm as excited to see the new Terminator movie as anybody, but is this really a good idea?
What if the film is terrible and bombs at the box office?
Warner Brothers appears to be pretty damn confident about this one.
We'll see what happens.
Sadly last week we learned that Ricky Gervais would not be hosting the Oscars.
This was a disappointing blow, but there was hope that Chris Rock, Jon Stewart or another favourtie host of recent years would get a chance to return.
Sadly that's not the case.
Instead Hugh Jackman will be hosting what will undoubtedly be the most bland and unfunny Oscar night in recent memory.
Seriously, Jackman?
Why is he qualified to do this?
They aren't even trying to find good people to host that show anymore.
It's about time, right?
Perpetual mess Tara Reid has finally decided to try and shed her drunk-girl image and has entered rehab.
``Tara Reid has checked herself into Promises Treatment Center,'' her rep told UsMagazine.com.
``We appreciate your respect to her and her family's privacy at this time.''
The actress, who hasn't done anything to speak of in years, has been seen, on so many occasions, wasted out of her mind, unwittingly flashing the paparazzi on the red carpet, looking scary-skinny, and making really D-list personal appearances.
Rehab has been calling her name loud and clear for years.
Best decision ever.
Good luck, Tara.
Tara Reid Finally Checks Into Rehab For Undisclosed Reasons
It's been a long time coming, but Tara Reid has finally entered Malibu Promises Treatment Center on Tuesday, her rep told People.com.
The 33-year-old hard partying actress finally decided to put an end to her drinking days and get help for her addictions, although her publicist refused to disclose the real reason why Reid checked into rehab.
In a statement released to People, the ``American Pie'' star's rep Jack Ketsoyan confirmed that she was at the same clinic where Britney Spears, Ben Affleck, Charlie Sheen, and Lindsay Lohan were previously treated, and pleaded for her and her family's privacy at this time.
``Her friends and family are supportive of her decision,`` a friend of the actress said.
``She checked in herself - it was her decision.''
Following her breakthrough in 1999's ``American Pie,'' the actress has been better known for her partying habits and personal life rather than her movies, which weren't that many in the first place.
Three years ago, Reid, who has launched a new fashion line called Mantra in September, opened up about her party girl image saying it wasn't accurate and her entourage was a bad influence as well.
``My picture is taken only when I have a cup in my hand,'' she told Us Weekly.
``Trust me, my body is tired.
I partied hard.
But I think it was that the people I partied with were not the best people.''
Earlier this year, the star said she had turned a corner from being a hard-hitting drinker and was now a ``social drinker.''
When asked about the temptation to fall back into old habits she said she had enough fun and a great time to last her a lifetime.
``I'm so happy with where I'm at right now.
I don't need to do anything anymore,'' she added.
Besides ``American Pie'' and her E! reality show ``Taradise,''
Reid has had a recurring role on ``Scrubs'' and starred in ``Van Wilder'' and ``The Big Lebowski.''
The beautiful party girl Tara Reid is taking the time this season and checking herself into rehab.
Yesterday, on Friday, Reid apparently felt she needed to be checked in without really saying why she was going in.
People are assuming it's her party life that is bringing her into rehab, or maybe she's just going crazy.
According to various reports Tara Reid's representative Jack Ketsoyan left a statement for the press, he said
``We appreciate your respect to her (Tara Reid ) and her family's privacy at this time.''
Apparently the beautiful breast slippin babe's problem is not getting out much like Spears problems were laid out in the media by the paparazzi and friends of the family.
Of course who could forget the breast slip photo of Tara Reid on the red carpet where she had no idea her entire left boob was hanging out as reporters snapped tons of pictures and were laughing at her. (c) tPC
The good news is that Tara Reid is getting help, according to People Magazine, for boozing it up too much.
``Tara Reid has checked herself into Promises Treatment Center.
We appreciate your respect to her and her family's privacy at this time,'' the actress's rep Jack Ketsoyan tells PEOPLE.
The rep would not reveal what Reid, 33, is being treated for.
The even better news is that her boobs are still big.
The bad news is that they are crooked, a bit off-tilt, if you will.
Tara is not going to enjoy Promises, there is no open bar, from what I understand.
Don't forget to tip your waitresses and waiters Tara.
This is such a warm holiday story, I am about to melt.
I wonder what this means for MTV's beach house, where Tara's crooked boobs are somewhat of an iconic symbol for the show?
This could get interesting.
The notorious party girl, who makes headlines for her wild antics and plastic surgery-enhanced figure, had checked into the Promises Treatment Centre in Malibu, her publicist confirmed.
He did not say what Reid was being treated for.
``We appreciate your respect to her and her family's privacy at this time,'' he said.
Reid, 33, was infamously photographed topless on the red carpet when her dress slipped off, exposing one of her breasts.
Reid has starred in American Pie, and had a guest role in television sitcom Scrubs.
She has admitted several of her cosmetic surgery enhancements were botched.
She last month dumped her manager in an attempt to clean up her image.
Tara Reid is seeking help at rehabilitation facility in California.
The actress, who shot to fame in 1999 movie American Pie, decided to check in last week.
It is unclear what she is being treated for.
'Tara Reid has checked herself into the Promises Treatment Center,' her rep says in a statement.
'We appreciate your respect to her and her family's privacy at this time.'
Tara, 33, was previously engaged to MTV host Carson Daly in 2001.
But they called it off only months before their wedding.
She is currently dating her business partner Julien Jarmoune, 34.
A publicist says Tara Reid has checked herself into rehab.
Jack Ketsoyan said Friday that the ``American Pie'' star went to the Promises Treatment Center.
He did not specify what she was being treated for or when she entered the facility.
``We appreciate your respect to her and her family's privacy at this time,'' he said in a statement.
Reid, 33, earned a reputation as a drunken partier after famously being photographed on a red carpet with her breast exposed, apparently unaware that the strap of her dress had fallen off.
Her film credits include ``Van Wilder'' and ``The Big Lebowski.''
She also hosted the short-lived, half-hour show ``Taradise'' on E!
Tara Reid has seemingly spent the last decade out and about, but her latest destination hits much closer to home.
The American Pie actress and velvet-rope fixture has checked into Promises Treatment Center in Malibu, according to her publicist, Jack Ketsoyan.
``We appreciate your respect to her and her family's privacy at this time,'' he said.
Ketsoyan did not say what Reid is being treated for and no other details were forthcoming.
The move comes as a surprise to Reunion Pictures' Matthew O'Connor, who coproduced Reid last year on the made-for-TV horror flick Vipers.
``Tara was 100 percent professional,'' he told E! News.
``She came in totally prepared every day.''
``Absolutely not,'' O'Connor said when asked whether he had noticed any warning signs that Reid might have a problem.
``She was better than fine - great.''
The 33-year-old Reid, whose personal life and plastic-surgery travails have earned her far more headlines than her career over the last few years, described herself to People a few months ago as ``a social drinker.''
When asked whether she was still a party girl, the Taradise star said, ``I've done enough of everything for a lifetime!
I partied.
I had fun.
I ate and drank and dated a million guys, but I'm so happy with where I am right now.
I don't need to do any of that anymore.''
Reid recently started her own clothing line, Mantra, but her last notable acting gig was a guest arc on Scrubs back in 2005.
Tara Reid has finally looked in a mirror and got a glimpse of what was starting back.
The actress who is known more for staggering around town than actually appearing on the big screen, finally checked into rehab.
In a statement from her people, it was confirmed, ``Tara Reid has checked herself into Promises Treatment Center.''
Promises is the home away from home for many stars including Britney Spears, Lindsay Lohan and Ben Affleck.
Tara is known for her roles in American Pie and Van Wilder.
She also starred in the ill-fated party show, Taradise, on the E! network which premiered in September 2005 was canceled the following month
Well it's better late than never, Tara.
The original trainwreck Tara Reid's publicist confirmed that the actress Reid was admitted into Promises Treatment Center in Los Angeles, California.
``We appreciate your respect to her and her family's privacy at this time,'' the actress's rep Jack Ketsoyan tells People magazine.
Reid checked herself in on Tuesday, December 9, 2008.
Her rep, however, declined to reveal Reid's reason for this seemingly abrupt decision.
Reid's, 33, acting abilities had always been overshadowed by her 'party girl' reputation, and certainly set the bar for young starlets like Lindsay Lohan and Paris Hilton.
In an October interview with People, Reid claimed she was a 'social drinker' and that her crazy past was far behind her.
'I've done it.
Trust me.
I've done enough for a lifetime ofeverything.
I've had a great time.
I partied.
I had fun.
I ate and drank whatever.
I dated a million guys, but I'm so happy with where I'm at right now.
I don't need to do anything anymore,' she told the magazine.
Apparently, old habits die hard.
Hopefully, Promises will help her get back on track.
Talking to People magazine, Jack Ketsoyan, Tara Reid's representative confirms the Perennial Party Girl, has herself checked into Promises Treatment Centre.
Asking to respect her and her family's privacy, Ketsoyan did not reveal what the star of ``American Pie'', ``Van Wilder'' and ``The Big Lebowski'' was being treated for.
Reid who launched Mantra, her new fashion line, is being supported in her decision to enter rehab by all friends and family.
Reid, 33, with a reputation as one who drinks and parties long and hard, none more so when she was photographed on the red carpet with a breast exposed, completely unaware the strap of her dress had fallen off.
Reid has also hosted 'Taradise', the short-lived, half-hour show.
The ``American Pie'' actress has entered Promises for undisclosed reasons
The actress, 33, reportedly headed to a Malibu treatment facility on Tuesday.
``Tara Reid has checked herself into Promises Treatment Center.
We appreciate your respect to her and her family's privacy at this time,'' the actress's rep Jack Ketsoyan tells the mag.
Although the rep wouldn't reveal why she entered rehab, a source from the magazine said that it was her decision to get help.
Reid became famous from her 1999 role in ``American Pie'' and had her own reality show ``Taradise'' in 2005.
Oh, it's been so long since we were on the rehab beat!
After telling People in October that she didn't ``need to do any of that anymore,'' ``American Pie'' actress and former travel reporter Tara Reid checked into Promises Treatment Center on Friday for an unspecified problem.
Promises is a celeb favorite favored by Britney Spears and Lindsay Lohan -- it's also where Mel Gibson retired to after his 2006 accident and anti-Semitic outburst.
Not quite the Christmas alternative we're looking for...
Get well soon, Tara!
It's a party... a rehab party!
It's one of the most exclusive rehab centers, and Tara Reid is in.
Hey, if you're going to rehab anyway, might as well get your ego stroked, too.
Actress Tara Reid entered well-known Malibu rehab center Promises Treatment Center, reportedly of her own desire.
The specific reason behind her checking in to the facility is currently unknown to the public.
Reid may be best known for her romance with MTV's ``Carson Daly'' and her roles in the ``American Pie'' movies.
Her former producer, Chris Weitz, will now be helming the next film installment of the ``Twilight'' series.
According to this L.A. Times story (which credits the team-owned flagship radio station), the Angels have made an eight-year offer to free agent first baseman Mark Teixeira.
The dollar amount was unspecified, but Bill Shaikin, the fine reporter who wrote the story, says the team was believed to have offered at least $160 million.
This, obviously, changes the landscape of the Teixeira sweepstakes, as the Nationals' best chance for landing him was to blow everyone else out of the water with their offer -- which, apparently, has not happened.
That's not to say the Nationals cannot sweeten their offer, but team officials have indicated an unwillingness to get into a bidding war with higher-revenue teams.
Of course, we still have yet to hear from the Red Sox -- or even the Yankees, as I hypothesized in today's print edition. 
In any case, it appears this thing is far from over.
Angels general manager Tony Reagins confirmed to the Los Angeles Times that he has made an eight-year offer to free agent first baseman Mark Teixeira.
Regains didn't reveal the dollar amounts, but the newspaper speculates the deal is worth at least $160 million.
Teixeira is considered the top offensive player available on the free agent market, and the Orioles (seven years, $140-$150 million) and Nationals (eight years, $160 million) reportedly have made sizeable offers as well.
The Red Sox, considered to be the front-runner for Teixeira, also have put in a bid, though monetary details have been kept quiet.
There has been talk of the Yankees being in the Teixeira sweepstakes as well.
Teixeira, 28, has hit at least 30 homers and driven in at least 105 runs in each of the past five seasons.
After being acquired from the Braves before the trading deadline this past season, Teixeira hit .358 with 13 homers and 43 RBIs in 54 games with the Angels.
The Los Angeles Angels of Anaheim offered free-agent first baseman Mark Teixeira an eight-year contract at the Winter Meetings in Las Vegas.
Owner Arte Moreno met with Scott Boras, Teixeira's agent, and presented him with the offer, which is believed to be worth at least $160 million and possibly as much as $180 million over the life of the contract.
``It's something they can consider - or should consider,'' Angels general manager Tony Reagins told MLB.com on Friday. 
``They have the right.''
Other teams in the battle for Teixeira are the Baltimore Orioles (seven years, $140-150 million), Washington Nationals (eight years, $160 million) and Boston Red Sox.
The New York Yankees also have expressed interest.
Teixeira, 28, was acquired by the Angels in a July 29 deal with the Atlanta Braves last season and hit 13 home runs and 43 RBIs in 54 games.
Overall, he finished the season with a .308 average, 33 homers and 121 RBI.
It marked the fifth straight 30-homer, 100-RBI season for Teixeira.
He batted .467 with seven hits and four walks in the American League Division Series as the Angels fell to the Red Sox in four games.
The Angels have offered an eight-year contract to Mark Teixeira, general manager Tony Reagins said Friday night.
The contract would be the longest and richest in club history.
The value could almost double the previous club record, the $90 million guaranteed last year to Torii Hunter.
Reagins declined to provide the value of Teixeira's offer.
The Angels are believed to have offered at least $160 million, matching or exceeding the highest offer so far reported for Teixeira.
Owner Arte Moreno flew from his Arizona home to Las Vegas on Tuesday and met personally with Scott Boras, the agent for Teixeira.
Angels spokesman Tim Mead said he believed Moreno presented the offer to Boras at that time.
Mead also said he did not know when the offer might expire.
None of the other teams in the Teixeira sweepstakes -- the Boston Red Sox, Baltimore Orioles and Washington Nationals -- has been reported to have offered more than eight years.
The Nationals reportedly have bid $160 million over eight years, the Orioles between $140 million and $150 million over seven years.
The details of the Boston bid have not been reported.
The Angels had exclusive negotiating rights with Teixeira for the first 15 days after the World Series, but they declined to make an offer during that time and said they would do so at an appropriate time.
Boras has had one month since then to solicit bids from other teams, enabling him to let Moreno know how the market had developed and enabling Moreno to make his first -- and perhaps only -- offer without Boras shopping that offer to other teams.
The Angels have not wavered from treating Teixeira as their top priority, even as other coveted options have evaporated.
The Angels negotiated with pitcher CC Sabathia, a favorite among their scouts, but they chose not to make an offer after deciding they would not match the New York Yankees' initial $140-million bid.
Sabathia agreed to a seven-year, $161-million deal with the Yankees late Tuesday night, hours after Moreno met with Boras.
On Friday, outfielder Raul Ibanez signed a three-year, $31.5-million contract with the Philadelphia Phillies.
The Angels had considered signing Ibanez if they lost out on Teixeira, with Ibanez playing left field and Kendry Morales replacing Teixeira at first base.
The Angels' eight-year offer first was reported Friday night on the team-owned radio station, AM 830.
Super-agent Scott Boras said leaving the Winter Meetings that it was going to take an eight-year deal to get the services of slugging first-baseman Mark Teixeira.
The Angels apparently are good with that.
Los Angeles general manager Tony Reagins has sounded like a broken record saying that resigning Teixeira was his top priority, and backed that up now with an eight-year offer.
No dollar figures have been released with the offer, but the seven-year offers for Teixeira were in the $140 million to $160 million range and the new offer is expected to be at the top of that range.
If accepted, this would certainly be the largest contract in the Angels history, dwarfing the four-year, $90 million deal that Torii Hunter got just last summer.
But if he keeps mashing like he did after the trade, Teixeira could be worth the bank.
In 54 games with the Angeles he hit .358 with 13 home runs and 43 RBIs, and had a slugging percentage of .632.
The two-time Gold Glove winner also helped solidify the Angeles infield.
After the Winter Meetings, the conventional wisdom was that the Red Sox were the frontrunners for Teixeira's services, even though they met privately and their offer was never made public (maybe that's why people thought they were the leaders).
However, no other offer (including from the Nationals and Oriels trying to bring Teixeira back to his native Maryland) was thought to be more than seven years.
The race for Teixeira seems to be in the final furlong.
But then again, Boras is a patient man, especially if he thinks more money could be around the corner.
The Los Angeles Angels made an eight-year offer to first baseman Mark Teixeira during winter meetings in Las Vegas.
Team spokesman Tim Mead confirmed Sunday the Angels have withdrawn their offer and are ``out of the Mark Teixeira derby.''
The team made its offer, reportedly worth about US$160 million, during the winter meetings in Las Vegas earlier this month.
The Red Sox said last week that they ``are not going to be a factor'' in signing the 28-year-old Maryland native. 
Washington and Baltimore have expressed interest in Teixeira.
The Angels obtained Teixeira from the Atlanta Braves in late July. 
Playing in a combined 157 games with the Angels and Braves, Teixeira had 33 homers and 121 RBIs along with a career-best .308 average.
So as things turn out, apparently there are teams in Major League Baseball not named the New York Yankees who are willing to spend money this winter.
After letting Francisco Rodriguez leave to join the New York Mets and failing to sign CC Sabathia, the Angels find themselves with some money laying around, and they've decided to spend it on Mark Teixeira.
According to a report in the Los Angeles Times, the Angels have made an offer to the free agent first baseman that would be the biggest contract in the history of the franchise, surpassing the $90 million deal they gave to Torii Hunter last season.
While the numbers aren't confirmed, the deal is believed to be an offer of eight years and around $160 million.
Owner Arte Moreno flew from his Arizona home to Las Vegas on Tuesday and met personally with Scott Boras, the agent for Teixeira.
Angels spokesman Tim Mead said he believed Moreno presented the offer to Boras at that time.
Mead also said he did not know when the offer might expire.
The Angels, of course, are one of four teams that are known to be pursuing Teixeira.
The Nationals offered him the same deal as the Angels, the Orioles have made an offer between $140 and $150 million over seven years, and nobody knows for sure what the Red Sox have offered.
I'm pretty sure the Red Sox offer will be the only one the Angels have to compete with because even though the Nationals and Orioles are close to Teixeira's home, neither have any realistic expectation of competing for a World Series next season, with or without Teixeira.
In other news, somewhere Manny Ramirez just punched something.
With last night's news from Los Angeles Angels GM Tony Reagins that the team has made an eight-year contract offer (dollars undisclosed) to 1B Mark Teixeira, the trade rumor being reported , most recently by John Perrotto at Baseball Prospectus, about the Angels going after San Diego Padres' ace is likely caput.
Perrotto's iteration had AAA RHP Nick Adenhart and AAA SS Brandon Wood heading a package that would lead to Peavy topping the Angels' rotation.
While the Angels are being lumped in with the big spenders of baseball ( read: New York Yankees and Boston Red Sox ), there is little to indicate the Angels' off-season plans included dropping $20MM per on Teixeira and another $15 + MM on a starting pitcher.
As a back-up plan to a failure to land Teixeira, yes.
However, an interesting scenario develops if Teixeira spurs the West Coast in favor of working closer to home for the Washington Nationals or Baltimore Orioles.
In this scenario, the Angels would have the luxury of dealing Peavy to the Padres for a Wood/Adenhart/Reggie Willits/Reliever package, and reviving its offense with the signings of non-tender 3B/2B Ty Wigginton and Jonny Gomes.
The 4th parliamentary election of Turkmenistan ended Sunday evening as scheduled, said reports from Ashgabat, Turkmenistan's capital.
More than 2,000 booths in 125 constituencies in the country were closed at 6:00 p.m. local time (1300 GMT).
The Central Election and Referendum Commission declared the election valid. 
Official election results will be announced within 10 days.
Some 2.44 million people, accounting for some 88.41 percent of the country's eligible voters, cast their ballots as of 4:00 p.m. local time (1100 GMT).
Under Turkmen laws, parliamentary elections can only be declared valid with a turnout more than 50 percent of eligible voters.
The election attracted wide attention as it was held amid constitutional and justice reforms advocated by President Kurbanguly Berdymukhamedov.
About 40 observers from the United Nations, the Organization for Security and Cooperation in Europe and the Commonwealth of Independent States oversaw the election.
This was the first the government allowed international observers to supervise the elections in Turkmenistan.
Berdymukhamedov said earlier that the parliamentary elections in Turkmenistan would show the international community that the country's democratization process is irreversible with the adoption of a new constitution.
Voting for MPs to Majlis (Parliament) began in Turkmenistan on Dec.14.
A total of 288 candidates run for 125 parliamentary seats, with 37 of the candidates registered in the capital city of Turkmenistan - Ashgabat, 46 in Akhal region, 25 in Balkan region, 63 in Dashoguz region, 56 in Lebap region, and 61 in Mary region.
Of the 288 candidates, 286 have higher education, 202 are under 45 years old, and 56 are women.
Turkmenistan has 27 polling stations abroad attached to the country's diplomatic missions.
Elections take place by the voting of Turkmenistan citizens on the basis of a universal, equal and direct suffrage with secret ballot and alternative basis.
The term of office of MPs is five years.
For the first time foreign observers and experts, representatives from European states and international organizations including UN, OSCE, and CIS Executive Committee monitor elections in Turkmenistan.
Voters in Turkmenistan began to cast their ballots at 8: 00 am local time ( 0300 GMT ) on Sunday in the country's fourth parliamentary election, said reports from Ashgabat, Turkmenistan's capital.
Over 2.5 million Turkmens are eligible to vote at more than 2,000 booths in the country, while there are 27 overseas booths.
Voting will close at 6: 00 p.m. local time (1300 GMT) Sunday.
In accordance with the country's election law, there are a total of 125 contituencies in the current election and single winners will be elected in each of them for a term of five years.
A total of 288 candidates are vying for the 125 seats in the legislature.
Turkmenistan voted Sunday in a parliamentary election meant to show that the energy-rich central Asian nation was shedding its autocratic past, but Western observers said nothing had changed.
Authorities said turnout reached 93.87 percent in the election for 288 candidates, all of whom support the policies of President Gurbanguly Berdymukhamedov in the ex-Soviet republic.
Voting stations were festooned with Turkmen flags and pictures of Berdymukhamedov, the successor of eccentric dictator Saparmurat Niyazov, who ruled Turkmenistan for two decades until his death in 2006.
Over 2.5 million people were eligible to vote in the election, held under the framework of a new constitution approved in September and intended to increase parliament's powers and raise the number of seats from 65 to 125.
``I attach hopes for the better to these elections, especially for our children,'' Valentina Redzhepova, an official at one of Ashgabat's voting precincts, told AFP.
``We are waiting for borders to open even further so more guests can come to us and so we can visit them.''
Voters, however, appeared reluctant to criticise the government.
In Gyami, a village outside the Turkmen capital, 25-year-old Guzel said she had come to the local polling station to vote and watch her daughter perform in a children's folk-dance troupe.
``I voted for our fellow village resident.
He is an experienced person and knows village life well,'' she said.
Pensioner Bayram-aga, a voter in Ashgabat, said:
``I remember the elections from the Soviet days. ...
People were very active then, it was like a festival.
Now it's much quieter.''
Western observers say Niyazov still casts a shadow, despite promises of openness by Berdymukhamedov and some moves to dismantle the late dictator's bizarre personality cult.
Niyazov's gold statue still towers over the desert nation's capital, rotating to face the sun.
``The facade has changed but the foundations remain the same,'' said a Western diplomat, who requested anonymity.
``Power rests entirely with the president.
His photo appears every day on the front of the papers.
He strictly controls the economy and the whole of the media,'' the diplomat added.
New York-based Human Rights Watch said in an assessment last month that Turkmenistan had made ``some progress'' but ``remains ... one of the most repressive and authoritarian states in the world.''
The elections are unlikely to get a clean bill of health from the West, not least as all candidates have stressed support for the president while campaigning.
The Organization for Security and Cooperation in Europe sent eight experts to monitor the poll and draw up an ``internal report.''
The group's spokesman, Jens Hagen Eschenbecher, told AFP that the experts would not be making any public statements on their conclusions.
Ninety percent of the 288 candidates come from the Democratic Party set up by Niyazov in place of the Communist Party, with the other 10 percent coming from so-called ``initiative groups'' that have little clout.
All candidates are funded by the state, with a ban on other funding.
Western journalists have been refused permission to cover the vote.
Foreign election observers will mainly come from the Commonwealth of Independent States, a post-Soviet group with little credibility.
With its enormous natural gas reserves, Turkmenistan is central to European efforts to diversify gas supplies away from Russia.
Berdymukhamedov has voiced support for giving the West more access to Turkmen gas.
Voters in Turkmenistan cast ballots Sunday in a parliamentary election hailed by the government as an exercise in democracy but dismissed by critics as a sham.
The election of a 125-seat national legislature is the first parliamentary vote in the natural-gas rich Central Asian nation since the death of longtime autocrat Saparmurat Niyazov two years ago.
His successor, Gurbanguli Berdymukhamedov, says the election is a key step in the development of democracy.
But while the seats are contested, only one political party is legally registered in Turkmenistan, and its opponents have no foothold in politics.
The U.S. and Europe are courting Turkmenistan as they seek to diversify energy sources and were watching the vote for signs of change.
The people of Turkmenistan have voted in the first parliamentary election held after the adoption of a new constitution earlier this year.
The Central Election Commission said that turnout was almost 90%.
It was the first poll to be held under President Kurbanguly Berdymukhamedov, who has promised to end the Central Asian nation's international isolation.
The authorities say the vote is an important democratic step, but critics question the validity of the process.
Almost all of the 288 candidates running for 125 seats in the parliament came either from Turkmenistan's sole political party, the Democratic Party, or state-affiliated organisations.
All candidates were funded by the state as alternative funding was banned.
Ethnic minorities, such as the sizeable Uzbek community, were not permitted to nominate their own candidates.
International observers
There was no shortage of voters in the parliamentary elections in Turkmenistan, the former Soviet republic which borders the Caspian Sea.
According to the country's Central Election Commission the turnout was extremely high.
Almost all of the 2.5 million people eligible cast their votes, reports said.
State media proudly reported that Turkmen citizens living abroad were able to vote for the first time at Turkmen embassies and consulates.
Officials are keen to demonstrate that these elections are part of Turkmenistan's process of democratisation.
International observers from the Organisation for Security and Co-operation in Europe were invited to monitor the poll.
They are not expected to give any formal assessment of the election proceedings.
Previously, Turkmenistan had a People's Council whose 2,507 members had to be approved by the country's late ruler, Saparmurat Niyazov, who died in 2006 after 21 years in power.
The new leader, Mr Berdymukhamedov, a former dentist, has introduced a number of measures to modernise the gas-rich nation, after years of isolation under his predecessor.
Abolishing the People's Council and reinstating the country's parliament was one of them.
However the country remains largely closed to the outside world.
Voters in reclusive Turkmenistan elect a parliament Sunday in balloting heralded by authorities in the natural gas-rich nation as a key step toward democratic standards but dismissed by critics as a sham.
The election comes two years after the death of idiosyncratic dictator Saparmurat Niyazov, which kindled hopes here and in the West that the Central Asian country would gradually roll back its oppressive political regime and introduce greater freedoms.
Niyazov's successor, President Gurbanguli Berdymukhamedov, has revoked some of his more draconian decrees and vowed to pursue political reform.
But most of the parliamentary candidates are from the only permitted political party, and exiled opposition activists say the president has failed to live up to his promises.
``Beyond all the pompous declarations, there will be no real change,'' Tadzhigul Begmedova, director of the Turkmenistan Helsinki Foundation for Human Rights, said by telephone from Varna, Bulgaria.
``The hopes many people had that a new president would open up Turkmen society have been shattered.''
On the surface, Turkmenistan's political landscape is changing.
In September, the rubber-stamp People's Council - a 2,507-member assembly of presidential appointees, town elders and others - voted to abolish itself and cede most of its powers to an expanded parliament.
But out of the 288 candidates running for the 125 seats Sunday, more than half are members of the pro-presidential Democratic Party of Turkmenistan - a political force created out of the ashes of the Soviet-era Turkmen Communist Party.
Non-party candidates have been drawn from state-controlled women's and veterans' organizations, trade unions and a youth group.
The only non-party candidate in the capital, Ashgabat, avidly supports Berdymukhamedov - undermining official claims the polls will offer a wide choice.
``I will devote all my strengths to the honest and righteous support of our esteemed president's domestic and foreign policy,'' the candidate, regional bureaucrat Resulberdy Mammedov, said in a campaign statement.
Niyazov isolated Turkmenistan from the international community and forged a pervasive personality cult.
He called himself Turkmenbashi, or father of all Turkmens, renamed months after himself and his mother, and made his self-penned spiritual tome mandatory reading for students and state employees.
With Berdymukhamedov decreasing the country's isolation, government opponents claim the election is aimed to appease Western countries that are eager to win access to its vast natural-gas reserves but wary of its record on democracy and human rights.
The U.S. and European Union are seeking to lessen Russia's control over exports of Turkmen gas.
``This whole spectacle has been arranged for the international community, to show that Turkmenistan is following the path of democratization,'' said Begmedova.
While officials have extolled the vote as an exercise in democracy, there has been little campaigning and little coverage on state-run television, in contrast with the February 2007 presidential election that confirmed Berdymukhamedov's role as head of state.
``There are very few billboards around the city.
With just four days to go before the election, I still don't know who I'm supposed to vote for,'' said Maral, 45, an Ashgabat resident who declined to give her surname for fear of official intimidation.
Turkmens go to the polls Sunday in a parliamentary election the West sees as a test of the Central Asian nation's commitment to bring about change after decades of isolation.
Critics say the poll is a sham and designed to put a gloss of democracy on a government that tolerates no dissent.
All the candidates in Sunday's election represent either the ruling Democratic Party of Turkmenistan, the only party registered in Turkmenistan, or a handful of state-approved independents.
Europe will be watching the vote closely as it tries to gauge how much business it can do with the gas-rich nation it sees as key to its energy diversification.
The parliament election is over in Turkmenistan.
Turkmenistan's voters are going to the polls in parliamentary elections portrayed by the government as a step towards democracy in the gas-rich Central Asian nation.
But critics say that Sunday's vote is a sham with all the candidates either representing the ruling Democratic Party, the only registered party, or a handful of state-approved independents.
``Beyond all the pompous declarations, there will be no real change,'' Tadzhigul Begmedova, director of the Turkmenistan Helsinki Foundation for Human Rights, said from Bulgaria.
``The hopes many people had that a new president would open up Turkmen society have been shattered.''
Gurbanguli Berdymukhamedov became president in 2006 after the death of Saparmurat Niyazov, who forged a personality cult that saw months of the year renamed after himself and his mother, and a spiritual guide he authored become mandatory for students and government workers.
'Pluralism and openess'
Berdymukhamedov rolled back some of the decrees which had celebrated the previous leader and vowed to increase democracy and foreign investment.
``It does not matter who gets elected.
The president has the final say``
``This campaign stands out for its pluralism, openness and the activeness of the citizens,'' an election official told the AFP news agency, requesting anonymity.
In September, the People's Council, a 2,507-member assembly of presidential appointees, town elders and others, voted to abolish itself and cede most of its powers to an expanded parliament.
But more than half of the 288 candidates running for the parliament's 125 seats on Sunday are from the Democratic Party, while the others have been drawn from state-controlled women's and veterans' organisations, trade unions and a youth group.
All of them receive state funding for the campaign as no other form of political funding is allowed under Turkmenistan's laws.
``It does not matter who gets elected.
The president has the final say,'' Osman-aga, who herds camels in a remote desert area, told the Reuters news agency.
Contest 'impossible'
The Organisation for Security and Co-operation in Europe has not sent only three observers to monitor the vote, saying a genuine contest was impossible.
Human Rights Watch said in a report last month:
``The conditions are not in place to hold a free and fair election that would be a meaningful reflection of the will of the people.''
The presence of foreign media also is limited as many journalists were unable to get permission to report there.
The run-up to the election in the former Soviet state has seen little campaigning and garnered little coverage on state-run television.
``There are very few billboards around the city ...
I still don't know who I'm supposed to vote for,'' Maral, a resident of Ashgabat who declined to give her surname for fear of official intimidation, told the Associated Press news agency.
The government of Turkmenistan said 90 per cent of eligible voters had participated in parliamentary elections Sunday, despite boycotts from opposition groups.
The elections, the first since the country adopted a new constitution earlier this year, had 2.5 million eligible voters picking between 288 candidates for 125 seats in the revived parliament.
In another first, the government allowed international observers to oversee the elections.
According to media reports, President Kurbanguly Berdymukhamedov saw the step as necessary to prove that the oil- and gas-rich nation can meet Western standards of democracy.
But opposition groups boycotted the election.
Groups representing Uzbeks, the nation's largest minority, complained that there was not a single Uzbek name on the ballots.
Additionally, human rights group argued that recent reforms implemented by Berdymukhamedov's government were mere window dressing.
A victory by groups with close ties to the administration was expected.
The government claims that seating a new parliament is a major step forward.
Under Berdymukhamedov's predecessor, laws were rubber-stamped by a group known as the People's Council, which was loyal to former president Saparmurat Niyazov, also known as Turkmenbaschi, or Leader of all Turkmens.
Niyazov died in 2006.
The Indian Navy on Saturday prevented pirates from attacking a merchant vessel flying an Ethiopian flag in the Gulf of Aden and took 23 into custody.
Responding to a distress call by MV Gibe, INS Mysore on anti-piracy patrol in the area, swung into action against the pirates in two boats, a Defence Ministry release said.
The apprehended included 12 Somalis and 11 Yemenis. Seven AK-47s, three other automatic rifles, 13 loaded magazines, a rocket-propelled grenade-launcher, rockets, cartridges and grenades were found in the boats.
There were also three outboard motors and a global positioning system receiver.
The personnel, arms, ammunition and equipment would be handed over to appropriate authorities ashore.
The Ministry said MV Gibe put out a message at 1100 hours that it was under attack from two boats closing in on it and firing small arms.
The merchant vessel retaliated with small arms onboard.
The warship some 13 nautical miles away, altered course and launched its integral armed helicopter.
On sighting the warship and the helicopter, the pirates attempted to escape.
INS Mysore closed in and ordered them to stop.
The larger boat, a dhow was identified as Salahuddin, with the second smaller boat in tow.
Marine commandos boarded the dhow at 1230 hours and apprehended the pirates and recovered the arms, ammunition and equipment.
PTI reports:
Last month, Navy warship INS Tabar, a missile-frigate, had sunk a mother ship of the pirates and had also rescued two merchant vessels under attack.
On November 19, INS Tabar sunk a fishing trawler that was under the control of pirates, in a third successive strike since its deployment on November 2 this year.
The Indian navy has captured 23 Somalian pirates.
The pirates were about to board a vessel in the Gulf of Aden when they were apprehended.
Last month, India's navy drew criticism after sinking a Thai fishing trawler that had been commandeered hours earlier by pirates, but the navy says it fired in self-defence.
Somali pirates have become increasingly brazen, and recently seized a Saudi supertanker loaded with e75m worth of crude oil.
The Indian navy said it arrested 23 pirates who threatened a merchant vessel in the Gulf of Aden on Saturday, the latest in a series of recent clashes with Somali pirates.
Indian forces repulsed the pirates as they were about to board the merchant ship, navy spokesman Commander Nirad Sinha said.
The pirates are from Somalia and Yemen, two countries surrounding the Gulf of Aden, Sinha said.
No further details were immediately available.
Last month, India's navy drew criticism after sinking a Thai fishing trawler that had been commandeered hours earlier by pirates.
The navy defended its actions, saying it had fired in self-defense.
Somali pirates have become increasingly brazen in recent months, seizing a number of vessels including a Saudi supertanker loaded with $100 million worth of crude oil.
Somalia, an impoverished nation caught up in an Islamic insurgency, has not had a functioning government since 1991.
In another successful anti-piracy operation, Navy warship on Saturday repulsed an attack on a merchant vessel in the Gulf of Aden and nabbed 23 Somali and Yemeni sea brigands, in a show of resolve to weed out the menace that affected maritime trade in the region.
The pirates on two speed boats had surrounded the merchant vessel flying the Ethiopian flag around noon, when INS Mysore warship intervened and warded off the attack, Navy spokesperson said.
The pirates had fired at the merchant vessel with their small arms, when it sent out a rescue call and the Indian warship, which was sailing nearby moved its Marine Commandos on a helicopter to help the distressed cargo vessel, he said.
The attack took place about 150 nautical miles off Aden and INS Mysore was about 13 nautical miles away from the merchant vessel when it picked up the SOS call.
The Navy flew its Marine Commandos on helicopters to the scene of the pirate attack and rescued the ship. MV Gibe was later escorted to safety, he added.
The Naval commandos also boarded the pirates' boats and seized seven AK-47 assault rifles, two other rifles, a grenade launcher and 13 fully loaded magazines of ammunition from the 12 Somali and 11 Yemeni pirates on board the two pirate boats.
Further search for other pirates, who fled from the spot following the Indian Naval intervention, was in progress, the spokesperson said.
Last month, Navy warship INS Tabar, a missile-frigate, had sunk a mother ship of the pirates and had also rescued two merchant vessels that were under attack from the sea brigands.
After the successful counter attack on the pirates, INS Mysore later escorted MV Gibe to safety, the Navy spokesperson said.
It also launched further search for some of the pirates who escaped after the launch of the marine commando operation.
Indian Navy has also sought assistance from warships of other countries deployed on anti-piracy patrols in the Gulf of Aden to catch the runaway brigands, he said.
New Delhi had taken a serious view of piracy-related incidents in the Gulf of Aden, the primary sea lane for global maritime trade to and fro oil-rich West Asia, following the abduction of MV Stolt Valor, which had 18 Indian sailors on board, by Somali pirates from the region on September 15, 2008.
On October 23, India gave a go-ahead to the Navy's request for a pro-active approach to counter the outlaws operating with audacity in the region along the Horn of Africa.
The Navy rushed its stealth frigate INS Tabar, which was already deployed nearby to Gulf of Aden on November 2 and since then it rescued an Indian vessel MV Jag Arnav and a Saudi cargo ship on November 11 and also sunk a pirate `mother ship' on November 19.
The 'first kill', as Navy Chief Admiral Sureesh Mehta had later described the sinking, turned out to be a Thai fishing trawler under the pirates' control carrying a lot of ammunition and it went up in flames after INS Tabar fired at it in retaliation.
The Indian navy captured 23 pirates in the Gulf of Aden after rescuing a merchant vessel that was being hijacked on Saturday, the Defence Ministry said .
The Indian INS Mysore was patrolling the waters when it received a distress call from Ethiopian-flagged MV Gibe saying two boats were closing in and firing, a Defence Ministry statement said.
``On sighting the helicopter and Mysore, the boats disengaged from MV Gibe and attempted escape.
Mysore closed the vessels and ordered them to stop.''
Indian commandos boarded the larger pirate boat, seizing 12 Somali and 11 Yemeni nationals as well as arms and equipment, the statement said.
Piracy in the Gulf of Aden has been on a rise this year, with several high-profile hijackings, including the capture of Saudi supertanker Sirius Star, which was loaded with $100 million of crude oil.
The Indian navy has captured 23 pirates who threatened a merchant vessel in the lawless waters of the Gulf of Aden.
The Indians say the pirates were from Somalia and Yemen, two countries on the coast of the Gulf.
Also, a German naval helicopter thwarted another attack today on a freighter being chased by speedboats off Yemen.
Both ships that were targeted by the pirates are said to be Ethiopian.
Somali pirates recently seized a Saudi supertanker loaded with $100 million of crude oil.
Also, the threat of pirates recently prompted a German cruise ship to evacuate some 420 passengers and crew after the company decided not to risk their safety as the ship passed through the Gulf of Aden.
Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice is set to ask the U.N. to authorize ``all necessary measures'' against the increasingly bold Somalian pirates.
MSNBC is reporting that the Indian Navy claims they have captured 23 pirates in the Gulf of Aden.
This the region where so many ships have recently been commandeered.
They had ``a large cache of weapons including 7 AK-47 rifles, a rocket propelled grenade launcher, and 3 machine guns.''
They are taking the vessels to pirate controlled regions in Somalia, with an estimated 1,500 pirates.
Commandos from an Indian warship today caught pirates in the act in the Gulf of Aden and took 23 of them into custody, a spokesperson at naval headquarters said.
Indian naval ship Mysore, a destroyer, picked up a distress call from merchant vessel Gibe, which flies an Ethiopian flag, when it was 13 nautical miles (about 24km) from the cargo ship.
Details of what exactly happened are still awaited.
The Gibe was about 150 nautical miles (about 277km) from Aden when the pirates, said to be in a dhow or fishing vessel named Salaluddin, fired at it and tried to board it, according to information available now.
Two speedboats suspected to be carrying more pirates were approaching the Gibe.
The navy spokesperson said marine commandos from the Mysore flew in the destroyer's embarked helicopter, boarded the Salaluddin and caught 12 Somalis and 11 Yemenis.
They also confiscated seven AK-47s, a 5.56mm and a 7.62mm rifles, a grenade launcher, three outboard motors (used to power dinghies or inflatable rafts), a handheld global positioning system and mobile phones.
The pirates in the speedboats fled.
The Mysore is tasked to patrol a 480-nautical-mile corridor from Bab-el-Mandab in the west to the mouth of the Gulf of Aden.
It is required to be in touch with merchant vessels within a 15-nautical-mile radius at all times.
Last month, marine commandos from INS Tabar were reported to have rescued two cargo vessels that were being attacked.
Later, the Tabar fired at and sank a Thai trawler that the Indian Navy said was a pirate ``mother vessel''.
The Mysore will eventually replace the Tabar in patrolling the Gulf of Aden and off the coast of Somalia.
A much larger ship than the frigate, the Mysore was deployed because it is capable of staying out at sea longer without having to replenish frequently.
For the fourth time in two months, the Indian Navy on Saturday took the bandits head on foiling a piracy attempt and putting 23 pirates out of business.
Indian Naval Services (INS) Mysore, the Indian Naval destroyer on anti-piracy patrol in the Gulf of Aden, rescued an Ethiopian ship, MV Gibe.
Pirates on a dhow and a smaller boat attacked this merchant ship about 1100 hrs IST, 150 nautical miles west of Aden, firing machine guns to scare the crew.
The Indian warship, which was escorting merchant ships some 13 miles away, responded to the distress call.
They launched marine commandos on an armed helicopter and altered course to confront the pirates.
The bandits lost nerve on seeing the helicopter and the warships and attempted to flee
The INS Mysore fired warning shots, forcing the pirates to give up.
Marine Commandos boarded the pirate dhow, Salahaddin, which had the smaller boat in tow.
Of the 23 pirates arrested, 12 are reported to be Somali and 11 Yemeni.
The cache of arms on the pirate ship included seven AK-47 rifles, one rocket propelled grenade launcher, grenades and three other rifles.
The pirates have been taken on board the INS Mysore.
They are likely to be handed over to law enforcing authorities in Djibouti.
The Indian anti-piracy patrol is moving full steam ahead undeterred by the adverse publicity which followed the November 18 sinking of a Thai fishing trawler in Indian Naval action against pirates on board.
The Indian Navy said Saturday it had captured 23 pirates as they tried to board an Ethiopian-flagged vessel in the Gulf of Aden.
The pirates were Somali and Yemeni, the BBC reported. A navy spokesman said the Indians responded to a distress call from the MV Gibe and caught the pirates in the act.
On Friday, a high-level U.S. naval commander said attacking Somali ports probably wouldn't be effective in battling rampant piracy.
Speaking at a security conference in Bahrain attended by representatives from 25 countries, U.S. Navy Vice Adm. Bill Gortney said there would many difficulties in attacking land bases in an effort to curtail piracy.
Gortney maintained that civilian casualties could be high in such attacks because pirates would be hard to identify.
Instead, he suggested shippers employ armed guards to protect their vessels from hijackings.
Meanwhile, Somali pirates Saturday released a Greek chemical tanker, the MV Action, they had held since October, a piracy monitor told CNN.
``She is currently limping to safe waters (and) it is feared that three crew members lost their lives under questionable circumstances,'' Andrew Mwangura, head of the Seafarers Assistance Program in Mombasa, Kenya
Taking the lead in the fight against piracy, the Indian Navy on Saturday arrested 23 Somali pirates. 
An Indian warship, INS Mysore deployed in the Gulf of Aden attacked two boats of pirates after receiving signals from a ship that the pirates were trying to hijack.
The Indian warship was patrolling in the Somali waters when it rushed to rescue MV Gibe, a merchant vessel flying the Ethiopian flag.
The pirates on two speed boats had surrounded the merchant vessel, when INS Mysore warship intervened and warded off the attack, Navy spokesperson said here.
The pirates had fired at the merchant vessel with their small arms, when it sent out a rescue call and the Indian warship, which was sailing nearby moved its Marine Commandos on an helicopter to help the distressed cargo vessel, he said.
The attack took place about 150 nautical miles off Aden and INS Mysore was about 13 nautical miles away from the merchant vessel when it picked up the SOS call.
The Navy flew its Marine Commandos on helicopters to the scene of the pirate attack and rescued the ship. MV Gibe was later escorted to safety, he added.
The Indian commandos also recovered 12 AK 47 guns, three rifles, two grenades along with other ammunition.
Out of 23 arrested pirates, 12 are reportedly from Somalia and 11 from Yemen.
The Indian warship, the INS Mysore, was dispatched to the Gulf of Aden after a spike in piracy and hijackings off the coast of Somalia, which is caught up in an Islamic insurgency and has had no functioning government since 1991.
Indian naval forces came to the rescue of a merchant vessel under attack by pirates in the Gulf of Aden on Saturday, capturing 23 of the raiders, India said.
India's INS Mysore and its armed helicopter were on anti-piracy patrol when they received a distress call from the Ethiopian-flagged MV Gibe saying two boats were closing in and firing, a Defence Ministry statement said.
``On sighting the helicopter and Mysore, the boats disengaged from MV Gibe and attempted escape.
Mysore closed the vessels and ordered them to stop.''
Indian commandos boarded the larger pirate boat, seizing 12 Somali and 11 Yemeni nationals as well as arms and equipment, the statement said.
A surge in piracy this year in the busy Gulf of Aden and Indian Ocean off Somalia has driven up insurance costs, earned the gangs tens of millions of dollars in ransoms, and prompted foreign navies to rush to the area to protect shipping.
Several international naval operations are under way off Somalia, including a NATO anti-piracy mission.
The Indian Navy in November said it had sunk the Somali pirate ``mother ship'', though an anti-piracy watchdog later said the vessel was actually a Thai ship carrying fishing equipment that was being hijacked.
Somalia has seen continuous conflict since 1991 and its weak Western-backed government is still fighting Islamist insurgents.
The chaos has helped fuel the explosion in piracy.
There have been nearly 100 attacks in Somali waters this year.
Pirates holding about a dozen ships and nearly 300 crewmen in safe havens on the Somali coast.
Among the captured vessels are a Saudi supertanker loaded with $100 million of crude oil, the Sirius Star, and a Ukrainian cargo ship carrying some 30 Soviet-era tanks, the MV Faina.
Striking another blow against the pirates infesting the waters off the Horn of Africa, an Indian Navy warship not only repulsed an attack on a merchant vessel in the Gulf of Aden, but nabbed 23 Somali and Yemeni sea brigands.
The pirates, in three boats, were attempting to hijack the Ethopian-flagged merchant vessel around noon today, when the destroyer INS Mysore intervened and repulsed the attack, a Navy spokesman said here.
The incident took place about 150 nautical miles off Aden.
After the Mysore picked up a distress call from the merchant vessel, MV Gibe, at around 11 a.m. saying it was under attack, it immediately lauched its helicopter and headed for the scene
On sighting the helicopter and the Mysore, the pirates broke off their attack and attempted to escape, but the warship chased them down.
Marine commandos boarded two of the pirate vessels to nab 12 Somali and 11 Yemeni pirates.
Nine assault rifles, a grenade launcher, 13 fully loaded magazines and a GPS receiver were seized from the pirates, the Navy spokesman said.
The larger boat, a 10-metre dhow, is named the Salahaddin.
It had a smaller boat, a skiff, under tow, Navy sources said.
The INS Mysore later escorted the MV Gibe to safety.
The pirates are being held on board the Mysore and will be handed over to appropriate authorities ashore, possibly at Djibouti in Ivory Coast, the warship's next port of call.
Today's operation is the fourth successful offensive by the Navy in the heart of the pirates' zone of operations.
Last month, the INS Tabar, a missile-frigate, had sunk a Thai trawler that was being used as a mothership by the pirates and also rescued two merchant vessels that were under attack.
The Mysore, a 6,900-tonne destroyer, replaced the Tabar on patrol in the region about a fortnight ago.
Dozen of warships of several countries are also patrolling the shipping lanes in the Gulf of Aden.
India's recent pro-active approach against piracy reflects the concern of the maritime community over a new surge in hijackings off Somalia.
The International Maritime Bureau has reported that pirates based in the lawless African nation were now ``out of control''.
New Delhi had taken a serious view of piracy-related incidents in the region following the hijacking of MV Stolt Valor, with 18 Indian sailors on board, by Somali pirates in September this year.
On 23 October, the government gave a go-ahead to the Navy's request for a pro-active approach against the pirates.
The Indian navy captured 23 pirates who threatened a merchant vessel in the lawless waters of the Gulf of Aden and a German naval helicopter thwarted another attack Saturday on a freighter being chased by speedboats off Yemen.
The successes came days before Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice was to ask the United Nations to authorize ``all necessary measures'' against increasingly bold Somalian pirates operating in one of the world's busiest shipping lanes.
An Indian navy ship, the INS Mysore, was escorting merchant ships in waters off Somalia's coast Saturday when it received a distress call from seamen on board the MV Gibe, who said they were being fired on by two boats that were approaching fast.
The Mysore and its helicopter sped to the scene, and the pirate boats attempted to escape when they saw them, according to a statement from the Indian government.
Indian marine commandoes boarded the pirate boats and seized ``a substantial cache of arms and equipment,'' including seven AK-47 assault rifles, three machine guns, a rocket-propelled grenade launcher and other weapons, the statement said.
They also found a GPS receiver and other equipment.
The pirates were from Somalia and Yemen, two countries on the coast of the Gulf of Aden.
The Gibe was flying an Ethiopian flag but little else was known about it, the Indian statement said.
Last month, India's navy drew criticism after sinking a Thai fishing trawler that had been commandeered hours earlier by pirates.
At least one Thai crew member was killed in the attack, which the Indian navy had originally announced by saying it had sunk a pirate ``mother ship.''
The Indian navy defended its actions, saying it had fired in self-defense.
Somali pirates have become increasingly brazen and recently seized a Saudi supertanker loaded with $100 million of crude oil.
Many of the vessels are taken to pirate-controlled regions in Somalia, where they are held for ransom.
It was not immediately clear what would happen to the pirates captured by the Indians, or where they would be taken.
The statement said only that the prisoners and their weapons would be ``handed over to appropriate authorities ashore.''
Most foreign navies patrolling the Somali coast have been reluctant to detain suspects because of uncertainties over where they would face trial, since Somalia has no effective central government or legal system.
Also on Saturday, a German military spokesman said a navy frigate had chased away pirates in speedboats pursuing an Ethiopian freighter off the coast of Yemen.
The German frigate responded to a distress call from the freighter, and a helicopter took off from the deck to investigate.
The pirates turned away from the freighter as the helicopter flew overhead, said the spokesman, who declined to give his name in line with military policy.
An estimated 1,500 pirates are based in Somalia's semiautonomous Puntland region, raking in millions of dollars.
Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice will present a draft Security Council resolution next week asking the United Nations to authorize ``all necessary measures'' against piracy from Somalia.
However, the commander of the U.S. Navy's 5th Fleet expressed doubt Friday about the wisdom of launching attacks against Somali pirates on land, as the draft proposes.
U.S. Vice Adm. Bill Gortney told reporters that it is difficult to identify pirates, and the potential for killing innocent civilians ``cannot be overestimated.''
The threat of pirates recently prompted a German cruise ship to evacuate some 420 passengers and crew after the company decided not to risk their safety as the ship passed through the Gulf of Aden.
The passengers and crew have rejoined the M/S Columbus - which is on a six-month round-the-world trip - in Oman's port of Salalah after three days in Dubai, Hamburg-based cruise operator Hapag-Lloyd said Saturday.
The ship and a limited crew made it through the gulf without incident, a company spokeswoman said.
Striking yet another blow at the very heart of piracy in the Gulf of Aden, Indian warship INS Mysore and its marine commandos thwarted a hijack attempt on an Ethiopian merchant vessel on Saturday and captured 23 pirates and a large arms cache in the operation.
The arrest of the 23 pirates (12 Somali and 11 Yemeni) and the arms haul is the largest such seizure in the ongoing anti-piracy operations off Somalia.
The confiscated arms and equipment included seven AK-47s, three other assault rifles, 13 loaded magazines, a rocket-propelled grenade launcher with two rockets, several grenades, a GPS set and a mobile phone.
Early November, the British Royal Navy had captured eight pirates, who were subsequently handed over to Kenya to face trial in the port town of Mombasa.
``The external affairs ministry is now working to find out to which country the 23 pirates in INS Mysore's custody can be handed over,'' said a senior officer.
``INS Mysore, which replaced stealth frigate INS Tabar early December, may head for Djibouti on the horn of Africa.
Our plan to base a maritime reconnaissance aircraft like a Dornier at Djibouti (which has a French military base) is also underway,'' he added.
Pirates operating with sheer impunity from ports like Eyl and Hobyo in Somalia, torn apart by an 18-year-old civil war, have already attacked as many as 100 merchant vessels transiting through the crucial shipping lane this year.
At least 17 of the hijacked ships and their crew are still being held captive by the pirates for ransom.
The dramatic action on the high seas on Saturday began at 11am IST when the 6,900-tonne Delhi-class missile destroyer INS Mysore received a ``distress call'' over the MMB Channel 16 from Ethiopian merchant vessel Gibe that it was being attacked by a pirate ``mother dhow'' and a speedboat around 150 nautical miles east of Aden.
An armed Chetak helicopter, with four marine commandos, was immediately ``launched'' from INS Mysore towards Gibe, which was 13 nautical miles from the Indian warship at that point in time.
``The sailors on Gibe were exchanging small arms fire with the pirates.
On spotting the armed Chetak hovering overhead, the pirate boats broke off their attack,'' said an officer.
Soon after, steaming at full speed, the deadly INS Mysore also reached the spot.
By then, all 23 pirates had clambered onto the 10-metre-long dhow -- later identified as `Salahaddin' -- in a bid to escape.
INS Mysore then opened fire across the dhow's bows with its heavy-calibre machine guns, forcing the sea bandits to come to a complete halt.
A detachment of heavily-armed marine commandos promptly sped across to the pirate dhow in their fibre-glass inflatable boats.
``Seeing the Marcos, the pirates surrendered quite easily, even though for some time they pretended to be plain fishermen.
A search of the dhow led to the discovery of the large arms cache and three outboard motors,'' he said.
``The grenades, being unstable, were thrown off overboard.
The 23 pirates and the other arms were taken on board INS Mysore, which will resume its patrolling duties after handing over them over to appropriate ashore authorities,'' he added.
Though over 20 warships from US, EU and other countries are patrolling the piracy-infested Gulf of Aden, which connects the Red Sea to the Indian Ocean, it's actually the Indian Navy which has taken the battle to the pirates.
On November 11, INS Tabar had repulsed two hijack attempts, one on an Indian ship (MV Jag Arnav) and the other on a Saudi oil carrier (NCC Tihama), one after the other.
Then, on November 18, it had sunk Thai trawler ``Ekawat Nava 5'', which had been commandeered by pirates, after a gunbattle.
Though the Navy had come in for some criticism for sinking the Thai trawler, Admiral Sureesh Mehta had declared that his force had done nothing wrong.
``Thai ownership does not change the situation.
It was under the command of pirates.
Use of force was inevitable ...
We acted in self-defence,'' said the Navy chief.
External affairs minister Pranab Mukherjee, too, had strongly defended the Navy's anti-piracy action on the high seas.
The Indian Navy on Saturday foiled a hijack attempt in the notorious Gulf of Aden and arrested 23 heavily armed Somalian and Yemeni pirates.
Within minutes of receiving a distress call from an Ethiopian vessel, MV Gibe, INS Mysore, a Delhi-class destroyer, launched an armed helicopter with marine commandos onboard to stop the pirates from boarding and hijacking the vessel.
The skipper of the Ethiopian vessel, sailing 150 nautical miles west of Aden, radioed a message at around 11 am (IST) saying that pirates had brought his ship under heavy fire.
The Mysore, which replaced stealth frigate INS Tabar in November-end, immediately launched a helicopter and began closing in on the vessel.
Upon sighting the chopper, the pirates abandoned their plans to hijack the vessel.
Instead, navy sources said, they tied their skiffs (speedboats) to the mother vessel and pretended to be fishermen.
The mother vessel, a 10-metre craft called Salahaddin, had some catch stocked in it to give the impression that it was a fishing vessel.
The Mysore intercepted the mother vessel and fired ahead of it to prevent the pirates from getting away.
Sources said the marine commandos had sighted pirates carrying rocket-propelled grenade launchers and automatic weapons.
As Mysore engaged the pirates, the commandos boarded the Salahaddin and arrested the pirates, who decided not to hold out as they were no match for the Indian warship.
The navy recovered seven AK-47 assault rifles, RPG launchers, three speedboats, grenades and other ammunition.
The pirates were taken onboard and would be handed over to authorities in Djibouti.
It was in November that the government authorized the navy to undertake ``hot pursuit'' of pirates in the territorial waters of Somalia, which descended into anarchy in 1991.
A country's territorial waters extend to 12 nautical miles from shore.
The navy has been carrying out anti-piracy patrols in the international waters off the Gulf of Aden since October 23 to ``protect Indian sea-borne trade, instill confidence in the seafaring community and act as a deterrent for pirates.''
``Hot pursuit`` empowers the navy to temporarily violate the maritime border of Somalia to pursue pirates.
This marks the fourth success of the navy against pirates after it launched anti-piracy patrols.
On November 19, Tabar sank a Somalian pirate vessel after being threatened with disastrous consequences.
A few days before that, the same warship foiled two hijack attempts in the Gulf of Aden --- the world's most dangerous waters for commercial shipping.
It rescued an Indian flagship and a Saudi Arabian merchant vessel.
The Indian navy said it has captured 23 Somali and Yemeni pirates who attacked a merchant vessel in the Gulf of Aden on Saturday.
An Indian navy ship sent its marine commandos on a helicopter towards the Ethiopian flag-bearing vessel MV Gibe after getting a distress call from it as it came under fire from two boats, the navy said in a statement.
The boats tried to escape on seeing the navy ship but were chased and the pirates surrendered to the commandos when they boarded the boats.
``Twenty-three personnel (12 Somali and 11 Yemeni) surrendered on boarding,'' the navy said.
The pirates, along with their arms and equipment, would be handed over to the appropriate authorities, it said, adding that the ship would return to patrolling the Gulf of Aden.
Last month, the navy said it had sunk a pirate ``mother vessel'' off Somalia in a battle that erupted after the Indian ship INS Tabar came under attack from gunmen on board the boat.
But the International Maritime Bureau later said that the vessel destroyed by the Indian navy was actually a Thai fishing trawler that had been seized by pirates off Yemen.
Somali pirates have carried out around 100 attacks in the Gulf of Aden and Indian Ocean since the start of this year.
They still hold at least 14 foreign vessels and more than 300 crew members to ransom.
The Indian navy captured 23 piracy suspects who tried to take over a merchant vessel in the Gulf of Aden, between the Horn of Africa and the Arabian Peninsula, Indian officials said .
Piracy suspects raise their hands in surrender as an Indian navy boat approaches.
In addition to the 12 Somali and 11 Yemeni suspects, the Indian navy seized two small boats and ``a substantial cache of arms and equipment,'' the military said in a statement.
Among the seized items were seven AK-47 automatic rifles, three other automatic weapons and 13 loaded magazines; a rocket-propelled grenade launcher along with rockets, cartridges and grenades; up to three outboard motors and a global positioning system receiver.
Pirate attacks in the waters off Somalia have increased this year, with armed men staging increasingly bold attacks on ever-larger targets.
This year, pirates have attacked nearly 100 vessels off Somalia's coast and hijacked nearly 40, the International Maritime Bureau said.
The Indian warship Mysore, which carried out Saturday's operation, is on anti-piracy patrol in the Gulf of Aden, the release said.
The Mysore received a distress call Saturday morning from the MV Gibe, a merchant vessel sailing under an Ethiopian flag.
The Gibe reported that two boats were firing small arms at it.
The merchant ship, which was 13 nautical miles from the Mysore, fired back with small arms onboard the vessel.
The Mysore changed course toward the Gibe and launched an armed helicopter, the Indian military said.
Upon seeing the helicopter and the Mysore closing in, the attackers broke off and tried to flee, the release said.
The warship caught up to the boats, the larger of which was described as a 24- to 30-foot dhow, a traditional Arab sailboat.
The dhow, identified as bearing the name Salahaddin, was towing a smaller skiff.
Indian sailors boarded the Salahaddin, the military said, and the 23 suspects surrendered peacefully.
The suspects, weapons, ammunition and equipment will be handed over to authorities, and the Mysore will return to patrol duties, India said.
Last month, the Indian navy said it had sunk a pirate ``mother vessel'' in the Gulf of Aden.
The ship's owner said the sunken vessel was a Thai trawler that was being seized by pirates when an Indian warship fired on it.
Sixteen crew members were aboard the ship, said Wicharn Sirichaiekawat, owner of the Ekawat Nava 5.
Two have been accounted for.
One crewman was found alive after six days adrift in the Gulf of Aden, and one is confirmed dead, the ship's owner said.
Indian authorities insisted that their ship, the frigate INS Tabar, had acted against a pirate vessel that had threatened to attack it.
``We fired in self-defense and in response to firing upon our vessel,'' Commodore Nirad Sinha, a navy spokesman, told CNN.
``It was a pirate vessel in the international waters, and its stance was aggressive.''
He said the ship the Tabar fired on was laden with ammunition.
All sorts of vessels -- freight and cargo ships, cruise liners and private yachts -- have been attacked in the waters off Somalia.
In many hijackings, pirates take the crew and passengers hostage and demand a ransom.
Just this month, Somali pirates captured two Yemeni fishing boats and 22 Yemeni fishermen in the Gulf of Aden, Yemen's official news agency SABA reported.
A day earlier, the German cruise liner MS Columbus said it would fly its 246 passengers and most of its crew over the Gulf of Aden instead of through it to avoid any pirate attack.
The United States is reportedly circulating a proposal in the U.N. Security Council that would allow military forces to enter Somali territory in ``hot pursuit'' of pirates.
The Pentagon said Friday, however, that there are no plans for U.S. forces to go ashore in pursuit of pirates in Somalia.
The Indian navy says it has arrested 23 Somali and Yemeni pirates who tried to storm a ship in the Gulf of Aden.
A navy spokesman said it had responded to a mayday call from MV Gibe, flying under the Ethiopian flag.
Several countries have warships patrolling the gulf amid growing international concern about piracy.
Meanwhile, US Defence Secretary Robert Gates said better intelligence was needed for a land attack on pirate bases to be considered.
Mr Gates, speaking at a security conference in Bahrain, also called for shipping companies to do more to protect their vessels travelling through the Arabian Sean and Indian Ocean.
The Indian government said in a statement that the captured pirates had a cache of arms and equipment, including seven AK-47 assault rifles, three machine guns, and a rocket-propelled grenade launcher.
The pirates would be handed over to the appropriate authorities, the statement added.
Last month, India's navy said it had sunk a pirate ``mother vessel'' off Somalia.
But it later emerged that the vessel was actually a Thai fishing trawler that had been seized by pirates off Yemen.
Mr Gates told the security conference:
``The need for increased maritime security and potentially new and better means of co-operation has been highlighted by the recent high-profile acts of piracy off the coast of Somalia and in the Gulf of Aden.
Robert Gates called for companies to protect their ships better
``As with terrorism, piracy is a problem that has serious international implications and should be of particular concern to any nation that depends on the seas for commerce.''
Mr Gates said most ships could outrun the pirates and they should take more preventative measures, like pulling up their ladders when at sea and perhaps placing armed guards on board.
When asked by the BBC if the US intended to attack the pirates' land bases, Mr Gates replied that the US and its allies would first need to acquire better intelligence on who is behind the ongoing attacks on shipping.
He said he believed that just two or three Somali clans were responsible and that the individuals involved needed to be targeted accurately to avoid killing innocent civilians.
An arsonist has badly damaged the church attended by the Governor of Alaska, Sarah Palin, and she has apologised if the fire was connected to ``undeserved negative attention'' from her failed campaign as the Republican vice-presidential nominee.
No one was hurt in the fire on Friday night although a handful of people, including two children, were inside the Wasilla Bible Church, said the Central Mat-Su fire chief, James Steele.
Ms Palin visited the church on Saturday.
Her spokesman, Bill McAllister, said, ``Whatever the motives of the arsonist, the Governor has faith in the scriptural passage that what was intended for evil will in some way be used for good.''
Mr Steele said the blaze was being treated as arson, but he did not know of any threats to the church.
Authorities also did not know whether Mrs Palin's connection to the church was relevant to the fire.
``It's hard to say at this point.
Everything is just speculation,'' he said.
``We have no information on intent or motive.''
Damage to the church was estimated at $US1 million ($1.52 million), authorities said.
Mr Steele said the fire was lit at the entrance and moved inward as a small group of women were working on crafts.
A fire alarm alerted them to the fire.
Firefighters fought the blaze in temperatures of minus 17 degrees.
The pastor, Larry Kroon, declined to say whether the church had received any recent threats.
``There are so many variables,'' he said.
``I don't want to comment in that direction.''
The 1000-member evangelical church was the subject of scrutiny after Mrs Palin was named John McCain's Republican Party running mate.
Early in her campaign, the church was criticised for promoting a Focus on the Family ``Love Won Out Conference'' in Anchorage.
It promised to ``help men and women dissatisfied with living homosexually understand that same-sex attractions can be overcome''.
Wasilla, Mrs Palin's home town, is 64 kilometres north of Anchorage.
The Wasilla Bible Church, the Alaskan church made famous as being the religious outpost for failed VP candidate and Alaska Governor Sarah Palin has caught fire.
The ``suspicious'' fire devastated the church Friday night, and officials are considering arson among possibilities.
A ladies craft group was in the building when the fire broke out, although no one was hurt.
Palin released a statement after the fire and offered an apology to the assistant pastor ``if the incident is in any way connected to the undeserved negative attention the church has received since she became a vice presidential candidate.''
Burn baby, burn?
Estimated damage is in the vicinity of $1 million.
Authorities are now saying they suspect arson is to blame for Friday night's fire at Wasilla Bible Church, where Gov. Sarah Palin and her family attend.
It's a sad day when the hate, anger and vengeful actions of a few overshadow our people here in Alaska.
We don't know if the fire is the result of radicals angry with Palin, but we do know our governor has not been treated fairly.
For months I have been reading the lies about our first family of Alaska.
I had to endure watching on TV an appalling effigy of Gov. Palin, part of a Halloween display in a yard in Southern California.
The governor of California did nothing, the mayor did nothing, and the neighbors thought it was ``cool.''
This effigy was a likeness of a woman swinging by a noose in someone's yard!
Where was the outrage?
Then there are those who have blasted the governor for her daughter's pregnancy.
Both have been brutally criticized, belittled and shamed. 
Children will do what they want as teenagers;
we parents try our best to instill good morals and values.
Palin's daughter's upbringing has nothing to do with who our governor is or what she believes.
I was appalled to hear comments like, ``Well, she put herself in the limelight, so she deserved what she got.''
There have also been those who have asked if the governor is really Trig's mom?
Where has the fair and balanced reporting been on that ``story''?
It is one thing to disagree with Sarah Palin's views or beliefs, but to tear her and her family apart to make you feel more superior, to make you feel good about your hatred, anger and lack of Christianity, that is appalling.
I do hope Palin's church was not torched because of her beliefs.
She and her family have never done anything to warrant the outlandish actions from her insensitive critics.
A church was devastated by fire, which was attended by Alaska Gov. Sarah Palin on Friday night in her hometown of Wasilla.
According to the church's minister, ``We have no idea what caused it''.
Still, it was not specified that how many people were in the building at the time of the blaze.
The metal church building, which normally accommodates Sunday congregations of up to 1,000 people, was heavily damaged by flames and smoke.
The church services would be held on schedule Sunday in a nearby school.
The Wasilla Bible Church in Wasilla, Alaska was apparently attacked by an arsonist last night.
The fire, which broke out when several people were inside the church, did an estimated $1 million damage.
Authorities described the fire as ``suspicious and as potential arson.''
The Bible Church's head minister said, ``Someone intentionally did it, but we don't know who and why.''
He declined to say whether the church has received threats.
Governor Palin stopped by the church this morning and ``told an assistant pastor that she apologizes if the incident is in any way connected to the undeserved negative attention the church has received since she became a vice presidential candidate.''
Given the insane hatred that Democrats directed toward Palin during the recent campaign, it would be easy to jump to the conclusion that the arson is the work of a liberal Democrat.
But we don't know that for sure.
There are many possible motives, and arsonists don't necessarily need what would normally be regarded as a motive.
It would be a good thing for the country if this particular crime does not turn out to be politically motivated.
Wasilla Bible Church, the home church of Alaska Gov. Sarah Palin and her family, received an estimated $1 million in damage from a fire that was deliberately set Friday night.
No one was injured, but several people, including two children, were inside the church when the blaze started.
Palin spokesman Bill McAllister said that Palin told an assistant pastor she was sorry if the fire was related to the ``undeserved negative attention'' the church had received since she became the Republican vice presidential candidate earlier this year.
``Whatever the motives of the arsonist, the governor has faith in the scriptural passage that what was intended for evil will in some way be used for good,'' McAllister added.
Sarah Palin's home church has had a million dollars damage done to it as it was set alight by suspected arsonists.
No one was injured when the blaze hit the Wasilla Bible Church.
Palin has apologised if it was connected with her campaign due to ``undeserved negative attention''.
The fire chief has said an investigation is underway noting that there hadn't been any recent threats to the church.
Authorities are unsure if there is a relevant connection between the fire and Sarah Palin's campaign.
Palin's Church Damaged In Suspicious Fire
Authorities estimate the damages to the Wasilla Bible Church at $1 million.
No one was injured in the fire last night, which was intentionally set while people, including two children, were inside.
The local fire chief says the fire ``is definitely suspicious.''
Pastor Larry Kroon declined to say if the blaze was politically based or directed at Palin, the failed Republican vice presidential candidate.
He also declined to say whether the church has received any recent threats.
Palin stopped by the church this morning.
Her spokesman, Bill McAllister, says Palin told an assistant pastor she apologizes if the fire was connected to the ``undeserved negative attention'' the church has received since she became the vice presidential candidate on Aug. 29.
Alaska Gov. sarah palin's home church has been badly damaged in an arson fire.
Damages to the Wasilla Bible Church are estimated at $1 million.
The fire chief says the fire ``is definitely suspicious.''
No one was hurt.
Sarah Palin's family will have to attend church in a local school this morning after a fire ripped through her church on Friday evening.
The fire, estimated to have caused $1 million in damages to the Wasilla Bible Church, has been labeled ``suspicious'' by James Steele, chief of the Central Mat-Su Fire Department.
Steele told the Anchorage Daily News that investigators are looking at the cause of the blaze as ``potential arson'' and said it was too early to link the fire to the exposure the church received as a result of Palin's vice-presidential run.
``Right now there's no indication that we have that there's any connection there.
We just don't have any leads at all as far as the intent or motive in this,'' Steele said.
The fire, the largest of the year for the department, ``was was set at the entrance of the church'' according to the Associated Press and was battled by firefighters for nearly eight hours before it was fully extinguished.
Reports are that five women were inside the building at the time of the fire.
No one was injured.
Governor Palin visited the church on Saturday and her office later released a statement.
``Gov. Palin stopped by the church this morning, and she told an assistant pastor that she apologizes if the incident is in any way connected to the undeserved negative attention the church has received since she became a vice-presidential candidate on Aug. 29.
Whatever the motives of the arsonist, the governor has faith in the scriptural passage that what was intended for evil will in some way be used for good.''
Palin is in Juneau today, but the Anchorage Daily News said her children were planning on attending services at the makeshift church.
An overnight fire Friday at Alaska Gov. Sarah Palin's home church caused an estimated $1 million in damage, and investigators say it could be the work of an arsonist.
Firefighters were called to Wasilla Bible Church in Wasilla, Alaska, about 9:40 p.m. Friday and found flames and smoke coming out windows at the back of the three-story structure, said James Steele, chief of the Central Mat-Su Fire Department.
Alaska Gov. Sarah Palin, her husband Todd and up to 1,000 fellow parishioners will worship in a local school this morning after a suspicious fire virtually destroyed the Wasilla Bible Church early Saturday.
The Rev. Larry Kroon said some parishioners were in the church on Nicola Avenue at the time the fire was noticed but no one was injured.
Firefighters baAlaska Republican governor and GOP vice presidential candidate Sarah Palin whose church was burned Saturday by suspected arsonttled for about eight hours in minus-20 degree temperatures to completely extinguish the blaze that began at the front door.
The former Republican vice presidential candidate went to the church Saturday to apologize to pastors in case the estimated $1 million fire damages, suspected as arson, were ``in any way connected to the undeserved negative attention the church has received'' since the governor's involvement with John McCain's presidential campaign.
The 30-year-old congregation in Wasilla, about 40 miles north of Anchorage, had moved into its new church just 30 months ago.
Church officials said they expect to hold services at the Wasilla Middle School for the foreseeable future during repairs.
Authorities suspect arson is the cause of a fire that caused an estimated $1 million in damage to Gov. Sarah Palin's church, reports this morning's Anchorage Daily News.
Firefighters were called to Wasilla Bible Church about 9:40 p.m. and found flames and smoke coming out windows at the back of the three-story structure, said James Steele, chief of the Central Mat-Su Fire Department.
Five women, and possibly a couple of children, were inside the church working on crafts, but everyone got out safely after a fire alarm alerted them to trouble, Steele said.
It was the biggest fire the department has seen this year, and Steele said as many as 35 to 40 volunteer firefighters came from across the region to battle the blaze.
A fire that caused more than $1 million in damage to Alaska Gov. Sarah Palin's church in Wasilla, Alaska, may have been set by an arsonist, investigators say .
Flames and smoke were coming from the Wasilla Bible Church Friday evening when as many as 30 to 40 volunteer firefighters arrived at the three-story structure, and officials said Saturday they were treating the fire as a possible arson, the Anchorage Daily News reported Sunday.
``We are definitely treating it as suspicious and as potential arson at this point,'' James Steele, chief of the Central Mat-Su Fire Department, told the newspaper, adding nothing so far suggests any political motivation for the fire.
``Right now there's no indication that we have that there's any connection there,'' he said.
``We just don't have any leads at all as far as the intent or motive in this.''
``We have no idea what caused it,'' the Rev. Larry Kroon of the Wasilla Bible Church told CNN.
Palin apologized to church's assistant pastor Saturday if the fire was connected to her Republican U.S. vice-presidential candidacy, a statement from her office said.
Arson is suspected in the burning of the church former vice presidential candidate Sarah Palin attends.
She visited the church after the fire to apologize for any tie in with her recent national political exposure.
A ladies' crafts group was meeting in the church at the time of the fire.
``We have no idea what caused it,'' the Rev. Larry Kroon of the Wasilla Bible Church said Saturday, adding that investigators were considering arson and other possible causes.
Damage to the Wasilla Bible Church was estimated at $1 million, authorities said Saturday.
No one was injured in the fire, which was presumably set Friday night while a handful of people, including two children, were inside, according to Fire Chief James Steele.
A ``suspicious'' fire devastated the church attended by Alaska Gov. and former vice presidential candidate Sarah Palin on Friday night in her hometown of Wasilla, the church's minister said.
Alaska Gov. Sarah Palin reportedly apologized for the possibility the fire was related to her nomination.
``We have no idea what caused it,'' the Rev.
Larry Kroon of the Wasilla Bible Church said Saturday, adding that investigators were considering arson and other possible causes.
A ladies' craft group was in the building when the fire broke out, but they got out safely, Kroon said.
``No one was hurt,'' he said.
Central Mat-Su Fire Department Chief James Steele said the department was ``treating it as suspicious and as potential arson at this point'' but did not elaborate, The Anchorage Daily News reported.
The newspaper said Palin released a statement after the fire in which she said she stopped by the church Saturday morning and offered an apology to the assistant pastor ``if the incident is in any way connected to the undeserved negative attention the church has received since she became a vice presidential candidate.''
Steele said that as many as 40 firefighters from his and neighboring departments fought the blaze, which started about 9:40 p.m. Friday (1:40 a.m. ET Saturday).
Firefighters were on the scene dealing with hot spots until about 5 a.m. Saturday, the Anchorage Daily News reported.
The metal church building, which normally accommodates Sunday congregations of up to 1,000 people, was heavily damaged by flames and smoke, Kroon said.
``The fire investigators and insurance people are there now.
There's definitely a lot of damage.
I've heard the figure of $1 million, but I don't know for sure,'' he said.
Kroon said he was not at the church when the fire broke out and would not discuss what any of the church members who were there had reported to him.
He would not specify how many people were in the building at the time of the blaze.
``They were all adults, and they all got out.
We're trying not to talk about specifics while investigators are still working on finding out what happened.''
Kroon said the nondenominational church, which he described as ``just a local community church,'' is about 30 years old and the church building itself is about 2 years old.
The pastor said church services would be held on schedule Sunday in a nearby school.
Gov. Sarah Palin's home church was badly damaged by arson, leading Ms. Palin to apologize if the fire was connected to `undeserved negative attention' the church received during her campaign as the Republican vice-presidential nominee.
Damage to the Wasilla Bible Church was estimated at $1 million, authorities said Saturday.
No one was injured in the fire, which was set Friday night while a handful of people, including two children, were inside, according to the Central Mat-Su fire chief, James Steele.
Chief Steele said that the blaze was being investigated as an arson but that he did not know of any recent threats to the church.
The authorities also did not know whether Ms. Palin's connection to the church was relevant to the fire, he said.
Chief Steele would not comment on the means used to set the fire.
The church's pastor, Larry Kroon, declined to say whether the church had received any recent threats.
Ms. Palin, who was not at the church at the time of the fire, stopped by Saturday.
Her spokesman, Bill McAllister, said in a statement that the Alaska governor told an assistant pastor she was sorry if the fire was connected to her candidacy.
``Whatever the motives of the arsonist,'' Mr. McAllister said, ``the governor has faith in the scriptural passage that what was intended for evil will in some way be used for good.''
The 1,000-member evangelical church was the subject of intense scrutiny after Ms. Palin was named Senator John McCain's running mate.
Early in her campaign, the church was criticized for promoting in a Sunday bulletin a Focus on the Family ``Love Won Out Conference'' in Anchorage.
The conference promised to ``help men and women dissatisfied with living homosexually understand that same-sex attractions can be overcome.''
The fire was set at the entrance of the church and moved inward as a small group of women were working on crafts, Chief Steele said.
The group was alerted to the fire by an alarm.
Outside temperatures were minus 20 as firefighters battled the blaze.
Gov. Sarah Palin's home church has been badly damaged in a suspicious fire.
Larry Kroon, pastor of the Wasilla Bible Church, estimates damages at more than $1 million to the church.
Kroon declined to say if the blaze was politically based or directed at Palin, the failed Republican vice presidential candidate.
Kroon says the fire broke out Friday night while a small group of women were working on crafts.
They were alerted to the blaze by a fire alarm.
Kroon says he was called and by the time he got to the church, smoke was pouring out of the building.
Sprinklers kept the fire from spreading beyond offices and classrooms.
Authorities are not immediately commenting, but Kroon says he's been told the fire is being investigated as a crime.
Sarah Palin's church in Wasilla, Alaska went up in flames this weekend.
The fire started Friday night while a handful of people, including a women's craft group and two children, were inside Wasilla Bible Church.
No one was hurt.
The blaze is being investigated as an arson.
On Saturday, the Alaska Governor said she apologizes if the incident was in any way connected to ``undeserved negative attention'' brought on by her failed bid for the vice presidency of the United States.
Authorities believe the fire was set at the entrance of the building and moved inward before setting off a fire alarm.
Damage to the church is estimated at one-million dollars.
Providentially, nobody was injured, but an estimated one million dollars in damage was done to Wasilla Bible Church Friday night, in a fire that began while people, including children, were inside.
Providentially, nobody was injured, but an estimated one million dollars in damage was done to Wasilla Bible Church Friday night, in a fire that began while people, including children, were inside.
The fire is being investigated as a possible case of arson.
This would not fit Bill Ayers' definition of terrorism, since no one was killed.
More like protest that just went a little too far in a matter of mere youthful excess.
The Governor of Alaska has apologized if ``undeserved attention'' focused on Wasilla Bible Church caused haters to set a fire there.
The American people were treated to far more media attention on Sarah Palin's church than on Barack Obama's involvement in corrupt Illinois politics.
The congregants of Wasilla Bible Church have our deep sympathy.
If this is arson, it is a monstrous crime.
Can you imagine the media outcry if arson were suspected to have caused a million dollars worth of arson damage to Trinity United Church of Christ?
Sarah Palin actually apologized after the evangelical church she attends was nearly destroyed by arsonists -- all because she still harbors guilt over her failed VP run.
Officials estimated the fire caused around $1 million in damage to the Wasilla Bible Church -- which Sarah hoped wasn't in connection to the ``undeserved negative attention'' from her failed campaign, according to the Sun Times News Group.
The police have no leads at this time -- and John McCain has not been named as a suspect.
The church Alaska Gov.Sarah Palin attends was badly damaged by fire Friday night, and investigators suspect arson.
Palin, who was also the Republican vice presidential candidate, apologized if the fire was in any way connected to the attention the church received during the campaign.
The fire caused more than $1 million in damages, the Anchorage Daily News reported.
Firefighters were called to the blaze at around 9:40 p.m.
Friday night. 
The arrived to find smoke and flames coming out of the windows at the back of the three-story building.
Five adult women and possibly two children were inside the church, but escaped unharmed, Central Mat-Su Fire Department Chief James Steele told reporters.
It took about 40 volunteer firefighters to knock down the blaze, Steele said.
Fire and police units are still at the scene of a fire which gutted a Waitrose supermarket in Surrey.
More than 50 firefighters tackled the blaze at the store in High Street, Banstead, which broke out on the roof at about 2045 GMT on Friday.
Sixty residents were moved from their homes, while premises nearby suffered smashed windows and smoke damage.
No-one was injured in the fire, which is being treated by police as ``potentially suspicious''.
Roads in the area were closed until about 1630 GMT on Saturday.
The alarm was raised after a CCTV operator noticed smoke coming from the roof.
A statement from Waitrose said damage to the building had been extensive but the store would be rebuilt.
Surrey Police said firefighters, along with two fire tenders, and police officers would remain at the scene until Monday.
A fire that ripped through a Waitrose store in Surrey is being treated as ``potentially suspicious'', police said.
More than 50 firefighters tackled the blaze which began on the roof of the supermarket in Banstead, and residents nearby were evacuated as a precaution.
Police said: ``The fire progressed rapidly through the store which is almost totally destroyed.
It is being treated as potentially suspicious''.
A Waitrose store was reduced to ruins after a blaze being treated by police as ``potentially suspicious''.
More than 50 firefighters with 10 fire engines fought the blaze which virtually destroyed the store in Banstead, Surrey.
It broke out in the roof at around 9pm on Friday, forcing a number of residents living nearby to be temporarily evacuated.
A Surrey Police spokeswoman said: ``The fire has progressed rapidly through the store which is almost totally destroyed.
It is being treated as potentially suspicious.''
Anyone with information is asked to call police on 0845 125 2222 or Crimestoppers anonymously on 0800 555 111.
Police are treating a fire which has destroyed a Waitrose supermarket in Banstead in Surrey as ``potentially suspicious''.
More than 50 firefighters have been trying to control the fire which broke out in the roof of the building.
Peter Guest, Assistant Chief Fire Officer at Surrey Fire and Rescue Service says the building is ``a total loss''.
A Waitrose supermarket in Surrey has been destroyed in a fire.
People living near the store on High Street in Banstead were made to leave their homes, and surrounding roads were closed, police said.
More than 50 firefighters tackled the blaze, which broke out on the roof of the supermarket at about 2045 GMT.
Assistant chief fire officer Peter Guest described the building as a ``total loss''.
Police are treating the fire as ``potentially suspicious''.
``The fire grew very rapidly and there was a large explosion and the fire then grew in intensity and scale to such a point that the building would be impossible to save,'' Mr Guest said.
``The crews have worked extremely hard ... to protect the surrounding buildings to ensure that this fire didn't spread further, but I'm afraid the building here is a total loss.''
Mr Guest added that no-one had been injured in what was a serious incident.
The alarm was raised after a CCTV operator noticed smoke coming from the roof.
A Surrey Police spokeswoman said: ``The fire has progressed rapidly through the store which is almost totally destroyed.
``People are asked to avoid the High Street area if at all possible.''
An investigation is taking place into the cause of the fire, which was still burning and being tackled by firefighters on Saturday morning.
A statement from Waitrose said damage to the building had been extensive but the store would be rebuilt.
``We have made available a distress fund for local residents and staff affected, and regret any inconvenience caused to them as well as the wider community and traders,'' it added.
Ten fire engines were tackling the last of the blaze which began on the roof of the store in Banstead, Surrey, before 9.
Residents nearby were evacuated as a precaution.
A Surrey Police spokeswoman said tonight: ``Surrey Police and Surrey Fire and Rescue are currently at the scene of a large fir e at a Waitrose Store in High Street, Banstead, which is being treated as potentially suspicious.''
``Police were alerted to a fire on the roof at 8.49pm this evening.
``The fire has progressed rapidly through the store which is almost totally destroyed.
``Local road closures close to the high street have been put in place and residents living close to the fire are currently being evacuated.
``Around 10 fire service pumps are in attendance at the scene.
No one is believed to be injured at this time.''
``People are asked to avoid the high street area if at all possible.''
Anyone with information is asked to call police on 0845 125 2222 or Crimestoppers anonymously on 0800 555 111.
Residents evacuated from their homes after a huge fire at a Waitrose store in Banstead on Friday night have been allowed to return to their homes.
Around 60 people spent the evening at a local day care centre after being evacuated from their homes near the supermarket in the High Street.
They were initially sent to Banstead Baptist Church after the blaze broke out about 8.40pm.
Police said they wanted to thank residents and local businesses for their patience and assistance during the evacuation.
The alarm was raised after a CCTV operator noticed smoke coming from the roof of the store.
High winds meant the fire spread rapidly through the Waitrose, which was almost totally destroyed.
Other premises suffered some damage, such as smashed windows and smoke damage.
The fire was still burning on Saturday morning.
Investigators have since been sifting through the rubble to find the cause of the fire, which police have said they are treating as ``potentially suspicious.''
Many nearby roads were cordoned off and police said on Saturday they were likely to remain closed for some time.
Anyone with any information about the fire is asked to contact Surrey Police on 0845 125 2222 or Crimestoppers anonymously on 0800 555111.
A HUGE fire has almost totally destroyed a Waitrose store in Banstead.
Fire crews and police officers were called to the High Street premises shortly before 9pm on Friday after a CCTV operator noticed smoke coming from the building's roof.
The blaze, which is being treated by police as ``potentially suspicious'', spread quickly through the store as the flames were fanned by high winds.
Sixty local residents had to be evacuated from their homes, initially to a nearby church and later to a local day care centre, but they had all been allowed to return by Saturday evening.
A police spokeswoman said other premises suffered smashed windows and smoke damage.
Roads around the area, including Banstead High Street itself, were closed for some time, but the spokeswoman said they were all reopened by 4.30pm on Saturday.
She added: ``The focus for today [Saturday] has been to maximise the safety of the public, minimise disruption to the community and return normality to the area.
``Surrey Police would particularly like to thank the local community and those local groups and individuals who've worked alongside the emergency services to look after the welfare of personnel and members of the community affected.''
A statement from Waitrose said: ``Damage to the building is extensive, however it is too early to confirm the cause.
No-one has been injured.
``The store will be rebuilt ... we will be in a position to understand how long that might take once the full extent of damage has been assessed.
``We have made available a distress fund for local residents and staff affected, and regret any inconvenience caused to them as well as the wider community and traders.''
Fire and police units were due to remain at the scene until at least Monday.
Anyone with any information about the fire is asked to contact Surrey Police on 0845 125 2222, or call Crimestoppers anonymously on 0800 555111.
A huge fire has destroyed the Waitrose store in Banstead High Street.
The fire, which is being treated as suspicious, broke out in the roof of the store at 8.49pm on Friday night and quickly spread to the rest of the building.
Dozens of people were evacuated from their homes and spent the night in a nearby church and day care centre.
They began returning to their properties at 10am today, Saturday.
The fire was spotted by a CCTV operator who saw smoke coming from the roof of the building.
High winds meant the flames quickly spread throughout the building.
Fire crews brought the blaze under control within the store late last night, but it is expected to continue burning for some hours yet.
Police and firefighters remain at the scene this morning.
Roads in the immediate area are expected to remain closed for a number of hours, and police have urged people to stay away from the scene.
Other properties in the area suffered damage in the blaze, including broken windows.
At this stage, nobody is thought to have been injured and anybody with information is asked to call police on 0845 125 2222.
Police have thanked residents for their 'patience and assistance' during the evacuation.
A supermarket in Surrey has been completely destroyed after a fire broke out on Friday night.
A statement from Surrey police said the blaze at the Waitrose store on the High Street in Banstead was being treated as ``potentially suspicious''.
Officers were alerted to the fire on the roof of the store at 20:49 GMT on Friday.
The blaze then progressed rapidly through the supermarket, leaving it almost totally destroyed.
Police claim that local residents have been evacuated and local road closures have been put in place.
No-one is believed to have been injured in the incident, which saw more than 50 firefighters tackle the blaze.
Assistant chief fire officer Peter Guest admitted it was impossible to save the building due to the extent of the damage.
``The fire grew very rapidly and there was a large explosion and the fire then grew in intensity and scale to such a point that the building would be impossible to save,'' he said.
``The crews have worked extremely hard ... to protect the surrounding buildings to ensure that this fire didn't spread further, but I'm afraid the building here is a total loss.''
Police are appealing for anyone with any information relating to the fire to contact them on 0845 125 222 or Crimestoppers on 0800 555111.
Two possible gang members are under arrest for the assassination-style murder of a Los Angeles County sheriff's deputy outside his house in a gang-plagued section of the city last summer, police said Saturday.
Guillermo Hernandez, 20, and Carlos Velasquez, 24, were arrested Friday and were being held without bail in a Los Angeles Police jail, charged with killing Juan Abel Escalante last summer, said Chief of Detectives Charlie Beck.
The suspects are members of the Avenues Gang, a violent group that has long claimed as its turf the low-income Cypress Park area northeast of Dodger Stadium, according to the Los Angeles Times.
But police chief William J. Bratton, eager to protect his case, would not confirm the reported gang links.
Escalante was shot outside his boyhood home in the 3400 block of Thorpe Street in Cypress Park while on his way to work at the Men's Central Jail early Aug. 2.
Bratton said Escalante was loading a car seat into the family's car when his wife, Celeste, heard gun shots and saw her husband on the ground.
Police earlier confirmed that Escalante was shot in his head from behind and may never have seen his murderer.
Bratton asked for the public's help in providing additional information now that the suspects' names were made public.
The city had offered a $75,000 in the case, and the county Board of Supervisors added another $20,000 to that pot.
At an afternoon news conference at Parker Center, police offered almost no details about the arrests and Bratton specifically declined to confirm reports of the suspects' gang affiliation.
A filing with the district attorney's office was expected on Monday, and officials said releasing details in advance of the filing could put the case at risk.
Bratton asked anyone with information to call 877-LAPD-24-7 (527-3247).
Two possible gang members were arrested in the fatal shooting of a sheriff's deputy who was murdered as he was gettingready to go to work, officials announced Saturday.
Two male gang members whose names remain unreleased were arrested last night in the case of the murder of Los Angeles County Sheriff's Deputy Juan Abel Escalante which took place outside his Cypress Park home this August 2nd as he prepared to leave for work.
According to the LA Times, ``investigators have had a difficult time determining a motive for Escalante's killing,'' however after working on the case at great length the team of detectives from both the LAPD's robbery-homicide department and the LA County Sheriff's Homicide Bureau isolated two members of the Avenues gang.
It is possible that the murder took place due to the ongoing tension between the Avenues and the Cypress Park gang, which runs the area where Escalante lived, as opposed to Escalante being a specific target due to his work at the Men's Central Jail.
The 27-year-old Escalante ``was shot in the back of the head and never saw the assailants coming.''
He had been a deputy for less than 3 years when he was murdered.
A 61-year-old man was charged with first-degree murder Saturday after allegedly opening fire at his former employers' office Christmas party in Vancouver, killing one man, police said.
Constable Tim Fanning said Eric Allen Kirkpatrick, who had recently been fired from his job, is accused of fatally shooting Benjamin David Banky, 40.
Fanning said at least a dozen people were at the party when the gunman entered about 4 p.m.
All but Kirkpatrick escaped without injury.
``Police locked down the neighborhood and negotiated with the suspect, who gave himself up to police just after 6: 00 p.m.,'' Fanning said in a statement.
The business at the location of the shooting is listed as TallGrass Distribution Ltd., a natural health product supplier.
A Vancouver man has been charged with first-degree murder after a killing at an office party.
Police allege Eric Allen Kirkpatrick, 61, opened fire at a Vancouver office Christmas party Friday, killing one man.
Const. Tim Fanning told a news conference today a man walked into the party with a firearm and shot one person dead immediately.
Police have identified the victim as Benjamin David Banky, 40, of Vancouver.
Twelve other people managed to leave the office while police began two hours of negotiations with a suspect.
Fanning says the incident was extremely traumatic for witnesses.
A former employee recently let go from his job opened fire at an office Christmas party yesterday, killing one person.
Vancouver Police say the disgruntled man burst into the workplace during the party and opened fire.
``The suspect, a 61-year-old man, entered the business, which had at least a dozen people inside enjoying a Christmas party,'' police said in a statement.
Police Const. Tim Fanning said the gunman came in around 4 p.m. local time.
One man was shot and killed but the other partygoers managed to escape and no one else was injured.
``Police locked down the neighbourhood and negotiated with the suspect, who gave himself up to police just after 6 p.m.,'' Fanning said in the statement.
The business at the location of the shooting is listed at TallGrass Distribution Ltd., a natural health product supplier.
State police say a bomb exploded at an Oregon bank after it was evacuated and at least one bomb technician was injured.
TheOregonian newspaper quotes a federal spokesman confirming that a bomb detonated at West Coast Bank in Woodburn.
The spokesman for the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives also said at least one bomb technician had been injured.
TheOregonianreports the bank had been evacuated before the bomb detonated.
Employees at a Vancouver wholesaler were coping Saturday with the death of their boss, who was gunned down at their office Christmas party.
A man facing murder charges in a Christmas party shooting was on suicide watch Monday as friends and family of paid glowing tribute to his alleged victim.
Those who knew Benjamin David Banky, 40, were still in shock three days after he was gunned down during what was supposed to be a Christmas celebration at his office.
His accused killer, Eric Kirkpatrick, made a brief appearance in Vancouver provincial court Monday on a charge of first-degree murder.
Banky was CEO of TallGrass Distribution Ltd., a wholesaler of natural health products, which remained closed Monday.
``He was incredibly bright, a very caring person and incredibly family-oriented,'' said Nancy O'Higgins, a longtime family friend.
O'Higgins and her husband Eric, both retired journalists, knew Ben as a baby because they worked in the media in Ontario with Ben's father Jake before both families moved west, six months apart.
The O'Higgins' attended Ben's wedding a couple of years ago on Hornby Island, one of the Gulf Islands where his parents now live.
``They weren't married very long, just a couple of years.''
She said Ben and his wife grew up as neighbours on Hornby Island.
``That was how Ben and Linda knew each other.''
Ben attended school in his early years in White Rock but got most of his education in Victoria where his father worked for Broadcast News, which is now The Canadian Press.
She said he travelled to China for awhile, where he studied Mandarin and was quite fluent.
``I was so incredibly impressed that he spoke Mandarin that that really stuck in my head,'' said O'Higgins.
John Banky, Ben's older brother, spoke briefly from the parents' home Monday, alluding to his brother's musical abilities.
``He spoke a few languages and could play any instrument made by man,'' said his brother.
While the family tried to deal with the loss, Kirkpatrick made a brief appearance in court.
His lawyer, Richard Fowler, told the court his client is on suicide watch at the North Fraser Pretrial Centre in Port Coquitlam.
Fowler described conditions at the centre as unacceptable, saying his client is double-bunked with a man who is withdrawing from a drug addiction and the cell is cold.
Much of B.C. is in the grips of a cold spell, with unusually cold temperatures in the Vancouver area that are well below freezing.
Kirkpatrick, who has long grey hair flowing down to his shoulders and a long grey beard, was dressed in red, prison-issue coveralls.
He stood quietly in the prisoner's box listening to the proceedings.
The sixty-one-year-old was arrested Friday, not long after Banky was shot to death.
Outside court, Fowler said Kirkpatrick is ``not doing very well.''
``He is placed in a double bunk with somebody who is withdrawing from drugs.
He cannot sleep.
It's freezing cold.
The problem is that these institutions are too full.''
``He's presumed innocent and he should be treated better.''
Lon Wood, another retired Victoria journalist who knew Ben's father from their days working in Victoria, said he met Ben and the other children through their parents.
``They are a very close family.''
John Paul Fraser of National Public Relations, which is working for TallGrass, said the family is not speaking publicly yet.
At a weekend news conference, city police spokesman Const. 
Tim Fanning said Kirkpatrick had been let go from TallGrass on Thursday.
Fanning didn't know how long the suspect had worked at the business.
The other people at the office party were able to escape without injury, Fanning said.
``The shock was tremendous but all the other people in the business - and a dozen other people who were there for a Christmas party - managed to get out safely,'' Fanning said.
The shocked party-goers were put on buses and taken to police headquarters where witness statements were taken, he said.
He said counsellors have been made available to them.
A former employee who opened fire at an office Christmas party and killed one man has been charged with first-degree murder, police said Saturday.
Constable Tim Fanning allege the recently- fired man, Eric Allen Kirkpatrick, 61, opened fire at a Vancouver office Friday, killing Benjamin David Banky, 40.
Fanning said the gunman entered the party of at least a dozen people around 4 p.m.
One man was shot and killed but the other partygoers managed to escape and no one else was injured.
``Police 'locked down' the neighborhood and negotiated with the suspect, who gave himself up to police just after 6 p.m.,'' Fanning said in a statement.
The business at the location of the shooting is listed as TallGrass Distribution Ltd., a natural health product supplier.
Luke Pigeon, who lives in an apartment building next door, said he didn't hear a gunshot but heard noise outside his window.
``It wasn't typical, crazy noise that sometimes happens.
You got the feeling there was something definitely, definitely wrong,'' Pigeon told The Canadian Press.
He looked out his window and saw someone fleeing the building next door.
``All of a sudden in my front yard there were five totally decked out, geared up riot squad officers with guns out of the holster, aiming at the second floor of the building right beside us,'' Pigeon said.
After two hours, he said, the gunman gave himself up and police cuffed him.
One man is dead after being shot by a gunman who marched into a company Christmas party Friday night.
Vancouver police have arrested a 61-year-old former employee after the shooting at Tallgrass Distributors Ltd., an organic supplements and health product store in the Mount Pleasant neighbourhood near downtown Vancouver.
``A man who apparently had just been let go from his job there came in, shot and killed another man,'' Vancouver police Const.
Tim Fanning told a news conference.
``There was at least a dozen other people on the scene.
They managed to get out.
``Our negotiators got on the phone with him right away, and fortunately were able to talk him down from his very, very excited and upset state.''
Fanning said no one else was injured.
Offices around the neighbourhood were shut down during the police standoff that lasted two hours before the gunman gave himself up.
Staff at Fiji Island Auto, across the street from the building where the shooting took place, were told at 5: 30 p.m. local time to leave the premises.
John Christie, head of house production for Paperny Films, located down the street, said they were planning to hold an office party upstairs when someone heard shots fired.
``We have been asked by the police to stay away from the windows and we've been forced to go downstairs,'' Christie said.
A former employee walked into a staff Christmas party at an east Vancouver health products business Friday and shot and killed a man, according to police.
Police said they were called to Tallgrass Distributors Ltd., in the central Mount Pleasant neighbourhood, where a man carrying a firearm had confronted the crowd.
``A man who apparently had just been let go from his job there came in, shot and killed another man,'' Vancouver police Const. Tim Fanning told a news conference.
``There was at least a dozen other people on the scene.
They managed to get out.
``Our negotiators got on the phone with him right away, and fortunately were able to talk him down from his very, very excited and upset state.''
After two hours a 61-year-old man surrendered and was arrested.
Fanning couldn't say if anyone else was in the building at the time, but said no one else was injured.
Nigel Hacker said he looked outside his nearby office at about 4:20 p.m. to see the street cordoned off.
``There was someone in the building and they were trying to get him out,'' Hacker said.
``I tried not to listen.''
But he caught the tone of the conversation.
``It wasn't emotional from this end,'' he said.
``Everything seemed under control.
They did a great job.''
Down the street at Paperny Films, John Christie said employees were planning to hold an office party upstairs when someone heard shots fired and the police came knocking at their door.
``We have been asked by the police to stay away from the windows and we've been forced to go downstairs,'' Christie said.
``We're having an office party anyway so we're just staying out of the way, undercover.
If we're in a lockdown, at least we have beers and pizza.''
Christie said the police, who placed an undercover officer at Paperny's front door, weren't pleased when some office workers fled through the back alley to get home.
TallGrass claims it is the fastest-growing natural-health-product supplier to the Natural Health Industry in Canada.
It was originally called Tallgrass Hemp Company, and supplied a variety of products based on the hemp plant, including Body Dope, a line of hair- and skin-care products made with hemp and other botanicals.
A 61-year-old man in Canada is charged with first-degree murder in a deadly office Christmas party shooting.
Constable Tim Fanning says Eric Allen Kirkpatrick, who had recently been fired from his job in Vancouver, is accused of fatally shooting Benjamin David Banky.
Fanning says at least a dozen people were at the party when the gunman entered about 4 p.m.
Police locked down the neighborhood and Kirkpatrick gave up about two hours later.
The business at the location of the shooting is listed as TallGrass Distribution, a natural health product supplier.
A 61-year-old Vancouver man was charged yesterday in connection with the fatal shooting of his former boss at an office Christmas party.
Eric Allen Kirkpatrick faces one count of first-degree murder, Vancouver police said.
It was unclear when he would appear in court to answer to the charge.
The victim, Benjamin David Banky, 40, of Vancouver was gunned down Friday when a man showed up at the Christmas party with a gun.
The man ``had a firearm with him.
He shot one man fatally right away,'' said Vancouver police spokesperson Tim Fanning.
The business where the shooting occurred is listed as TallGrass Distribution Ltd., a natural health product supplier.
Kirkpatrick was let go by his employer last Thursday, Fanning said, but he did not know how long the suspect had worked at the business.
The other people at the office party were able to escape without injury, Fanning said.
``The shock was tremendous, but all the other people in the business - and there were another dozen other people who were there for a Christmas party - managed to get out safely,'' Fanning said.
Police were called immediately, and surrounded the building, Fanning said.
What followed was a tense two hours while police negotiated the suspect's exit from the building.
It's not known what kind of firearm was involved.
Luke Pigeon, who lives in an apartment next door, said he didn't hear a gunshot but saw a woman fleeing the building next door.
``All I saw was a ... lady running down the block screaming,'' Pigeon said.
He said she ran into a nearby auto repair shop where she apparently called for help. 
Police were on the scene within minutes.
A man has been charged with first-degree murder after a shooting at an office Christmas party in Vancouver Friday.
Police allege Eric Allen Kirkpatrick, 61, opened fire at the TallGrass Distribution Ltd Christmas party, killing Benjamin David Banky, 40.
Banky was the CEO of TallGrass Distribution Ltd., a natural health products company.
At least a dozen employees had been celebrating when the gunman, who had been recently laid off, entered the party and began firing a gun, according to Vancouver Police spokesperson Const. Tim Fanning.
The other partygoers managed to escape unharmed.
``The shock was tremendous but all the other people in the business - and there another dozen other people who were there for a Christmas party - managed to get out safely,'' Fanning said.
Police locked down the neighbourhood before the suspect turned himself in around 6 p.m.
Police said Kirkpatrick was let go on Dec. 11.
A resident who lives in a nearby apartment building told The Canadian Press that he did not hear gunshots, but saw a woman run from the party and into a nearby auto repair shop, where it appears she called for help.
``All of a sudden in my front yard there were five totally decked out, geared up riot squad officers with guns out of the holster, aiming at the second floor of the building right beside us,'' Luke Pigeon said.
``I tried to open up my door and they said close your door, lock your door.''
Mark Pinder told The Canadian Press that police ordered a group of film studio employees into the basement of their building, which was across the street from the party.
The group was just about to celebrate the completion of a project when police came knocking, he said.
``People grabbed a couple of bowls of chips and dip and we just sort of moved the party downstairs,'' Pinder said.
``Some people seemed quite concerned but there wasn't anyone freaking out or crying.
Everyone was calling their family and making sure that people knew they were OK.''
Pigeon said police spent about two hours negotiating with the suspect before bringing him into custody.
``They cuffed him on the ground and they took him into a cruiser,'' he said.
``He was giving them a bit of grief, he was saying that his cuffs hurt, but he was following orders.''
Employees who had been at the party at the time of the shooting are receiving counselling from the Vancouver police victim's services team.
``I cannot emphasize enough how traumatic this would have been for the people in there to see one of their co-workers gunned down, so we're going to do all we can to help these people though a very, very difficult time,'' Fanning said.
A former employee recently let go from his job opened fire at an office Christmas party Friday, killing one person, police said.
``The suspect, a 61-year-old man, entered the business, which had at least a dozen people inside enjoying a Christmas party, `` police said in a statement.
Police Const. Tim Fanning said the gunman entered the party around 4 p.m.
One man was shot and killed but the other partygoers managed to escape and no one else was injured.
``Police 'locked down' the neighborhood and negotiated with the suspect, who gave himself up to police just after 6: 00 p.m.,'' Fanning said in the statement.
The business at the location of the shooting is listed as TallGrass Distribution Ltd., a natural health product supplier.
Luke Pigeon, who lives in an apartment building next door, said he didn't hear a gunshot but heard a commotion outside his window.
``It wasn't typical, crazy noise that sometimes happens.
You got the feeling there was something definitely, definitely wrong,'' Pigeon told The Canadian Press.
He looked out his window and saw someone fleeing the building next door.
``All of a sudden in my front yard there were five totally decked out, geared up riot squad officers with guns out of the holster, aiming at the second floor of the building right beside us,'' Pigeon said.
He spent the next two hours in his apartment, with armed officers about 10 feet from his front window as police tried to negotiate with the suspect.
Finally, he heard activity as the gunman gave himself up.
``They cuffed him on the ground and they took him into a cruiser,'' he said.
``He was giving them a bit of grief, he was saying that his cuffs hurt.''
Police said the victim's name would not be released until next of kin had been notified.
They said the name of the suspect would be released after he is formally charged.
A former employee who opened fire at an office Christmas party killing one man, has been charged with first-degree murder , police said Saturday.
Constable Tim Fanning allege the recently-fired man, Eric Allen Kirkpatrick, 61, opened fire at a Vancouver office Friday, killing Benjamin David Banky, 40.
Fanning said the gunman, entered the party of at least a dozen people around 4:00 p.m.
One man was shot and killed but the other partygoers managed to escape and no one else was injured.
``Police 'locked down' the neighborhood and negotiated with the suspect, who gave himself up to police just after 6:00 p.m.,'' Fanning said in a statement.
The business at the location of the shooting is listed as TallGrass Distribution Ltd., a natural health product supplier.
Luke Pigeon, who lives in an apartment building next door, said he didn't hear a gunshot but heard noise outside his window.
``It wasn't typical, crazy noise that sometimes happens.
You got the feeling there was something definitely, definitely wrong, ``Pigeon told The Canadian Press.
He looked out his window and saw someone fleeing the building next door.
``All of a sudden in my front yard there were five totally decked out, geared up riot squad officers with guns out of the holster, aiming at the second floor of the building right beside us,'' Pigeon said.
After two hours, he said, the gunman gave himself up and police cuffed him.
61-year-old Vancouver man charged with first-degree murder after company CEO gunned down at office holiday party
Employees at a Vancouver wholesaler were coping Saturday with the death of their boss, who was gunned down at their office Christmas party.
Terrified workers ran screaming from building after a gunman opened fire at the party the day before.
A woman ran screaming from the office of TallGrass Distribution after four loud pops were heard in the quiet Vancouver street, said Faud Ali, owner of Fiji Islands Auto Repair, a business on the same street.
Terrified that her sister was trapped in the office where a hooded gunman was pacing about, agitated, the woman ran to the auto shop to call police, Mr. Ali said Saturday.
In the office she and about a dozen coworkers had just fled, Benjamin David Banky, 40, the CEO of TallGrass, lay dead.
Looking through the windows across the street, Mr. Ali told The Canadian Press he could see a man striding back and forth, holding what looked like a firearm.
``We saw the guy moving inside the office,'' Mr. Ali said.
``He was just going back and forth. 
After the shots, he just put the lights off.
``It is terrifying. 
I still feel shaky when I talk about it.
``I just keep saying I cannot believe this, I cannot believe this.''
Police quickly responded and surrounded the building.
After two hours, a man surrendered.
TallGrass, a wholesaler of natural health products, issued a statement Saturday evening saying it was ``deeply saddened by the tragic death of our president and CEO, Ben Banky.''
It described Mr. Banky as ``a compassionate and dedicated leader who will be sadly missed.''
The statement said Mr. Banky co-founded the company 12 years ago.
It said the company would have no further comment while the police investigation continues.
A 61-year-old Vancouver man - Eric Allen Kirkpatrick - was charged Saturday with one count of first-degree murder in connection with the shooting, Vancouver police said.
Vancouver Police spokesman Constable Tim Fanning said the suspect had been let go from TallGrass on Thursday.
He didn't know how long the suspect had worked at the business.
The other people at the office party were able to escape without injury, Const. Fanning said.
``The shock was tremendous but all the other people in the business - and a dozen other people who were there for a Christmas party - managed to get out safely,'' Const. Fanning said.
The shocked party-goers were put on buses and taken to police headquarters where witness statements were taken, he said.
He said counsellors have been made available to them.
``I cannot emphasize enough how traumatic this would have been for the people in there to see one of their co-workers gunned down, so we're going to do all we can to help these people though a very, very difficult time,'' Const. Fanning said.
Police were called immediately and surrounded the building, Const. Fanning said.
``We determined that there was nobody else in the building, just our victim, who was deceased, and the suspect,'' Const. Fanning said.
What followed was a tense two hours while police negotiated with a suspect to give himself up.
It's not known what kind of firearm was involved.
Luke Pigeon, who lives in an apartment building next door, said he didn't hear a gunshot but was drawn to his window by a commotion outside.
``It wasn't typical, crazy noise that sometimes happens.
You got the feeling there was something definitely, definitely wrong,'' Mr. Pigeon told The Canadian Press.
He looked out the window and saw a woman fleeing the building next door.
``All I saw was a ... lady running down the block screaming,'' Mr. Pigeon said.
He said she ran into the auto repair shop and in what seemed like mere minutes, police were on the scene.
``All of a sudden, in my front yard there were five totally decked out, geared up riot squad officers with guns out of the holster, aiming at the second floor of the building right beside us,'' Mr. Pigeon said.
``I tried to open up my door and they said 'close your door, lock your door.'''
He spent the next two hours in his apartment, as police negotiated and finally persuaded a suspect to surrender.
``They cuffed him on the ground and they took him into a cruiser,'' Mr. Pigeon said.
``He was giving them a bit of grief, he was saying that his cuffs hurt, but he was following orders.''
Mr. Pigeon also commended police for their handling of the dangerous situation.
``They managed to stop any further loss of life.''
Mark Pinder was working at a film studio across the street when a police officer banged at his window.
``I didn't realize it was a police officer right away because he was a plainclothes officer,'' Mr. Pinder said.
``But then I saw that he had a weapon drawn.''
The officer told Mr. Pinder to get everyone in the basement.
Mr. Pinder and his fellow employees were just about to begin a party to celebrate the completion of a show they'd been working on.
``People grabbed a couple of bowls of chips and dip and we just sort of moved the party downstairs,'' Mr. Pinder said.
``Some people seemed quite concerned but there wasn't anyone freaking out or crying,'' Mr. Pinder said.
``Everyone was calling their family and making sure that people knew that they were okay.''
Work place killings are rare, police say.
``It's something no business can prepare for,'' Const. Fanning said.
A just- fired employee of a Canadian health products company crashed the office Christmas party in Vancouver, killing the chief executive officer, police said.
Vancouver police identified the victim of the Friday night shooting at the TallGrass Distributors Ltd. 
Christmas party as Benjamin Banky, 40, the Canadian Broadcasting Corp. reported.
Police said Eric Allen Kirkpatrick, 61, surrendered after two hours of negotiations with police and was charged Saturday with first-degree murder, the CBC reported.
Kirkpatrick had been dismissed from his job Thursday.
Authorities said they did not know how long he had worked at TallGrass or the reasons for his termination.
Other employees of TallGrass Distributors Ltd. escaped unharmed, The Vancouver Sun reported.
``A man who apparently had just been let go from his job there came in, shot and killed another man,'' Police Constable Tim Fanning said.
``Our negotiators got on the phone with him right away, and fortunately were able to talk him down from his very, very excited and upset state.''
Police blocked the street in the Mount Pleasant neighborhood.
Employees of other companies in the area were asked to stay where they were until the surrendered.
TallGrass distributes products based on hemp, including Body Dope, a brand of skincare products.
One man is dead after an ex-employee opened fire at his company's Christmas party at a Vancouver, B.C. business Friday night.
Just past 4 p.m. Friday, Vancouver Police received a call of a man being shot at 40 East 5th Ave. at a business called Tall Grass Distribution Limited.
Police say a recently laid off employee opened fire shortly after entering the party, killing one male employee. At least a dozen workers were at the party at the time.
A 61-year-old man surrendered to police shortly after 6 p.m.
He is currently in custody and his identity will not be released until charges are formally laid.
Police locked down the busy neighbourhood for almost three hours while they negotiated with the suspect, directing traffic away from Ontario Street.
Employees at the party have been questioned by police and have been shuttled out by bus for further investigation.
Police say they are receiving counseling from its Victim Services Unit.
Employees at neighbouring businesses were forced to hide inside their offices during the shooting.
The name of the deceased will not be released until next of kin are notified.
A former employee walked into a staff Christmas party at an east Vancouver health products business Friday and allegedly shot and killed a man.
Police said they were called to Tallgrass Distributors Ltd., at 40 East Fifth Avenue., where a 61-year-old man carrying a firearm had confronted the crowd.
Const. Tim Fanning said the man, who had recently lost his job at Tallgrass, walked into the party and pointed the gun at the victim. 
He then let about a dozen employees leave before holing up inside the office building with the victim.
Hostage negotiators were called in to get the man out of the building.
He finally surrendered at 6 p.m. and was arrested.
Fanning couldn't say if anyone else was in the building at the time, but said no one else was injured.
Police used a neighbouring office as a base for the negotiations.
Nigel Hacker, who runs Intarsia Design out of a heritage home at 2016 Ontario, said he was in his office waiting for people to attend a meeting at about 4: 20 p.m.
He looked outside to see the street cordoned off.
Police set up shop at the office and began trying to coax the gunman out of the building around the corner at 40 East 5th Avenue.
``There was someone in the building and they were trying to get him out,'' Hacker said.
``I tried not to listen.''
But he caught the tone of the conversation.
``It wasn't emotional from this end,'' he said.
``Everything seemed under control. They did a great job.''
Just before 7 p.m. Friday, the lights were still blazing at the two-storey 1950s-style office building, which was decorated with a Christmas tree and Santas made of cotton wool.
Early on, about a dozen police officers milled about outside securing the building, while others blocked nearby intersections and directed traffic away from Ontario Street.
A Coast Mountain bus was called in to collect witnesses, TransLink spokesman Drew Snider said.
Offices around the neighbourhood were shut down, with staff either told to stay indoors or escorted outside to their cars or other transport.
Lorin Pearce, an executive assistant at Focus Audio Visual Services on West Fifth, said she saw what appeared to be a police officer with a gun at the corner of Fifth and Ontario.
She didn't know the focus of the police attention, but said the corner is home to several businesses.
When some employees tried to leave, they were told by police to stay inside the office until further notice, she said around 5: 30 p.m.
``A couple of us tried to exit and they said, 'Please go back inside,'''
Pearce said, adding she was not afraid for her own safety.
Staff at Fiji Island Auto, across the street from Tallgrass, were told to close shop at 5:30 p.m. and were escorted by police off the premises.
Down the street, John Christie, head of house production for Paperny Films at Fifth and Quebec, said employees were planning to hold an office party upstairs when someone heard shots fired and the police came knocking at their door.
``We have been asked by the police to stay away from the windows and we've been forced to go downstairs,'' Christie said.
``We're having an office party anyway so we're just staying out of the way, undercover.
If we're in a lockdown, at least we have beers and pizza.''
Christie said the police, who placed an undercover officer at Paperny's front door, weren't pleased when some office workers fled through the back alley to get home.
An employee of another nearby business, Relaxus Massage Products, said staff were escorted to their cars by police so they could go home.
TallGrass claims it is the fastest-growing natural-health-product supplier to the Natural Health Industry in Canada.
It was originally called Tallgrass Hemp Company, and supplied a variety of products based on the hemp plant, including Body Dope, a line of hair- and skin-care products made with hemp and other botanicals.
Products also include shampoo, conditioner, therapeutic lotion and soap
Greece rocked by more clashes over teenager's shooting
Fresh riots were reported in Greece on Saturday December 13 2008 in protest at the killing by police of a 15-year-old boy, Alexandros Grigoropoulos, eight days ago.
The disturbances have ben described as the most serious in Greece since student protests that preceded the fall of the military junta in 1974.
Violent clashes broke out in the capital, Athens, following a day of demonstrations.
The protests in memory of the teenager had been initially peaceful.
Students of the school attended by Grigoropoulos held a silent vigil during the day in Syntagma Square.
Hours later, hundreds of others brought candles to the site, while others gathered at the site of the shooting.
But later, about 100 youths hurled volleys of petrol bombs and rocks at a police station in the Exarchia district, where the officer, who shot him and has now been charged with murder, was based.
The protesters chanted ``murderers out''.
Later, hooded and masked protesters targeted a commercial area near the National Technical University of Athens, known as the Polytechnic, overturning cars and setting fire to three banks.
Several shops and an office of the environment ministry were also attacked.
Riot police positioned at street corners in the area responded by firing tear gas at the protesters.
Unrest has now spread throughout the country, prompting calls for Greece's conservative Prime Minister Costas Karamanlis and his government to stand down.
Fresh wave of rioting hits Greece
There's been more rioting in Greece in protest at the death of 15-year-old Alexandros Grigoropoulos.
The teenager was shot and killed by police in Athens eight days ago, triggering violent protests which have spread across the country.
The teenager was shot and killed by police in Athens eight days ago, triggering violent protests which have spread across the country.
The latest trouble began as protestors gathered in the capital city to target the station where the policeman charged with Alexandros' murder was based.
Earlier, several peaceful services had been held to remember the teenager.
Advice if you're upset by the news
At least 70 people have been hurt in the protests over the past eight days.
As the riots have continued, more and more people have been calling for the Greek Prime Minister Costas Karamanlis and his government to quit.
But Mr Karamanlis says he will not be pushed out by the protestors.
More protests ahead in Greece
Greek students announced new rallies on Sunday after another night of violence over the police shooting of a teenager.
A police station in Athens was firebombed on Saturday night.
It was next to the Exarchia district where Alexis Grigoropoulos, 15, was killed by a police bullet on 6 December.
The officer who fired the shot says he killed the boy accidentally in self-defence due to a bullet ricochet.
A ballistics report is yet to be made public.
Police said they made 86 arrests over the course of Saturday's protests.
Pamphlets announced rallies in front of the Athens police headquarters on Monday and in parliament square on Thursday.
Opposition socialists are pressing for fresh elections.
However, Prime Minister Costas Karamanlis has dismissed calls to quit, saying the country needs ``a steady hand on the helm'' to deal with the current financial crisis.
Ricochet killed Greek teenager
INITIAL results from the post- mortem on a 15-year-old Greek boy whose killing by police sparked five days of rioting show Alexandros Grigoropoulos died from a bullet ricochet.
According to forensic doctors and independent experts hired by the Grigoropoulos family, the bullet ``is a bit deformed, which showed the bullet touched a hard surface'' before entering the boy's chest, court sources said last night.
The news came as two police officers charged over the shooting prepared to go before a magistrate and riot police fired teargas at thousands of demonstrators advancing on the national parliament building in Athens.
``Now that we have these conclusions, which are in line with what my clients had indicated, they will give their statements to the judge,'' said Alexis Kouyias, the lawyer for policemen Epaminondas Korkoneas and Vassilis Saraliotis.
Amid anger towards the police compounded by the unpopularity of the Government of Prime Minister Costas Karamanlis, Greece is still awaiting a final ballistics report expected to shed light on Mr Korkoneas's statement that the bullet bounced up off a pavement after he had fired warning shots to disperse a mob.
Alexandros was allegedly among a group of 30 youths that had thrown stones at the squad car in the Exarchia district of Athens, which is known as a stronghold of political radicals.
Riot police fired teargas at youths throwing molotov cocktails outside parliament last night, as a general strike paralysed Greece and raised pressure on a fragile Government reeling from four days of riots sparked by the police shooting.
The clashes escalated into running battles through the city centre, with riot police firing volleys of teargas at masked youths pelting them with rocks, bottles and blocks of marble smashed from the Athens metro station entrance.
The youths smashed windows newly replaced after four days of the worst riots Greece has seen in decades.
More than 10,000 people had been marching through central Athens to protest the conservative Government's economic policies in a general strike that has shut down schools, public services and hospitals and grounded flights.
Although the strike and demonstrations had been scheduled long before the riots broke out, they have taken on the added form of protest against the Government's handling of the riots.
A WEEK ago, the name Alexis Grigoropoulos was just a name, an ordinary person leading an ordinary life in Athens, struggling to survive in the city.
Alexis did not have an opportunity to live his life to the full because on Saturday December 6 he was gunned down by a police officer from the unruly 'Zita' wing of the police force.
The death of the 15 year old sparked off uprisings throughout the whole of Greece, and for several days and nights, parts of central Athens looked like a war zone.
The government, eager to quell the unrest, called for unity and chose to target the anarcho-koukoulofori - the so-called ``hoodies''.
Just like with the fires in the summer of 2006, Prime Minister Kostas Karamanlis had lost control;
it felt as if the country was stateless.
Ignoring the indignation felt throughout Greece on the killing of the innocent teenager, within two days one sensed an emerging cover-up.
Rumours circulated that the Zita policeman did not fire directly.
By Tuesday, Alexis was buried.
On Wednesday two Zita officers Epaminondas Korkoneas and Vassilios Saraliotis found themselves in court.
Their lawyer claimed the bullet was a ricochet and that two or three shots had been fired in the air.
In many ways this is an excuse, a fable, because bullets cannot bounce from the sky and then land accidentally around the region of an innocent person's heart!
The state should have also conducted a much deeper probe into the death of the teenager, with a full independent ballistic and post-mortem inquiry.
Alexis Grigoropoulos is not just a name;
he has become a symbol of resistance, a person who died way too young in a world that was far too harsh.
He is also not alone.
A long list of over 100 people has been accumulated since 1980;
all victims of the police, making the recent case just the tip of the iceberg.
What is most worrying though is if the court accepts the ricochet theory it is likely Kornoneas and his accomplice Saraliotis will not be convicted.
And if that happens.
Why do people riot?
My infamous sociology professor asked a seminar room full of students nearly 30 years ago.
In the comfort of a room brimming full with hundreds of books stacked on shelves, a desk and the floor I initially thought the question was an exercise in scholastic nihilism.
So many books, I wondered out loud, and no answers.
Maybe it was my encounters with reality a week earlier in Kirkby, Liverpool, where caught in the middle of a full scale riot I had witnessed something that maybe he had not.
Trying to elaborate on this in a reflective way, the professor dismissed my answer as way too subjective.
After which point I turned off for the rest of the lecture and he bleated on about Durkheim and Weber some more.
Hopefully professors nowadays are more sensitive and may be they will see rioting in a more spherical sense.
There is always a root cause, an incident that sparks things off.
There are also much deeper causes, economic; political which are manifest through injustices such as high unemployment, racism and state authoritarianism.
The deepest cause of all, however, is politicians who abuse their powers in the name of ideology in ways that are dogmatic and plainly ignorant.
Margaret Thatcher, then PM in Britain had similar trade mark tendencies as the current Greek government.
The Zita crackpot troops in the Greek police force resemble the then British Special Patrol Group, who were responsible for the murder of many civilians.
Special elite forces of any kind in any police force can step beyond their line of duty, becoming detrimental to the public's perception of policing in society.
One difference, however, with Britain is the level of corruption rife in Greek politics.
For example, the Interior Minister, Prokopis Pavlopoulos, has appointed 3, 000 people to the elite Zita force since his appointment.
Most of these appointments have a certain political leaning.
Furthermore The Z-force does not go through the same training in the Police Academy making them a law unto themselves.
Just two days after the death of Alexis Grigoroplous, a Zedder fired 15 shots into the air in a confrontation with a small group of 12-13 year olds who were rioting in Mesoghieon Avenue in central Athens.
Given this behaviour it is a miracle that no one else has died, civilian or police.
Instead of trying to control the situation through yet more draconian measures, Karamanlis should conduct a complete independent inquiry, with proper objective and scientific evidence.
Only than can justice be done and only then will any semblance of faith in the Greek police force be restored.
If he opts for the same old approach of managing a tragic situation through bad public relations, not only are his political days numbered but Greece will be in a state of perpetual unrest.
Fury at report clearing Greek police over death of schoolboy
Greeks have reacted with fury to an official report which concluded a schoolboy whose death triggered riots across the country was killed by an accidental ricochet.
The finding came as a nationwide strike paralysed Greece, with banks, schools and shops closed, flights in and out of the country halted and even the Parthenon barred to tourists.
The fatal shooting of Alexis Grigoropoulos, 15, on Saturday sparked five days of riots and demonstrations across Greece after witnesses claimed that the police officer deliberately took aim at the teenager.
But the lawyer acting for the officer, who has been charged with murder, said that initial results from a post-mortem showed that the boy was accidentally hit by a ricochet.
Forensic experts said the bullet was ``a bit deformed'', suggesting that it had bounced off a hard surface before hitting Grigoropoulos in the chest.
Lawyer Alexis Kougias said: `` This tragedy is the result ... of an act by the policeman to fire into the air.
The bullet ricocheted, we have an entry wound from above.
It proves irrefutably that it was a ricochet.''
But the tens of thousands of students who have taken to the streets of a dozen Greek cities this week have pointed out similarities to the case of another 15-year-old, Michalis Kaltezas, who was killed by an officer during a demonstration in Athens in 1985.
The officer accused of shooting him in the back of the head was initially convicted of murder but was later found innocent after an appeal.
Anthony Livanios, a political analyst and pollster, said: ``People will not buy it and there's a possibility that it will make things worse.
It will be met with cynicism.
Even if it's true, which it might be, it will be seen as a cover-up.''
Protesters threw two petrol bombs at Athens's main courthouse where the officer and his partner were questioned by a magistrate.
They also attacked a television crew's truck, injuring at least two people.
In Athens' main Constitution Square, where 10,000 gathered for an anti-government demonstration, riot police guarding parliament fired tear gas at demonstrators who attacked them with petrol bombs and cobblestones.
Youths smashed windows which had only just been replaced from previous rioting.
Students chanting ``Pigs! Murderers!'' clapped and cheered each time a riot policeman was hit by a rock.
Business owners have accused the police of failing to protect their property as rioters rampaged through some of Athens' best known shopping areas.
Although police have responded when directly attacked, they stood back as gangs of youths smashed windows, torched rubbish bins and set light to cars.
The cost of damage to shops and businesses in Athens alone was estimated by the Greek Commerce Confederation at about 200 million euros.
``In Athens, we had 565 shops suffering serious damage or being completely destroyed'', said Vassilis Krokidis, vice president of the federation.
Greece has entered a period of intense soul searching over the violence, the worst since the country's military dictatorship was brought down in 1974.
``There is acute shame and embarrassment about what has happened,'' said Mr Livanios.
``It is unacceptable that in 2008, in a country which is a member of the EU and Nato, the government cannot establish public order. Two weeks before Christmas, Athens looks like downtown Beirut.''
The prime minister, Costas Karamanlis, has ignored mounting calls for his resignation.
An opinion poll for the respected Kathimerini newspaper found that 68 per cent of Greeks believe the government has mishandled the crisis including nearly half of respondents who voted for Mr Karamanlis' conservative party in last year's elections.
``For four days, Greece has surrendered itself to flames and anarchy,'' said an editorial in the conservative daily Eleftheros Typos.
``The volatile situation appears out of control, with the police appearing unable to deal with the situation. ...
Politicians appear to have fallen dramatically short of the task at hand.''
Greek police charged over boy's death
A GREEK police officer has been formally charged with voluntary homicide over the killing of a teenager that sparked nationwide riots, a court source said.
Epaminondas Korkoneas, 37, has also been charged with the `` illegal use `` of his service weapon over the killing of Alexis Grigoropoulos and was ordered to remain in custody by an Athens magistrate.
The officer's partner, Vassilios Saraliotis, 31, was charged with being an accomplice and will also remain in custody, the same source said today.
The pair have each been held since Monday.
According to the charge sheet, Mr Korkoneas killed Grigoropoulos on Sunday during a clash with around 30 youths in the central Athens district of Exarchia, an incident which sparked this week's violence.
Under questioning, the court source said Mr Korkoneas indicated he had acted out of self defence when the group began throwing firebombs and other objects while shouting they ``were going to kill them''.
The officer said that he took out his revolver and fired two or three times in the air out of self defence and that he had not aimed his gun at the victim who died from a ricochet.
Ballistics tests conducted in the wake of the 15-year-old's post-mortem reportedly showed the shooting may have been caused by a ricochet bullet, legal sources earlier said.
According to forensic experts and independent experts acting for the Grigoropoulos family, the bullet ``is a bit deformed, which showed the bullet touched a hard surface'' before entering the boy's chest.
Mr Saraliotis also said he acted out of self defence during the unrest which triggered five days of rioting in Athens and elsewhere across Greece.
Day six of the Greek youth revolt
Protests, riots and clashes with police have overtaken Greece for the sixth straight day since the fatal police shooting of a teenage boy in Athens Saturday night.
One day after Wednesday's massive general strike over pension reform and privatization shut down the country, more than a hundred schools and at least fifteen university campuses remain occupied by student demonstrators.
A major rally is expected on Friday.
And as solidarity protests spread to neighboring Turkey, as well as Germany, Spain, Italy, Russia, Denmark and the Netherlands, dozens of arrests have been made across the continent.
On Wednesday, two police officers involved in Saturday's shooting were arrested, and one was charged with murder.
But anger remains high over the officers' failure to express remorse at the student's death.
The police officers claim the bullet that killed Alexandros Grigoropoulos was fired in self-defense, and the death was an accident caused by a ricochet.
The unrest this week has been described as the worst since the end of the military dictatorship in 1974 and could cost the already weakened Greek economy an estimated hundreds of millions of dollars.
It's also shaken the country's conservative government that has a narrow one-person majority in Parliament.
The socialist opposition has increased calls for the prime minister to quit and call new elections, ignoring his appeals for national unity.
I'm joined now on the telephone by a student activist and writer from Athens.
He's with the Greek Socialist Workers Party.
He's a graduate student in political philosophy at Panteion University in Athens.
We welcome you to Democracy Now! Can you lay out for us exactly when this all began and how the protests have escalated and what they're about right now, Nikos Lountos?
Greece calm after 8 days of riots by angry youths
Athens was calm Sunday after eight days of the worst riots Greece has seen in decades, sparked by the police killing of a teenager.
Traffic returned to normal in the center of town and an open-topped double-decker bus carried tourists round the city's main sights.
The popular cafes in the Thissio area under the Acropolis were busy, and couples took their young children for a Sunday walk.
But Greek youths who have protested daily since the boy's death have vowed to remain on the streets until their concerns are addressed.
Protesters are angry not just at the police but at an increasingly unpopular government and over economic issues.
A newspaper poll published Sunday showed the governing conservatives' popularity at a dismal 20.6 percent, 5.6 percent below the main opposition Socialists.
However, 55 percent of respondents said neither party seemed competent to handle the situation.
The Focus poll of 1,000 people for Real News gave a 3.1 percent margin of error.
Violence has wracked Greece every day since the death of 15-year-old Alexandros Grigoropoulos, spreading quickly from Athens to more than a dozen other cities and leaving at least 70 people injured.
Hundreds of stores have been smashed and looted, and more than 200 people arrested.
Late Saturday and early Sunday, youths in Athens attacked a police station, stores and banks and fought running battles with police, as candlelit vigils were held to mark a week since the shooting.
A new candlelit vigil is planned for Sunday evening at the site of the shooting.
A separate protest is scheduled in western Athens.
While most of the protesters have been peaceful, the tone of the demonstrations has been set by a violent fringe.
And more young people have been willing to join those fringe elements than in the past.
``In the end, the violence that we use is minimal in comparison to the violence the system uses, like the banks,'' said 32-year-old protester Paris Kyriakides.
``Speaking as an anarchist, we want to create those social conditions that will generate more uprisings and to get more people out in the streets to demand their rights.''
In a poll released Sunday, some 62 percent of respondents said the reactions to the shooting were inexcusable, compared with 35 percent who believed the violence was justified.
The poll of 1,000 people gave no margin of error.
According to another poll, Greeks see more in the violence than a simple reaction to the shooting.
Asked whether the riots were a social uprising, 60 percent responded yes.
Some 64 percent considered police were unprepared for the violence.
The poll of 520 people published in the Kathimerini newspaper gave a 4.5 percent margin of error.
Violent protests in Europe borne out of deeper frustrations
They gripped rocks and stones, looking ready for a fight.
But the five young men - sons of a dentist, merchants, a state tax collector - stood in the shadow of the University of Athens before another day of battle in the Greek capital's running street protests.
``What I feel when I see this,'' said one young man, a hard plastic helmet covering his curly brown hair, ``is that I am loving my city more than ever.
Because we are all here.
Because we are discussing, really, what is going on here.
The system has failed us.
The politicians failed us.''
``I do feel bad when I see property burned,'' said a man wearing ski goggles and a dark blue jacket.
``But this is a statement, a manifestation of what we see has gone wrong here.''
For more than a week, Greece has been shaken by a rebellion.
A deadly police shooting Dec. 6 in Athens of Alexandros Grigoropoulos, 15, was killed touched off the first riots.
Then something else stirred.
A coming-of-age generation from Thessaloniki to Athens rose up to attack dozens of police stations, occupy university campuses and prompt the closing of the international airport.
Some of their demands are immediate:
They want police banned from carrying guns.
Others are less defined:
They are looking for government to change.
The center-right government of Costas Karamanlis, increasingly unpopular amid mounting economic problems, didn't anticipate or understand how the anger had spiraled.
The youth were suddenly lashing out at all that ails Greece: a weak government, an economy that remains one of the poorest of the European Union and their own bleak job prospects.
They looted businesses, pelted police with stones and ran amok near government banks, offices and university campuses with Molotov cocktails.
About 100 people have been injured.
Property damage is an estimated $2 million.
Talk of what happened in Athens and Thessaloniki has spread to Italy and Spain, which have had protests of their own.
Few of the dozen people interviewed in Athens said they had a permanent job or a job that guaranteed a pension.
Many older spectators said they are sympathetic - even if they didn't like the ruin left behind.
``I feel sorry for the young, `` said 40-year-old Tsikala Stephania, a public sector worker.
``They don't see much of a future, and they have to show their wrath in some way.''
Athens vigil ends in violence
Violence reignited in Athens following vigils for the teenager killed by police a week ago
Greek rioters have attacked an environment ministry building, shops and banks in Athens on the eighth day of protests following the killing of a teenager by police.
The clashes late on Saturday came after an evening candle-lit vigil to mark the shooting of 15-year-old Alexandros Grigoropoulos.
Youths attacked a police station with petrol bombs in central Athens as well as at least three banks, several stores and a government building, police said.
Several hundred protesters set up burning barricades and attacked police with rocks and flares.
The killing of Grigoropoulos has sparked the worst rioting Greece has seen in decades, with at least 70 people injured in cities across the country.
Hundreds of stores have been smashed and looted, and more than 200 people have been arrested.
Earlier, hundreds of schoolchildren holding candles gathered peacefully outside the parliament building in Athens and at the site where Grigoropoulos was shot.
They left candles spelling out the name ``Alex'' in front of a line of riot policemen.
Banners in the main square outside parliament read: ``The state kills'' and ``Down with the government of murderers''.
``The murder of Alexis was the last straw.
Being a young man in Greece today is a crime ...
They are stealing our dreams,'' said one leaflet distributed in the square.
The young protesters promised to remain on the streets until their concerns, including opposition to the increasingly unpopular government and worry over economic issues, are addressed.
Throughout most of the day, the capital had appeared calmer than in the past week.
Christmas shoppers cautiously returned to central Athens earlier on Saturday, but many stores had boarded up their windows instead of replacing the glass, for fear of further violence.
Much of the rioting has been blamed on an anarchist fringe tapping into resentment over political scandals and the impact of the global slowdown.
A sanctuary for dissent in Greece?
Greek law keeps police away from universities, but some fear the immunity clause meant to protect free speech is now being used to harbor bastions of violence.
Masked men wielding clubs guard the entrance to the Athens Polytechnic University, keeping watch over the graffiti-covered walls on campus.
Nearby streets are barricaded with the carcasses of burnt cars, and a huge black banner proclaims ``MURDERERS'' - the rallying cry that has brought Greece's youths to the streets.
Inside, piles of empty gas canisters testify to the scores of Molotov cocktails assembled there recently
For more than a week, Athenian streets have been a battleground between police and protesters, whose anger was sparked by the fatal shooting of a 15-year-old boy by a policeman.
Protected by Greece's Constitution from police interference, the Polytechnic has become the headquarters of the protest movement - and a haven for those wreaking havoc on the city's streets.
As Greeks try to make sense of the chaos - and prepare for another week of protests, ranging from sit-ins to nationwide roadblocks - many here are beginning to ask whether the asylum law is protecting free speech or simply harboring criminals.
``The university asylum is for the freedom of movement of ideas, but not of commitment of criminal actions,'' says George Bergeles, a professor at the Polytechnic who is sympathetic to the students' complaints, but not their harsh tactics.
``The law about university asylum I believe is a fantastic achievement of the university movement, but we should protect it by not allowing criminal offenses to happen inside.''
The Polytechnic holds historic importance for Greeks.
In November 1973, students barricaded themselves inside in rebellion against the country's military junta, which had been in power since 1967.
Fearful that the revolt would spread, on Nov. 17 the national police moved in with tanks, killing a still-disputed number of protesters.
The junta fell less than a year later.
Greece's new Constitution gave special status to universities and other schools, forever barring the police from entering their grounds.
Today, the Poly-technic and other institutions of learning are once again brimming with revolutionary zeal.
Across Athens, high schools and universities are under occupation by students and other youth angry at the Dec. 6 killing of Alexandros Grigoropoulos and also at a political system they see as corrupt and incompetent.
So far, Prime Minister Costas Karamanlis has rejected calls by opposition leaders to hold early elections, but his center-right party holds only a one-seat majority in parliament, and public support for his government was weak even before the riots.
The latest poll numbers show a 20 percent approval rating.
The Polytechnic, which lies on the border of the edgy neighborhood of Exarchia, where the 15-year-old was killed, is serving as the heart and brain center of the revolt.
There, anarchists - many of whom call Exarchia their home - are helping to organize students and other young people.
The area just outside its gates has been the site of some of the most intense clashes with police.
Inside, protesters regroup and rearm around bonfires that burn through the night.
There's an air of menace outside the Polytechnic.
But Stergia Sarantopoulou, an architecture student there who has been participating in protests, says the mood is angry but collegial.
Like many students, she passionately defends the asylum law.
``There are historical, political, ideological reasons for the immunity to exist,'' she says.
``Universities are our home.
It's the students home; it's the teachers home.''
The university safe-haven policy might at times be abused, Ms. Sarantopoulou says, but in the long run society is better off by having a law that forever ensures a safe place for free speech.
``It's much more harmful for the state to control [universities ,]'' she says.
The explosion of rioting and looting that took place in the aftermath of Alexandros's death has faded in recent days, but there are still daily protests, many of which end in hails of rocks and flaming Molotov cocktails.
On Saturday, the one-week anniversary of the shooting, the protests were largely peaceful, though still angry.
In daylight, a fragile normality began to return to the city center, with shops again opening and people returning to work.
But at night, uncertain Athenians stayed away from the normally bustling city center, which was ghostly quiet.
Groups of young people roamed the streets across central Athens, shouting:
``This night is for Alexi!''
A heavy cloud of tear gas and smoke hung over Exarchia, which felt like a rebel-held enclave in a city at war.
Police lingered warily on its edges as young people set up burning barricades and attacked government buildings and banks.
And clashes erupted once again outside the Polytechnic.
Few here think the unrest will end anytime soon, and the rage of Greece's youth continues to smolder.
The death of Alexandros's has tapped into anger about a range of broader complaints - about corruption, nepotism, a failing education system, and the poor economic prospects of young people, including unemployment rates in the 25 percent range.
Protests are expected to continue throughout the week, with activists calling for roads to be blocked nationwide on Tuesday.
They say they want to bring down Greece's whole political system - it's not just the current government that is seen as tainted, most believe the main opposition is little better.
The protesters, however, struggle to articulate exactly what they want in its place.
``Don't bend your head down,'' they chanted as they confronted police recently in front of parliament.
``The only way is resistance.''
Greek government under fire
A week of violence in Greece has taken its toll on the fragile conservative government, with opinion polls showing many think authorities mishandled the worst rioting in decades.
The shooting of a 15-year-old boy by police unleashed a wave of unrest by thousands of students and anarchists across the country.
This comes at a time where there is growing anger over political scandals and the impact of a global recession on Greece's economy.
While the violence has generally subsided in the past few days, small groups of hooded youngsters are still hurling fire bombs, smashing shops and fighting running battles with riot police.
Prime Minister Costas Karamanlis has pledged to ensure security, rebuffing calls for early elections.
An opinion poll published by Ethnos newspaper on Sunday said 83.3 percent of Greeks were unhappy with the government's response to the violence.
``I'm tired of coming to the shop every night to check the damages.
You think it's going to calm down and then it starts again.'' said Anna Pavlidou, manager of a central Athens mobile phone store that has been repeatedly attacked and looted.
``The government should assume its responsibilities and resign.
It didn't handle it well.
If it had, we wouldn't have 355 damaged shops in Athens.
I mean we will not be able to open until Christmas.'' she said.
A policeman charged with killing Alexandros Grigoropoulos has been jailed along with a colleague pending trial, while more than 400 protesters have been detained over the unrest.
Greek government under fire over handling of riots
A week of violence in Greece has taken its toll on the fragile conservative government, with opinion polls showing on Sunday that many think authorities mishandled the worst rioting in decades.
The December 6 killing of a 15-year-old teenager by police unleashed a wave of unrest by thousands of students and anarchists across the country, feeding on growing anger over political scandals and the impact of a global recession on Greece's economy.
While the violence generally has subsided in the past few days, small groups of hooded youngsters with fire bombs are still rampaging at night in the capital, fighting running battles with riot police and smashing shops.
Prime Minister Costas Karamanlis has pledged to protect people and property, but he has drawn widespread criticism for not acting quickly and decisively to tackle the revolt.
An opinion poll published by Ethnos newspaper on Sunday said 83.3 percent of Greeks were unhappy with the government's response to the violence.
Discontent was high -- at 65.6 percent -- even among supporters of Karamanlis' New Democracy party, which has a one-seat majority in parliament and already lagged behind the Socialist opposition before the riots.
Another survey, in Kathimerini daily, put disapproval of the government at 68 percent with 60 percent of those polled saying the riots were a social uprising rather than an outburst by an isolated fringe of violent protesters.
More demonstrations are planned for Monday, including one outside the police headquarters in Athens.
Eight days of clashes have caused 200 million euros ($265.3 million) of damage in Athens alone.
The city was calm on Sunday but broken shop windows bore witness to the latest, sporadic riots overnight, when a few hundred youths wearing gas masks attacked a government building, four shops and two banks.
``I'm tired of coming to the shop every night to check the damages.
You think it's going to calm down and then it starts again,'' said Anna Pavlidou, manager of a central Athens mobile phone store that has been repeatedly attacked and looted.
``The government should assume its responsibilities and resign.
It didn't handle it well.
If it had, we wouldn't have 355 damaged shops in Athens.
I mean, we will not be able to open until Christmas,'' she told Reuters.
``Someone has to understand the deeper reasons for this -- poverty, high unemployment -- and solve it radically.''
The policeman charged with killing Alexandros Grigoropoulos has been jailed along with a colleague pending trial, while more than 400 protesters have been detained over the unrest.
In central Athens, where even in calmer times barely a week goes by without a demonstration, riot police with teargas canisters have been manning street corners at night, especially in the leftist Exarchia neighborhood where the boy was shot.
Rioters in Greece attack police station, banks
Rioting youths in the Greek capital attacked a police station, stores and banks and fought running battles with police late Saturday, authorities said, as violent protests against a police killing continued for the seventh straight day.
The clashes broke out as candlelit vigils were being held to mark a week since the police shooting of a 15-year-old boy, which triggered the riots that are threatening the stability of the government.
The clashes broke out as candlelit vigils were being held to mark a week since the police shooting of a 15-year-old boy, which triggered the riots that are threatening the stability of the government.
Youths - some on foot, others riding motorcycles - attacked a police station with petrol bombs in central Athens as well as at least three banks, several stores and a government building, police said.
Several hundred protesters set up burning barricades and attacked police with rocks and flares. Riot police fired tear gas and chased the youths through parts of the city.
The protesters chanted ``murderers out'' and used laser pointers to target police for attack.
Violence has wracked Greece every day since the death of teenager Alexandros Grigoropoulos.
The riots in cities throughout the country has left at least 70 people injured.
Hundreds of stores have been smashed and looted, and more than 200 people have been arrested.
While most of the protesters have been peaceful, the tone of the demonstrations has been set by a violent fringe.
And more young people have been willing to join those fringe elements than in the past.
Hundreds of school children holding candles gathered peacefully Saturday outside parliament and at the site where teenager was shot.
Outside parliament, they left candles spelling out the name ``Alex'' in front of a line of riot policemen.
The young protesters promised to remain on the streets until their concerns - including opposition to increasingly unpopular government and worry over economic issues - are addressed.
``Speaking as an anarchist, we want to create those social conditions that will generate more uprisings and to get more people out in the streets to demand their rights,'' said 32-year-old protester Paris Kyriakides.
``In the end, the violence that we use is minimal in comparison to the violence of the system uses, like the banks,'' Kyriakides said.
Earlier Saturday, a crowd of about 1,000 people attended a peaceful sit-down demonstration in Athens and another 1,000 demonstrated in the northern city of Thessaloniki.
One 16-year-old student at the Athens demonstration, who gave only her first name, Veatriki, said young people her age felt their voices were being heard immediately when they smashed a shop window or a car.
She also said young people want to see the policemen involved in the shooting punished and the police disarmed.
The two officers involved in the boy's shooting have been arrested.
One was charged with murder and the other as an accomplice.
The circumstances surrounding the shooting remain unclear.
Giorgos Kyrtsos, publisher of the City Press and Free Sunday newspapers, said the violent demonstrations revealed widespread public discontent.
``We are entering a long period of economic crisis,'' Kyrtsos said.
``But there is also a deepening social crisis, combined with a weakened state.
We are truly at a crossroads.''
Kyrtsos, a conservative, was highly critical of the government's handling of the protests.
``This is the only government I remember that has managed to alienate both the rebellious youth and the law-and-order crowd,'' he said.
``It has nothing to offer to anybody.''
Christmas shoppers cautiously returned to central Athens earlier Saturday, but many stores had boarded up their windows instead of replacing the glass, for fear of further violence.
Athens Mayor Nikitas Kaklamanis greeted shoppers with the city's brass band.
``People came up to me and were telling me that it was the first time they had smiled in days,'' the mayor said.
World's sexiest man' Hugh Jackman has been roped in to host the 81st annual Academy Awards ceremony
According to Laurence Mark, producer of the telecast, the Australian actor has been selected ``because we want the ceremony to be fun.
He can hold the screen and he can hold a stage.
It doesn't hurt that he looks amazing in a tuxedo and he's the sexiest man alive,'' People quoted him as saying.
The ceremony will take place at the Kodak Theatre in Los Angeles on February 22.
The X men star, who is known for his hard body, he has a softer side too.
Jackman sings ballads at home, makes pancakes for son Oscar, 8, daughter Ava, 3, as well as his wife Deborra-Lee Furness.
``Deb and my kids have been the best things that have ever happened to me, without a doubt,'' he said.
Even as Oscar organizers on Friday unveiled Hugh Jackman as the host of their gala film awards, the prospect of a U.S. actors strike was casting a long shadow over whether Hollywood's big show would go on as usual.
The Academy Awards' February 22 date puts it directly in the path of a potential walkout by Screen Actors Guild members who vote next month on whether to give union leaders permission to call a strike in stalemated contract talks with major studios.
Movie making by the big studios has wound down since late June in anticipation of labor strife, compounding a general slowdown from the U.S. recession.
The tension has only been heightened by fatigue from a tumultuous 14-week Hollywood writers strike that ended in February and cost the Los Angeles area economy around $3 billion as production stopped on most prime-time TV shows.
``A strike, if one occurred, would be nothing short of horrible,'' said Ron Howard, the former actor and Oscar-winning director of ``A Beautiful Mind'' whose latest film, ``Frost/Nixon,'' is considered a strong Oscar contender.
``The timing couldn't be worse,'' he said on Thursday.
Actor Leonardo DiCaprio, who on Thursday earned a Golden Globe nomination for his work in ``Revolutionary Road,'' said strike concerns are hitting ``everyone.''
``It's really important that we come up with a solution,'' he said.
``These are unheard-of times, and no one can predict what is going to happen'' with the U.S. economy.
SAG'S DARK CLOUD
The Oscars, given out by the Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences, are annually Hollywood's glitziest night.
Putting the show in jeopardy, however, was this week's announcement by SAG that strike authorization ballots will be mailed to its 120,000 members on January 2 and tallied on January 23, a full month before the Oscars.
That sequence of events raises the prospect of A-list stars boycotting the honors to avoid crossing their own union's picket lines -- or even carrying picket signs themselves.
The same dynamic came into play last January when a work stoppage by 10,500 Writers Guild of America members threw the awards season into disarray and caused the star-filled Golden Globe Awards to be replaced by a news conference.
Only 5.8 million TV viewers tuned-in, far below the Globes' typical 20 million audience.
Broadcaster NBC lost an estimated $10 million to $15 million in advertising revenue.
The writers strike was settled a month later, sparing the Academy Awards and its network, ABC, a similar fate.
But this time around, the Oscars are on the firing line and Australian actor Jackman, star of the ``X-Men'' movies as well as Broadway stage shows, may himself have to pull out.
``At this point, we are moving forward with all of our plans to do our show, and of course we are monitoring what is going on,'' said Academy spokeswoman Leslie Unger.
SAG leaders say they need a credible strike threat to wrest a better contract deal from the studios than the ``final'' offer management presented before talks collapsed on June 30.
They stress, however, that a ``yes'' vote does not automatically put a strike into effect, and it remains uncertain whether SAG can muster the support it needs -- 75 percent of those voting -- to pass its authorization.
Talks collapsed over issues that included how much actors would get paid for work on the Internet, and the financial impact of a possible strike on Hollywood remains unclear.
Most films slated for release in 2009 already have been shot, meaning the 2010 slate would see the brunt of a strike.
Some TV prime-time dramas and sitcoms will have completed production before SAG a work stoppage, though a walkout could hinder development of new series for Fall 2009.
It's a tough job hosting the Academy Awards.
It's supposed to be entertaining, but it's also a night for the stars to revel in the glory of an Oscar win.
And the host has to be edgy and funny, without going over the line and insulting the honorees.
But when it works, as it did in 1992 when tough-guy actor Jack Palance did push-ups in front of comedian and host Billy Crystal, only to become the butt of Crystal's jokes for the rest of the night, it makes for memorable moments.
On Friday, the organization behind the Academy Awards named Australian actor Hugh Jackman as the host of February's annual show.
Jackman is the first non-comedian to single-handedly host the show in recent years.
The last time an Australian hosted the show was in 1987, when to ``Crocodile Dundee'' star Paul Hogan shared the stage with actress Goldie Hawn and comedian Chevy Chase.
Coming off starring in ``Australia,'' which has had only limited box office success since its Nov. 26 opening with a total box office take of $43 million, Jackman will rely on song and dance instead of just jokes to entertain a worldwide audience on Oscar night.
He has done well hosting the Tony Awards, the Broadway version of the Oscars, but the Oscars' audience is used to comedians on the show.
On a night where hype and pomp rule, the comedian's role is often to keep the show grounded by injecting a jester's dose of realism.
Jackman's naming as host prompted a ``love it or hate it'' reaction here on our news floor in Los Angeles.
There didn't seem to be much in between, so we thought we'd leave it to readers to weigh in with their own thoughts.
Hugh Jackman: an Oscar hit or miss?
The producers of the Academy Awards are counting on a mutant wolverine who is People magazine's reigning Sexiest Man Alive to inject some desperately needed razzle-dazzle into their annual telecast.
Hugh Jackman, the Australian actor known to film audiences for playing a furry comic-book hero in the X-Men movies, will be host of the 81st incarnation of the Oscars, the Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences announced on Friday.
ABC will broadcast the awards show on Feb. 22.
Its producers said they hoped to achieve multiple goals with the casting of Mr. Jackman.
First, there is a desire to put more movie in the annual movie business extravaganza.
Jon Stewart and Ellen DeGeneres, recent hosts, are both primarily known as television stars.
Laurence Mark, a co-producer of the Oscars telecast, with Bill Condon, said there was also a desire to steer clear of stand-up comedians.
``We are trying to get away from this late-night talk show rut,'' Mr. Mark said in a telephone interview.
``It seemed to us that we needed to turn a corner and get somebody who is, imagine that, a movie star.''
Mr. Jackman's selection is also an attempt to play to the audience at home, which has been shrinking in recent years. 
Viewers of the ceremony are overwhelmingly female - the Oscars are known in the advertising world as the Super Bowl for women - and producers clearly expect Mr. Jackman to turn out that demographic in droves.
``It certainly did not escape us that Hugh looks terrific in a tuxedo,'' Mr. Mark said.
With any luck, a host plucked from within the movie industry's own ranks - and less emphasis on stand-up comedy, which has often been at the expense of people sitting in the audience - will also play well inside the Kodak Theater.
In recent years the crowd of movie insiders has seemed to respond to hosts with notable coldness.
A representative for Mr. Jackman said he was walking a red carpet in Berlin on behalf of his current film, the epic ``Australia,'' and was unavailable for an interview.
Deadlinehollywooddaily.com first reported his selection on the Web.
Mr. Jackman, 40, has never been nominated for an Oscar but has artistic credibility, an important credential for the M.C. of the film awards show.
He has won positive reviews for turns in films like ``The Prestige'' and ``Kate & Leopold.''
He won a Tony Award in 2004 for his role in the musical ``The Boy from Oz.''
He also has experience as an awards show M.C., winning an Emmy in 2005 for his appearance as host of the Tonys.
He presided over that ceremony three times.
The Oscars are a very different phenomenon from the Tonys.
The film honors are an awkward hybrid - a telecast about the movies set in a theater - that require their host to oscillate between jocular chitchat and solemn introductions, while sprinkling in just the right amount of self-deprecation.
Serving as host of the three-hour live show requires physical stamina and an ability to hold up under the emotional pressure of knowing that the television audience, while diminished in the United States, numbers several hundred million worldwide.
This year Mr. Jackman will have the added pressure of serving as the ringmaster of a lavish self-congratulation-a-thon at a time of global economic crisis.
Preparing for the job may prove difficult, since producers will most likely need to draw up contingency plans in the event of a Screen Actors Guild strike.
The union, at loggerheads with studios over contract issues big and small, said on Wednesday that it would ask its members to authorize a strike.
The union, which will announce the results of the vote in late January, sees its power to wreak havoc with the Oscars as prime leverage.
The telecast has come under harsh criticism in recent years as a lumbering snore that takes itself too seriously and lacks spontaneity.
Star wattage has dimmed, with many members of the A list refusing to attend unless they are nominated or have a coming film to promote.
A trend toward honoring small, independent movies that most people have not seen has dented viewership.
Ratings for last year's Oscars plunged to a record low, with about 32 million people tuning in, compared with 55.3 million a decade ago.
Mr. Condon and Mr. Mark, who recently served as the creative team behind the movie ``Dreamgirls,'' are trying to energize the telecast partly by making the ceremony more of a party that celebrates movies in general, not just the elite few selected by Academy voters.
``We are still at the preliminary conversation stage about what Hugh wants to do, but his theatrical talent certainly does give us reason to do at least one musical number,'' Mr. Mark said.
He sings, dances, acts on stage and screen, and he's the ``Sexiest Man Alive.''
Hugh Jackman does everything but standup comedy - and that's why the first-time Oscars host fulfills the academy's promise to shake up the show in a way that's as tough to predict as the winners.
Jackman was announced Friday as the host of the 81st Academy Awards, a marked departure from the academy's standard of big-name comedians.
Jon Stewart, who hosted in 2008 and 2006, and Ellen DeGeneres, the 2007 host, were the latest in a line of funny emcees since 1990.
Billy Crystal did it eight times, Whoopi Goldberg took on four, Steve Martin did it twice and David Letterman and Chris Rock each had a shot.
As the parade of A-list comedians continued, ratings were in steady decline.
But with new producers, a new director, new set designer and even a new music director, the academy has been hinting for months at an all-new look and feel for this year's Oscars telecast on Feb. 22.
Having Jackman host certainly fits with that theme.
Producers Laurence Mark and Bill Condon called the Australian actor ``a consummate entertainer and an internationally renowned movie star.''
``He also has style, elegance and a sense of occasion,'' Mark and Condon said in a joint statement.
``Hugh is the ideal choice to host a celebration of the year's movies - and to have fun doing it.''
Indeed, Jackman can be a mutant superhero (Wolverine from the ``X-Men'' movie franchise), a flirtatious singing barker (Billy Bigelow in Rodgers & Hammerstein's musical ``Carousel''), a determined magician (``The Prestige'') and a dancing penguin (``Happy Feet'').
The 40-year-old actor plays a roughhewn cattle driver opposite Nicole Kidman's English aristocrat in the new Baz Luhrmann romantic adventure ``Australia.''
Jackman was abroad promoting the film Friday when his Oscar role was announced.
``Thirty years ago when I was in Sydney watching Johnny Carson host the Oscars with my family, I never imagined that I'd one day have the chance to be up on that stage myself,'' he said in a statement.
``I am very grateful to the Academy for giving me this opportunity.
And, excited to be working with Larry and Bill on what I know will be a fun and memorable celebration.''
Having an entertainer such as Jackman host the show necessitates a change in the well-established standard of opening the show with a jokes, said Steve Pond, author of the 2005 book ``The Big Show: High Times and Dirty Dealings Backstage at the Academy Awards.''
``The tricky part is that while he's charming, he's not the kind of guy to go out there and deliver a comic monologue at the top of the show,'' Pond said.
``He's more comfortable with a song and dance, but is a song and dance at the top of the Oscars what people want to see?
It'll be tricky adopting what he does best to what works at the Oscars.''
But with ratings dropping for all awards shows, it's worth shaking things up to generate interest - and the Academy Awards telecast, which posted its lowest ratings ever in February, isn't the only one trying something new.
The Emmys added a category - best reality-show host - and divvied the show's hosting duties among the five nominees.
The results were disastrous:
Critics panned the format and the show was one of the least-watched Emmys ever.
The Grammy Awards spiced up its nominations earlier this month by trading its typical staid press conference for a glitzy, live concert special.
Ratings-wise, the hourlong show came in fourth among prime-time contenders, behind such dramas as NBC's ``Life'' and ABC's ``Private Practice.''
Bringing in Jackman to host the Academy Awards is ``a stretch for the Oscars, but at this stage, it's worth taking the risk,'' Pond said.
``He certainly has what it takes to do the gig if some changes are made in what that gig requires.''
Jackman also has award-winning hosting experience:
He won an Emmy in 2005 for hosting the 58th annual Tony Awards in 2004, when he also took a best-actor Tony for his performance in the musical ``The Boy From Oz.
``Jackman has never been an Oscar nominee, but was nominated for a Golden Globe for his role in 2001's romantic film ``Kate & Leopold.''
He also served as a past presenter on the Oscar show.
Jackman and his wife, Deborra-Lee Furness, have their own Oscar at home - their 8-year-old son, Oscar Maximillian.
The couple also have a 3-year-old daughter Ava.
Australian actor Hugh Jackman was named on Friday as host of February's Oscars in a departure from the tradition of picking U.S. comedians on Hollywood's most prestigious night.
The Academy of Motion Pictures Arts and Sciences, which hands out the world's top film honors, said Jackman, 40, star of the romantic epic ``Australia,'' will host the televised ceremony for the first time.
The actor, who also starred in the three ``X-Men'' movies and is an award-winning musical theater performer, has hosted Broadway's Tony awards three times and last month was named 2008's ``sexiest man alive'' by People magazine.
``Hugh Jackman is a consummate entertainer and an internationally renowned movie star,'' said Laurence Mark and Bill Condon, the new producers of the televised show.
``He also has style, elegance and a sense of occasion.
Hugh is the ideal choice to host a celebration of the year's movies -- and to have fun doing it,'' the pair said in a statement.
Oscar nominations for the best movies and performances of 2008 will be announced in January.
The awards will be handed out on February 22 by the Academy at the Kodak Theater in Hollywood and will be televised in the United States by the ABC network.
Jackman's choice heralds a new direction for the 81st Oscar ceremony after recent years of falling TV ratings.
Typically, the program has been hosted by U.S. comedians, and in recent years, show organizers have experimented with a variety of hosting styles ranging from political satirist Jon Stewart, to edgy Chris Rock and popular Ellen DeGeneres.
Mark and Condon have axed the famous opening monologue for the February 2009 show, hoping for more spontaneity overall.
They said there may be a stronger element of music and dancing than previously.
``We want it to be more of a party and a celebration and a departure from the late-night talk-show format,'' Mark told Reuters.
Mark and Condon have a background in musicals and worked together on the 2006 film hit ``Dreamgirls''.
Jackman, who can sing and dance, was ``genuinely thrilled'' at the offer, Mark said, but ``he wanted to make sure the format would mesh with his skills.''
The February 2008 three-hour plus broadcast, hosted for the second time by Stewart, hit a low 32 million U.S. viewers and entered the record books as the least-watched Oscars ever.
Still, even an audience of that size makes the telecast annually one of the most-watched U.S. TV shows.
The broadcast also is televised live in more than 200 countries worldwide.
Mark said he and Condon planned to get the telecast under three hours, yet still keep the live presentations of awards and acceptance speeches.
If only he'll wear those gold lame pants.
As word got out Friday that Hugh Jackman will be this year's Oscar host, a clip from the 2004 Tony telecast of his performance from ``The Boy From Oz'' made the rounds.
If you happened to miss the 2004 Tonys, Jackman, playing the flamboyant Australian songwriter Peter Allen, sang, danced and writhed his way across the stage in a leopard skin top and skin-tight gold lame pants.
Will the Oscar gift baskets include smelling salts?
Jackman, who has hosted the Tonys several times and won an Emmy for doing so in 2005, certainly knows how to hold a stage -- he won a Tony for ``The Boy From Oz'' -- and by choosing him, first-time Oscar producers Laurence Mark and Bill Condon are betting that Broadway can do what comedy could not.
Previous hosts -- Jon Stewart, Ellen DeGeneres, Chris Rock -- all followed the traditional stand-up model and the ratings have steadily soured.
Obviously a change is required, and though I would lean toward thinking ``television'' rather than ``Broadway'' (why, I even wrote a piece about it, for this coming Sunday's Calendar, before the host choice was announced), Jackman is, of course, another way to go.
Clearly Mark and Condon are less concerned with solving the ratings crisis as they are with creating a new vibe for the show.
Jackman may have more talent in his little finger than most of us do in our entire bodies, but he doesn't have the fan base of DeGeneres or Rock.
If you are among the thousands who loved his hosting of the Tonys, you're probably not only watching the Oscars anyway, you're hosting your own annual Oscar party.
Yes, Jackman was just named People's Sexiest Man Alive, and yes, he is Wolverine of ``X-Men'' but do we want Wolverine hosting the Oscars?
Probably not.
Otherwise, Jackman's movie career has been less than memorable, capped by this year's box office dud ``Australia.''
And as last season's mercifully short-lived ``Viva Laughlin'' proved, one talented person does not a television show make.
Or at least not a good television show.
But Mark and Condon are the team that brought us ``Dreamgirls,'' which actually makes Jackman an obvious choice.
There's nothing wrong with a big Broadway-esque opener similar to Billy Crystal's famous musical clips, but with more hip action.
Beyond that, however, it gets a little worrisome.
The Oscars have a prickly relationship with singin' and dancin' and as anyone who saw Rosie O'Donnell's recent disaster knows, nothing fails bigger than a failed variety show.
What Jackman does have in his favor is an unapologetic, unabashed love for, and understanding of, theater.
He isn't snarky and he isn't an outsider.
He is a from-the-bottom-of-his-heart performer who seems utterly happy and at ease in front of an audience.
No doubt those in the Kodak will enjoy an energetic and dazzling evening.
How it will play on television remains to be seen.
But maybe it's time we stopped caring about that so much.
The Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences announced Friday that Hugh Jackman will be the host of the 81st annual Oscars on Feb. 22 at the Kodak Theatre.
The lanky Australian, who was recently named People magazine's Sexiest Man Alive, is best known for playing Wolverine in the ``X-Men'' franchise, including the upcoming ``X-Men Origins: Wolverine,'' and for his romantic adventure roles in the current period drama ``Australia'' and as a vampire hunter in ``Van Helsing.''
Not exactly the wild and crazy comedy type that has been hosting the Oscars for the last 20 years, a list that includes names such as Billy Crystal, David Letterman, Steve Martin, Whoopi Goldberg, Jon Stewart and Ellen DeGeneres.
In addition to looking great in a tux, the 40-year-old Jackman has TV hosting experience.
He emceed both the 2004 and 2005 Tony Awards, and won an Emmy Award for his first go at hosting that award show.
``He is so sparkling and personable, and he delivers,`` said academy President Sid Ganis.
``I saw him recently at a Motion Picture Home event on the Sony lot.
He is charming and pleasant.
The other thing is:
He loves [being the host].
He loves the patter.
He likes to wink his eye at an audience and have fun.''
While it's been more than two decades since a non-comedian was one of the Academy Award hosts, the Jackman announcement is hardly unprecedented.
Numerous actors, directors and even producers have served as master of ceremonies.
Douglas Fairbanks, Laurence Olivier, James Stewart, Ingrid Bergman, Jane Fonda, Alan Alda, Claudette Colbert, Fredric March, Agnes Moorhead, Thelma Ritter, Fred Astaire and Charlton Heston have all played host on Oscar night.
``We're sort of going back to the pre-Bob Hope days a little bit,'' said Oscar producer Laurence Mark, explaining that the decision to return to an actor as host was influenced by a desire to change what he called the ``late-night talk-show'' feel of past programs.
``We wanted to take the show to another form,'' Mark said.
``Hugh seemed to be the perfect person.
The lovely thing about the show is it is a TV show set in a theater about the movies, so the fact that he is a movie star... he's also an extraordinary stage presence and he does actually have an Emmy Award for hosting the Tonys.
He fits all three bills.''
``Thirty years ago when I was in Sydney watching Johnny Carson host the Oscars with my family, I never imagined that I'd one day have the chance to be up on that stage myself,'' Jackman said in a statement.
The academy is hoping that Jackman's international appeal will help bring more viewers to the annual event that is telecast on ABC.
Ratings for the Oscar telecast have declined sharply in recent years, especially among young-adult audiences.
The 2008 telecast delivered 32 million total viewers, a 24% drop compared with the previous year's ceremony, according to figures from Nielsen Media Research.
The most-watched Academy Awards in recent years was in 1998, when ``Titanic'' won best picture.
A total of 55.3 million people tuned in to watch who took home the golden statuettes.
``We hope [Jackman 's] appeal is going to broaden us out,'' Ganis said.
``We all know the ratings are down, but we are going to have something pretty special.''
Now that it's been confirmed that Hugh Jackman will be hosting the 81st Annual Academy Awards, instantly upping the annual ceremony's overall attractiveness, the Ampersand would like to offer some heartfelt advice to the first-time Oscar host.
True, Jackman held his own just fine as the host of both the 2004 and 2005 Tony Awards, earning an Emmy for the former, but this is a whole new ballgame.
So without further ado, Hugh, a list of dos and don'ts when hosting the Academy Awards:
DO Keep jokes tight, snappy and to-the-point, a la Jon Stewart.
Stewart pulled off a television miracle last year when he hosted the 2007 Oscars only 11 days after the WGA writer's strike ended, meaning that his jokes and opening speech were last-minute writes.
This didn't seem to dampen Stewart's usual comedic flair.
Keeping a constant string of quick (and often political) one-liners coming at the audience, who had to keep on their toes so as not to miss anything, he made sure that the ceremonies didn't get bogged down, keeping things lively.
My personal favourite quip:
``Oscar is 80 this year, which makes him now automatically the front-runner for the Republican nomination.''
A ``John McCain is so old'' joke is never in bad taste! 
Stewart also oozed confidence, despite lackluster reviews of his hosting job in 2006.
DO Channel Johnny Carson.
Carson is considered the epitome of the Oscar host.
He hosted the ceremony five times and found that magical place where a joke is just biting enough, but doesn't sting.
``I see some new faces here, especially on the old ones,'' he joked in one opening speech.
See?
Slightly scathing, but playful.
After all, the last thing you want to do is piss off your entire industry.
DO Allow yourself to get star-struck.
Even the Hollywood heavy-weights that host the Oscars are allowed to be overwhelmed by the folks the statuettes are being presented to.
While obviously a part of her act, there was something very endearing about Ellen DeGeneres pausing in her host spiel to snap a Myspace picture of her and Clint Eastwood and letting the audience know what a thrill the experience of hosting for them was.
Nothing's going to get the audience on your side like admitting they they impress you.
DO Go Big.
Hollywood has never been about self-restraint or simplicity.
When celebrating the movie industry you've got to be lavish.
While Jackman has a certain composed air about him and oozes class (have you seen a picture of him in a tux?) he could benefit from a spectacular entrance like Whoopi Goldberg's in 1999 (she waltzed on stage in full Queen Elizabeth get-up).
It's Hollywood: go big, baby.
DO Watch the time
Since the introduction of the play-off music that cuts award recipients off when they get too long-winded (is there anything more embarrassing than watching an A-lister chase the microphone as its lowered into the stage in order to get that last thank-you in?), the Oscars have been trimmer in recent years.
But just as dangerous as the ceremony going over is it running short.
It happened in 1959.
Then host Jerry Lewis forced that year's winners to dance awkwardly around the stage in order to fill the last twenty minutes of his broadcast.
Mortifying.
Avoid at all costs.
DON'T Appropriate.
It will always be funny when Billy Crystal relives the year's greatest films (or rather, dodges certain death within them) in an intricate opening montage.
He's done it eight times already and it has yet to get old.
That being said, it's Crystal's thing.
Jackman will have to come up with his own trademark hosting quirk.
Might I suggest flashy, high-kicking song and dance numbers?
DON'T Do anything that David Letterman did.
Enough said.
DON'T Be afraid to be abusive or controversial.
While no one ever wants to see a repeat of Michael Moore's rant in 2001, it's the snippy, daring jokes and comments that are remembered, like Steve Martin's improvistation right after the aforementioned tirade.
And the legitimization of funnybooks continues, as today the Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences has announced that Wolverine himself will be hosting the 81st Academy Awards, proving once again that he's the best there is at what he does - even hosting a major awards ceremony!
Okay, so it's a bit of a stretch there, but regardless, today it was announced that one of our own, Hugh Jackman, will be the host of the ceremony, televised live on Sunday, February 22, 2009, from the Kodak Theatre at Hollywood & Highland Center on ABC.
While it's certainly clear that Jackman has come into his own as one of Hollywood's top leading men of both stage and screen, what us geeks know him best as is Wolverine from both the ``X-Men'' series of films as well as next year's ``X-Men Origins: Wolverine.''
In a statement released today by the Academy, producers had this to say about their choice of Jackman as the telecast's host, ``Hugh Jackman is a consummate entertainer and an internationally renowned movie star.
He also has style, elegance and a sense of occasion.
Hugh is the ideal choice to host a celebration of the year's movies - and to have fun doing it.''
Quake hits island off south Iran, five hurt: media
A 5.6 magnitude earthquake hit an island off Iran's southern coast on Sunday, injuring five people and damaging buildings, Iranian media said.
The tremor struck an area around the town of Dargahan on Qeshm island, at the entrance to the Gulf through which 40 percent of the world's traded oil passes.
``So far only the collapse of walls of houses in the villages of Zainabieh and Koohi has been reported,'' Qeshm Governor Mehdi Irannejad told ISNA news agency.
Another news agency quoted the governor as saying five people had received treatment after being injured by the quake, which struck seven km (4 miles) east of Dargahan.
The governor told Iranian media that 2,000 tents were ready in case they were needed, and medical teams with supplies and rescue equipment had been sent to check villages near Dargahan.
Iran, the world's fourth-largest oil producer, is criss-crossed by faultlines and often experiences earthquakes.
A powerful quake with a magnitude of 6.1 struck southern Iran in September near the port city of Bandar Abbas, on the mainland near Qeshm island, killing at least seven people and injuring 40, 15 of them on Qeshm.
Five Wounded by Quake in Southern Iran
An earthquake measuring 5.6 on the Richter scale jolted Qeshm island off Iran's southern coast on Sunday, followed by several aftershocks on Monday.
The tremor struck an area around the town of Dargahan on Qeshm island, at the entrance to the Persian Gulf, injuring five people and damaging buildings.
The Seismological network of the Geophysics Institute of Tehran University registered the quake at 17:06 hours local time (13:36 GMT).
The epicenter of the quake was located in an area 55.96 degrees in longitude and 26.94 degrees in latitude.
The quake has been followed by frequent aftershocks varying from 2.8 to 3.8 degrees on the Richter scale on Monday.
``So far only the collapse of walls of houses in the villages of Zainabieh and Koohi has been reported,'' Qeshm Governor Mehdi Irannejad said.
The governor also said that five people had received treatment after being injured by the quake, which struck seven km (4 miles) east of Dargahan.
The governor said that 2,000 tents were ready in case they were needed, and medical teams with supplies and rescue equipment had been sent to check villages near Dargahan.
Residents in Dubai and the Northern Emirates also felt the quake.
A strong 5.6-magnitude earthquake jolted part of Qeshm island in the Gulf off Iran's southern Hormozgan province at 17:06 pm (1336 GMT) on Sunday, state television reported, cited by AFP.
According to the student ISNA news agency, the quake on the outskirts of Dargahan, a small town on the island, injured two people.
``Two people from Zinbi village were hurt but their general condition is satisfactory,'' Qeshm governor Mehdi Irannejad was quoted as saying.
Houses in two villages were also reported damaged, he added.
Quake shakes southern Iran, damages residential buildings
An earthquake with a magnitude of 5.6 on the Richter scale shook the southern Iranian island of Qeshm and caused damage to residential buildings in villages on Sunday, ISNA news agency reported.
Several residential units in the villages Kavouhi and Zinabieh in the Dargehan area were damaged and two villagers slightly injured, the governor of Qeshm, Mehdi iran-Nejad, told ISNA.
Relief aid and medical teams have already been dispatched to the quake site, the official said.
The same island was hit by a 6.1 quake in September.
That temblor killed at least six people, injured almost 50 and caused heavy damage to residential units in September.
Iran's state television says a magnitude-5.2 quake has injured three people in the Persian Gulf Island of Qeshm.
The report says the earthquake struck the island at 5:11 p.m. local time.
The U.S. Geological Survey put the quake's strength at magnitude-5.4.
Monday's earthquake was the second one to hit Qeshm in the past 24 hours.
Earlier on Sunday a 5.6 quake jolted the island, some 930 miles south of the capital, Tehran.
Police arrest suspect in fatal Bloomington hit and run
The driver allegedly hit a 66-year-old woman near a Bloomington parking lot and fled the scene.
Police said alcohol was a factor.
A woman hit and killed by a motorist Wednesday night outside a Sam's Club store in Bloomington might be alive if the driver had listened to bystanders who frantically pleaded with him to stop.
LuAnn Marie Johnson, 66, of Burnsville, was walking into the store at 200 W. American Blvd. with her husband when she was struck just after 7 p.m., said Sgt. Marty Earley.
She was in a marked crosswalk when the car hit her.
The impact knocked Johnson to the ground.
As she lay in front of the motorist's vehicle, a man standing next to her screamed, ``No, no, no!'' and tried to get the driver to stay put.
Instead, the driver gunned the engine and drove over Johnson, hitting her and dragging her 10 feet as he sped away, said witness Angela Benson, who had just exited the store with her two young sons and was 20 feet away.
``It was horrible to see,'' said Benson, a managing editor at WCCO-TV, Ch. 4.
``He took off like a bullet.
People were just screaming.''
Johnson was taken to Hennepin County Medical Center in Minneapolis, where she died.
After hitting her, the suspect sideswiped a parked vehicle before leaving the parking lot and heading west on American Boulevard.
Police stopped Anthony Phillip LaSalle, 36, of Bloomington, when he hit another vehicle at the intersection of American Boulevard and Lyndale Avenue.
They used a Taser to subdue him.
LaSalle was arrested and booked into the Bloomington city jail, Earley said.
He is now being held in the Hennepin County jail on probable cause for criminal vehicular operation.
Police were still gathering statements from several witnesses Thursday morning, but ``we do know alcohol was a factor,'' Earley said.
LaSalle is expected to be charged today, Earley said.
Man with murder in death at Bloomington store
A Bloomington man has been charged with third-degree murder in a hit and run that killed a woman at the Bloomington Sam's Club store.
Anthony Phillip LaSalle was also charged Friday with three counts of criminal vehicular homicide.
LaSalle is expected to appear in court next Monday.
Police say 66-year-old LuAnn Marie Johnson, of Burnsville, was killed Wednesday night when she was struck twice by LaSalle's car outside the store.
Authorities say the 36-year-old LaSalle had a blood alcohol level of 0.41%.
That's more than five times the legal limit. 
Police say they had to Taser him to get him out of his car, and that he told them he fled because he had drank a half-liter of vodka before driving to the store.
Bloomington Sam's Club hit-run driver's alcohol level: .41
The suspect in the death at a Sam's Club had a blood- alcohol level more than five times the legal limit, according to charges, and he admitted he felt his car run over someone.
A man accused of running down and killing a woman in front of a Bloomington store had a blood-alcohol level that was more than five times the legal limit, according to charges filed Friday.
Anthony Phillip LaSalle, 36, was charged with third-degree murder and three counts of criminal vehicular homicide. His blood-alcohol level was 0.41 percent, according to the charges.
The legal limit in Minnesota is 0.08 percent.
The charges say that he admitted to drinking a half-liter of vodka Wednesday and that he said he fled because he had been drinking.
LuAnn Marie Johnson, 66, of Burnsville was struck as she walked into Sam's Club at 200 W. American Blvd. on Wednesday night.
Police said she was in a marked crosswalk about 7 p.m. when a vehicle knocked her to the pavement.
The man driving momentarily stopped, and a man believed to be Johnson's husband screamed, ``No, no, no!'' and tried to prevent the car from driving off.
Instead, LaSalle gunned the engine and drove over Johnson, hitting her and dragging her 10 feet as he sped away, a witness said.
Johnson died at Hennepin County Medical Center in Minneapolis.
The car then sideswiped a parked vehicle before leaving the parking lot and heading west on American Boulevard.
Police stopped LaSalle, of Bloomington, when he hit another vehicle two blocks away at the intersection of American Boulevard and Lyndale Avenue.
According to the charges, police stopped LaSalle's vehicle and tried to make contact, but LaSalle refused to comply, saying officers ``would need to kill'' him.
Officers used a Taser to subdue him, said Sgt. Marty Earley.
LaSalle was taken to Fairview Southdale Hospital in Edina to treat a cut on his head and to take a blood sample to measure his alcohol content, the charges said.
Woman struck, killed in Bloomington
Authorities have released the name of a 66-year-old woman who was walking outside the Sam's Club in Bloomington when she was struck and killed by a motorist.
Police identified the victim on Thursday as LuAnn Marie Johnson of Burnsville.
Johnson was walking in a crosswalk outside the store when she was struck around 7 p.m. Wednesday.
Police say a man outside the Sam's Club told the 36-year-old driver to stop but he kept going.
Police pulled him over a few blocks away and say they had to Taser him to get him out of the car.
The woman was pronounced dead at HCMC.
Hit and run outside Bloomington Sam's Club leaves woman dead
A woman died Wednesday night after being struck by a hit-and-run driver outside a store in Bloomington, according to a report from WCCO-TV Channel 4.
The woman was walking in a crosswalk outside the Sam's Club at 200 W. American Blvd. around 7 p.m. when she was hit, the station reported. 
A bystander tried to stop the driver, but he drove off.
Police pulled the 36-year-old driver over a few blocks away, the station reported.
The victim, who was in her 60s, was taken to Hennepin County Medical Center in Minneapolis, where she was pronounced dead, according to the report.
The station also reported that when the driver was arrested, he was uncooperative and officers had to use a Taser to subdue him.
Police believe the driver was drinking at the time of the crash, WCCO-TV reported.
Charges Filed In Parking Lot Drunken Hit-And-Run
The Hennepin County Attorney filed criminal charges Friday against the man who they say hit and killed a woman walking out of a store.
Anthony Phillip LaSalle is now in jail for that crime.
Bloomington Police say he drank so much his blood-alcohol level was 0.41, more than five times the legal limit.
LaSalle faces serious charges, including murder and vehicular homicide.
Both of them are felonies.
The criminal complaint in this case gives details about exactly what happened Wednesday night.
LaSalle drank 1/2 liter of Vodka before he drove to the Sam's Club in Bloomington and parked his car.
As he was leaving the lot, he accelerated rapidly, and felt his front and rear left side tires drive over someone.
LuAnn Marie Johnson was hit at such a high rate of speed that her feet came out from under her and she hit her head on the pavement as she fell.
The car dragged her 10 feet.
Johnson and her husband were walking out of the store about 7 p.m.
They were in the crosswalk when the car came speeding toward them.
Michael Gallagher happened to be right there, too.
``Our hearts and prayers are with the man who lost his wife who died,'' said Gallagher, who threw down his Salvation Army Bell and ran to Johnson and her husband to help.
``He was pretty shook up.
He tried to provide first aid for and tried to provide comfort for her,'' said Sgt. Marty Earley with the Bloomington Police Department, as he described Gallagher's actions.
Minutes later, Bloomington Police saw the car LaSalle was driving.
They tried to contact LaSalle, but they say he was uncooperative and refused to get out of his vehicle, saying that officers would need to kill him.
Those police officers had to use a taser to get him out of his car.
They say he smelled like alcohol and had glassy eyes.
Bloomington Police officers gave Johnson first aid and questioned people who saw the hit-and-run.
Johnson suffered a head trauma and her injuries were severe.
She died an hour later at Hennepin County Medical Center.
Man charged in deadly hit and run outside Sam's Club
A man has been charged in a hit and run accident that killed a 66-year-old Burnsville woman.
Anthony Phillip LaSalle of Bloomington was charged on Friday with third degree murder and three counts of criminal vehicular homicide.
LaSalle is expected to appear in court next Monday.
LuAnn Marie Johnson, 66, of Burnsville was killed Wednesday night when LaSalle struck and killed her as she was walking outside a Sam's Club in Bloomington.
LaSalle, 36, had a blood alcohol level of 0.41 percent.
That's more than five times the legal limit.
Police say a man outside the Sam's Club told LaSalle to stop but he kept going.
Police pulled LaSalle over a few blocks away and say they had to Taser him to get him out of the car.
Man charged in fatal Bloomington hit and run
The man police say is behind a fatal hit and run outside a Sam's Club store in Bloomington, now faces a murder charge.
The Hennepin County attorney's office handed down charges to Anthony Phillip Lasalle Friday, which include one count of third-degree murder and three counts of criminal vehicular homicide.
Police said 66-year-old LuAnn Marie Johnson, of Burnsville, was with her husband when she was struck in the crosswalk outside the store, located at 200 West American Boulevard, around 7 p.m. Wednesday.
Paramedics rushed Johnson to Hennepin County Medical Center where she died.
``Kind, gentle, Christian, loved the Lord, and she's better off where she is now,'' said Lois Scholz, a friend of LuAnn's.
Scholz lives across the hall from LuAnn and her husband Leroy.
``Leroy was blessed and he's comfortable with this,'' Scholz said.
``I talked with him and he's very at peace with the idea that she's with the Lord.''
After a struggle, officers were able to apprehend the Bloomington man a few blocks away from the scene, by using a taser.
During his flee, Lasalle struck two other vehicles, but no one was injured, according to authorities.
According to the criminal complaint, Lasalle was transported to Fairview Southdale Hospital to be treated for his injures he sustained during his apprehension.
He also had blood drawn, which was tested, and resulted in showing his blood-alcohol level was .41.
Lasalle told police he had drank a half-liter of vodka before driving to Sam's Club.
He also admitted that he knew he had hit someone and was required to stop.
However, he told officials that because he was drunk, it affected his decision to leave the scene.
State records show Lasalle has three prior DUI convictions, spanning from 1990 to 1991.
He also has two motor vehicle theft convictions.
Lasalle is in custody.
If convicted, he faces up to 55 years in prison, a $60,000 fine, or both.
Pedestrian Fatally Hit Outside Bloomington Sam's Club
Police use Taser to arrest hit-and-run suspect
Police have arrested a man in the hit -and-run death of a woman in the parking lot crosswalk at Sam's Club in Bloomington.
66-year-old Luann Johnson, of Burnsville, was hit while walking in the crosswalk around 7 p.m. Wednesday night.
The driver fled the scene after the woman was hit.
Her husband watched it happen.
Anthony Phillip LaSalle, 36, of Bloomington, was pulled over a few blocks away, where police say he was uncooperative, refusing to exit his car.
After the suspected motorist hit the woman, he allegedly hit another car in the parking lot and another car on American Boulevard.
There, LaSalle, also known by law enforcement as ``Crazy T,'' was eventually Tasered and taken into custody.
He has a prior DWI conviction in Minnetonka from 1992.
Police say alcohol was a factor in the accident.
LaSalle is expected to face charges on Friday of criminal vehicular homicide, DWI, and driving with a limited license.
Police Release ID Of Woman Killed In Parking Lot
According to police, Anthony LaSalle, 36, of Minneapolis, hit and killed a 66-year-old LuAnn Marie Johnson in the parking lot of the Bloomington Sam's Club Wednesday night.
Holiday shopping turned traumatic for dozens of people in Bloomington Wednesday night after a woman was killed right in front of them, while her husband struggled to keep her alive.
Police said Johnsonwas in the crosswalk around 7 p.m. when the car first hit her.
The driver, LaSalle, then paused as Johnson's husband tried to stop him.
Then LaSalle hit the gas, running her over and dragging her as he tried to get away.
``The moment he hit that gas, I went, that woman just died,'' said WCCO TV Managing Editor Angela Benson.
Just seconds before, Benson and her two young sons were walking in the same crosswalk.
``I turned around and there's a man telling a car 'No, no, no, stop, wait a second.'
And there's a woman laying on the ground in front of the tire,'' recalled Benson.
She said the driver then gunned the car and took off, hitting several cars in the parking lot along the way.
``He hit her and rolled over her, and she rolled under his car a good 10 feet,'' Benson said.
Police caught up to him after he rear-ended a parked car at a stop light on Lyndale Avenue.
``The driver was uncooperative, made some veiled threats that they'd have to shoot him to get him out.
He was subsequently tased by police,'' said Bloomington Police Sgt. Marty Earley.
Meantime, Salvation Army bell ringer Michael Gallagher ran to help Johnson and her hysterical husband.
``He was pretty shook up.
He tried to provide first aid for her, and tried to provide comfort for her,'' said Earley.
Gallagher was back on the job the next day.
He had only one thing to say about the horrible thing he saw the night before.
``Our hearts and prayers go out to the man and his wife who died,'' he said.
That's something that Benson echoes.
``I just feel sad, I feel really sad for that man crying over his wife,'' she said.
Police arrested LaSalle for drunk driving.
According to his police record, this is his second DWI and he uses the alias ``Crazy T''.
He's expected to be charged with the hit-and-run by noon on Friday.
Investigators say Sam's Club is looking over its surveillance tape and will hand it over to police to check out.
A Sam's Club spokesperson said this is a terrible tragedy and their hearts and thoughts are with the woman's family.
Authorities have released the name of a 66-year-old woman who was walking outside the Sam's Club in Bloomington when she was struck and killed by a motorist.
Police identified the victim on Thursday as LuAnn Marie Johnson of Burnsville.
Johnson was walking in a crosswalk outside the store when she was struck around 7 p.m. Wednesday.
Police say a man outside the Sam's Club told the 36-year-old driver to stop but he kept going.
Police pulled him over a few blocks away and say they had to Taser him to get him out of the car.
The woman was pronounced dead at HCMC.
Arrest made in Bloomington hit and run
Police arrested a man they believe to be the hit and run driver who killed a 66-year-old woman outside the Sam's Club in Bloomington.
Bloomington officers said LuAnn Marie Johnson, of Burnsville, was walking with her husband was hit in the crosswalk of the parking lot of the store, located off American Boulevard, around 7 p.m. Wednesday.
Paramedics rushed Johnson to Hennepin County Medical Center where she died.
Police said they pulled over the driver, Anthony LaSalle, a few blocks away after he had struck two other vehicles while fleeing the scene.
Officials had to use a Taser on LaSalle to get him out of his car.
According to court records, LaSalle has three prior DUI conviction spanning from 1990 to 1991.
He also has two motor vehicle theft convictions.
LaSalle is in custody, pending formal charges that are expected Friday.
The crash is still under investigation.
Sixty-year-old Sharron Diane Crawford Smith is now accused of murdering two women at a Staunton ice cream store in 1967.
A 60-year-old woman charged with killing two young women in a Staunton ice cream shop 41 years ago was released without bail, authorities said Friday, because she is dying from kidney and heart disease and living in a hospice facility.
Staunton police on Friday arrested a 60-year-old, terminally ill woman in the 1967 killings of two young women at a local ice cream stand, ending an agonizing 41-year odyssey for the victims' families.
A co-worker has been charged in the 1967 slayings of two women at an ice cream shop in Staunton, but authorities say the suspect is near death with a terminal illness.
The Staunton Police Department announced Friday they have made an arrest in a 41-year-old double murder case.
Staunton Police Chief Jim Williams announced 61-year-old Sharron Diane Crawford Smith was arrested around 10:24 a.m. Friday and charged with two counts of first degree murder.
Staunton Police this morning arrested Sharron Diane Crawford Smith, of Staunton, on first-degree murder charges in the 1967 slayings of two women at High's Ice Cream Shop.
A onetime co-worker has been charged in the 1967 slayings of two women at an ice cream shop in Staunton, but authorities said the suspect is near death with a terminal illness.
The Staunton Police Department will hold a press conference this afternoon to address its investigation into a double murder back in 1967.
This morning, 41 years later, Staunton police have arrested and charged Sharron Diane Crawford Smith, age 61, with two counts of first-degree murder.
AN AUSTRALIAN climber who survived two nights stuck on Mount Cook after seeing his brother die narrowly escaped being buried alive.
Police say a Perth mountain climber who watched his brother fall over the edge of New Zealand's highest mountain is devastated.
Dr Mark Vinar, 43, is presumed dead after disappearing off Zurbriggens Ridge, on Mt Cook, on Thursday.
A colleague has paid tribute to a Perth doctor feared dead after a fall from a mountain in New Zealand.
Mark Vinar, an Australian climber from Perth, has been presumed dead after falling over half a kilometre from New Zealand's highest peak, Mount Cook.
AN AUSTRALIAN climber who watched his brother fall to his death on New Zealand's highest peak said he was expecting to die that night on the treacherous mountain.
Miles Vinar spoke to ONE News about seeing his brother plunge to his death on Thursday, and about his own desperate battle to stay alive on the mountain.
A Perth man has survived after spending up to two nights in an ice cave on New Zealand's Mt Cook after seeing his brother fall to his death from the country's highest peak.
A climber who watched his brother fall to his death from a notorious ridge on Mt Cook, is lucky to be alive after two ``horrific'' nights high on the mountain.
An Australian climber who survived two nights stuck on Mount Cook after seeing his brother die also narrowly escaped being buried alive himself.
Four armed robbers -- two dressed as women -- made off with $137-million of diamonds and jewels from a famed Paris store.
Robbers in drag steal e80 million from Paris diamond store in biggest French heist 
The four robbers, two of whom were disguised as women, stole nearly all the jewellery on display at Harry Winston jewellers on the Avenue Montaigne, just off the Champs-Elysees in the French capital.
Harry Winston Diamond Corp.'s prestigious Paris jewellery store near the Champs-Elysee was stormed by as many as four robbers on Thursday afternoon.
Armed robbers stole gems worth 85 million euros (74 million pounds) from luxury jewellers in the heart of Paris, during a raid described by French media on Friday as the most lucrative heist in France's history.
French police say armed robbers cleaned out a high-end jewelry store yesterday in Paris, news organizations report.
Three or four robbers burst into the store on ritzy Avenue Montaigne near the Champs-Elysees late Thursday afternoon and stole watches, rings and necklaces.
ARMED robbers in drag carried out one of the biggest jewel heists in history, snatching p74million of diamond rings, necklaces and luxury watches from a boutique in Paris.
Armed robbers stole diamonds valued at 85 million euros ($108 million) from the Paris branch of jeweler Harry Winston, the city prosecutors' office said.
Armed robbers - some disguised as women - snatched $108 million worth of diamond rings, necklaces and luxury watches from a Harry Winston boutique on a posh Paris avenue in one of the largest jewel heists in history, officials said Friday.
Armed thieves have carried out another brazen and meticulously planned robbery of the Harry Winston store in central Paris, making off with an estimated $102 million in jewelry.
A savvy band of jewel thieves, armed with guns and some posing as women, have struck in the heart of the city's golden triangle of luxury shops, stealing more than e85 million worth of diamonds, rings and watches from a posh Harry Winston boutique.
A gang of four thieves -- two of them disguised as women -- on Thursday stole nearly all the jewels on display at the Harry Winston boutique just off the Champs-Elysees avenue, which attracts a wealthy international clientele.
Jewellery worth more than $160 million has been stolen from a Paris boutique in what is believed to be France's biggest jewellery theft.
Daring Diamond Heist in Downtown Paris
At 5:30 p.m., four armed robbers, some reportedly dressed in drag, entered the store on the chic Avenue Montaigne, off the Champs Elysees in central Paris, a heavily patrolled area less than 330 feet from a police station.
Saints place Bush on IR
The New Orleans Saints have placed running back Reggie Bush on injured reserve because of a sprained knee.
Bush was hurt last Thursday in a 27-24 loss to Chicago.
The Saints are 7-7 and were eliminated from playoff contention over the weekend.
The third-year star from Southern California was the team's second-leading rusher and receiver this season, despite missing four games to recover from arthroscopic surgery for a knee injury suffered in an October 19 game against Carolina.
Bush will finish the year with 404 yards rushing and a pair of touchdowns, as well as 52 catches for 440 yards and four scores.
He also returned three punts for touchdowns.
The Saints signed cornerback Michael Lehan to fill the vacant roster spot.
New Orleans Saints RB Reggie Bush's season over
The Associated Press reports New Orleans Saints running back Reggie Bush (knee) will miss the rest of the season.
Bush underwent an MRI earlier this week, and head coach Sean Payton decided the team would place Bush on Injured Reserve.
It has been a disappointing campaign for Bush;
the 2006 second-overall pick played in just 10 games this year, rushing for 404 yards and two touchdowns while catching 52 passes for 440 yards and four scores.
However, he missed time because of arthroscopic knee surgery earlier this year and apparently a knee sprain will halt his season.
In Bush's absence this year, running back Pierre Thomas has established himself as a legitimate No. 1 back.
He has 189 rushing yards and two touchdowns in his last two games.
He has also caught eight passes for 66 yards and two touchdowns.
Of his 11 touchdowns this year, eight have come since the start of Week 11.
He has 548 rushing yards, 28 receptions and 258 receiving yards this season.
Running back Deuce McAllister could see a few more touches with Bush out, yet even when Bush was out earlier this year, McAllister only once received more than eight utilizations in a game; the team used him 22 times in Week 8. McAllister has just 317 rushing yards on the season and only 54 since the team's Week 9 bye.
However, he does have three of his four touchdowns in that stretch.
Fullback Mike Karney has received five utilizations in the last two weeks, though most are on short-yardage situations.
Fantasy owners carrying Bush have almost certainly missed out on Thomas;
if for some reason he is available, pick him up immediately.
McAllister is a last-ditch flex option as the Saints face the Detroit Lions in Week 16, but playing him is a risk given Thomas' versatility.
Karney is not a viable fantasy back.
The New Orleans Saints placed Reggie Bush on the injured list on Wednesday, ending the National Football League season for the star running back.
The 23-year-old Bush will miss the team's final two regular season games against Detroit and Carolina with a sprained left knee.
Bush finished his third season in New Orleans with just 404 yards and two touchdowns on 106 carries.
Bush suffered a left knee injury against Carolina on October 19.
He appeared to be on the mend, but he sprained the knee in last Thursday's 27-24 overtime loss at Chicago and was limited to only 30 yards on six carries.
The New Orleans Saints placed Reggie Bush on injured reserve today, officially ending his third NFL season.
It's the second straight year that Bush failed to make it to the last week of the season.
It's also the second straight year that Bush took steps backward after a strong rookie season.
Bush, who missed several games after arthroscopic knee surgery earlier this season, wraps up the year with 404 yards rushing and 440 yards receiving.
He scored six touchdowns on offense and added three more on punt returns.
There's nothing wrong with nine touchdowns in 10 games, but Bush's inability to stay on the field has made him something less than the Saints expected with the second overall pick in the 2006 Draft.
Leon Washington of the Jets, a fourth-rounder that year, has turned in similar production as Bush this season (in more games) but costs his team much less money.
Making matters worse is the fact that the relationship between Bush and coach Sean Payton seems to be deteriorating.
Bush expressed unhappiness about being yanked from last week's loss to the Bears, two weeks after Payton made a similar move against the Bucs.
Whatever his shortcomings, Bush could still play an important role in the supercharged Saints offense.
Unless he loses Payton's faith once and for all, of course.
Reggie Bush is done, for the season at least.
Bush sprained the medial collateral ligament in his left knee in the Saints' game against the Chicago Bears Thursday night.
He originally injured it against the Carolina Panthers earlier this season and needed surgery on it.
The Saints still have to play the winless Detroit Lions and the playoff-bound Panthers.
Head Coach Sean Payton said Bush's knee does not need surgery this time, just a little R and R, he also said that if the team were still in playoff contention, then he wouldn't have place Bush on IR.
Saints' spokesman Greg Bensel confirmed Wednesday owner Tom Benson underwent surgery December 10 to remove a cancerous growth on his left kidney. Bensel said in a statement released by the team.
Benson is under the primary care of his personal physician and Saints team doctor, John R. Amoss, who said he expects a full recovery.
``It was diagnosed as early-stage renal cell cancer, and the prognosis for this type of cancer removed at this stage is excellent,'' said Amoss.
``We anticipate a full and complete recovery, and he will not need any radiation or chemotherapy.''
The 81-year old is at home, and will miss the team's trip to Detroit, but will be back at the office next week sometime.
Bush placed on injured reserve
The Saints placed running back Reggie Bush on injured reserve ending his season.
The decision was made after Bush met with Dr. James Andrews this past week.
Bush injured his left knee on Oct. 19 and had arthroscopic surgery to fix a torn meniscus and missed four games.
He was bothered by the knee last week against the Bears and didn't play in the second half.
Pierre Thomas will get most of the carries and is an excellent play against the Lions this week.
Saints could shut down Reggie Bush?
The Biloxi Sun Herald suggests that Reggie Bush (knee) could be shut down for the remainder of the Saints' season.
Beat writer Larry Holder puts this in a one liner, saying Bush ``could sit out the final two games.''
It may be speculative, or Holder has reasoning behind it that he doesn't give.
We'll know more about Bush Wednesday, when the Saints practice and hopefully reveal the results of his MRI.
Injured Saints RB Reggie Bush to miss last 2 games
Running back Reggie Bush will miss the final two games of the New Orleans Saints' season.
The knee was examined over the weekend and coach Sean Payton said at practice on Wednesday that the team decided to put Bush on injured reserve.
Payton said the Saints, who were eliminated from playoff contention over the weekend, would not have placed Bush on injured reserve if they were still fighting to reach the postseason.
He said Bush's injury does not require surgery, just rest and rehabilitation.
Bush rushed for 404 yards and two touchdowns, caught 52 passes for 440 yards and four TDs, and scored three touchdowns on punt runbacks this season.
Saints shut down Bush
Running back to miss games against Lions and Panthers
Reggie Bush's injury-hit season has come to an early end due to a sprained left knee.
The running back has been placed on injured reserve by the New Orleans Saints, meaning he will miss the final two games against Detroit and Carolina.
The 23-year-old finished his third season with the franchise with 404 yards rushing on 106 carries, scoring two touchdowns on the ground.
Bush picked up the problem in the Saints' overtime loss to the Chicago Bears in week 15, a result that ended their hopes of reaching the play-offs.
With nothing to play for but pride in the final two weeks, New Orleans have decided to rest him for the remainder of the season.
It is not the first time this year Bush has had a problem with his left knee. 
He missed four games after having arthroscopic surgery back in October.
The Saints signed cornerback Michael Lehan, who had been with the Miami Dolphins, to fill the roster spot, despite being short-handed at running back.
Already without Deuce McAllister, coach Sean Payton will now rely on Pierre Thomas and Mike Bell, who has had only six carries this season, having signed for the team in week 12.
The Tampa Bay Buccaneers have also lost a player to injury, a fractured right forearm sidelining Jermaine Phillips for the remainder of the season.
The strong safety, who ranks fifth on the team with 86 tackles, was injured during the 13-10 overtime loss to the Atlanta Falcons last Sunday.
Phillips had already missed three games earlier this season with a fractured left forearm.
The Bucs will have to do without him in their bid to reach the play-offs.
Tampa have signed defensive end Patrick Chukwurah and linebacker Rod Wilson to bolster their defence, while releasing running back Noah Herron.
Saints place RB Bush on injured reserve
The injury-plagued season of New Orleans Saints running back Reggie Bush is over.
The Saints placed Bush on the injured reserve list Wednesday with a sprained left knee, meaning he will miss the team's final two games against Detroit and Carolina.
However, given his limited effectiveness last week, the Saints decided to shut him down for the remainder of the season.
The former Southern California star finished his third season in New Orleans with just 404 yards and two touchdowns on 106 carries.
Bush suffered a left knee injury against Carolina on October 19 and missed the next four games following arthroscopic surgery.
He returned to action against Tampa Bay on October 30 and scored a touchdown the following week against Atlanta.
Bush appeared to be on the mend, but he sprained the knee in last Thursday's 27-24 overtime loss at Chicago and was limited to only 30 yards on six carries.
On Saturday, New Orleans coach Sean Payton indicated that Bush would not return to the lineup until further undergoing a further evaluation.
However, given his limited effectiveness last week, the Saints decided to shut him down for the remainder of the season.
Bush's absence leaves the Saints furthered shorthanded in the backfield as they are now down to Pierre Thomas and Mike Bell, who has had only six carries this season after signing with New Orleans in Week 12.
To take Bush's roster spot, the Saints signed cornerback Michael Lehan, who had been with the Miami Dolphins.
In case you had any doubts whether or not Pierre Thomas (left) would get more carries than Reggie Bush, you can now have full faith in Thomas.
After spraining his knee last week at Chicago, Bush has been placed on the injured reserve list ending his season.
Hello, Mr. Thomas. Owners have been worried that Thomas' carries would be affected by Bush's return, but those worries are all for naught.
With Bush completely out of the picture, Thomas is the lone back and could capitalize in a big way in his two remaining games.
Remember, Thomas is still playing for a contract.
The Saints take on the 0-14 Lions, and it appears the Saints will march into Motown and hand them No. 15.
The Lions have the league's worst rushing defense, and teams don't need to throw a lot because offenses are able to run wild.
Good news for Pierre owners.
Thomas is an elite RB going forward, and those of you lucky enough to nab him should reap the benefits. Make sure he's in your lineups for championship weeks.
Since Week 11, Thomas has eight touchdowns on 498 rushing yards and 176 receiving yards.
Not bad for a late waiver-wire guy, huh?
As far as Bush is concerned, the Saints are erring on the side of caution regarding the injury.
With the playoffs out of the picture, there's no need to worsen the injury.
He'll be a top PPR running back in 2009.
The Saints have placed Bush (knee) on injured reserve, the Baton Rouge Advocate reports.
Bush tweaked his left knee last Thursday and coach Sean Payton said the Saints decided to put the running back on IR after determining that he would be unavailable for the team's final two games.
The positive here is that Bush's injury shouldn't impact his 2009 availability. 
Pierre Thomas figures to see the bulk of the Saints' carries the next couple of weeks, as a result.
The New Orleans Saints placed running back Reggie Bush on Injured Reserve Wednesday, ending the former first-round picks season two games short of the year's finale with a sprained medial collateral ligament in his left knee.
Bush missed four games earlier this season after undergoing arthroscopic surgery to repair the meniscus on his left knee and it appears it was injured in the Saints' Thursday night loss to Chicago.
``Right now, for him, it's going to be rehab and rest with it,'' Saints Head Coach Sean Payton said.
``With two weeks remaining in the season, we thought that was the best way to go with his injury and allowed us acquire another player.''
Payton added, ``He wouldn't be put on IR if we had more than two weeks or three weeks left in the season.
The news is fairly good, which is encouraging.''
Bush was unavailable for comment Wednesday and will see Dr. James Andrews in Birmingham, Ala., for further evaluation Friday.
He missed games against San Diego, Atlanta, Kansas City and Green Bay midway through this season after getting injured in New Orleans' 30-7 Oct. 19 loss at Carolina.
Payton pulled Bush in the second half of the loss to the Bears and following the game, Bush expressed frustration with the move.
Saints quarterback Drew Brees understands.
``He was frustrated. He's not the only one,'' Brees said.
``There's a lot of guys who get frustrated when maybe you want to play and you're not or you know you're not 100 percent healthy and it's affecting you.
That frustrates you.''
``He's used to being the guy,'' Brees continued.
``He's used to being the one everyone counts on in the clutch situations, all the way from high school to college.
That's what's in his makeup.
That's what's in his blood.
He's an extremely competitive guy.''
The former USC running back and Heisman Trophy winner also missed the final four games of the 2007 season after tearing the posterior cruciate ligament in his left knee.
But Payton said the injuries this year aren't related to his injury a year ago and he's not concerned with the long-term prognosis of the third-year pro.
``We're encouraged with the overall outlook and not having surgery it appears right now,'' Payton said.
Bush was named an alternate to the NFC Pro Bowl team on Tuesday.
Prior to getting injured, Bush was having a standout year.
Through 14 games in the 2008 season, Bush had 404 yards and two touchdowns on 106 carries, averaging 3.8 yards per run.
He also had 440 yards and four touchdowns receiving and had returned three punts for touchdowns.
``I had a long visit with him (Tuesday),'' Payton said.
``Just disappointment in the way the season started. Certainly it was encouraging.
As we monitor his touches and we look at how many times he gets the ball, be it in the running game and passing game, we'll find that right balance.''
Reggie Bush's season has come to an end.
The Saints placed Bush on the injured reserve list Wednesday after he suffered a knee sprain in the team's Week 15 loss at Chicago.
Saints put Bush on I.R.
New Orleans signed CB Michael Lehan, who spent five games with the Dolphins this season, to take the vacant roster spot.
Bush played in 10 games, but had to sit out four straight after he underwent knee surgery to repair a torn meniscus in October.
He rushed 106 times for 404 yards and two touchdowns and also had 52 catches for 440 yards and four TDs. He also had three punt returns for scores.
Sports news in brief from around the world:
New Orleans Saints running back Reggie Bush has been placed on injured reserve and will miss the final two games of the regular season, the team said Wednesday.
Bush hurt his left knee against the Carolina Panthers on Oct. 19 and, after missing four games during rehabilitation, has struggled to regain his form.
The Saints (7-7) will visit the Detroit Lions (0-14) this Sunday.
Golf - U.S. Masters champion Trevor Immelman has become the fourth South African to be awarded honorary life membership of the European Tour, and the 32nd overall.
``I actually have goosebumps just thinking about this,'' said the 29-year-old on the eve of the South African Open in Paarl.
``I started my professional career on the tour.
``To become an honorary life member ... is something extremely special I will cherish for the rest of my life,'' added Immelman who follows in the footsteps of compatriots Gary Player, Ernie Els and Retief Goosen.
Gaetano Lo Presti, one of 99 alleged Sicilian Mafia members seized on Tuesday, has apparently hanged himself with his belt in prison.
Lo Presti, 52, head of Mafia clans in the Porta Nuova area of Palermo, was found dead in Pagliarelli prison only hours after his arrest.
A Mafia boss in Palermo hanged himself in jail after hours before he was arrested in a police's raid.
Suspected Key Mafia Boss Vying For Top Costra Nostra Slot Found Hanging Dead In Palermo Jail Cell
A key suspected Mafia boss arrested Tuesday in a Sicilian police raid has been found dead, hanging in his Pagliarelli prison cell in in Palermo.
An alleged Mafia boss who was caught on wiretaps purportedly discussing Cosa Nostra's new hierarchy hanged himself in a Sicilian jail hours after his arrest, police said Wednesday.
A suspected Mafia boss arrested in a high-profile police raid has been found dead in his cell, Italian police sources have said.
Gaetano Lo Presti, who had been previously convicted of mob-related crimes before his re-arrest on Tuesday, was found dead in Pagliarelli prison in the Sicilian capital of Palermo.
Police said Lo Presti had hanged himself late on Tuesday night.
One of the key suspected Mafia bosses arrested yesterday in one of Sicily's biggest police operations has hanged himself in his prison cell, police said .
Gaetano Lo Presti, the ``godfather'' of the Palermo district of Porta Nuova, was found dead late last night in Pagliarelli prison in the Sicilian capital of Palermo.
An alleged mafia boss who was arrested in a massive sweep by Italian police hanged himself in a prison cell within hours of being detained.
Police have launched an investigation into how Gaetano Lo Presti was able to commit suicide.
He was found dead in a cell in Palermo's Pagliarelli prison late on Tuesday night, just hours after being picked up during raids by 1,200 police backed up by helicopters and sniffer dogs.
The alleged Mafia boss of a Palermo neighborhood hanged himself in jail, hours after he was arrested in a blitz against Cosa Nostra, police in Sicily said Wednesday.
Carabinieri paramilitary police in Palermo said Gaetano Lo Presti, 52, hanged himself in his cell in a Palermo jail Tuesday evening, hours after he was arrested in the raid.
A suspected Mafia leader has hanged himself in prison in Sicily hours after being arrested, Italian police say.
Police said Lo Presti, alleged boss of a Sicilian Mafia clan in a district of Palermo, hanged himself in his cell.
A suspected Mafia boss arrested Tuesday in a high-profile police swoop has hanged himself in his prison cell, police sources said Wednesday.
Gaetano Lo Presti, who was already convicted of mob-related crimes prior to his latest arrest, was found dead late last night in Pagliarelli prison in the Sicilian capital of Palermo.
One of the Mafia bosses and clan members arrested in a major police crackdown has hung himself in his prison cell in Palermo.
His suicide appeared to be related to clan feuds.
Gaetano Lo Presti, 52, who had taken over control of Mafia clans in the Porta Nuova area of Palermo and had previous convictions, was found dead in Pagliarelli prison, police said today.
A suspected Mafia leader committed suicide overnight after being arrested in a major police sweep, police in Palermo, Sicily, said on Wednesday.
He may have been driven to suicide because wiretapped conversations between him and other Mafia bosses helped lead to the police sweep on Tuesday in which 89 people were arrested following a nine-month probe, the Ansa news agency reported.
A mafioso committed suicide hours after his arrest in a police bust of almost 100 people suspected of trying to re-establish Cosa Nostra provincial 'commission'.
Gaetano Lo Presti, 52, hung himself in his cell on Tuesday evening after he is believed to have read police wiretap transcripts implicating him in the affair.
Internet Explorer issue 'fixed', say Microsoft
Microsoft has said that an emergency security update has fixed a flaw in Internet Explorer that left millions of computers vulnerable to hacking and hijack .
The software patch, which was released last night, has closed a loophole that has seen the computers of at least two million users hacked by cyber criminals.
The problem related to a ``zero day'' flaw that tricked people into visiting an infected website, enabling hackers to gain access to online banking passwords and e-shopping logon details.
``Microsoft has released a security update for Internet Explorer that will help protect its customers from malicious attacks ,'' said the company in a statement.
``Like a vaccine developed to fight a virus, this 'security update' will protect computers only if it is installed.''
Computers that are set to automatically update and install software will already be protected by the patch.
Those users who manage their own updates are advised to download the fix as soon as possible from the Microsoft website.
``When the patch is released, people should run, not walk, to get it installed,'' said Paul Ferguson, a researcher with Trend Micro.
``This vulnerability is being actively exploited by cyber criminals and getting worse every day.''
It is thought that the security flaw, which came to light earlier this week, was exposed by accident, after a Chinese security firm, Knowsec, released details of the loophole believing Microsoft had already issued a software fix to resolve it.
However, technology experts have warned that malware authors, who write the viruses and code that exploits security vulnerabilities, are already working on ways to get around the software update.
``We are seeing customised versions of the IE 7 exploit with varying degrees of obfuscation,'' wrote McAfee security expert Rahul Mohandas on the company blog.
``Malware authors have been coming up with innovative mechanisms to leverage this exploit to social engineer the not so tech-savvy internet users.''
Microsoft Releases Critical Patch For IE Zero Day Flaw
Microsoft (NSDQ:MSFT) issued an out-of-band emergency patch Wednesday for a zero-day Internet Explorer vulnerability that has opened the door for hackers to install malware on susceptible computers without any user intervention.
The flaw, which is given the highest severity rating of critical, affects all versions of Microsoft's IE Web browser.
Specifically, Microsoft's IE update affects versions of Windows 2000 for IE 5.01:XP, XP Professional, Server 2003 for IE 6; and XP, Server 2003, Vista, Server 2008 for IE 7.
The vulnerability was reported after the release of Windows IE 8 Beta 2, but Microsoft still recommends in its advisory that users apply the patch.
The IE security problem is the result of a fundamental flaw in the browser's data binding function, which ultimately leaves a hole in the memory space that can be accessed by remote hackers.
Internet Explorer can then quit unexpectedly while in an exploitable state.
Unlike other exploits, users have only to visit a malicious site infused with Trojans or other malware in order to become infected.
Hackers can also entice victims to visit a specially crafted site, usually via some kind of phishing or social engineering scheme, or place infected banner ads on legitimate Web sites.
Once users open an infected Web page, malicious downloaders are then installed on their computers, which are designed to record keystrokes and steal passwords, credit card numbers, or other financial information.
The users' computer could also become part of a botnet, an infected network of compromised computers, operated by a central command and control center.
Security researchers first saw evidence of attacks exploiting the IE vulnerability last week, shortly following Microsoft's ``Patch Tuesday'' monthly security bulletin release Dec. 9.
Since then, researchers have seen active exploitation rapidly spread in the wild.
While exact numbers of victims are difficult to precisely calculate, the number of infected computers could potentially affect hundreds of thousands or millions of computers, experts say.
``There're people constantly looking at the code, trying to find issues like (the IE vulnerability),'' said Dave Marcus, security research and communications manager for McAfee.
``It gets posted to the Internet very quickly.''
McAfee Avert Labs researchers reported variants of the IE exploit that attempt to infect users via an ActiveX control that stores the malicious exploit code, stealthily running in the background of a Microsoft Word document.
Malware is then installed on the vulnerable computer once users open up a Word document -- all without their knowledge or permission.
``We've seen some pretty clever ways of people trying to take advantage of this,'' said Marcus.
``It just speaks to the fact that they look for clever, very unique ways to get malware onto your system.''
Security experts strongly recommend that users apply Microsoft's latest IE patch as soon as possible, which can be downloaded from the Microsoft Web site.
Microsoft releases emergency patch for IE
Microsoft on Wednesday released an emergency patch to fix a perilous software flaw allowing hackers to hijack Internet Explorer browsers and take over computers.
The US software giant said security update MS08-078 addresses a vulnerability cyber-criminals can exploit to their advantage.
``Microsoft encourages all IE customers to test and deploy this update as soon as possible,'' said Microsoft security response communications head Christopher Budd.
The threat led Microsoft to mobilize security engineering teams worldwide to deliver a software cure ``in the unprecedented time of eight days.''
According to researchers at software security firm Trend Micro, attacks based on the vulnerability in the world's most popular Web browser were spreading ``like wildfire'' with millions of computers already compromised.
Microsoft typically releases patches for its software on the second Tuesday of each month and rushing this fix to computer users out-of-cycle is testimony to the severe danger of the threat, according to Trend Micro.
``People should run, not walk, to get it installed,'' said Trend Micro advanced threat researcher Paul Ferguson.
``This vulnerability is being actively exploited by cyber-criminals and getting worse every day.''
The IE software patch will be automatically applied to hundreds of millions of personal computers due to standard update settings in the machines, according to Microsoft Security Response Alliance director Mike Reavey.
Wednesday morning, business networks using IE began getting the critical fix through routine patching processes.
Reavey said Microsoft went into ``emergency response'' mode on December 9 after it first learned of the attacks on IE browsers.
A day later, Microsoft published a security advisory that ``listed workarounds that blocked all known attacks.''
``Over the course of the next eight days, this advisory was updated five times, adding newer workarounds and mitigations,'' Reavey said.
``We also continually monitored the threat environment, noting when the attacks began to change in nature and scope.''
Trend Micro has identified about 10,000 websites that have been infected with malicious software that can be surreptitiously slipped into visitors' unprotected IE browsers to take advantage of the flaw.
A major Internet portal in Taiwan is among the legitimate websites unknowingly tainted with malicious software aimed at IE's weak spot, according to Ferguson.
Hackers can take control of infected computers, steal data, redirect browsers to dubious websites, and use machines for devious activities such as attacks on other networks, according to security specialists.
``What makes this so insidious is it takes advantage of a big gaping hole of IE, which has the largest install base of any browser on the market,'' Ferguson said.
IE is used on nearly three-quarters of the world's computers, according to industry statistics from November.
Reavey said the patch consists of more than 300 distinct updates for more than half-a-dozen versions of IE in scores of languages.
Analyst Rob Enderle of Enderle Group in Silicon Valley said it was ``amazing'' that Microsoft was able to turn out a complex critical fix in a week when such jobs typically can take a month or longer of intense work.
``Even with that, the release Emergency Response process isn't over,'' Reavey said.
``There is additional support to customers and additional refinement of our product development efforts.''
Trend Micro urges IE users to heed precautionary advice from Microsoft, or avoid using the browsers, until the patches are applied.
The ``exploit'' is similar to one used recently to steal user names, passwords and other information from people playing online games in China, according to Trend Micro.
Microsoft releases emergency patch for IE
Microsoft has released an emergency patch to fix a software flaw that allows hackers to get into Internet Explorer browsers and take over computers.
The head of Microsoft's security response team says all users of Internet Explorer should test and install the update as soon as possible.
Experts say without the emergency patch, the flaw could allow criminals to take control of computers and steal users' passwords even when they are not downloading material.
Microsoft says less than 1 per cent of Australian PC users have been affected by the problem.
Microsoft Issues Emergency Patch to Curb Password-Stealing Hackers
Microsoft today issued an emergency update to plug a critical security hole present in all versions of its Internet Explorer Web browser, a flaw that hackers have been leveraging to steal data from millions of Windows users.
The patch, which Microsoft dubbed MS08-078, fixes a security vulnerability that Microsoft says already has been used to attack more than 2 million Windows users.
As Security Fix and other members of the tech community have chronicled, attackers have been busy compromising thousands of Web sites by seeding them with code that installs password-stealing software on computer systems of Web site visitors who use Internet Explorer.
Microsoft estimated Monday that one in every 500 Windows users had been exposed to sites that try to exploit the flaw.
Additionally, it said the number of victims was increasing at a rate of 50 percent daily.
Vulnerability management company nCircle said Microsoft's decision to issue the patch outside of its normal Patch Tuesday (second Tuesday of each month) cycle is wise, given the current exploitation of the flaw and because instructions for exploiting the flaw are now available online.
``Given the ongoing attacks for this bug and because the technical details have been available to the public for over a week, this is clearly a high risk client side vulnerability that everyone should patch now,'' said Andrew Storms, director of security for nCircle.
This is an urgent update. 
If you use Windows, apply this patch now.
Windows users can download the fix at Windows Update, or by enabling Automatic Updates.
With Web attacks increasing, Microsoft fixes IE bug
Security experts say that Web surfers should immediately install a new bug-fix for Microsoft's Internet Explorer browser, released Wednesday morning.
The flaw, which was accidentally made public by Chinese security researchers just over a week ago, has been used in a growing number of Web-based attacks over the past few days.
Criminals have posted attack code that exploits this flaw on thousands of Web sites so far, according to Rick Howard, intelligence director with Verisign's iDefense group.
Verisign has now seen six variants of the attack software, all of which attempt to steal Chinese online gaming credentials.
Often the attack is launched through a hidden iFrame component that is surreptitiously put on a Web site.
Verisign has even spotted one such iFrame attack on a legitimate financial institution's Web site, Howard said.
``The volume of iFrames deploying this thing is really high.''
The flaw lies in the way Internet Explorer's data-binding function works, Microsoft said.
When the browser is attacked it will crash, corrupting the computer's memory and allowing the criminal to run unauthorized software.
View more related contentView all related articles
Because Internet Explorer is used by about 70 percent of Web surfers, this attack code will probably show up in widely used malicious software toolkits ``very shortly,'' Howard said.
Other security companies agreed with Verisign's assessment.
``Microsoft's latest IE out-of-band patch release needs to be installed right away,'' said Shavlik Technologies in a statement.
``The number of infected Web sites is growing at an alarming rate -- even people visiting legitimate Web sites are getting hacked with this exploit.''
The flaw is so serious, in fact, that Microsoft took the unusual step of issuing its security fix weeks ahead of schedule.
Typically Microsoft releases security patches just once a month in order to simplify the lives of system administrators.
Its next set of updates is due Jan. 13.
Criminals could also launch their attacks via e-mail, by sending victims maliciously encoded HTML documents, although this type of attack has not been reported.
Microsoft's patch is for users of IE version 5 and up.
Microsoft releases patch for critical IE security flaw
Microsoft released a critical security patch on Wednesday to plug vulnerabilities in Internet Explorer, a move that comes amid malicious attackers taking advantage of the security flaws.
The patch is designed to prevent attackers from downloading malware onto users' computers if they visit a malicious Web site, or a legitimate Web site that has been infected.
This zero-day exploit has been in circulation since the first week of December and potentially could have infected a wide swath of users.
The vulnerabilities are found in not only IE 7, Microsoft's latest browser, but also Internet Explorer 5.01, Internet Explorer 6, and Internet Explorer 6 Service Pack 1.
Microsoft Releases Critical Internet Explorer Patch
The out-of-band security update fixes a JavaScript-related vulnerability that's being actively exploited through hacked Web sites.
Microsoft (NSDQ:MSFT) has released an out-of-band security update , MS08-078, to fix a vulnerability in its Internet Explorer Web browser that's being actively exploited.
``At this time, we are aware only of attacks that attempt to use this vulnerability against Windows Internet Explorer 7,'' said Christopher Budd, Microsoft security response communications lead, in an e-mailed statement.
``Our investigation of these attacks so far has verified that they are not successful against customers who have applied the security update.
MS08-078 has a maximum severity rating of Critical for all versions of Internet Explorer.''
On the heels of the Yahoo deal that fell apart V 2, comeback CEO Jerry Yang was skewered by the able hands of Web 2.0 Summit host John Battelle.
Paul Martino, CEO of Aggregate Knowledge, talks about the company's ``online discovery'' tool, which essentially looks across hundreds of millions of Web sites and recommends content, products, and services to users in real time.
Mashmaker allows developers to add a bit of JavaScript to any page and have that page automatically populated with appropriate widgets, making the page more useful for site visitors.
Nonetheless, Microsoft lists Internet Explorer 5.01, 6, and 7 as affected software in its Security Bulletin.
It also says separately, in the FAQ section, that Internet Explorer 8 Beta 2 is affected.
The vulnerability can be exploited through JavaScript code posted on malicious Web sites.
Internet Explorer users may be redirected to these sites through hacked legitimate sites.
If the malicious code is successful, it silently downloads malware onto the victim's computer.
Microsoft typically releases software patches, referred to as Security Bulletins, on the second Tuesday of every month.
When critical vulnerabilities emerge and are actively exploited, Microsoft often issues a patch as soon as it's ready.
The last such out-of-band patch, Microsoft Security Bulletin MS08-067, was released on Oct. 23.
It addressed a vulnerability in Windows Server service that affected all currently supported versions of Windows.
That vulnerability allowed an attacker to take over affected computers remotely.
When Microsoft issued its out-of-band patch in October, it cited the vulnerability's potential ``wormability'' -- meaning the hole could be exploited on a massive scale using self-copying malware -- as a reason for its action.
But MS08-078 isn't wormable.
``That shows that the wormability of a vulnerability is no longer a good indicator of the seriousness of a threat and that these Web-based threats are now much more dangerous than network worms,'' said Roel Schouwenberg, senior antivirus researcher for Kaspersky Lab, Americas, in an e-mailed statement.
Indeed, Microsoft security researchers estimated that as many as 1 in 500 users of Internet Explorer could have been exposed to malware attempting to exploit the flaw.
``The browser flaw had been disclosed roughly one week ago as a zero-day vulnerability, and active exploits have been around the Internet for that timeframe as well,'' Qualys CTO Wolfgang Kandek said in an e-mailed statement.
``The workarounds provided by Microsoft were very technical and quite cumbersome to implement, making it imperative for Microsoft to release a fix as quickly as possible.''
Kandek suggests that Microsoft is at a disadvantage in updating Internet Explorer because its browser doesn't have a built-in update mechanism like other browser makers.
Mozilla, for instance, just released Firefox 3.05 to Firefox users through its auto-update system.
Microsoft is urging users of IE to test and deploy this update as soon as possible.
Microsoft releases emergency patch for Web browser
Microsoft was to release an emergency patch yesterday to fix a perilous software flaw allowing hackers to hijack Internet Explorer (IE) browsers and take over computers.
The US software giant said on Tuesday that in response to ``the threat to customers'' it immediately mobilized security engineering teams worldwide to deliver a software cure ``in the unprecedented time of eight days.''
Researchers at software security firm Trend Micro say attacks based on the vulnerability in the world's most popular Web browser are ``spreading like wildfire'' with millions of computers already compromised.
Microsoft typically releases patches for its software on the second on Tuesday of each month and rushing this fix to computer users out-of-cycle is testimony to the severe danger of the threat, according to Trend Micro.
``When the patch is released people should run, not walk, to get it installed,'' said Trend Micro advanced threat researcher Paul Ferguson.
``This vulnerability is being actively exploited by cyber-criminals and getting worse every day,'' he said.
Trend Micro has identified about 10,000 Web sites that have been infected with malicious software that can be surreptitiously slipped into visitors' unprotected IE browsers to take advantage of the flaw.
``What makes this so insidious it takes advantage of a big gaping hole of IE, which has the largest install base of any browser on the market,'' Ferguson said.
IE is used on nearly three-quarters of the world's computers, industry statistics from last month showed.
Microsoft's move came one day after Cisco issued a report saying armies of hijacked computers are flooding the world with spam as hackers devise slicker ways to take over unwitting people's machines.
Virus-infected computers are woven into ``botnets'' used to attack more machines and to send specious sales pitches to e-mail addresses in low-cost quests to bilk readers out of cash.
``Every year we see threats evolve as criminals discover new ways to exploit people, networks and the Internet,'' Cisco chief security researcher Patrick Peterson said.
This year, botnets were used to inject an array of legitimate Web sites with an IFrames malicious code that reroutes visitors to Web sites that download computer viruses into their machines, Cisco said.
Microsoft Patches IE, But Security Issues Remain
As usual, the bad guys are ahead in the tug-of-war over security.
Microsoft today released a patch for the latest Internet Explorer (IE) browser vulnerability that has been in the news since last week.
However, malware authors have already begun pushing out customized variants of the flaw that the Microsoft patch may not address.
The vulnerability, rooted in IE's XML parser, lets attackers execute code on their victims' PCs.
By Saturday, at least 6,000 Web sites had been infected and the number is growing though ascertaining the exact number is difficult.
However, security experts say things will get much worse, even if users follow Microsoft's (NASDAQ: MSFT) advice to install the patch immediately.
Currently attacks have only targeted IE 7, Christopher Budd, security response communications lead at Microsoft, said in a statement.
They have not been successful against systems where the patch has been applied, according to Budd.
Microsoft is hosting two Webcasts to address customer questions about the security bulletin.
The first was set for 1 p.m. PDT today and 11 a.m. PDT tomorrow in the U.S. and Canada.
The Webcast will be available on demand after that.
According to researcher Rahul Mohandas on the McAfee (NYSE:MFE) Avert Labs blog, malware authors have already begun issuing customized version of the IE exploit with various degrees of stealth.
One of the most prominent techniques is where the attacker sends victims a Microsoft Word document by e-mail that contains an embedded ActiveX control triggered when the document is opened.
This exploit was listed as one of the SysAdmin, Audit, Network, Security (SANS) Institute's top 20 security risks in 2007.
Victims of the latest exploit are hit by drive-by injection attacks, where they go to a compromised Web site that automatically downloads malicious code onto their Web site.
Malware authors have come up with a new twist on this, Dave Marcus, security research and communications director at McAfee Labs, told InternetNews.com.
They plant an IFrame onto a legitimate site and the IFrame redirects unsuspecting visitors to the site hosting the malicious code.
An IFrame is an HTML element that lets users embed an HTML document inside another HTML document.
The CBS (NYSE:CBS) TV network site was hit by an IFrame attack on November 11 that saw visitors redirected to a server in Russia, according to security company Finjan's MCRC blog on November 27.
``We've seen an awful lot of sites that have been compromised with the IFrame on them,'' Marcus said.
``It's a very Web 2.0 way of spreading malware.''
Critical IE patch now available: go get it!
In Thursday's IT Blogwatch, Richi Jennings watches bloggers watch Microsoft's latest out-of-cycle, critical patch for Internet Explorer.
Not to mention portability, 1980's style ...
As it promised [Tuesday], Microsoft Corp. today issued an emergency patch to plug a critical hole in Internet Explorer (IE) that attackers have been increasingly exploiting from hacked Web sites.
The patch, described in Microsoft's security bulletin MS08-078, fixes a flaw in the data-binding function of all available versions of the popular browser, including IE5.01, IE6, IE7 and IE8 Beta 2.
Microsoft labeled the bug as ``critical,'' the most serious threat ranking in its four-step scoring system.
According to both Microsoft and numerous security firms, attacks have been mounting, particularly since last weekend, when hackers began hijacking legitimate Web sites and launching exploits against unwary visitors.
In fact, Microsoft said it monitored a ``huge increase'' in attacks last Saturday.
The number of infected Web sites, many of them legitimate, has grown at ``an alarming'' rate since the vulnerability was released into the wild and people need to do nothing but visit an infected site with a vulnerable browser to be affected.
By Friday, Microsoft was aware users were becoming infected at a rate even faster than previous zero-day exploits.
Originally porn sites seemed to be the carriers, but the number of legit sites causing infections was skyrocketing.
Hackers were planting the exploit using well-known SQL injection techniques.
It is users' turn to protect themselves by installing this emergency patch and all all the others, and fast.
Since the bad guys were exploiting it before Microsoft knew it existed, the exploit is termed ``zero day'' because that is how much notice Microsoft got of the problem.
It is also termed an ``drive-by'' exploit since a user could pick up a malware infestation by merely using IE to browse any of thousands of compromised websites.
In short, it was really nasty stuff.
Brian Krebs sounds worried:
Microsoft estimated Monday that one in every 500 Windows users had been exposed to sites that try to exploit the flaw. 
Additionally, it said the number of victims was increasing at a rate of 50 percent daily.
This is an urgent update. 
If you use Windows, apply this patch now.
Microsoft's Mike Reavey grabs the mic:
This update will be applied automatically to hundreds of millions of customers through automatic updates over the next few days.
And, for our enterprise customers - with multiple systems within their networks - this update can be deployed through all standard security update management systems including, SCCM, SMS, WSUS, and Windows Update
This update meets the quality, deployment and application compatibility criteria.
It is a high-quality update, ready for broad release, and we encourage customers to test and deploy this update as quickly as possible.
We were able to share detailed information with our partners in the Microsoft Active Protections Program (MAPP) and Microsoft Security Response Alliance (MSRA), allowing protections to be created for over 24 different security partners' products.
This is further validation of our commitment to 'community based defense' and means customers that ... weren't even using Microsoft products, were also protected from known attacks.
Ed Oswald is impressed by Microsoft's speed:
Well, that was quick.
It's pretty bad when security experts are telling your customers to switch.
These are unbiased (for the most part) folks, and the typical computer user is going to take their advice seriously.
But Tiny Dancer ... well, not so much:
Eight days is rather shamefully long to have to wait for a potentially devastating vulnerability to be fixed.
This ain't Hanukkah, Microsoft, and you ain't no Maccabee.
Microsoft releases security update for Internet Explorer
Microsoft has released an emergency security update to fix the vulnerability in Internet Explorer that has seen the computers of at least two million users hacked.
The ``zero day'' flaw allows hackers to gain access to the computers of visitors to infected websites, jeopardising the security of passwords, bank details and other personal information.
It is believed that as many as 233,000 web pages have been affected.
Microsoft says its ``critical'' update will protect users. 
Christopher Budd, of the software giant's security centre, said the company ``encourages all Internet Explorer customers to test and deploy this update as soon as possible''.
Mike Reavey, also from the security centre, said: ``Even with that, the release Emergency Response process isn't over.
There is additional support to customers and additional refinement of our product development efforts.''
Microsoft has said that the flaw has been proven to exist only in version 7 of Internet Explorer, but that version 6 and the ``beta'' release of version 8 are also ``potentially vulnerable''.
It has estimated that one in every 500 Windows users has been exposed to websites that attempt to exploit the flaw, and that the number of victims was increasing by 50 per cent every day.
Paul Ferguson, a researcher from the software security company Trend Micro, told the BBC that attacks were spreading ``like wildfire''.
``This vulnerability is being actively exploited by cyber-criminals and getting worse every day,'' Mr Ferguson said.
Microsoft issues emergency patch for Internet Explorer
Microsoft has issued an emergency patch for its Internet Explorer browser, aiming to fix a critical flaw that allowed hackers to take over computers merely by steering them to infected websites.
Microsoft Wednesday took the rare step of issuing the patch after numerous security experts advised people to switch to rival browsers until Microsoft fixed the problem.
Microsoft usually releases patches on a set schedule and this is only the third emergency patch in the last three years.
The flaw has been in circulation since the first week of December.
So far, more than two million computers are believed to have been infected, according to PC Magazine.
The vulnerabilities are found on copies of Internet Explorer 7, as well as IE6 and IE5.
The patch is designed to prevent attackers from downloading malware onto users' computers if they visit a malicious Web site, or a legitimate Web site that has been infected.
Microsoft Patches Major IE Bug
In record time, Microsoft released today an ``out of band'' patch for a significant security flaw in Internet Explorer that burst onto the scene 8 days ago.
We strongly recommend that all Windows users, especially Windows XP and Windows 2000 users, apply the patch as soon as possible.
It is available on Windows Update and through Automatic Updates and by direct download through the security advisory for the vulnerability.
Here is the description of the vulnerability that it presents:
A remote code execution vulnerability exists as an invalid pointer reference in the data binding function of Internet Explorer.
When data binding is enabled (which is the default state), it is possible under certain conditions for an object to be released without updating the array length, leaving the potential to access the deleted object's memory space.
This can cause Internet Explorer to exit unexpectedly, in a state that is exploitable.
That's not quite enough to help you to write an exploit, but it's a lot more detail than they usually release.
Once again, run, don't walk, to your vulnerable PCs and apply these updates.
Microsoft issues patch to fix IE
Microsoft has issued a security patch to fix a critical vulnerability in its Internet Explorer browser which it said has attacked over 2m Windows users.
The flaw is believed to have already infected as many as 10,000 websites.
The ``zero day'' exploit let criminals take over victims' computers by steering them to infected websites.
Microsoft's Christopher Budd said the software giant ``encourages all IE customers to test and deploy this update as soon as possible''.
He also said the threat led Microsoft to mobilise security engineering teams worldwide to deliver a software cure ``in the unprecedented time of eight days''.
The company's security response team said the patch consists of more than 300 distinct updates for more than half-a-dozen versions of IE in around 50 languages.
``Even with that, the release Emergency Response process isn't over,'' said Security Response Alliance director Mike Reavey.
``There is additional support to customers and additional refinement of our product development efforts.''
Microsoft stressed that the flaw was proven to exist only in IE 7 on all applicable versions of Windows, but that IE 6 and the ``beta'' release of IE 8 were ``potentially vulnerable''.
Users who have automatic updates turned on will receive the patch over the next 24 hours while others can access it via a download.
The AZN Trojan has been making the rounds since the beginning of December but became public knowledge in the last week.
Unlike other exploits, users only have to visit a malicious site with Trojans or other malware in order to become contaminated.
Once an infected web page is opened, malicious downloaders are installed on the computer designed to record keystrokes and steal passwords, credit card details and other financial information.
The sites affected are mostly Chinese and have been serving up programmes to steal passwords for computer games which can then be sold for cash on the black market.
Internet Explorer is the world's most widely used web browser with nearly three quarters of the market share.
Microsoft estimated that one in every 500 Windows users had been exposed to sites that tried to exploit the flaw and the number of victims was increasing at a rate of 50% daily.
Researchers at the software security firm Trend Micro said attacks were spreading ``like wildfire''.
``This vulnerability is being actively exploited by cyber-criminals and getting worse every day,'' said the company's advanced threat researcher Paul Ferguson.
Microsoft labelled the bug as ``critical,'' the most serious threat ranking in its four-step scoring programme.
The update is something of an unusual move for Microsoft and underscores the seriousness of the zero day flaw.
The company rarely issues security fixes for its software outside of its regular monthly patch updates.
Meanwhile Mozilla has released a scheduled update for its open source Firefox web browsers for at least 10 different vulnerabilities.
The bugs in the browser could have been ``used to run attacker code and install software, requiring no user interaction beyond normal browsing,'' said Mozilla.
It is also reissuing calls for users to upgrade from Firefox 2.0 to Firefox 3.0 as soon as possible and said it is ``not planning any further security and stability updates for Firefox 2''.
This means Mozilla will no longer support the Firefox 2 browser against future online scams and attacks.
Microsoft issues emergency IE patch as attacks escalate
Microsoft has issued a rare emergency update for its Internet Explorer browser as miscreants stepped up attacks targeting a vulnerability on hundreds of thousands of webpages.
In many cases, the websites distributing the toxic payload are legitimate destinations that have been commandeered, allowing an attacker to snare victims as they surf to online banks, forums, and other trusted sites.
There are at least six distinct versions of attack code circulating in the wild, according to researchers at iDefense, a security lab owned by VeriSign.
A web search showed 233,000 pages containing the string ardoshanghai.com/s.js, just one of many web addresses exploiting a weakness in the way IE's data-binding function works.
Most of the attacks silently install keylogging software as soon as a victim surfs to a site carrying the exploit.
Once installed, the software steals login credentials for online games.
Attack strings in separate SQL injections include 17gamo.com/1.js.
Researchers say the number of attack sites is too high to keep exhaustive lists, but Shadowserver is doing an admirable job here.
``The vulnerability is so juicy that we expect it to show up in tool kits fairly shortly,'' said Rick Howard, intelligence director of iDefense.
The patch was released eight days after reports began circulating that websites were targeting a vulnerability in fully patched versions of IE.
This is only the second time in 18 months that Microsoft has issued an unscheduled update.
Typically, patches are available on the second Tuesday of each month to allow system administrators time for planning.
Given the prevalence of attacks, there's no good reason why anyone running a Windows machine shouldn't stop what they're doing and install the patch immediately (those with administrative rights, anyway) - doing so is as easy as opening IE and selecting Windows Update from the Tools menu.
The patch can also be downloaded directly here.
Howard mentioned the site of ``a major financial institution'' that he found hosting the exploit, so don't think you're immune just because you steer clear of porn and warez.
Microsoft rushes to release patch to fix web browser flaw
Microsoft on Wednesday issued an urgent patch to fix an Internet Explorer (IE) web browser flaw that may have been used by hackers to attack millions of computer users.
The security update for IE, dubbed MS08-078, resolves a publicly disclosed vulnerability that ``could allow remote code execution if a user views a specially crafted Web page using Internet Explorer,'' the software giant said in a statement.
The flaw could allow hackers to take control of computers and steal passwords and credit card information.
Writing in a company blog, Mike Reavey, director of the Microsoft Security Response Center, urged users to test and deploy the security update ``as quickly as possible.''
Microsoft said the update is for IE on all currently supported versions of Windows.
Users can now download it for their home computers or laptops from Microsoft Update website.
Microsoft security experts estimated earlier that roughly 0.2 percent of IE users worldwide may have been exposed to websites containing exploits of the latest vulnerability, which means millions of users are in danger of having their computers infected.
Latest statistics from research firm Net Applications showed that IE still dominates the browser market with a share of nearly 70 percent.
Lawman's Unwavering Compass Led Him to White House Showdown
W. Mark Felt Sr., the associate director of the FBI during the Watergate scandal who, better known as ``Deep Throat,'' became the most famous anonymous source in American history, died yesterday.
Felt died at 12:45 p.m. at his home in Santa Rosa, Calif.
On Tuesday, Oct. 10, 1972, Washington awoke to this startling news:
``FBI agents have established that the Watergate bugging incident stemmed from a massive campaign of political spying and sabotage conducted on behalf of President Nixon's reelection and directed by officials of the White House and the Committee for the Re-election of the President,'' The Washington Post reported.
Bob Woodward and Carl Bernstein wrote that story, but it would not have been possible, they would later tell the world, without the clandestine help of the most famous unnamed source in history, W. Mark Felt -- the man they called ``Deep Throat.''
He was the associate director of the FBI, and he guided the reporters, all along insisting that Watergate was not an isolated incident but part of a wider conspiracy designed to destroy Democratic presidential candidates who might run against Nixon.
Instead, the Watergate scandal subsequently destroyed the Nixon presidency.
Facing impeachment, Nixon resigned the presidency in disgrace less than two years after that day in October when, one of his key lawyers would later say, it was apparent that ``in a general way and with the help of Deep Throat, (Woodward and Bernstein) figured out Watergate.''
Felt died Thursday at his home in Santa Rosa, Calif.
He was 95.
As the second-ranking official in the FBI, Felt possessed authoritative knowledge of what came to be known as the Watergate conspiracy.
Felt had personally witnessed the Nixon administration's attempt to subvert the bureau's investigation into the complex of crimes and coverups that began unraveling with a 1972 burglary of the Democratic National Committee's headquarters at the Watergate complex in Northwest Washington.
``He helped stiffen the spine of The Washington Post, which went out on a limb more than any other publication did, and broke stories that other outlets shunned,'' said Mark Feldstein, a George Washington University faculty member who is writing a book on Nixon and the media.
``Had Woodward not run with it, Felt had a network of connections in Washington, (other reporters) he was talking to ... but no one knew of his connection to Woodward.''
Felt, a dashing figure with a full head of silver hair and a reputation as a taskmaster, adamantly denied over the years that he was Deep Throat, even though Nixon suspected him almost from the start.
Nixon ordered interim FBI director L. Patrick Gray to fire Felt five times.
But Gray, convinced by Felt's denials, never did.
A master of bureaucratic infighting and misdirection, Felt seized upon a Post story that had not used him as a source.
In a bold stroke, he denounced it in an internal memo and ordered an investigation into the leak.
``Expedite,'' he commanded.
The next day, in a notation on another memo that passed across his desk, he pointed to a prosecutor as the source of the leak.
``I was impressed.
My guy knew his stuff,'' Woodward wrote in ``Secret Man: The Story of Watergate's Deep Throat'' (2006).
``The memo was an effective cover for him, the very best counterintelligence tradecraft.
Not only had he initiated the leak inquiry, but Felt appeared to have discovered the leaker.''
Felt had insisted on remaining completely anonymous, or on ``deep background.''
A Post editor dubbed him ``Deep Throat,'' a bit of wordplay based on the title of a pornographic movie of the time.
The source's existence, but not his identity, became known in Woodward and Bernstein's 1974 book, ``All the President's Men,'' and in the subsequent movie version, in which actor Hal Holbrook played the charismatic but shadowy source.
It wasn't until May 30, 2005, that Felt's family revealed his identity in an article for Vanity Fair magazine.
The story, written by San Francisco lawyer John D. O'Connor, did not make clear why Felt, who was suffering from dementia, admitted his role after more than 30 years. 
Woodward confirmed the revelation, and the secret was finally out.
Mark Felt, who was known as Watergate scandal informant 'Deep Throat,' died on Friday.
He was 95.
Felt worked as the associate director of the FBI in the 1970s and is one of the most famous anonymous sources for the press in American history.
His daughter Joan Felt said her father ate a big breakfast before saying he was tired, and went to sleep, she told the Washington Post.
He died at 12:45 p.m. on Thursday at his home in Santa Rosa, California, the Post stated.
``He slipped away,'' she said.
Felt blew the whistle on a corrupt administration trying to cover up attempts to sabotage opponents.
He secretly guided Washington Post reporter Bob Woodward and his colleague Carl Bernstein who pursued the story of the 1972 break-in of the Democratic National Committee's headquarters at the Watergate office buildings.
That ultimately led to the resignation of President Richard M. Nixon.
Felt insisted on remaining completely anonymous until May 30, 2005 when Felt's family revealed his identity in an article for Vanity Fair magazine.
Mark Felt, 'Deep Throat' of Watergate, dead at 95
W. Mark Felt, who leaked information to reporters under the moniker, ``Deep Throat,'' about the Watergate break-in, died Thursday at the age of 95, sources told CNN.
Mark Felt, known as ``Deep Throat,'' divulged information to reporters about the Watergate break-in.
Rob Jones, Felt's grandson, said his grandfather died at his home in Santa Rosa, California.
According to published reports, Felt died of congestive heart failure.
Felt admitted in a 2005 Vanity Fair article he was the Washington Post's source for many of its 400 stories on the Watergate affair during the early nineteen seventies.
The Watergate break-in eventually led to the 1974 resignation of President Richard Nixon.
``I'm proud of everything that Deep Throat did,'' Felt, 92, told CNN's ``Larry King Live'' in 2006, his first public interview on the subject.
Felt's entanglement with history occurred in 1972 after the bungled break-in at the Democratic National Party offices in the Watergate hotel.
Felt, an associate director at the FBI, said he was unhappy with the way the administration meddled with the investigation into the break-in, which led him to divulge information to the newspaper.
Video Watch how Felt played a pivotal role in presidential history
Carl Bernstein and Bob Woodward, then-rookie reporters with the Washington Post, did stories about the break-in and subsequent cover-up.
Both men credited Felt for helping them, but Bernstein said Felt was a tough interview.
``He didn't leak.
He had to really be squeezed,'' Bernstein said in a 2006 interview.
``He confirmed mostly what we had gotten elsewhere.
He didn't want to volunteer a lot of information, yet his role was essential in giving us a solidity and a knowledge that what we were reporting was right.''
Mark Felt, 'Deep Throat' in Watergate reports, dies
Former FBI official had storied role in Washington Post investigation that brought down Nixon
W. Mark Felt, the former FBI official who ended one of the United States' most intriguing political mysteries when he identified himself as ``Deep Throat'' -- the nickname for the anonymous source who helped guide The Washington Post's Pulitzer Prize-winning investigation into the Watergate scandal -- has died.
He was 95.
A controversial figure who was later convicted of authorizing illegal activities in pursuit of members of the radical Weather Underground, Felt died of heart failure Thursday at his home in Santa Rosa, Calif., his grandson Rob Jones said.
Felt was deputy associate director of the FBI in 1972 when he began supplying information to Bob Woodward, who with Carl Bernstein made up The Post's investigative duo who doggedly pursued the story of the Watergate break-in and a conspiracy that led directly to President Richard M. Nixon, who ultimately resigned.
The reporters continued to keep Felt's name a secret, but in 2005, at the age of 91, Felt told Vanity Fair magazine, ``I'm the guy they used to call Deep Throat.''
His disclosure ended a mystery that had intrigued Washington insiders and journalists for three decades and provided the grist for many hotly debated newspaper and magazine articles.
While Felt's name was raised as a suspect on several occasions, he always managed to deflect attention, usually by saying that if had been Deep Throat he would have done a better job of exposing the wrongdoings at the White House.
His disclosure in a Vanity Fair article by his family's lawyer, John D. O'Connor, provoked a national debate:
Was he a hero who should be lauded for sparing the country the strain of further high crimes and misdemeanors by the Nixon White House?
Or was he a traitor who betrayed not only his president but his oath of office by disclosing grand jury information and the contents of FBI files?
For the most part, reaction split along political lines.
``There's nothing heroic about breaking faith with your people,'' said commentator Patrick J. Buchanan, a former Nixon speechwriter.
Felt ``disgraced himself and dishonored everything an FBI agent should stand for.''
But Richard Ben-Veniste, a key lawyer in the Watergate prosecution team, said Felt's role showed that ``the importance of whistle-blowers shouldn't be underestimated, particularly when there are excesses by the executive branch of government -- which in this case went all the way to the executive office.''
Felt's moment in history began to unfold shortly after five men in business suits were arrested at the Watergate complex in Washington on June 17, 1972, after breaking into the offices of the Democratic National Committee.
Nixon press secretary Ron Ziegler dismissed the incident as ``a third-rate burglary,'' but details gradually tumbled out tying the burglars to the president's re-election campaign.
Misdeeds in the White House were uncovered, hearings were conducted in the House of Representatives and Senate, and for the first time in American history a president was forced to resign.
The relationship that defined a generation in journalism began about 1970 when Woodward was a Navy lieutenant assigned to the Pentagon as a watch officer.
In his book, ``The Secret Man: The Story of Watergate's Deep Throat,'' published after the Vanity Fair article appeared, Woodward wrote that he met Felt when he delivered a package of documents to the White House and struck up a conversation with him in a waiting room.
From that initial meeting, Woodward cultivated a friendship that would pay off handsomely after he entered journalism.
Felt began to provide tips to Woodward when he was a cub reporter at the Montgomery County Sentinel, a suburban Maryland newspaper, and later at The Post, where he was tipped by Felt on stories about the investigation of the 1972 shooting of George C. Wallace, the Alabama governor then running for president.
When Woodward was assigned to the Watergate break-in, he again pressed Felt for help.
His request came during a crucial moment in the FBI's history:
Felt's mentor, the legendary founding director J. Edgar Hoover, had died the month before the break-in, and Assistant Attorney General L. Patrick Gray III had been named acting director.
Felt feared -- and his suspicions were later proven right -- that Gray was too close to the Nixon administration to conduct an uncompromised investigation.
Felt agreed to help Woodward but only on ``deep background,'' a term meaning that ``the information could be used,'' Woodward wrote, ``but no source of any kind would be identified in the newspaper.''
Felt insisted on using covert rules he had learned while working in the FBI's espionage section during World War II.
If Woodward needed to talk to Felt, he would move a flower pot with a red cloth flag in it to the front of his apartment balcony.
If Felt needed to talk to the reporter -- to correct something The Post had written or to convey other information -- he would circle page 20 in Woodward's home-delivered copy of The New York Times and draw clock hands on the page to indicate the time of the meeting.
He resisted telephone contact in favor of clandestine 2 a.m. encounters at an underground parking garage in Rosslyn, Virginia.
The two met from June 19, 1972 -- two days after the break-in -- to November 1973, five months after Felt left the FBI.
Within the paper, only Woodward and Bernstein knew the identity of Deep Throat, a name borrowed from a notorious pornographic movie of the era.
But Felt dealt only with Woodward, and Bernstein did not meet him until 2008.
When Nixon left office on Aug. 9, 1974, the two reporters shared the secret with Post Editor Benjamin C. Bradlee, who until then had only known that the source was a high Justice Department official.
Nixon, according to Woodward, had suspected Felt of being the confidential source and assumed him to be part of a Jewish cabal out to get him.
According to Vanity Fair, Felt had no religious affiliation.
Mark 'Deep Throat' Felt dead at 95
We're all learning this morning of the death, at age 95, of W. Mark Felt, who as a senior Federal Bureau of Investigation official, served as the shadowy source known as ``Deep Throat'' to reporter Bob Woodward in his investigation of the Watergate scandal that led to President Nixon's resignation.
As Johanna Neuman writes in a Los Angeles Times piece:
A controversial figure who was later convicted of authorizing illegal activities in pursuit of members of the radical Weather Underground, Felt died of heart failure Thursday at his home in Santa Rosa, Calif., his grandson Rob Jones said.
Felt was deputy associate director of the FBI in 1972 when he began supplying information to Bob Woodward, who with Carl Bernstein made up The Post's investigative duo who doggedly pursued the story of the Watergate break-in and a conspiracy that led directly to President Richard M. Nixon, who ultimately resigned.
The reporters continued to keep Felt's name a secret, but in 2005, at the age of 91, Felt told Vanity Fair magazine, ``I'm the guy they used to call Deep Throat.''
His disclosure ended a mystery that had intrigued Washington insiders and journalists for three decades and provided the grist for many hotly debated newspaper and magazine articles.
While Felt's name was raised as a suspect on several occasions, he always managed to deflect attention, usually by saying that if had been Deep Throat he would have done a better job of exposing the wrongdoings at the White House.
His disclosure in a Vanity Fair article by his family's lawyer, John D. O'Connor, provoked a national debate:
Was he a hero who should be lauded for sparing the country the strain of further high crimes and misdemeanors by the Nixon White House?
Or was he a traitor who betrayed not only his president but his oath of office by disclosing grand jury information and the contents of FBI files?
For the most part, reaction split along political lines.
``There's nothing heroic about breaking faith with your people,'' said commentator Patrick J. Buchanan, a former Nixon speechwriter.
Felt ``disgraced himself and dishonored everything an FBI agent should stand for.''
But Richard Ben-Veniste, a key lawyer in the Watergate prosecution team, said Felt's role showed that ``the importance of whistle-blowers shouldn't be underestimated, particularly when there are excesses by the executive branch of government -- which in this case went all the way to the executive office.''
Mark Felt, the mysterious ``Deep Throat'' source who helped Washington Post reporters Bob Woodward and Carl Bernstein crack the Watergate scandal that brought down President Richard Nixon, has died at age 95.
Felt suffered from congestive heart failure but the exact cause of his death at home on Thursday was not immediately known, said the Press Democrat newspaper in Santa Rosa, California, 55 miles (90 km) north of San Francisco.
In its report on Felt's death, the New York Times called him ``the most famous anonymous source in American history.''
Felt, the No. 2 official at the FBI when the Watergate case broke, kept his role in the story a secret for 30 years. 
Only in 2005, at age 91, was his part made public in an article in Vanity Fair magazine written by Felt's family lawyer.
``I'm the guy they used to call Deep Throat,'' Felt told attorney John O'Connor.
For years, people had speculated and argued about the identity of ``Deep Throat,'' whose name was derived from the title of a popular pornographic movie.
Vanity Fair scooped Woodward and Bernstein, who had promised not to reveal the name of the star source of their 1974 stories until after his death.
But within a day of Felt's unveiling, Woodward wrote of his relationship with Felt.
Woodward said he turned to Felt after he and Bernstein wrote about the break-in at the offices of the Democratic National Committee at the Watergate complex in Washington.
Mark Felt, Watergate's `Deep Throat,' dies at 95
W. Mark Felt, the former FBI second-in-command who revealed himself as ``Deep Throat'' 30 years after he tipped off reporters to the Watergate scandal that toppled a president, has died.
He was 95.
Felt died Thursday in Santa Rosa after suffering from congestive heart failure for several months, said family friend John D. O'Connor, who wrote the 2005 Vanity Fair article uncovering Felt's secret.
The shadowy central figure in the one of the most gripping political dramas of the 20th century, Felt insisted his alter ego be kept secret when he leaked damaging information about President Richard Nixon and his aides to Washington Post reporter Bob Woodward.
While some - including Nixon and his aides - speculated that Felt was the source who connected the White House to the June 1972 break-in at the headquarters of the Democratic National Committee, he steadfastly denied the accusations until finally coming forward in May 2005.
``I'm the guy they used to call Deep Throat,'' Felt told O'Connor for the Vanity Fair article, creating a whirlwind of media attention.
Weakened by a stroke, the man who had kept his secret for decades wasn't doing much talking - he merely waved to the media from the front door of his daughter's Santa Rosa home.
Critics, including those who went to prison for the Watergate scandal, called him a traitor for betraying the commander in chief.
Supporters hailed him as a hero for blowing the whistle on a corrupt administration trying to cover up attempts to sabotage opponents.
Felt grappled with his place in history, arguing with his children over whether to reveal his identity or to take his secret to the grave, O'Connor said.
He agonized about what revealing his identity would do to his reputation.
Would he be seen as a turncoat or a man of honor?
``People will debate for a long time whether I did the right thing by helping Woodward,'' Felt wrote in his 2006 memoir, ``A G-Man's Life: The FBI, `Deep Throat' and the Struggle for Honor in Washington.''
``The bottom line is that we did get the whole truth out, and isn't that what the FBI is supposed to do?''
Ultimately, his daughter, Joan, persuaded him to go public;
after all, Woodward was sure to profit by revealing the secret after Felt died.
``We could make at least enough money to pay some bills, like the debt I've run up for the kids' education,'' she told her father, according to the Vanity Fair article.
``Let's do it for the family.''
The revelation capped a Washington whodunnit that spanned more than three decades and seven presidents.
It was the final mystery of Watergate, the subject of the best-selling book and hit movie ``All the President's Men,'' which inspired a generation of college students to pursue journalism.
It was by chance that Felt came to play a pivotal role in the drama.
Back in 1970, Woodward struck up a conversation with Felt while both were waiting in a White House hallway.
Felt apparently took a liking to the young Woodward, then a Navy courier, and Woodward kept the relationship going, treating Felt as a mentor as he tried to figure out the ways of Washington.
Later, while Woodward and partner Carl Bernstein relied on various unnamed sources in reporting on Watergate, the man their editor dubbed ``Deep Throat'' helped to keep them on track and confirm vital information.
The Post won a Pulitzer Prize for its Watergate coverage.
Within days of the burglary at Watergate that launched the Post's investigative series, Woodward phoned Felt.
``He reminded me how he disliked phone calls at the office but said that the Watergate burglary case was going to `heat up' for reasons he could not explain,'' Woodward wrote after Felt was named.
``He then hung up abruptly.''
Felt helped Woodward link former CIA man Howard Hunt to the break-in.
He said the reporter could accurately write that Hunt, whose name was found in the address book of one of the burglars, was a suspect.
But Felt told him off the record, insisting that their relationship and Felt's identity remain secret.
Worried that phones were being tapped, Felt arranged clandestine meetings worthy of a spy novel.
Woodward would move a flower pot with a red flag on his balcony if he needed to meet Felt.
The G-man would scrawl a time to meet on page 20 of Woodward's copy of The New York Times and they would rendezvous in a suburban Virginia parking garage in the dead of night.
In the movie, the enduring image of Deep Throat - a name borrowed from a 1972 porn movie - is of a testy, chain-smoking Hal Holbrook telling Woodward, played by Robert Redford, to ``follow the money.''
In a memoir published in April 2006, Felt said he saw himself as a ``Lone Ranger'' who could help derail a White House cover-up.
Felt wrote that he was upset by the slow pace of the FBI investigation into the Watergate break-in and believed the press could pressure the administration to cooperate.
``From the start, it was clear that senior administration officials were up to their necks in this mess, and that they would stop at nothing to sabotage our investigation,'' Felt wrote in his memoir.
Some critics said Felt, a J. Edgar Hoover loyalist, was bitter at being passed over when Nixon appointed an FBI outsider and confidante, L. Patrick Gray, to lead the FBI after Hoover's death.
Gray was later implicated in Watergate abuses.
``We had no idea of his motivations, and even now some of his motivations are unclear,'' Bernstein said.
Felt wrote that he wasn't motivated by anger.
``It is true that I would have welcomed an appointment as FBI director when Hoover died.
It is not true that I was jealous of Gray,'' he wrote.
Felt was born in Twin Falls, Idaho, and worked for an Idaho senator during graduate school.
After law school at George Washington University he spent a year at the Federal Trade Commission.
Felt joined the FBI in 1942 and worked as a Nazi hunter during World War II.
Ironically, while providing crucial information to the Post, Felt also was assigned to ferret out the newspaper's source.
The investigation never went anywhere, but plenty of people, including those in the White House at the time, guessed that Felt, who was leading the investigation into Watergate, may have been acting as a double agent.
The Watergate tapes captured White House chief of staff H.R. Haldeman telling Nixon that Felt was the source, but they were afraid to stop him.
Nixon asks: ``Somebody in the FBI?''
Haldeman: ``Yes, sir. Mark Felt ...
If we move on him, he'll go out and unload everything.
He knows everything that's to be known in the FBI.''
Felt left the FBI in 1973 for the lecture circuit.
Five years later he was indicted on charges of authorizing FBI break-ins at homes associated with suspected bombers from the 1960s radical group the Weather Underground.
President Ronald Reagan pardoned Felt in 1981 while the case was on appeal - a move applauded by Nixon.
Woodward and Bernstein said they wouldn't reveal the source's identity until he or she died, and finally confirmed Felt's role only after he came forward.
O'Connor said Thursday his friend appeared to be at peace since the revelation.
``What I saw was a person that went from a divided personality that carried around this heavy secret to a completely integrated and glowing personality over these past few years once he let the secret out,'' he said.
Felt is survived by two children, Joan Felt and Mark Felt Jr., and four grandchildren.
His wife, Audrey Felt, died in 1984.
Mark Felt, the most famous anonymous source in the history of journalism who was known to the world as ``Deep Throat'', died yesterday aged 95.
As the associate director of the FBI, Mr Felt was outraged by the Nixon administration's attempts to block its investigation of the Watergate scandal which ultimately led to the resignation of President Richard Nixon in 1974.
A master of counter-intelligence from his days tracking German WWII spies, he secretly helped Washington Post reporters Bob Woodward and Carl Bernstein pursue the story.
It was thirty four years before he finally broke cover, admitting in 2006:
``I'm the guy they used to call Deep Throat.''
By then, he was so crippled by a stroke and Alzheimer's disease that his memory of his role in US history had almost vanished.
From the first day of the bungled 1972 break-in of the Democratic National Committee's headquarters in the Watergate hotel Mr Felt was at the heart of the FBI investigation.
The agency soon learned that the Nixon administration was running an extensive spying and sabotage campaign against its political enemies.
Under intense pressure from the White House to suppress its investigation, the FBI was starting to buckle.
A protagonist of the famous FBI director Herbert Hoover, the Mr Felt was already embittered for being passed over as his replacement.
When White House officials tried to block the FBI's corruption investigation, he became infuriated with what he would call their 'switchblade mentality.'
A debonair man about town and incurable political gossip, Mr Felt was already known to Mr Woodward when he first reached out to him.
Soon he was arranging cloak and dagger meetings with the young reporters in darkened parking garages across the Potomac River.
The chain-smoking FBI-man provided an insight into the scale of the presidential scandal that was larger than anyone had imagined.
``Deep Throat'', the name given to him at the Washington Post, was a wordplay based on a well known pornographic movie and his insistence on remaining on ``deep background'' despite the sensational nature of his revelations.
From the outset President Nixon suspected him of being the leaker and five times ordered the FBI director Patrick Gray to fire him.
Felt's adamant denials were convincing enough and he was never sacked.
Deep Throat continued to leak and on the assumption that he was being monitored he had elaborate procedures for contacting Mr Woodward.
When he had information to pass on, he would arrange meetings by circling the page number on page twenty of the reporter's copy of The New York Times and then drawing the hands of a clock to signal the hour.
If Mr Woodward wanted to see him he would simply place a red flag in a flowerpot on the balcony of his P street apartment.
Over the course of the scandal, Deep Throat supplied crucial information for some 400 Washington Post stories.
The reporters went on to win a Pulitzer prize, journalism's highest accolade.
A master of the black arts of disinformation, at FBI headquarters he alighted on a newspaper story for which he was not the source and ordered an investigation to find the leaker.
He then fingered a prosecutor as the source.
Mr Woodward wrote in his 2006 expose, ``Secret Man: The Story of Watergate's Deep Throat'' that ``The memo was an effective cover for him, the very best counterintelligence tradecraft.
Not only had he initiated the leak inquiry, but Felt appeared to have discovered the leaker.''
By then Deep Throat's real identity had already been revealed in Vanity Fair magazine.
More than 30 years after Watergate and Mr Woodward confirmed the revelation, finally letting his secret out.
By then Mr Felt was suffering from dementia and had little or no memory of his role in history.
Though Deep Throat was a hero to the anti Vietnam War movement and the left, Mr Felt was no liberal.
A law and order crime-fighter, he ran the agency's ``goon squad'' to monitor agents in the field.
He also advised Hollywood for its 1965 television series The FBI, ensuring that G-men were always shown in the most favourable light.
Long after Watergate he was convicted of running his own so called ``black bag'' burglaries of the radical Weather Underground movement.
He was later pardoned by President Ronald Reagan.
In a 1979 book, he bragged about the FBI's bugging of the Civil Rights leader Martin Luther King and he vehemently opposed the hiring of women agents by the FBI.
Deep Throat is dead.
The passing yesterday of W. Mark Felt, the man who was the infamous secret source for Washington Post reporters Bob Woodward and Carl Bernstein during their investigation of the Watergate scandal, marks the end of a life that brought about both the good and the bad of anonymous sources in political journalism.
Without Felt's information, the full scale of the Nixon administration's corruption would likely never have come to light, he wouldn't have resigned in disgrace, and it might have set a precedent that the president of the United States is above the law.
Deep Throat also gave us a new archetype in popular culture: the shadowy insider in a trench coat, calling up reporters for secret meetings in parking garages to spill the dirt, often with gravely voices and cautious looks over the shoulder.
It's been employed in entertainment ever since, from Hal Holbrook's performance as Deep Throat in All the President's Men, to Fox Mulder's informant in The X-Files, to even the Caped Crusader giving Vicki Vale the cure for the Joker's poison gas in Batman.
But the downside of Felt's legacy is the increased willingness of modern day journalists to grant anonymity to sources at the drop of a fedora.
I've been an avid reader of political news for ten years now and lost count of how many stories are attributed to someone, ``who declined to be named because they were not authorized to speak on the matter,'' or, ``who declined to be named for fear of angering the President.''
It's become a lazy reporter's default setting to allow people to talk on ``deep background,'' and as a result we've slipped into a rut where accountability in government has become a rare, almost non-existent concept.
All journalists should pore over the many obits of Felt today and think long and hard about their duty to the public the next time someone asks to go off the record.
The former FBI second-in-command who revealed himself as ``Deep Throat'' 30 years after he tipped off reporters to the Watergate scandal that toppled a president has died .
Mark Felt was 95. John D. O'Connor, a family friend who wrote the 2005 Vanity Fair article uncovering Felt's secret, says he died Thursday.
The shadowy central figure in one of the most gripping political dramas of the 20th century, Felt insisted his alter ego be kept secret when he leaked damaging information about President Richard Nixon and his aides to The Washington Post.
Some speculated that Felt was the source who connected the White House to the June 1972 break-in at the headquarters of the Democratic National Committee.
He steadfastly denied the accusations until finally coming forward in May 2005.
In the last week of November, the National Archives released more than 10,000 pages of documents from the Nixon presidency, among them were the urgings of past and present FBI agents and other interested citizens to appoint Felt, then the No. 2 FBI official, as director.
Associates described his ``outstanding loyalty.''
Nixon did not take the advice.
Ultimately, Felt's devastating leaks as The Washington Post's secret Watergate source helped undermine Nixon's presidency.
Nixon, soon to be consumed by the Watergate investigation, passed over career agents including Felt when he selected loyalist L. Patrick Gray as FBI chief after the J. Edgar Hoover's death in 1972, just weeks before the Watergate break-in.
Gray resigned the next year because of allegations he had destroyed Watergate documents.
Felt's supporters weighed in, with letters, telegrams and cards that have been in Nixon's White House files all these years.
``He has the integrity, the ability, the experience and the image to insure that our FBI will continue to deserve and maintain world esteem,'' Harold L. Child Jr., legal attache to the embassy in Japan and a 30-year FBI veteran, told Nixon in an April 1973 letter.
Efton A. Stanfield, a former FBI special agent who was then an executive of the electrical contractors' association, asked Nixon in a telegram to turn to the career professional to replace Gray.
``Mr. Felt is a man of outstanding loyalty, character, reputation, habits,'' he said.
The ``fidelity, bravery, and integrity of Mr. Felt are unquestioned.''
Felt himself was the lead agent in a telegram sent to the White House by a group of agents asking that a highly qualified professional be nominated.
The police chief in Kodiak, Alaska, made the case for Felt, and so did ordinary citizens.
Writing from Brooklyn, N.Y., Viena K. Neaville told Nixon that choosing Felt would be good for him because, ``You would be spared the tremendous aggravation to which you are subjected by so many factions.''
Nixon was spared no grief. 
He eventually chose William Ruckelshaus, who served at FBI only briefly.
Deep Throat's identity remained a mystery until Felt stepped forward in 2005 to acknowledge his clandestine role in bringing down Nixon.
Bob Woodward of The Washington Post said he first spoke with Felt about Watergate two days after the break-in.
Mark Felt, FBI official who became 'Deep Throat,' dead at 95
W. Mark Felt, who was the No. 2 official at the FBI when he helped bring down President Richard M. Nixon by resisting the Watergate cover-up and becoming Deep Throat, the most famous anonymous source in American history, died on Thursday.
He was 95 and lived in Santa Rosa.
His death was confirmed by Rob Jones, his grandson.
In 2005, Felt revealed that he was the source who had secretly supplied Bob Woodward of The Washington Post with crucial leads in the Watergate affair in the early nineteen seventies.
His decision to unmask himself, in an article in Vanity Fair, ended a guessing game that had gone on for more than 30 years.
The disclosure even surprised Woodward and his partner on the Watergate story, Carl Bernstein.
They had kept their promise not to reveal his identity until after his death.
Indeed, Woodward was so scrupulous about shielding Felt that he did not introduce him to Bernstein until this year, 36 years after they cracked the scandal.
The three met for two hours one afternoon in November in Santa Rosa, where Felt had retired.
The reporters likened it to a family reunion.
Felt played a dual role in Nixon's downfall.
As a secret informant, he kept the story alive in the press.
As associate director of the FBI, he fought the president's efforts to obstruct the FBI's investigation of the Watergate break-in.
Felt later said he believed that Nixon had been misusing the FBI for political advantage.
He knew that Nixon wanted the Watergate affair to vanish.
He knew that the White House had ordered the CIA to tell the bureau, on grounds of national security, to stand down in its felony investigation of the June 1972 break-in.
He saw that order as an effort to obstruct justice, and he rejected it.
That resistance led indirectly to Nixon's resignation.
Passed up for promotion
Felt had expected to be named to succeed J. Edgar Hoover, who had run the bureau for 48 years and died in May 1972.
The president instead chose a politically loyal Justice Department official, L. Patrick Gray, who later followed orders from the White House to destroy documents in the case.
The choice infuriated Felt.
He later wrote that the president ``wanted a politician in J. Edgar Hoover's position who would convert the bureau into an adjunct of the White House machine.''
Hoover had sworn off break-ins without warrants - ``black bag jobs,'' he called them - in 1966, after carrying them out at the FBI for four decades.
The Nixon White House hired its own operatives to steal information, plant eavesdropping equipment and hunt down the sources of leaks.
The Watergate break-in took place six weeks after Hoover died.
While Watergate was seething, Felt authorized nine illegal break-ins at the homes of friends and relatives of members of the Weather Underground, a violent left-wing splinter group.
The people he chose as targets had committed no crimes.
The FBI had no search warrants.
He later said he ordered the break-ins because he felt national security required it.
In a criminal trial, Felt was convicted in November 1980 of conspiring to violate the constitutional rights of Americans. 
Nixon, who had denounced him in private for leaking Watergate secrets, testified on his behalf.
Called by the prosecution, he told the jury that presidents and by extension their officers had an inherent right to conduct illegal searches in the name of national security.
``As Deep Throat, Felt helped establish the principle that our highest government officials are subject to the Constitution and the laws of the land,'' the prosecutor, John W. Nields, wrote in The Washington Post in 2005.
``Yet when it came to the Weather Underground bag jobs, he seems not to have been aware that this same principle applied to him.''
Seven months after the conviction, President Ronald Reagan pardoned Felt.
Then 67, Felt celebrated the decision as one of great symbolic value.
``This is going to be the biggest shot in the arm for the intelligence community for a long time,'' he said.
After the pardon, Nixon sent him a congratulatory bottle of champagne.
Felt then disappeared from public view for a quarter of a century, denying unequivocally, time and again, that he had been Deep Throat.
It was a lie he told to serve what he believed to be a higher truth.
William Mark Felt was born in Twin Falls, Idaho, on Aug. 17, 1913. 
After graduating from the University of Idaho, he was drawn to public service in Washington and went to work for Sen. James P. Pope, D-Idaho.
In 1938, he married his college sweetheart, Audrey Robinson, in Washington.
They were wed by the chaplain of the House of Representatives.
She died in 1984.
The couple had a daughter, Joan, and a son, Mark.
They and four grandsons survive Felt.
Days before Pearl Harbor, after earning a law degree in night classes at George Washington University, Felt applied to the FBI and joined it in January 1942.
He spent most of World War II hunting German spies.
After stints in Seattle, New Orleans and Los Angeles, Hoover named him special agent in charge of the Salt Lake City and Kansas City offices in the late nineteen fifties.
Rising to high positions at the headquarters in the 1960s, he oversaw the training of FBI agents and conducted internal investigations as chief of the inspection division.
In early 1970, while waiting in an anteroom of the West Wing of the White House, Felt chanced to meet a Navy lieutenant delivering classified messages to the National Security Council staff.
The young man in dress blues was Bob Woodward.
By his own description fiercely ambitious and in need of adult guidance, Woodward tried to wring career counseling from his elder.
He left the White House with the number to Felt's direct line at the FBI
On July 1, 1971, Hoover promoted Felt to deputy associate director, the third in command at the headquarters, beneath Hoover's right-hand man and longtime companion, Clyde A. Tolson.
With both of his superiors in poor health, Felt increasingly took effective command of the daily work of the FBI.
When Hoover died and Tolson retired, he saw his path to power cleared.
But Nixon denied him, and he seethed with frustrated ambition in summer 1972.
Breaking Watergate
One evening that summer, a few weeks after the Watergate break-in, Woodward, then a neophyte newspaperman, knocked on Felt's door in pursuit of the story.
Felt decided to cooperate with him and set up an elaborate system of espionage techniques for clandestine meetings with Woodward.
If Woodward needed to talk, he would move a flowerpot planted with a red flag on the balcony of his apartment on P Street in Washington.
If Felt had a message, Woodward's home-delivered New York Times would arrive with an inked circle on Page 20.
Woodward would leave his apartment by the back alley that night and take one taxi to a downtown hotel, then a second to an underground parking garage in the Rosslyn section of Arlington, Virginia.
Within weeks, Felt steered The Post to a story establishing that the Watergate break-in was part of ``a massive campaign of political spying and sabotage'' directed by the White House.
For the next eight months, he did his best to keep the newspaper on the trail, largely by providing, on ``deep background,'' anonymous confirmation of facts reporters had gathered from others.
The Post's managing editor, Howard Simons, gave him his famous pseudonym, taken from the pornographic movie then in vogue.
Millions of Americans knew him only as a shadowy figure in the 1976 movie made from the Watergate saga, ``All the President's Men,'' which made ``Woodward and Bernstein'' legends of American journalism.
In the movie, Deep Throat (Hal Holbrook) gives Woodward (Robert Redford) probably the most famous bit of free advice in the history of investigative journalism.
It was a three-word road map to the heart of the matter: ``Follow the money.''
Felt never said it.
It was part of the myth that surrounded Deep Throat.
Mark ``Deep Throat'' Felt Dead at 95
W. Mark Felt, Sr., the number 2 man at the FBI during the Watergate scandal , died yesterday from Alzheimer's disease at a hospice near his home in Santa Rosa, California, the Washington Post reports.
Felt was an instrumental player in the stunning downfall of President Nixon, but his identity as ``Deep Throat'' -reporter Bob Woodard's anonymous source for the Post's bombshell series of scoops on the Watergate affair in 1972-was unknown until three years ago, when Felt's family unmasked him in the pages of Vanity Fair.
According to the Times, even Woodward was shocked at this; 
he had gaurded the secret so zealously that even his partner Carl Bernstein did not meet Felt until earlier this year.
Felt never revealed why he leaked details on the Watergate break-in and cover up to Woodward, but the Times obituary points out that in May 1972 Feld had been passed over by Nixon as Edgar Hoover's successor to run the bureau.
W. Mark Felt, who remained anonymous for more than three decades as the source known as ``Deep Throat'' in the 1972 Watergate scandal that toppled Richard Nixon's presidency, has died.
Felt died at his home in Santa Rosa, California, Thursday, the Press Democrat newspaper reported, citing Felt's grandson Nick Jones.
Felt provided tips and information that guided Washington Post reporters Bob Woodward and Carl Bernstein as they wrote stories stemming from the bungled burglary of the Democratic Party National Committee headquarters in 1972.
President Nixon ultimately resigned as a consequence of the White House role in the scandal and in the cover-up that followed.
The identity of Felt, a former associate director at the Federal Bureau of Investigation, remained a secret until May 2005, when Woodward and Bernstein confirmed revelations published in an article in the July issue of Vanity Fair.
``Because of his position virtually atop the chief investigative agency, his words and guidance had immense, at times even staggering, authority,'' Woodward said in an article in the Washington Post on June 2, 2005.
The story of ``Deep Throat,'' a name borrowed from the title of a 1972 pornographic film, assumed legendary status as academics and history buffs clamored to unlock the enigma that played a role in Nixon's resignation in 1974.
As early as October 1972, Nixon himself voiced suspicion that Felt may be leaking information to the press and Attorney General Richard Kleindienst had pressured FBI Acting Director L. Patrick Gray to fire his deputy.
Felt denied his role repeatedly and stayed at the FBI until his retirement in June 1973.
``The thing that stuns me is that the goddamn secret has lasted this long,'' Ben Bradlee, who oversaw almost 400 stories on Watergate when he was the Washington Post's executive editor, said after the May 2005 revelations.
Although he knew the paper's source was a high-ranking government official, Bradlee didn't find out Felt's name until Nixon resigned.
Felt was one of many people rumored to be ``Deep Throat.''
Others included Alexander Haig, Nixon's White House chief of staff; former National Security Adviser Henry Kissinger; Fred Fielding, assistant to White House Counsel John Dean; and George H.W. Bush, the U.S. ambassador to the United Nations at the time.
Speculation also surrounded former U.S. Supreme Court Chief Justice William Rehnquist, whose poor health coincided with unfounded reports that ``Deep Throat'' was gravely ill.
Peyton Manning was nearly perfect, which was exactly what the Indianapolis Colts needed Thursday night to overcome the emotion the Jacksonville Jaguars showed with Richard Collier's return.
Analysis and discussion of the N.F.L. on the New York Times pro football blog.
Manning threw for 364 yards and three touchdowns, helping the Colts secure the No. 5 seed in the American Football Conference playoffs with a 31-24 victory over the Jaguars in Jacksonville, Fla.
Collier, a Jaguars tackle, was paralyzed below the waist after he was shot in early September.
Manning completed his first 17 passes in leading the Colts to their eighth consecutive victory and seventh straight playoff berth.
Indianapolis (11-4) took its first lead of the game when Keiwan Ratliff intercepted a pass from David Garrard and returned it 35 yards for a touchdown and a 31-24 lead with 4 minutes 48 seconds remaining.
The Jaguars had two chances to tie the score, but both drives ended with sacks. 
Garrard drove Jacksonville to the 7-yard line with 29 seconds remaining, but Maurice Jones-Drew sprained his knee on a reception, and since the Jaguars had no timeouts, 10 seconds ran off.
Garrard misfired on first down, then got sacked by Dwight Freeney to end the game.
The Colts overcame a 14-0 deficit in the second quarter and a 24-14 deficit early in the fourth.
They won without receiver Marvin Harrison (hamstring), running back Joseph Addai (shoulder) and linebacker Gary Brackett (leg).
TWO MORE RAMS OUT St. Louis lost two more players for the rest of the season, placing wide receiver and kick returner Derek Stanley and linebacker Gary Stills on injured reserve.
The moves brought to 12 the number of Rams players on injured reserve
Stanley tore the anterior cruciate ligament in his left knee in Sunday's loss to Seattle and was expected to be out six to eight months after surgery.
Stills had been playing with bone chips in his left knee and was scheduled to have surgery on Friday.
Offensive tackle Jonathan Scott was signed by Buffalo to fill the roster spot left open after defensive end Aaron Schobel was placed on injured reserve last week.
Scott had six starts in 20 appearances over two seasons with the Lions.
Dallas Cowboys quarterback Tony Romo said he did not anticipate any problem being ready for the next game, even in a shortened week.
Romo said he would be ready Saturday night when Dallas plays its Texas Stadium finale against the Baltimore Ravens.
Running back Marion Barber did not practice Thursday and was considered a game-time decision, as he was a week ago when he had only 2 yards on 8 carries.
Barber has been hampered by a broken pinkie toe that forced him to miss a game.
Tarvaris Jackson has reclaimed his starting spot at quarterback for Minnesota.
Coach Brad Childress said the decision has nothing to do with the health of Gus Frerotte and everything to do with the way Jackson has played the last two weeks.
Jackson, who was benched after losses to Green Bay and Indianapolis to start the season, now finds himself leading the Vikings (9-5) into a crucial game with Atlanta on Sunday. 
A win would give the Vikings their first N.F.C. North title.
Colts Clinch Playoff Berth With 31-24 Victory Against Jaguars
Keiwan Ratliff scored on a 35-yard interception return last night to give the Indianapolis Colts a 31-24 win over the Jacksonville Jaguars and the No. 5 seed position in the National Football League playoffs.
The Colts, trailing 14-0 at the start of the second quarter, scored 17 unanswered points in the fourth quarter to clinch their eighth straight win.
Dallas Clark scored on a one- yard pass and Adam Vinatieri tied the game at 24-24 with a 45-yard field goal before Ratliff intercepted a David Garrard pass, the only turnover of the game, for the winning touchdown.
``We were grateful for the win,'' Colts coach Tony Dungy said in a post-game broadcast interview.
``For a long time there it was in doubt.''
Peyton Manning completed 29 of 34 passes for 364 yards and three touchdowns as the Colts (11-4) recorded their sixth come- from-behind win this season.
``We've overcome a lot of obstacles,'' Manning said.
``We just keep fighting.''
The Jaguars (5-10) opened the scoring at Jacksonville Stadium in the first quarter with a 28-yard pass from Garrard to Dennis Northcutt.
Garrard, who completed 28 passes for 329 yards, ran for two yards to give Jacksonville a 14-0 lead in the second quarter.
Manning then threw a 41-yard touchdown pass to Reggie Wayne before Jaguars kicker Josh Scobee made a 44-yard field goal to give Jacksonville a 17-7 halftime lead.
Manning connected with Dominic Rhodes on a 10-yard scoring pass in the third quarter, which was countered by Montell Owens's two-yard run to give the Jaguars a 24-14 lead.
The Colts dominated the final period.
Clark collected a one-yard touchdown pass with 12 minutes, 31 seconds remaining before Vinatieri tied the game and Ratliff got the winning touchdown.
Manning picks apart Jaguars
Peyton Manning was nearly perfect, exactly what the Indianapolis Colts needed to overcome all the emotion the Jacksonville Jaguars got from Richard Collier's return.
Manning completed his first 17 passes, picked apart Jacksonville's secondary and led the Colts to their eighth consecutive win and seventh straight playoff berth.
Manning threw for 364 yards and three touchdowns, and the visiting Colts secured the No. 5 seed in the AFC playoffs with a 31-24 victory over the Jaguars on Thursday night.
They won without receiver Marvin Harrison (hamstring), running back Joseph Addai (shoulder) and linebacker Gary Brackett (leg).
The Jaguars (5-10) lost for the seventh time in the past nine games and fell to 2-6 at home this season.
This one may have been more emotionally draining than any of the others.
Collier, a 6-foot-7 offensive linemen paralyzed from the waist down following a shooting in early September, returned to the field for the first time and was recognized during pregame ceremonies.
He drove onto the field, sat next to his teammates during the national anthem and then headed to midfield as an honorary team captain for the coin toss.
``It's a bittersweet moment,'' Collier said.
``I'm here now, but I'm not a player anymore.
But it's also great with all the love that's been shown from everybody.
It was like I'm back at home.
Everybody showed me love.
It was good.''
Adam ``Pacman'' Jones says the herniated disk in his neck that forced him to miss Dallas' last game was bothering him even before he took a hard hit.
Jones was injured in the first quarter two Sundays ago at Pittsburgh in his first game after a six-week suspension for violating the league's personal conduct policy.
He finished that game, but tests showed a herniated disk and there was talk of shutting him down for the season.
The short conversation at his locker made for Jones' first public comments since before the alcohol-related scuffle with one of his bodyguards Oct. 7 that led to his suspension.
After not playing Sunday night against the New York Giants, Jones returned to practice this week after doctors re-evaluated his condition.
He is expected to start at cornerback and return kicks Saturday night against Baltimore.
Wide receiver Anquan Boldin and running back J.J. Arrington could be sidelined at New England on Sunday because of injuries.
Boldin has a shoulder injury.
Arrington has a sore knee.
They both sat out practice Wednesday and Thursday.
Tarvaris Jackson has reclaimed his starting spot at quarterback for Minnesota.
Coach Brad Childress said the decision has nothing to do with the health of Gus Frerotte and everything to do with the way Jackson has played the last two weeks.
The Vikings need a victory or a Chicago loss in the final two weeks to wrap up their first division title since 2000.
St. Louis placed wide receiver and kick returner Derek Stanley and linebacker Gary Stills on injured reserve.
Stanley tore the anterior cruciate ligament in his left knee in Sunday's loss to Seattle and is expected to be out six to eight months after surgery.
Stills had been playing with bone chips in his left knee and is scheduled to have surgery today.
Pro Bowl cornerback Cortland Finnegan was fined $25,000 by the NFL for two hard hits on Houston quarterback Matt Schaub last weekend.
Colts clinch playoff spot by beating Jags
Quarterback Peyton Manning was nearly perfect as the Colts beat the host Jaguars, 31-24, on Thursday night.
Manning completed his first 17 passes, picked apart Jacksonville's secondary and led the Colts to their eighth consecutive win and seventh straight playoff berth.
The Colts (11-4) secured the No. 5 seed in the AFC playoffs.
Wide receiver Anquan Boldin and running back J.J. Arrington could be sidelined for Sunday's game at New England because of injuries.
Offensive tackle Jonathan Scott was signed to fill the roster spot left open after defensive end Aaron Schobel was placed on injured reserve.
Adam (Pacman) Jones says the herniated disk in his neck that forced him to miss the last game was bothering him even before he took a hard hit.
Jones was injured in the first quarter two Sundays ago at Pittsburgh in his first game after a six-week suspension for violating the league's personal conduct policy.
He finished that game, but tests showed a disk problem, and there was talk of shutting him down for the season.
Pro Bowl cornerback Cortland Finnegan has been fined $25,000 by the NFL for two hard hits on Houston quarterback Matt Schaub last weekend.
Finnegan told the Tennessean he planned to appeal.
The Rams lost two more players for the rest of the season, placing wide receiver and kick returner Derek Stanley and linebacker Gary Stills on injured reserve.
Defensive end Kyle Vanden Bosch watched practice, two days after having surgery on his groin, and said he feels better.
Vanden Bosch will miss the last games of the regular season because of an injury.
He expects to be back when the Titans host a divisional playoff either Jan. 10 or Jan. 11.
Colts Top Jags To Make Playoffs
The Indianapolis Colts will be making their seventh straight playoff appearance after securing that spot with a 31-24 win over the Jacksonville Jaguars last night in Jacksonville.
The Colts (11-4) also won their eighth straight game in defeating the Jags (5-10) who raced out to an early 14-0 lead in the game.
In fact, the Colts didn't take their first lead until former Gator defensive back Keiwan Ratliff intercepted a David Garrard pass and returned it for a touchdown to give the Colts a 31-24 lead.
The Jags drove down to the Colts 7 yard line but a pass to running back Maurice Jones-Drew was completed and he hurt his knee on the play.
The Jags had no timeouts left and by injury rule at that time a 10 second clock runoff was instituted and the game ended.
Precision and perfection defined Colts quaterback Peyton Manning's start against the Jacksonville Jaguars. He completed his first 17 passes.
Meanwhile, inconsistency and an inability to score at the end of the game defined Jaguars quarterback David Garrard's Thursday night.
``It's a 60-minute game -- he played a really good game for 3 1/2 quarters,'' Colts defensive back Antoine Bethea said.
The Jaguars led for three quarters, but 17 unanswered points in the fourth did them in.
Manning completed 29 of 34 passes for 364 yards and 3 touchdowns in the Colts' 31-24 victory over the Jaguars at Jacksonville Municipal Stadium.
Jacksonville fell to 5-10 on its way to its first losing year since Coach Jack Del Rio's initial season (5-11) in 2003.
The loss ended a sordid home campaign in which the Jaguars went 2-6.
The Colts (11-4), on an eight-game winning streak, clinched a playoff berth.
Tony Dungy became the first coach since the 1970 merger to take his team to the playoffs in 10 consecutive years.
Garrard threw for a career-high 329 yards, but late in the fourth quarter he made costly mistakes.
After scoring on four of their first five drives, including their first two, the Jaguars punted to start the fourth quarter.
On their next drive, with 4:48 remaining in the game, Garrard threw an interception to defensive back Keiwan Ratliff, who returned the pick 35 yards for a touchdown.
``It was actually man-coverage, and he made a smart play by dropping off of Dennis [Northcutt],'' Garrard said.
``You never see that in man coverage.
They know we like the slant game on that down and distance and they watched tape.''
The score gave Indianapolis its first lead of the game.
Garrard finished with 28 completions on 41 attempts, a touchdown and an interception.
The Jaguars had one final chance to win the game, fielding a Colts punt with 2:34 remaining.
But with 12 seconds left, Garrard dropped back to pass and found Colts defensive end Dwight Freeney on top of him, nine yards behind the line of scrimmage.
The sack ended the game.
``I didn't even see it coming,'' Garrard said.
``So I couldn't use my legs to make a play.''
For the second home game in a row, the Jaguars started aggressively.
They won the coin toss, and then elected to receive, just like they did against the Green Bay Packers on Sunday.
Then they scored immediately, just like they did on Sunday.
On their second drive, the Jaguars scored again, jumping to a 14-0 lead with a 2-yard touchdown run by Garrard.
Despite the Colts' passing perfection, Indianapolis couldn't score.
``This is a funny game,'' Manning said.
``We were completing some passes, but were down 14-0.
So that dominated our thoughts.''
In the second half, Manning really went to work.
He threw two touchdown passes and set up a game-tying 45-yard field goal by Adam Vinatieri.
And any time the Colts needed something to happen, they went to their passing game.
Running plays were unreliable.
The Jaguars could stop those.
The Colts gained just 32 yards rushing.
But the passes baffled the Jaguars' defense, sailing at the most important times to exactly where they needed to be.
``Peyton Manning is a good quarterback,'' Jaguars safety Reggie Nelson said.
``He has always been good. 
That's what he does.''
Harrison out against Jaguars
Indianapolis Colts wide receiver Marvin Harrison did not play in Thursday night's 31-24 win over Jacksonville due to a hamstring injury.
Harrison, who hadn't missed a game all season, was listed as one of the inactive players.
He has 53 catches for 605 yards and five touchdowns.
He suffered the hamstring injury Sunday in a victory over Detroit.
The Colts, winners of eight straight games, clinched a playoff spot Thursday.
Manning on the money, Colts lock up 5th seed
Locking up the No. 5 seed in the AFC playoffs, Peyton Manning completed 29-of-34 passes for 364 yards and three touchdowns to lead the Colts over the Jaguars in Week 16.
Manning was feeling it tonight. 
He completed his first 17 passes, all of them on the money as he methodically took the Jags defense apart.
Firing beautiful pass after beautiful pass, this was vintage Peyton in his best game of the season -- and quite possibly the most accurate performance of his illustrious career.
Manning has the Indy passing game well-tuned for the playoffs, but he's likely to close out the season on the bench next week.
If so, his late-season flourish leaves him with 3,907 yards and 26 touchdowns in 15 games. Dec. 18 - 11:14 pm et
Efficient Peyton Manning Passes Colts Past Jags
Peyton Manning passed for 364 yards and three touchdowns and Keiwan Ratliff returned an interception 35-yards for a pick-six with just under five minutes left to carry the Indianapolis Colts over the Jacksonville Jaguars 31-24 Thursday night.
Manning started the game 17-for-17 to fall one completion short of the NFL record with 23 straight dating back to last Sunday.
Donovan McNabb holds the record with 24 straight completions, set in 2006.
Reggie Wayne got 108 yards receiving and a touchdown while Dallas Clark followed up his franchise-best tight end performance Sunday with another strong game, finishing with 105 yards and a touchdown.
The Jaguars Maurice Jones-Drew got 20 carries for 91 yards and David Garrard threw for 329 yards and a touchdown, but gave up a costly interception that provided the difference.
Indianapolis (11-4) made an NFL-best fourth double-digit comeback this season to lock up the five seed in the AFC with this win, their eighth straight.
The Colts defense looked shaky and gave up 409 yards, but got the game-winning interception and two late fourth-quarter sacks to seal the win.
Game slips away late as Jaguars fall to Indy
Late sacks, too much Manning give Colts comeback win.
The Jaguars couldn't make the big play and gave up the big play.
That was an all-too-familiar scenario Thursday night in a frustrating 31-24 defeat to the Indianapolis Colts.
The Jaguars battled the Colts toe-to-toe for almost 55 minutes, but with the score tied 24-24, they couldn't finish off the Colts.
First, Keiwan Ratliff fooled David Garrard when he made a coverage move he hadn't made all season, intercepted the pass and ran 35 yards for the touchdown.
After the teams traded punts, the Jaguars advanced from their 10 to the Colts 17 with 48 seconds left when Garrard spiked the ball.
Again, the Jaguars couldn't come up with the play to tie the game.
Coach Jack Del Rio had already decided to go for two and the victory if the Jaguars had scored a touchdown.
On second down, Maurice Drew ran for 10 yards to the 7 for a first down, but suffered a bruised leg on the play and had to come out.
That caused a 10-second runoff because the Jaguars were out of timeouts so they had a first down on the 7 with 17 seconds left.
Garrard then threw the ball away over the head of Reggie Williams in the back of the end zone because he was trying to avoid an interception.
He later said he regretted not giving Williams a chance to make the play.
``As I'm releasing the ball to Reggie I'm pretty much throwing it away because the safeties are high, and then at the last second, he (safety) darts down to my underneath guy and I'm thinking, he's not even playing Reggie.
Those are plays you want to say, 'Just give him a chance.'
I thought it wasn't the best coverage [to throw into] so go to the next down,'' he said.
That left the Jaguars with 12 seconds left, still time for two passes in the end zone.
But Garrard was sacked on second down and the clock ran out before he could call another play.
``It's tough.
You don't want to end the game on a sack when you're on the seven-yard line.
It's kind of how the season has been.
So close, so close and then a sack at the end of the game,'' Garrard said.
That was the difference between the Colts (11-4) clinching a playoff berth with their eighth consecutive victory and the Jaguars falling to 5-10.
That means they'll have double digit losses for the first time since they went 5-11 in Del Rio's first season.
They're now 24-23 in the regular season the last three years and finished 2-4 in the AFC South for the third consecutive season.
Garrard completed 28 of 41 passes for 329 yards and a touchdown and a 90.4 passer rating.
But he wasn't a match for Peyton Manning, who completed 29 of 34 for 364 yards and three touchdowns.
Of the Ratliff interception, Garrard said, ``You don't want to put your team in that situation where you let the guy pick it off and run it back for a touchdown.
They made a good play.
It was actually man-coverage and he made a smart play by dropping off Dennis [Northcutt].
You never see that in man coverage and that was a smart play by him.
They know we like the slant game so on that down and distance, they watched tape.
He just made a good play.''
Ratliff, a former Univerasity of Florida standout, said he didn't know if Garrard saw him, but got good blocking once he made the interception and scored easily.
``I thought we were going to have a shot to win the game, but we came up a little short,'' Del Rio said.
Del Rio added the Jaguars gave up too many ``gimme'' plays like Reggie Wayne's 41-yard touchdown catch when he was wide open down the right sideline in the first half.
``That's one area we've come up short all year on,'' Del Rio said.
``We had too many gimmes mixed in there.
That's kind of plagued us all year.''
The Jaguars scored touchdowns on their first two drives and then tacked on a Josh Scobee field goal with one second left in the first half for a 17-7 lead at halftime.
Dennis Northcutt, who caught five passes for 127 yards against the Packers last week in his first start of the season, continued to make a big difference in the passing game.
He caught five passes for 68 yards in the first half.
He wound up with eight catches for 101 yards. Ratliff said he was surprised the Jaguars didn't throw to Northcutt more.
The Jaguars got an emotional lift when offensive lineman Richard Collier, whose career ended when he was shot in September, visited the team Wednesday night and came out for the coin toss at the start of the game.
Linebacker Mike Peterson, probably playing his final game at Municipal Stadium, said he had to fight back the tears after seeing Collier.
Manning guides Indianapolis to eighth straight win
Peyton Manning helped inspire the Indianapolis Colts to their eighth straight win of the season as they overcame Jacksonville 31-24 on Thursday to reach the play-offs.
Manning finished with 29-of-34 after completing his first 17 passes and threw for 364 yards, including three touchdowns.
And Manning was full of praise of the side after they fought back from 14-0 and 24-14 down to clinch a place in the play-offs as the fifth seeds in the AFC.
``It was a funny game, we were completing some passes but we were down 14-0,'' Manning said.
``The crowd were into it and Jacksonville is always tough here at home.
``It's been a very different season.
For us to win eight in a row, it was what we had to do, we had no choice but to do that and have a chance to get into the play-offs.
``You never take winning for granted.
It's hard to win one game and it's extremely hard to win eight in a row like we did.''
The Colts had looked like they would suffer their first defeat in eight games as they entered the final quarter 10 points down.
However Manning's one-yard touchdown pass to tight end Dallas Clark and Adam Vinatieri's 45-yard field goal tied the scores.
And with just under five minutes remaining, Keiwan Ratliff intercepted quarterback David Garrard's pass and raced in from 35 yards out for the match-clinching touchdown.
Garrard, who rushed for a score, finished with 28-of-41 for 329 yards with one touchdown and one interception for Jacksonville.
And Colts coach Tony Dungy added: ``It's been a long fight back from (starting the year) 3-4.
``I like where we are right now. 
Peyton Manning was unbelievable, and our defense made some plays in the fourth quarter when they had to.''
After more than three years and a tangled trail of frustrating legal delays, the man who killed four people in a brazen courthouse escape was sentenced Saturday to prison for life without parole and hundreds of years more.
Yet prosecutors who spent the last month urging jurors to sentence one of Atlanta's most notorious criminals to death were not celebrating.
``The community has spoken,'' Fulton County District Attorney Paul Howard said at an emotional press conference after the sentencing of Brian Nichols.
``Even though we are puzzled and terribly disappointed by the decision, we must accept the conclusion provided by our community.''
It showed how difficult it is to get a capital sentence in Atlanta's Fulton County, where death penalties are rare even in a state where support for capital punishment is widespread.
Georgia tied for third in carrying out executions last year.
And it underscored the problems Georgia prosecutors say they frequently face with the requirement that death sentences can only be returned by unanimous jury verdicts.
Nichols, 37, was found guilty last month of murdering a judge, a court reporter, a sheriff's deputy and a federal agent in the March 2005 rampage.
After four days deliberating on whether to recommend the death penalty, the jury deadlocked at 9-3. 
Nichols will likely die in prison after Superior Court Judge James Bodiford handed down the maximum prison sentence on each of 54 charges.
The deadlock devastated prosecutors, who had turned down an offer from Nichols' attorneys to plead guilty in exchange for a life sentence. 
The trial has already cost more than $2 million, likely the most expensive in state history.
And it may not be over yet:
Howard said he's talked to the U.S. Attorney about a federal death penalty trial for the federal agent's slaying.
In the meantime, Howard and some state legislative leaders said Georgia's death penalty rules should be changed.
``Georgia is a conservative state, but there are pockets where it is not,'' said state Rep. Barry Fleming, a Republican who led a failed bid last year to allow judges to approve death penalties even if one or two jurors voted against it.
``There are people who will attempt to nullify the law when they get on the jury.''
The last time a Fulton County jury issued a death sentence was eight years ago, and only then for a triple murderer who killed a toddler.
One factor could be race.
The county is 43 percent black, and numerous polls and surveys have found that blacks are more likely than whites to oppose capital punishment.
Eight of the jurors were black.
The three who voted against the death penalty would not comment, but Howard said other jurors told him the three holdouts refused to deliberate.
He said he was told that one was wearing headphones during the closed-door discussions this week.
Two jurors who spoke at Howard's news conference but declined to be identified said they worked hard to try to reach a verdict.
``I believe Brian Nichols did not win.
In his own words, he said it's not his DNA to stay in jail, which is what he has to look forward to the rest of his life,'' said Christina Greenway, daughter of slain court reporter Julie Ann Brandau.
``I'm not disappointed and I have no regrets.''
Nichols was being escorted to his trial for rape when he overpowered a deputy guarding him and stole her gun.
He burst into the courtroom and shot and killed Superior Court Judge Rowland Barnes, Brandau and sheriff's Deputy Hoyt Teasley.
He fled downtown Atlanta and managed to evade hundreds of police officers searching for him overnight.
In Atlanta's posh Buckhead neighborhood, he shot and killed federal agent David Wilhelm at a house the agent was renovating.
Death penalty experts said the Nichols verdict shows there's no telling what will happen when a jury is asked to settle a capital case.
``It's very hard for 12 people to sit down around the table to make a decision to put another human being to death,'' said Stephen Bright, a Yale Law School lecturer and a veteran capital defense attorney.
Nichols, who argued he was insane when he carried out the killings, spoke for the first time in court on Saturday as relatives of the victims' families quietly wept.
``I just wanted to say that I know that the things I've done caused a lot of pain and I'm sorry,'' he said.
``And I just wanted to say that I will not bring dishonor to the decision to spare my life.
That's it.''
The judge had advice for anyone who deals with Nichols in the future:
``Do not trust Mr. Nichols ever again.
Ever again.
Because he cannot be trusted.''
Now that Fulton County courthouse killer Brian Nichols has been sentenced to life without parole, one of the not yet answered questions is where the 37-year-old will serve time.
Superior Court Judge James Bodiford on Saturday suggested that Nichols should serve his time in the federal maximum security prison - known as Supermax - in Florence, Colo., which has the reputation as the nation's toughest and most secure prison.
Bodiford said he was surprised to learn during the trial that Nichols, who is committed of state crimes, could still serve his time in a federal prison.
``I thought maybe Supermax might be a good place for Mr. Nichols for what it is worth,'' Bodiford said.
``I don't believe I can order it and I am not going to order it but that is my two cents worth.''
About the prison:
The supermax unit at the Florence Federal Correctional Complex at Florence, Colo., primarily holds extremely dangerous or escape-risk federal inmates.
There also are a few state prisoners there who need more security than those prisons can provide.
The remote prison, which opened in 1994, almost disappears into the same-color desert around it.
Cells are 8-by-12 feet, with concrete walls, ceilings and furnishings, including the bed.
The toilets, sinks and showers are stainless steel.
Cell windows are long and narrow, limiting the view to only the sky.
Some known inmates:
Unabomber Ted Kaczynski, shoe bomber Richard Reid, and Sept. 11, 2001 conspirator Zacarias Moussaoui.
Jamil Abdullah Al-Amin, the 1960s militant once named H. Rap Brown, convicted in Georgia of the state crime of murdering a Fulton County deputy.
Convicted of federal crimes in Georgia: Eric Robert Rudolph, who pleaded guilty to the Centennial Olympic Park bombings and other bombings in Atlanta, and Malachi Z. York, the Nuwaubian leader convicted of child molestation, racketeering and federal financial reporting charges.
Prison program:
A three-step program limits - or perhaps deprives - inmates of many things that would stimulate the senses - smell, sight and touch.
Olympic Park bomber Rudolph complained in letters to a Colorado newspaper in 2006 that the prison's design was driving him insane.
In the first stage of the program, inmates spend 23 of every 24 hours double-locked behind a steel door and a barred grate.
They are allowed one 15-minute telephone call a month. 
One hour each day is spent alone in a recreation area.
Their behavior is reviewed every 90 days before they can be moved up to the next step.
At the second and third steps, inmates are given progressively more freedom, more time for exercise, longer and more frequent telephone calls and more social contact with other prisoners - as long as they are free of violations.
Limited inmate privileges:
Inmates get a radio and a black-and-white, 13-inch television made specially with clear backs that reveal all internal components. 
The TVs are hooked up to ``basic cable.''
Inmates participate in religious services that are broadcast on their televisions.
Guards pass inmates' meals, law books and other items through a slot in the door.
There is limited direct human contact.
Former Kutztown University football player Brian Nichols has received a sentence of life in prison without parole for a March 2005 shooting spree in an Atlanta courthouse, according to reports.
According to reports in an Atlanta newspaper:
Nichols was sentenced Saturday morning to seven life sentences and four sentences of life without parole plus 485 years.
Nichols was being tried for rape in March 2005 when he overpowered a female sheriff's deputy, took her gun and shot the judge in his rape trial and the court reporter.
Outside the courtroom, Nichols shot and killed a sheriff's deputy sergeant.
Later that day, as he attempted to elude police, he shot and killed a U.S. Customs agent.
He later made it to Gwinnett County where he kidnapped a woman who says she talked Nichols into surrendering.
Fulton Courthouse killer Brian Nichols was sentenced Saturday morning to seven life sentences and four sentences of life without parole plus 485 years for the crimes he committed on March 11, 2005, that stunned metro Atlanta and the nation.
Brian Nichols was saved from a death sentence by three jurors who were determined that he instead spend his life in prison, no matter how many people he killed.
Fulton County District Attorney Paul Howard suggested Saturday that the possibility of a death penalty was doomed - even before jury selection - by the three holdouts.
``I talked to two jurors and they both say that some people showed up for jury duty with their minds already made up and never entered into a meaningful discussion of a death sentence,'' Howard said Saturday after Nichols was sentenced.
``That means we didn't get a fair trial.''
The two jurors, who indicated they were among the nine voting to put Nichols to death, reported one of the holdouts even worked a crossword puzzle while the panel deliberated Nichols' fate for 40 hours over four days.
The frustrated prosecutor gambled on getting a death penalty decision when he denied a Nichols offer a year ago to plead guilty in exchange for a life prison sentence.
He said Saturday that he would urge Georgia lawmakers to amend the law - that now requires a unanimous decision - to allow a 10-juror majority approve a death penalty.
``We're not asking for favors - we are just asking for a level playing field,'' Howard said.
``People who will not deliberate should not be permitted to continue to serve on juries.''
He was especially vexed because the holdouts were evidently not truthful when questioned by lawyers about whether they could impose the death penalty before they were chosen for the jury.
He said all the jurors swore under oath that they could consider death for Nichols if they felt the crimes deserved it.
Inside the jury room, however, the three holdouts told the other nine jurors that they would not impose death for any killings.
In fact, Howard said, the nine pro-death jurors asked the three holdouts how many people would Nichols have to kill before they would be willing to vote for execution.
``They asked, 'How about if it had been 50 people?''' Howard said.
``And the three people said it wouldn't make any difference at all.''
The two female jurors, one white and one black, spoke publicly at a news conference Saturday to express their exasperation
``I want the families to know we did everything we could do,`` said the white woman, who was identified as Juror No. 12.
Family members of the four murder victims expressed outrage that Nichols had escaped the death penalty.
``I feel in some ways he is proud of what he did,'' said Deborah Teasley, widow of a sheriff's deputy Nichols murdered.
``He was constantly sitting there at the defense table with a smirk on his face.''
The two jurors, who did not give their names, said the closed-door jury deliberations never became hostile during the four days they tried to decide a penalty.
``Everyone was respectful,`` said Juror No. 8, one of six African-American women on the panel.
``We were able to state our opinions.
But we would not back down.''
It was the pro-death majority, hoping to sway the three holdouts, who sought the replay of the bombshell jailhouse tape recording of Nichols talking with his brother on a telephone call.
``We were searching,'' Juror No. 12 said.
An angry Nichols was recorded saying he didn't regret the four murders and would have taken his rampage to the DA's office in the courthouse if given the chance again.
Defense attorneys vehemently objected to the tape as ``highly prejudicial,'' though Judge James Bodiford said jurors could rehear just the portion played for them at trial.
In the end, the jury did not follow through with a formal written request for the tape.
The two jurors kept their public comments limited at the news conference.
Other jurors contacted by The Atlanta Journal-Constitution, including the jury foreman, declined to talk or answer questions left for them at their residences.
The jury - six black women, two white women, two black men, one white man and one Asian man - began hearing the case Sept. 22 and convicted Nichols on Nov. 7 after 12 hours of deliberation.
The trial then entered a four-week penalty phase, with prosecution witnesses testifying that Nichols is still a remorseless killer plotting constantly to escape, and defense witnesses testifying he had a troubled childhood and has shown signs of remorse and redemption.
Howard said the jurors in the majority told him after reporting their 9-3 deadlock to Bodiford that they did not know they could have asked Bodiford to replace with alternates the three who refused to deliberate with them.
On Friday morning, a day after the 9-3 deadlock was first reported, prosecutor Kellie Hill asked Bodiford to ask the jury if all of the jurors were participating in good faith.
Defense lawyers objected, arguing to Bodiford that any such inquiry during the penalty phase would amount to coercion - which could result in a reversal on appeal.
Josh Moore, one of the defense lawyers, had reminded the judge earlier that unanimity in the penalty phase was not required.
``Georgia law shows no preference for a unanimous verdict in the sentencing phase of a death case,'' he said.
Howard said state law is murky on whether a judge could inquire or replace jurors during the penalty phase.
The law also permits each juror to follow his or her personal morality on determining whether to impose a death sentence, as long as the juror can honestly consider it.
Howard said he hoped the Legislature also would change the law, which permits vague responses during jury selection on whether potential jurors would be willing to impose the death penalty.
Victims' relatives said any Nichols victory was hollow.
``I don't think Brian Nichols won,'' said Christina Greenway, daughter of the court reporter Nichols murdered.
``In his own words, it is not in his DNA to stay in prison.
Now he can look forward to a life in prison.''
Nichols rose to infamy when he escaped from custody at the Fulton County Courthouse during his rape trial on March 11, 2005, by overpowering his guard, sheriff's Deputy Cynthia Hall, beating her so badly he left her brain-damaged and blind in one eye.
Nichols then took her gun and went to the chambers of Superior Court Judge Rowland Barnes, who was presiding over his trial, and took the staff captive and seized the gun of another deputy.
Minutes later, he shot Barnes in the back of the head while he was on the bench hearing a civil matter.
Four seconds later, he shot the court reporter, Julie Ann Brandau, in the head, killing her, also.
Nichols then escaped and shot and killed Deputy Sgt. Hoyt Teasley, who had pursued him outside the courthouse.
Nichols committed a series of carjackings before finally escaping downtown Atlanta by taking MARTA to Buckhead while police looked for him.
In Buckhead, while in search of a hiding place, he committed other assaults before ending up that night at the house that David Wilhelm was building a few blocks from Lenox Mall.
He shot Wilhelm, an off-duty U.S. Customs agent, emptied his pockets of cash and took his cellphone as he lay paralyzed, dying on the floor.
Nichols stole Wilhelm's pickup truck, where he said he found Wilhelm's badge.
Whether he knew Wilhelm was a federal agent before he killed him could make a difference on whether federal authorities indict him and seek a death penalty in a federal court.
At trial, prosecutors contended Nichols ambushed Wilhelm and that he didn't have his gun drawn during the confrontation as Nichols claimed.
Defense lawyers contended that Nichols committed the crimes because he suffered from a delusion that made him believe he was leading a slave revolt against an unjust justice system.
Nichols, 37, was an $80,000-a-year computer system expert at UPS before his life spiraled out of control after his girlfriend of seven years dumped him for infidelity.
He took her captive and raped her in August 2004 - saying he wanted to win her back - and was arrested and spent nine months in jail before the killings.
Wilhelm's widow, Candee, took aim at Nichols' parents - who had won praise from the judge as solid citizens - when she addressed the public after the sentencing.
``Brian Nichols' parents raised an extremely evil person,'' said Wilhelm, who was briefly detained during the trial for bringing a pistol into the courthouse.
``I am extremely disappointed that the defendant has been shown the mercy that he did not show on March 11, 2005.''
Lead prosecutor Kellie Hill reminded the crowd that mercy did not equal injustice.
``Justice has been served in this case - it absolutely has been,'' Hill said.
``Sometimes we don't understand the outcome, but we all have to accept it.''
Nichols' mother, Claritha, and father, Gene, attended the trial most days for 12 weeks.
They became the focus of testimony about their son's upbringing, and his mother testified about events leading up to his rape trial on the day he escaped and went on his killing spree.
They sat through the sentencing Saturday but left the courthouse before reporters could interview them.
As she came into the courthouse before the sentencing, Nichols' mother expressed their sentiments.
``We just want to fade into obscurity,'' she said.
A judge in Fulton County, Ga., sentenced Brian Nichols Saturday to multiple life prison sentences for his deadly 2005 rampage at Fulton Courthouse.
Superior Court Judge James Bodiford sentenced Nichols to seven consecutive life sentences and four sentences of life without parole for the March 11, 2005, incident that left four people dead, The Atlanta Journal-Constitution reported.
``You'll be pleased to know that I'm not going to lecture too much this morning,'' Bodiford said.
``I'm not going to express outrage and I'm not going to express any feelings might have.
The jury has spoken and I respect the jury.
I think the jury did everything it could to come up with a unanimous sentence.''
Nichols was convicted of overpowering a sheriff's deputy before killing Superior Court Judge Rowland Barnes, court reporter Julie Ann Brandau, Sheriff's Deputy Sgt. Hoyt Teasley and U.S. Customs Agent David Wilhelm.
The Journal-Constitution said Nichols, who also received an additional sentence of 485 years, offered a show of remorse before his sentence was announced Saturday.
``I am sorry.
I just want to say that I will not bring dishonor to the decision to spare my life,'' the convicted killer said.
An Atlanta judge sentenced Brian Nichols to life in prison Saturday morning.
He's the former Kutztown University football player who went on a shooting rampage at an Atlanta courthouse in 2005, killing four people.
The jury was unable to come to a decision after 30 hours of deliberation.
The judge, by law sentenced Nichols to consecutive maximum sentences on each of his charges.
While Nichols did not recieve the death penalty, he will likely die in prison.
Death sentences in Georgia require a unanimous decision by a jury.
Nichols faced more than 50 charges in the case.
He was on trial for rape in 2005 in an Atlanta courtroom when he grabbed a guard's gun, fatally shooting a judge, court reporter, sherrif's deputy and later, a federal agent.
A judge on Saturday sentenced the man who killed four people during a brazen courthouse escape to multiple life sentences with no chance of parole, and to hundreds more years on more than 50 charges.
The man, Brian G. Nichols, 37, was found guilty last month of murder and dozens of other counts in the March 2005 rampage that led from a downtown courthouse to an Atlanta neighborhood and which ended with his capture the next day in a suburban county.
Judge James G. Bodiford of Superior Court handed down the maximum sentence on each charge, to run consecutively.
``If there was any more I could give you, I would,'' Judge Bodiford said.
Mr. Nichols was spared multiple death sentences when the jury failed to reach a unanimous decision, as required by Georgia law, recommending that punishment.
The sentence ends more than three years of efforts to bring Mr. Nichols to justice since his arrest, frustrating victims' relatives and angering state legislators over the costs.
Mr. Nichols escaped on March 11, 2005, as he was being escorted to a trial for rape.
He beat a deputy guarding him and stole her gun.
He burst into the courtroom and shot and killed Judge Rowland Barnes; a court reporter, Julie Ann Brandau; and Sgt. Hoyt Teasley, a Fulton County sheriff's deputy.
Mr. Nichols fled downtown Atlanta and managed to evade hundreds of police officers overnight.
In the Buckhead neighborhood of Atlanta, he shot and killed a federal immigration and customs agent, David Wilhelm, at a house the agent was renovating.
Mr. Nichols was captured the next day in suburban Gwinnett County after a woman he took hostage, Ashley Smith Robinson, alerted the police.
Ms. Smith Robinson was credited with bringing a peaceful ending to the rampage by appealing to Mr. Nichols's religious beliefs and giving him illegal drugs.
Mr. Nichols, who was raised in Baltimore, confessed to the killings but said that he was legally insane and that he believed he was a slave rebelling against his masters.
Prosecutors argued that he concocted the delusions to avoid the death penalty.
Mr. Nichols's rampage led lawyers and judges to question their safety, and officials around the state re-examined courthouse security measures.
A Georgia judge handed Brian Nichols today four consecutive life sentences without the possibility for parole sentence today.
He was convicted of killing four people, including a judge in a court room shooting in 2005.
A court officer was also killed outside the court and an off-duty officer the next day.
``I will not bring dishonor to the decision to spare my life,'' Nichols, 37, told the court.
``I'm giving you the maximum -- every day I could give you,'' Superior Court Judge James Bodiford said, in the same court where the killing occurred.
``If I could give you more, I would.''
Nichols was on trial for rape when on March 11, 2005 he overpowered a guard and seized her weapon, killing in the court room Judge Rowland Barnes and the court reporter Julie Ann Brandau;
he also was convicted on killing Sgt. Hoyt Teasley outside the courthouse and killing the next day off-duty U.S. Customs Agent David Wilhelm.
Nichols said: ``I know that the things that I've done caused a lot of pain, and I am sorry.''
Jurors deadlocked with nine in favor and three against the death sentence.
Ironically Nichols had offered to plead guilty in return for life behind bars but prosecutors had refused.
A judge on Saturday sentenced the man who killed four people in a brazen courthouse escape to multiple life sentences with no chance of parole after a deadlocked jury failed to return a death sentence.
Brian Nichols, 37, was found guilty last month of murder and dozens of other counts for the March 2005 rampage that started in a downtown courthouse, led to an Atlanta neighborhood and ended with his capture the next day in a suburban county.
He will likely die in prison after Superior Court Judge James Bodiford handed down the maximum sentence on each charge.
``If there was any more I could give you, I would,'' the judge said.
Nichols was spared capital punishment when the jury failed to reach a unanimous decision to condemn him to death row for the murders of a judge, a court reporter, a deputy and a federal agent.
After four days and more than 30 hours of deliberations, the jury was deadlocked at 9-3, with nine in favor of the death penalty and three voting for life without parole.
Nichols, who argued he was mentally insane when he carried out the killings, spoke for the first time in court on Saturday.
``I just wanted to say that I know that the things I've done caused a lot of pain and I'm sorry,'' he said.
``And I just wanted to say that I will not bring dishonor to the decision to spare my life.
That's it.''
The sentence caps more than three years of efforts to bring Nichols to justice since his arrest that were repeatedly bogged down by legal complications, frustrating victims' relatives and angering state legislators over the costs.
The rampage prompted attorneys and judges to question their safety and law enforcement around the state to re-examine courthouse security measures.
The deadlocked jury was a setback for prosecutors, who turned down an offer from Nichols' attorneys to plead guilty in exchange for a life sentence.
But District Attorney Paul Howard said he has spoken with U.S. attorneys about a possible death penalty trial against Nichols in federal court for the killing of the off-duty federal agent.
Howard also said Georgia prosecutors need more leeway to strike jurors who are reluctant to vote for the death penalty.
He said jurors have told him that the three holdouts refused to deliberate and one even wore headphones during the closed-door discussions this week.
``The community has spoken,'' he said.
``Even though we are puzzled and terribly disappointed by the decision, we must accept the conclusion provided by our community.''
In a tearful post-trial press conference, the families of the victims thanked the prosecutors for going through with the trial, as painful as it was.
``I believe Brian Nichols did not win.
In his own words, he said it's not his DNA to stay in jail,'' said Christina Greenway, daughter of slain court reporter Julie Ann Brandau.
``Which is what he has to look forward to the rest of his life. I'm not disappointed and I have no regrets.''
Nichols was being escorted to his trial for rape when he beat a deputy guarding him and stole her gun.
He burst into the courtroom and shot and killed Superior Court Judge Rowland Barnes, Brandau and Deputy Hoyt Teasley.
He fled downtown Atlanta and managed to evade hundreds of police officers searching for him overnight.
In Atlanta's posh Buckhead neighborhood, he shot and killed federal agent David Wilhelm at a house the agent was renovating.
The judge, after sentencing Nichols to the slew of charges, urged the victims' of Nichols' crimes to try their best to regroup.
``We've learned a lot from this horrible tragedy, and as horrible as it was, we need to learn from this and make sure it never happens again,'' said Bodiford.
The judge offered advice for the prison guards who will handle Nichols:
``Do not trust Mr. Nichols ever again.
Ever again.
Because he cannot be trusted.''
Severed cables bring down phone lines linking Europe, Asia, Mideast
Internet and telephone communications between Europe, the Middle East and Asia were severely disrupted Friday after three undersea cables were damaged in the Mediterranean, France Telecom said.
``The causes of the cut , which is located in the Mediterranean between Sicily and Tunisia, on sections linking Sicily to Egypt, remain unclear,'' a statement said, while a spokesman said it was unlikely to have been an attack.
The company said it was sending a ship to fix the lines but that it would not arrive until Monday and that it could take until December 31 before normal service was restored.
Most business-to-business traffic between Europe and Asia was being rerouted through the United States, the firm said, but regular communications between Europe and several Asian countries has been disrupted since early Friday.
Sixty-five per cent of traffic to India was down, while services to Singapore, Malaysia, Saudi Arabia, Egypt, Taiwan and Pakistan were also severely affected, a spokesman said Friday evening.
An afternoon toll released by France Telecom said that 100 percent of traffic was lost in the Maldives Indian Ocean islands, with the Gulf state of Qatar and Djibouti, on the Gulf of Aden, also losing over 70 percent of their traffic.
Egypt's state news agency MENA reported that the cuts happened off the coast of Sicily at 10:00 am (0800 GMT) on Friday, with Indian-registered Reliance GlobalCom directing a submarine cable repair company to head to the region to fix the cables.
The agency added that services were being rerouted to backup cables and satellites to compensate for the failures.
The cables are jointly owned by several dozen different countries.
One of the cables is 40,000 kilometres (25,000 miles) long and links 33 different countries while a second is 20,000 kilometres long and serves 14 states.
``If there was just one cable down we could have used the other two,'' said France Telecom spokesman Louis-Michel Aymard.
``But all three are down so this puts us in a very difficult situation.
``This is a very rare situation,'' he said.
The cables might have got caught up in trawlers' nets or there may have been an underwater landslide, said Aymard.
One appeared to be fully severed, while the other two seemed to be only partially cut, he added.
Each cable has a ``leader'' country, he said. Egypt is in charge of the main cable and in this capacity commissioned France Telecom Marine, a subsidiary of the communications giant, to handle the repairs.
The boat, with 20 kilometres (12.5 miles) of spare cable on board, will leave very early Saturday and arrive Monday.
In January, five cables in the Middle East and Europe were cut, causing Internet failures in the region and damaging traffic through the region's important call centre industry.
France Telecom said it would publish updates on its website on the latest traffic disruption.
Traffic from Europe to Algeria and Tunisia is not affected, it said.
India suffers massive internet disruption after undersea cables break
Millions of people across the Middle East and Asia have lost access to the internet after two undersea cables in the Mediterranean suffered severe damage.
Huge numbers in Egypt and India were left struggling to get online as a result of the outage, when the major internet pipeline between Egypt and Italy was cut.
Internet Service Providers (ISPs) throughout the region, including those in United Arab Emirates, Kuwait and Saudi Arabia, also reported problems.
International telephone calls, which have also been affected, are being rerouted to work around the problem.
Industry experts told The Times that two sub-sea cables went down just off Alexandra, causing the mass disruption.
``It is incredibly rare to experience a dual-break where both cables are down simultaneously,'' said a spokesperson for Interoute, the internet networks company.
The Egyptian ministry said it will take ``several days'' for cables to be repaired and is trying to reroute Egypt's internet connections.
Indian ISPs said their problems were due to the cable damage off Egypt.
Speaking to reporters, Rajesh Chharia, president of the Internet Service Providers' Association of India, said: ``Information technology companies, software companies and call centres that provide online services to the UK or the US east coast are the worst affected.''
Rafaat Hindy, from the Egyptian ministry, said: ``Despite this being an international cable affecting many Gulf and Arab countries, we are closest to it and so we have a lot of responsibility.
``We are working as fast as we can.''
It is thought that up to 70 per cent of web services in Egypt, and 60 per cent in India, were disrupted yesterday.
There were reports that phone and internet difficults had spread to Yemen, Sudan, Bangladesh and Sri Lanka.
The shut down will take several days to fix, and could have a major impact on the region and across the world.
It is likely to hit businesses who will struggle to communicate in the affected countires.
Call-centres who work for British companies are likely to be offline or hard to contact in the coming days.
Others warned that bank and stock market trading could be affected.
The digital blackout highlighted the vulnerability of global communications.
Hundreds of millions of people access the web, but the vast majority of international traffic runs through a a small amount of cables submerged below the sea.
Industry insiders warned that a domino effect was occuring today, causing the disruption to spread across the globe.
As companies' private internet services went down, workers were forced to use the public internet and mobile phones to communicate.
This has resulted in a heavy strain on phone and internet networks, meaning calls could go down and cause the internet to become slower or blackout completely.
Damaged undersea cables disrupting service
Parts of Asia, the Middle East, and Europe experienced Internet and telephone outages Friday when three undersea cables between Italy and Egypt in the Mediterranean Sea were damaged.
The affected cable systems, which run from Alexandria in northern Egypt to Sicily in southern Italy, carry more than 75 percent of traffic between the Middle East, Europe, and the United States.
It's still unclear how the cables were damaged or when they will be fixed.
Reliance Globalcom, a communications provider in India, told Bloomberg News that there was no time frame for getting the network fixed.
France Telecom said it plans to send a boat to fix the problem and should have service restored to normal by December 31, according to Bloomberg.
The cable system that was cut is known as SMW4 cable or South East Asia- Middle East-Western Europe 4.
It connects 12 countries: Pakistan, Indonesia, Singapore, Malaysia, Bangladesh, India, Sri Lanka, United Arab Emirates, Saudi Arabia, Egypt, Italy and France.
Vodafone's cell phone service in Egypt has been affected by the cable failure, according to Bloomberg.
Mobile phone service between Europe and Asia on Orange was also disrupted, the Bloomberg article said.
Orange officials told Bloomberg that at one point as much as 55 percent of voice traffic in Saudi Arabia, 52 percent in Egypt, and 82 percent in India was out of service.
Telephone providers, such as Portugal Telecom and Reliance, told Bloomberg that they've been rerouting traffic to other parts of their network to avoid issues.
But this rerouting has caused network congestion, which means slower Internet connections and some dropped phone calls.
In January, undersea cables outside Alexandria were also damaged, disrupting about 70 percent of the communications network in India and the Middle East.
Severed Cables in Mediterranean Disrupt Communication
Internet and telephone communications between the Middle East and Europe were disrupted after three submarine cables between Italy and Egypt in the Mediterranean Sea were damaged.
The failures cut the flow of ``data of various kinds'' between Europe and the Middle East, and there's no timeframe for when communications will be restored, said Sanjeev Gaur, director of assurance at Reliance Globalcom Ltd. in India.
France Telecom SA, which plans to send a maintenance boat to fix the problem, said the situation should be back to normal by Dec. 31.
Three cable systems carrying more than 75 percent of traffic between the Middle East, Europe and America have been damaged, according to the U.K.'s Interoute Plc, which operates a fiber- optic data network connecting 92 cities.
The cables run from Alexandria in northern Egypt to Sicily in southern Italy.
In January, an anchor severed the cables outside Alexandria after bad weather conditions forced ships to moor off the coast.
``The information we have is a bit sketchy, but chances are that it will have been an anchor again, `` Jonathan Wright, Interoute's director of wholesale products, said in a telephone interview.
``Close to 90 percent of all the data traffic between Europe and the Middle East is carried on these three cable systems.''
Interoute said the January incident brought down 70 percent of the Internet network in India and the Middle East.
Customer services and some mobile-phone customers at Vodafone Group Plc's Egyptian unit are affected by the cable failure, said Simon Gordon, a spokesman for the U.K. company. 
Egypt is the only country where the company is aware of any problems linked to the failure, he said.
Most mobile-phone calls are routed through fixed-line cables at some point.
Verizon Communications Inc., the second-largest U.S. phone company, said it has rerouted traffic for its Verizon Business customers making calls to the Middle East by siphoning it to Europe and the U.S. and then down through Asia, spokeswoman Linda Laughlin said in an interview.
The rerouting slowed some traffic to about half its normal speed, Laughlin said.
Point-to-point customers still don't have connections, and Verizon doesn't have information on how many subscribers are affected.
The company expects repairs to be completed by early next week, she said.
Portugal Telecom SGPS SA, Portugal's biggest phone company, has redirected traffic through other cables in the region and therefore the ``impact is very small,'' said a company official.
Sonaecom SGPS SA, Portugal's second-biggest fixed-line phone company, also said that it's diverting traffic to other routes.
France Telecom's Orange mobile-phone unit said the cable failure ``greatly disturbed'' the traffic between Europe and parts of Asia.
At one point as much as 55 percent of voice traffic in Saudi Arabia, 52 percent in Egypt and 82 percent in India was out of service, according to Orange.
Internet traffic ``from Mumbai to London has now been rerouted via Hong Kong which may lead to congestion and increased latency on this route,''
Reliance said in an e-mailed ``traffic disruption update,'' adding that it is working with the affected customers to restore all services.
The company said it will publish another update on its Web site tomorrow.
``You can reroute the data through other cables, but that increases traffic and can potentially create bottlenecks,'' Interoute's Wright said.
``So Internet connections may slow down and some phone calls could get disrupted.''
Some of Interoute's clients in the U.K. and Southern France are probably affected by the failure, Wright said.
``It's difficult to forecast how long it will take to fix the problem as it depends on the weather and sea conditions in the Mediterranean,'' Wright said.
A fault is affecting the SMW4 cable near the Alexandria cable station, the FLAG FEA cable is down and the SMW3 cable system is also affected, according to information received from Telstra.
Flag Telecom Group Ltd., a Reliance Globalcom unit, operates FLAG FEA and the other cables are owned by groups of phone companies across the regions.
Reliance Globalcom doesn't know exactly what happened and engineers are working on the problem, said Anurag Joshi, head of the company's global network operations center.
The SMW4 cable, also known as SEA-ME-WE 4or South East Asia-Middle East-Western Europe 4 cable network, connects 12 countries: Pakistan, Indonesia, Singapore, Malaysia, Bangladesh, India, Sri Lanka, United Arab Emirates, Saudi Arabia, Egypt, Italy and France.
France Telecom said one of its maintenance boats in the Mediterranean area is headed to the region for a relief mission with 20 kilometers of spare cable on board.
Priority will be to recover the SEA-ME-WE 4 cable, then the SEA-ME-WE 3 cable, France Telecom said, adding that Sea Me We4 could be operating by Dec. 25 and the situation should be back to normal by Dec. 31.
As if the Middle East and South Asia don't have enough problems with war, terrorism and poverty, now communications in many of the nations in those regions have been disrupted.
The cause - three international underwater cables in the Mediterranean Sea that were damaged Friday.
Millions of people trying to make phone calls or log on to the Internet won't be doing so for a while.
A similar problem happened nearly a year ago, but this one has the potential to be worse.
The damage this time broke all three of the cables connecting Europe with Asia via the Middle East.
Many carriers in the Middle East and South Asia will have to route their European traffic around the globe, instead of via a more direct route.
No word yet on an official cause of the damage.
Previous reasons for cable breaks include oil drilling and wayward anchors.
Internet service in Egypt, the UAE, India and other counties in the region was interrupted today when submarine cables in the Mediterranean Sea failed.
Cause of the failure is not known at this time, says operator Reliance GlobalCom.
A total of three cables linking Italy and Egypt went down.
A ship has been sent out to fix the problems.
Currently, services are being rerouted to backup cables and satellites.
As rerouting measures fully kick in, services are expected to improve by early Saturday morning.
This isn't the first time that cable service to the region has failed.
Earlier this year, five separate undersea cables were cut between late January and early February, interrupting service to a number of countries.
There's likely to be some serious failure analysis involved if we see some more pipes go off-line in the next week.
Internet and telephone traffic between Europe and the Middle East and Asia was hampered Friday after three major underwater data lines were cut , according to France Telecom.
The cut occurred on lines between 07:28 and 08:06 Coordinated Universal Time (UTC) on lines in the Mediterranean sea that connect Sicily to Tunisia and Egypt, the telecommunications company said.
The cuts were to the Sea Me We 4 and Sea Me We 3 lines, which connect countries between Singapore and France as well as the Flag cable route, which stretches from the U.K. to Japan, a France Telecom spokeswoman who asked not to be named said.
France Telecom isn't sure what caused the cut, she said.
France Telecom isn't sure what caused the cut, she said.
``We have two assumptions.
The first is that it could be an underwater earthquake,'' she said.
``Or it could be simply a ship in the area which has cut the cable.''
``Or it could be simply a ship in the area which has cut the cable.''
A maintenance boat is en route to the site of the cut, but it will not get there until Monday, and it will take as many as two weeks for the situation to return to normal, she said.
Many countries were affected by the outage, including India, Saudi Arabia, Egypt and Malaysia, which all lost a significant percentage on their voice traffic to Europe.
For example, 82 percent of India's voice traffic capability to Europe was out of service early Friday, although that situation has now improved, the spokeswoman said.
Internet traffic also has been hit by the incident, according to Danny McPherson, chief security officer with Arbor Networks.
His company's sensors reported that between 3,000 and 5,000 Internet routes in the region were off-line early Friday morning.
These routes are the Internet's equivalent of dialing prefixes, meaning that computers that used them would be completely unreachable until service was restored.
``It's significant that it was lost,'' he said
``For them it was in the middle of a business day on Friday.''
A large number of these came back on-line around 17:00 UTC, McPherson said.
Most likely this happened after ISPs (Internet service providers) that had been knocked off-line had found alternate routes for their traffic.
It's hard to estimate how many Internet users were affected by the cut, but the Internet has a total of close to 300,000 such routes, he said.
This is not the first time this year that these cables have been cut.
Earlier this year both the Sea Me We 4 and Flag cables were cut.
Flag's cable was reportedly cut by ships anchored off the coast of Alexandria, Egypt.
Damaged cables cause internet outages for millions
Up to 70% of communications to the Middle East have been disrupted after cables connecting region to Europe were damaged 
Millions of web users across the Middle East are struggling to get online after damage to undersea cables connecting Europe, Africa and Asia took down a major route for internet traffic.
As much as 70% of internet traffic and telephone communications between the continents has been affected by the outage.
It is believed to have been caused by damage to a string of cables which run on the bed of the Mediterranean Sea between Italy and Egypt, connecting Europe with other parts of the world.
The lines, which run hit the Egyptian coast at Alexandria and go on to connect to Asia, are responsible for carrying vast amounts of internet traffic and phone calls between different parts of the world.
It remains unclear what precisely what caused the damage, but the Egyptian communications ministry said that ships have already been dispatched to look at the problem - although repairs will take ``several days''.
Jonathan Wright, a director at telecoms company Interoute, said that the outage could have a devastating affect on business and communication around the world.
``The potential impact of an outage of this size cannot be underestimated - it is like severing a major artery,'' he said. 
``Global internet connectivity is reliant on sub-sea cables connecting countries.''
The incident comes less than a year after a similar outage brought a halt to communications between Europe, Africa and Asia.
Those problems were believed to have been caused by ships' anchors ripping through another section of the same cables, but were exacerbated by simultaneous damage in lines through the Middle East.
As many as 75 million people were affected in countries as far apart as India, Egypt and Dubai.
It is not yet clear whether today's outage is the same order of magnitude.
Despite the prevalence of wireless internet and satellite connections, global communications are still largely reliant on the vast webs of fibre optic cables which cover the planet.
The lines, which take years of planning to install, move traffic backwards and forwards across continents.
The cables hit by the latest incident are among the most vital information pipelines linking Europe to the rest of the world - and are responsible for the majority of all connectivity in the Middle East and south Asia.
According to Alan Mauldin, research director of communications analysis company TeleGeography, the succession of problems in the region are only likely to be remedied by a series of new cables which are currently being planned.
``Many new cable systems are slated to enter service between Europe and Egypt in the next few years,'' he said.
Mass Internet outages in Egypt after cables cut
Egypt's communications ministry says Internet cables in the Mediterranean Sea have been cut, causing massive Internet outages.
The ministry says three Internet cables were cut off the coast of Sicily on Friday morning.
Throughout Egypt, the Internet is almost completely down or working sporadically.
The ministry says it will take ``several days'' for cables to be repaired and is trying to switch Egypt's Internet to an alternative route.
It was the second large-scale Internet outage in Egypt this year.
Undersea cables were also damaged in January, causing outages in the Mideast and India.
Yemen and Sudan were also having phone and Internet difficulties Friday because of he cable cut.
Internet, phone traffic badly disrupted
Internet and phone communications between Europe, the Middle East and Asia were severely disrupted on Friday after three undersea cables were damaged in the Mediterranean between Sicily and North Africa.
France Telecom says the cause of the cuts is still unclear, but it's unlikely to have been an attack. 
There may have been an underwater landslip.
The company says most business traffic between Europe and Asia is being rerouted through the United States, but 65% of traffic to India is down, and services to Singapore, Malaysia, Saudi Arabia, Egypt, Taiwan and Pakistan are severely affected.
A ship has been sent to fix the cables but normal service may not be restored till 31 December.
Mideast internet services disrupted
Internet links between Europe, the Middle East and South Asia have been disrupted after undersea cables failed in the Mediterranean.
International telephone and internet services in Egypt were down by 80 percent, in India by 65 percent.
The company managing the cables says a ship is under way to carry out repairs.
France Telecom expects communications will not be fully restored before 31 December.
Severed cable disrupts net access
Internet and phone communications between Europe, the Middle East, and Asia have been seriously disrupted after submarine cables were severed.
It is thought the FLAG FEA, SMW4, and SMW3 lines, near the Alexandria cable station in Egypt, have all been cut.
A fault was also reported on the GO submarine cable 130km off Sicily.
Experts warned that it may be days before the fault is fixed and said the knock on effect could have serious repercussions on regional economies.
Jonathan Wright - director of wholesale products at Interoute which manages part of the optical fibre network - told the BBC that the effects of the break would be felt for many days.
``This will grind economies to a halt for a short space of time,'' he said 
``If you look at, say, local financial markets who trade with European and US markets, the speed at which they get live data will be compromised.''
``If you think how quickly trades can be placed, if they are suffering from bad latency times, then by the time a trade is placed, the market may well have moved on.''
The cause of the break is as yet unknown, although some seismic activity was reported near Malta shortly before the cut was detected.
In a statement released in relation to one of the breaks, France Telecom said: ``The causes of the cut, which is located in the Mediterranean between Sicily and Tunisia, on sections linking Sicily to Egypt, remain unclear.''
The French firm said it was sending a ship out to fix the line between Italy and Egypt, although it could take until 31 December to fully repair the line.
The main damage is to the four submarine cables running across the Mediterranean and through the Suez Canal.
It is thought that 65% of traffic to India was down, while services to Singapore, Malaysia, Saudi Arabia, Egypt, Taiwan and Pakistan have also been severely affected.
Earlier this year, the same line was damaged in the same area - off the Egyptian coast - although only two lines were snapped then.
``We've lost three out of four lines.
If the fourth cable breaks, we're looking at a total blackout in the Middle East,'' said Mr Wright.
``These three circuits account for 90% of the traffic and we're going to see more international phone calls dropping and a huge degradation in the quality of local internet,'' he added.
``Normally you would expect to see one major break per cable per year.
With four you should have an insurance policy.
For this to happen twice in one year, on the same cable, is a serious cause for concern.''
More telecoms disruption between Europe and Asia follows another brak in underwater telephone lines.
10 months after the last event which blocked lines between the two continents, 3 underwater cables were severed on the bottom of the sea ``for unknown reasons'' between Sicily and Tunisia.
France Telecom reported that ``an attack is unlikely''.
The company is sending a repair ship to the location but predicts that there will be problems during Christmas which may last up to the new year.
Business volumes between Europe and Asia have been redirected on trans-oceanic lines to the USA.
At present 65% of traffic with India is offline.
The same goes for 59% of communications with Singapore, 44% with Malaysia, 55% with Saudi Arabia, 52% with Egypt, 39% with Taiwan and 51% with Pakistan.
Undersea cables damage disrupts Internet services in Egypt
Internet services in Egypt have been disrupted due to damage of undersea cables in the Mediterranean Sea, the Egyptian National Telecommunication Regulatory Authority said Friday.
Up to 80 percent of Internet services and call centers in Egypt have been cut after the submarine cables were damaged south of Italy on Friday for unknown reason, said the Egyptian MENA news agency.
The Egyptian side has contacted the international companies running the cables to give a repair report, MENA quoted an official source as saying, adding Internet services in Egypt is expected to improve in 12 hours.
Earlier in the day, Egyptian Minister of Communications and Information Technology Tareq Kamel ordered to set up an operation room to follow up the repair works, which are carried out by an international marine cable repair company.
Egypt is also trying to switch its Internet service to a backup route via southeast Asia and satellite.
Egypt is constructing another undersea cable, namely TE-North, to connect the northern Egyptian port city of Alexandria and the southeastern French city of Marseille, said MENA.
It is the second time in 2008 that Egypt witnessed a large scale Internet services cut due to submarine cable damage.
In January, Internet services and international calls were also partly cut in Egypt, along with a number of countries in the Middle East and south Asia.
In front of his home fans and a national television audience, Tyler Hansbrough became the all-time leading scorer for North Carolina basketball on Thursday in his team's win over Evansville.
Hansbrough needed just nine points in the game to eclipse Phil Ford for the top spot.
He wound up with 20 after surpassing Ford's mark in the first half.
Hansbrough now has 2,301 career points as a Tar Heel.
Hansbrough epitomizes all that is right with college basketball.
He gives his best every night, plays the game right, and has stayed in school for all four years of eligibility.
Amid much speculation about how he will fare in the NBA, Hansbrough has remained focused on the present and is one of the biggest parts of the top team in the country, on what many believe is the best team in recent memory.
UNC is now 10-0, with their closest margin of victory being by 15 points.
Joining events such as the Big Ten/ACC Challenge and the Big 12/Pac 10 Hard-court Series, the SEC and Big East showcased four cross-conference games for the second straight season.
While the SEC stole the show on Tuesday with victories from Vanderbilt and Tennessee, the Big East responded on Thursday with wins from Cincinnati and Louisville.
Cincinnati jumped out to a big 18-point halftime lead over Mississippi State, and fended off a comeback to win 75-63.
The other game was very similar, as Louisville jumped out to a big lead on Mississippi.
Mississippi came all the way back to tie the game in the second half before Louisville ultimately won 77-68.
Mississippi was playing amid some controversy, as head coach Andy Kennedy denied charges of physical assault and racial remarks toward a cab driver.
Several other players had big nights on Thursday in addition to the record-setting night from Hansbrough.
Louisville's Earl Clark finished his team's victory with 25 points and 16 rebounds, both career highs.
Clark actually had 17 points in just over the first eight minutes of the game, accounting for 17 of his team's first 24 points.
Clark's hot start helped Louisville to jump out on Ole Miss by a score of 32-14 midway through the first half.
Cincinnati was led by Deonta Vaughn.
Vaughn finished with 16 points and nine rebounds, scoring 14 in a four-minute stretch that resulted in a 20-2 run to close the half.
Despite Evanville's loss to UNC, one of their players was able to top Hansbrough in the scoring column.
Shy Ely put up 23 points against the Tar Heels.
Ely is a senior hoping to help lead the Purple Aces to the top of the Missouri Valley Conference this season.
Western Kentucky, the same team that has given Louisville its only loss of the season, earned a huge victory in their first conference game of the season by winning on the road against South Alabama.
Western Kentucky and South Alabama have dominated the Sun Belt Conference in recent years, and both made the NCAA tournament last season.
The Hilltoppers were led by 20-point efforts from guards A.J. Slaughter and Orlando Mendez-Valdez.
Three teams went into games on Thursday night trying to earn their first victories of the season.
Congratulations are in order for North Florida, who beat Furman 77-66.
The other two teams were not as fortunate.
North Carolina Central dropped to 0-13 after a 66-51 loss to Winstom-Salem and Texas Southern moved to 0-10 after absorbing a blowout loss to No. 9-ranked Gonzaga.
Hansbrough sets Carolina's career scoring record
Reigning national player of the year Tyler Hansbrough has broken the career scoring record at North Carolina.
The 6-foot-9 senior needed nine points in the top-ranked Tar Heels' game against Evansville on Thursday night to pass Phil Ford for the record.
He tied Ford on a jumper from the left wing with 14:05 left, then set the mark by banking in a turnaround shot with 7:41 left in the first half.
After the record-setting point, officials briefly stopped the game to allow Ford, coach Roy Williams and athletics director Dick Baddour to present Hansbrough with the game ball.
Ford finished his career in 1978 with 2,290 points.
Tyler Hansbrough broke Phil Ford's 30-year hold on the all-time North Carolina scoring record last night with an otherwise routine turnaround shot that never looks pretty with 7:41 left in the 1st half.
Hansbrough's 20 points and the Heels putting away Evansville 91-73 were afterthoughts, the entire night was dedicated to the historic event inside the Dean Smith Center.
The game was stopped following the basket to recognize the achievement, and the celebration continued after the game when Hansbrough addressed the crowd.
UNC officials bottled his tears so that scientists can study their possible healing ability.
Hansbrough breaks UNC scoring record
The Tar Heels and the Purple Aces play a game, but the attention is on record-setting UNC senior Tyler Hansbrough.
Since the day he stepped foot on North Carolina's campus, forward Tyler Hansbrough has been working to diversify his offensive resume by trying to extend his shooting range.
But it seemed appropriate that when it came time to break UNC's three-decades-old career scoring record during the top-ranked Tar Heels' 91-73 basketball victory over Evansville on Thursday night, the senior went back to an old staple: a workmanlike power move.
With 7:42 left in the first half at the Smith Center, Hansbrough muscled around Purple Aces forwards James Haarsma and Pieter van Tongeren to bank in a shot off the glass and score his 10th point of the game and 2,292nd point of his career.
That basket broke the mark of 2,290 that point guard Phil Ford set from 1974 to 1978.
Hansbrough finished with 20 points and now has 2,302 for his career.
``It was very fitting -- three guys on him, he was moving to the basket, kind of off-balance, he banks it in with his soft hands,'' said Gene Hansbrough, who surprised his son by attending the game.
``It was a perfect shot for Tyler to break the record on.''
Point guard Ty Lawson also chipped in 16 points for the Tar Heels (10-0), though coach Roy Williams looked frustrated at times by his team's performance, particularly after Evansville's Shy Ely ended the first half with a dunk.
That led the coach to stomp off the court despite the fact that his team led by 18 points.
The night, however, belonged to Hansbrough, who accepted the game ball and an embrace from Ford, now an assistant coach for the NBA's Charlotte Bobcats, immediately after setting the record.
After the game, Ford pressed his hands together and bowed to the big man at mid-court, congratulating him as fans in the sellout crowd -- some of whom held signs reading ``Phil Ford 2,290'' on one side and ``Tyler 2,291 +'' on the other -- were on their feet for a rousing ovation.
``It's an honor to be compared in the same breath at Tyler,'' Ford said later.
``When I see how hard he plays, and how he listens to Coach Williams -- as a player, that's why I tried to do.''
Then Hansbrough -- who followed his record-breaking bucket with a missed dunk attempt that probably will make the team blooper reel -- choked up as he watched a montage of current and former players congratulate him on the accomplishment.
``I got a little emotional, because you may not know all those guys [in the video], but you've got a connection, because you played here and you're part of something that I consider a family,'' he said.
Hansbrough, who also grabbed nine rebounds, had already secured his place in Tar Heels history -- and in the retired jersey portion of the Smith Center rafters, near Ford -- by earning consensus national player-of-the-year honors last season.
Breaking such a long-standing record adds to his still-blooming legend.
Ford passed the likes of Lennie Rosenbluth, Charles Scott and Larry Miller because they could play varsity basketball for only three years. 
Antawn Jamison, Michael Jordan and Rashad McCants failed to pass Ford because they stayed just three seasons.
Then came Hansbrough, the sometimes awkward-looking big man from Poplar Bluff, Mo., who opted to forgo going to the NBA after his freshman, sophomore and junior seasons in order to try to win an NCAA title.
Although he said he was a little nervous straying from the lane his rookie season, he actually scored his first Tar Heels bucket on Nov. 19, 2005, when he led a three-on-two fast break against Gardner-Webb that finished with his jump shot in the lane.
And he has barely slowed since, topping UNC's chart for all-time free-throw attempts -- he passed the 1,000 mark Thursday night -- en route to his latest record.
``I wanted it on a 3,'' Hansbrough said of the record-setting bucket, ``but in a game, I realize you have to do what you have to do.''
Which in his case, means playing with power and honing his improving finesse.
If he remains healthy, the combination probably will help him become the ACC's all-time leading scorer, as well.
Former Duke star J.J. Redick holds that mark with 2,769 points.
``I don't put anything past Tyler.
If somebody tells me he's going to break the NBA scoring record -- boy, that's going to be hard -- but you never say never when it comes to Tyler,'' Gene Hansbrough said.
``He's got a strong will.''
Danny Green (14 points) became the 61st player in UNC history to score 1,000 points when he buried a 3-pointer in the second half.
The historical record will show that with 7:42 remaining in the first half against Evansville's Purple Aces, Tyler Hansbrough became UNC's all-time leading scorer, slipping a screen, fighting through a double-team, and banking in a two-pointer for his tenth point of the game and the 2,292nd point of his career.
The record will show this in no small part because at least 20 sportswriters were diligently typing behind the home basket, writing versions of the same words at the very same moment.
If there was going to be any mistake, it was quickly corrected by Carolina's sports information army, abuzz all evening to ensure the moment was preserved perfectly.
Then there were the photographers, on hand to document each move, each point, each congratulatory handshake.
Beyond them, more than 20,000 witnesses ran their own internal documentary systems, surely thinking about how they'll tell future generations of Tar Heel fans that they were present.
Some might remember the moment coming at 7:41, a tick of a second later than the actual basket, when the game clock was stopped for a tastefully brief ceremony and the obligatory photo op.
Let the record show their memories were wrong, but it won't diminish the telling and retelling until history becomes legend, as it usually does.
Often history happens in quieter places, witnessed by fewer people, not fully appreciated or understood until much later.
But this episode was not left for chance.
It had been anticipated for months, ever since Carolina's lunch-bucket All-American decided to return for his senior season -- not because he cared a lick about breaking Phil Ford's almost 30-year-old record, but because he loves student life on campus, loves basketball, and wanted to keep doing both at the same time as long as possible.
The only hitch in the script was a sore shin and a twisted ankle that deferred the night for a few weeks, into late December, an early Christmas gift to the faithful who filled (well, almost filled) the Smith Center on a misty night.
Everything else followed the script nicely.
ESPN dutifully ensured a national audience would share the moment on television.
Then Hansbrough's father, Gene, made his surprise arrival at a game he wasn't expected to attend.
But how could he miss it, really?
Having nurtured his son's talent and his competitive drive and his character and everything else along the way, history demanded he be in his seat, ready to stand and salute his son as he swallowed down the lump in his throat and expressed his love and thanks.
Evansville proved the story's perfect villain, keeping it close through the early stages, and giving an already charged-up crowd opportunity to boo lustily as the Purple Aces' physical big men knocked Hansbrough to the ground on several occasions.
Didn't they know that's how Hansbrough would have wanted it -- physically challenged, and therefore determined to crush them into submission?
Ford, meanwhile, made a gentlemanly entrance, gracefully shook hands with fans of all ages, posed for pictures, and waited in the wings for history to arrive.
After it did, he was pure class, thanking Roy Williams, Hansbrough, and the university for asking him to be a part of the night.
``It's a dream come true for me,'' he said, sounding genuinely honored to be passing the torch to a player who, like him, gave his best for the program and properly understands that team success, not individual records, are the real measure of success.
Even with the game underway and subject to unpredictable bounces, an official's phantom call, or some other twist of fate, the script held.
The first points came from the foul line, swishing through the basket without a doubt, as they have more often than for any other Carolina player before him.
One reminder of greatness in the books.
The next points rapidly followed on a series of jumpers, well beyond the range of anything doubters expected the brawling forward to hit on a regular basis when he was a freshman.
``I'll prove you wrong,'' you could almost hear him thinking as he hit each one, showcasing the senior's evolution into a complete player.
Another reminder: players like this come along only once in a generation.
Then there was the struggle, as teammates worked to get him the ball in scoring position.
Having told everyone he wanted to break the record on a three, he camped out on the wing for one possession but failed to get a touch.
On another, he posted hard inside as Danny Green took and missed an open three;
as the Heels ran to the other end, Williams appeared to holler at Green for failing to look inside first.
On this night, with history looming, even good quality shots needed to wait for the moment.
But the struggle was needed, too.
Hasn't that been the essence of Carolina's working-class hero: the battler, scrapping for everything, finding success as much through passion as through athletic ability or skill?
It took will -- and a brief stint on the bench -- before the moment came.
Then, sure as sure, it did.
Because it did, a number of things will be quickly forgotten.
Though Tywon Lawson had another dominant performance and Danny Green (who broke a milestone of his own with his 1,000th career point) showcased the increasingly confident game that makes his summer draft experiment seem less surprising, the Tar Heels grinded their way through a game with 16 turnovers -- two more than Evansville -- and only 17 assists.
Deon Thompson never established a rhythm, taken out of his finesse game by the Purple Aces' physical style.
Early in the second half, Williams yanked out all five starters and replaced them with a Blue Team, unhappy with the focus and effort.
And Wayne Ellington's shooting slump continued, his normally perfect stroke disconcertingly slow to return from the finals break.
It was another double-digit win, and against a quality mid-major opponent, but a work of art it wasn't.
Hansbrough, who looked as though he was pressing all night despite finishing with another 20-point, 9-rebound performance, admitted to the nerves.
They were particularly evident on his next touch after the record-breaking points, when Hansbrough stole an inbounds pass, only to brick a dunk attempt off the back of the rim -- another moment that will probably be erased as history gives way to legend.
``I felt like there was a lot of pressure,'' he said.
``I didn't want to strictly focus on the scoring record.
We had a game and I was trying to do whatever I could to help the team.
Now I'm glad it's over, and I'm ready to move on.''
Williams agreed.
``I said, ``I'm glad we got that behind us, now let's focus on playing better, and let's focus on guarding somebody.''
I don't look up at the scoreboard, but it was the first time that I can ever remember counting points in my head.
So when [the shot] goes in, it was immediately a feeling of elation, and [then] a feeling of relief that we got that out of the way.''
Danny Green acknowledged the team was ready to move on as well.
``Yeah, definitely,'' he said.
``The one record we want to break is the winning record, going undefeated for an entire season and hopefully getting a national championship.
That's the record I want to achieve.''
History will remember this night, the emotions of the tribute video that followed the game, and the warmth of the celebratory laughter in the media room.
But in the locker room, business remained.
And in a brief quote that will probably be lost to memory, Phil Ford told the real story of the night in words that will echo until winter turns to spring.
``When I was coach here, if we didn't make the Final Four, it was a bad season,'' he said.
``And now, this guy,'' he continued, looking to Hansbrough,'' if he doesn't win a national title, he has a bad season.''
Hansbrough didn't flinch, but the eyes flashed with recognition.
The record is set, but history is still waiting.
Hansbrough broke Ford's all-time scoring record at North Carolina during the game.
A captive audience that included an emotional Tyler Hansbrough watched intently as the Smith Center video boards mixed in congratulatory remarks with the collection of memorable plays.
The accompanying music: O.A.R. hit ``Shattered.''
Hansbrough, North Carolina's new career scoring leader, approached midcourt when the song ended. UNC legend Phil Ford bowed before him.
Hansbrough passed Ford for the top spot in school history while posting 20 points in the top-ranked Tar Heels' 91-73 victory against Evansville on Thursday night.
Hansbrough entered the game with 2,282 points, eight fewer than Ford's total from 1974-78.
He broke the record when he posted up on the right block, spun toward the middle of the lane and banked in an off-balanced shot over James Haarsma with 7:42 remaining in the first half.
Hansbrough missed a dunk 23 seconds later with UNC leading 24-20, and the Tar Heels (10-0) took control with a 19-4 run.
``I'm usually not nervous before games, and I was a little nervous before tonight just because I felt like there was a lot of pressure,'' Hansbrough said.
``One thing for me, I didn't want to strictly focus on trying to break a scoring record.
We had a game, and I was trying to do whatever I could to help the team.
``Whenever it did happen, I was thrilled and excited it was over.
Also, I felt very honored.''
Officials stopped the game when Hansbrough, who now has 2,302 points, made the record-setting basket. Ford, an assistant coach with the Charlotte Bobcats, was posing for a courtside picture with two UNC students when the ball went through the net.
Ford, coach Roy Williams and director of athletics Dick Baddour presented Hansbrough with the gameball during the brief stoppage in play.
``It's an honor to be compared in the same breath with Tyler,'' Ford said.
``When I look at how hard he plays and how he listens to Coach Williams, as a player, that's what I tried to do.
As a player I wouldn't outrun a lot of people or outjump a lot of people - I was extremely quick, I will say that.
``The only thing I had going for me is I played for a great coach who brought out the best abilities in the things I could do.
I think that's what Tyler does.''
The postgame ceremony featured comments from Williams, strength and conditioning coach Jonas Sahratian, Brendan Haywood, Marvin Williams, Raymond Felton, Antawn Jamison, Marcus Ginyard and Bobby Frasor.
It also included clips of Hansbrough's dunk over 7-foot-7 Kenny George, his buzzer-beating shot against Virginia Tech in the 2008 ACC Tournament and his game-clinching 3-pointer at Duke as a freshman.
Ford made a favorable impression early in his UNC career at an unlikely sight: the Fetzer Field track.
Roy Williams recalled the effort Ford put forth to complete the team's mile run in a predetermined amount of time.
``The coaches are counting out the time as Phil Ford comes in there, and he dove across the line at Fetzer on the asphalt track,'' Williams said.
``Tyler Hansbrough would have done that.
``That, to me, is one of the most special things.
Phil Ford is one of the greatest competitors I've ever seen, and Tyler Hansbrough is also.
There's not a lot of people in that classroom.''
Hansbrough, like Ford, declined an opportunity to leave school for the NBA following his junior season.
The fun of college is one reason Hansbrough, who's on pace to take over the ACC career scoring mark currently held by Duke alum J.J. Redick, returned to UNC.
The Tar Heels are favored to win the national championship, but the pursuit of a title isn't always serious business even if Hansbrough's interaction with teammates such as Larry Drew suggests otherwise.
``There was a lot of hype around this game, but before the game the whole team is around playing Xbox and 'Mortal Kombat,''' Frasor said.
``He's getting into it, calling Larry a cheater.
Stuff like that you wouldn't get at a professional level.''
Top-ranked North Carolina waited for Tyler Hansbrough to make history, then cruised to its latest lopsided victory.
Hansbrough scored 20 points last night to break the storied program's career scoring record and help the Tar Heels (10-0) remain unbeaten with a 91-73 victory over visiting Evansville (7-2).
The reigning National Player of the Year passed Phil Ford for the record midway through the first half.
Ford, now an assistant coach to fellow Tar Heel alumnus Larry Brown with the NBA Charlotte Bobcats, finished his career in 1978 with 2,290 points.
As soon as the record-setting shot went through the net, officials briefly stopped the game to allow Ford, coach Roy Williams and athletic director Dick Baddour to present Hansbrough with the game ball.
``I never dreamed I'd be here and be the all-time leading scorer,'' Hansbrough said as he stood alone at midcourt after the game.
``This is a great honor to be here and to represent you guys every night in this uniform.''
Shy Ely scored 23 points for the Purple Aces.
Tyler Hansbrough scored 20 Thursday night to break North Carolina's career scoring record and help the No. 1 Tar Heels remain unbeaten with a 91-73 victory over Evansville in Chapel Hill, N.C.
The reigning national player of the year finished 7-for-14 from the field and had nine rebounds for North Carolina (10-0), which shook off a slow start and stretched the lead to double figures shortly after Hansbrough passed Phil Ford for the record midway through the first half.
Ford, now an assistant coach to Larry Brown with the NBA's Charlotte Bobcats, finished his career in 1978 with 2,290 points.
Hansbrough, who came back for his senior season after being crowned the National Player of the Year, moved into the top spot with a tough leaner in the lane with two Evansville defenders hanging on him with 7:42 left in the first half
Jon Scheyer and Kyle Singler each logged 22 points, as the second-ranked Duke Blue Devils fended off a late Davidson rally to top the Wildcats, 79-67, at Cameron Indoor Stadium.
Scheyer also dished out four assists while Singler added six rebounds for Duke (13-1), which won its fifth straight game and moved to 9-0 at home.
Gerald Henderson contributed 11 points and seven boards to the winning effort.
The nation's leading scorer, Stephen Curry, posted a game-high 29 points to go with eight rebounds and six assists.
But the sharpshooter went just 1-for-8 from three-point range and had seven of Davidson's 17 turnovers in the loss.
Andrew Lovedale finished with 15 points while pulling down seven boards for the Wildcats (10-3), whose three losses this season have all come against ranked opponents.
Tyler Hansbrough had 24 points and seven rebounds in a balanced attack, and the third-ranked North Carolina Tar Heels bounced back from their first loss with a 108-70 rout of the College of Charleston Cougars.
Deon Thompson had 15 points for the Tar Heels (14-1), who were beaten at home by Boston College, 85-78, on Sunday.
Danny Green scored 14 points, while Ty Lawson posted 15 points and eight assists in the win.
Wayne Ellington contributed 10 points for North Carolina.
Tony White, Jr. had a team-high 16 points for the College of Charleston (10-3), which has lost two straight after a 10-game win streak.
Antwaine Wiggins and Donavan Monroe each had 12 points in the loss.
Andy Rautins scored 17 points and added six assists, leading 11th-ranked Syracuse to an 85-68 win over DePaul at the Carrier Dome.
Arinze Onuaku totaled 14 points and 12 rebounds for the Orange (15-1, 3-0 Big East), who have won six in a row since falling to Cleveland State on December 15.
Paul Harris finished with 14 points, nine boards and four blocks, while Eric Devendorf chipped in 13 points.
Dar Tucker poured in 18 points for the Blue Demons (8-8, 0-3), who have dropped four of their last five games.
Will Walker netted 13 points and Mac Koshwal pulled down 13 rebounds to go along with a 12-point effort.
Matt Bouldin scored 26 points, as Gonzaga dominated overtime to record an 89-79 win over 15th-ranked Tennessee, snapping the Volunteers' 37-game home winning streak. 
Wednesday's matchup was the second meeting between the schools this season, as Gonzaga also beat Tennessee, 83-74, in the title game of the Old Spice Classic on November 30th.
As for the Vols' home winning streak, the 37 games are a school record and it had been the second-longest active streak in the nation -- second only to Notre Dame's 44.
Austin Daye finished with 20 points and eight rebounds for Gonzaga (9-4), which snapped a three-game losing streak.
Josh Heytvelt added 15 points and 12 boards in the win for the Bulldogs.
Cameron Tatum had 22 points to pace Tennessee (9-4), which has lost two in a row.
Tyler Smith added 17 points for the Vols before appearing to suffer a left knee injury late in overtime.
Wayne Chism had a career-high 19 boards and 15 points in the loss.
Jeremy Lin posted a game-high 27 points with eight assists, as Harvard shocked 17th-ranked Boston College, 82-70, at Conte Forum.
Oliver McNally had 17 points, including a 10-for-11 mark from the foul line, for the Crimson (8-6), who recorded their first-ever win over a ranked team.
Andrew Pusar added 13, while Doug Miller scored eight points with nine boards.
Corey Raji posted 16 points for the Eagles (13-3), who had won 10 consecutive games, including an 85-78 shocker at then-No. 1 North Carolina on Sunday.
Tyrese Rice added 14 points, and Joe Trapani had 12 in a surprising setback.
Wesley Matthews posted a game-high 23 points thanks to perfect 10-for-10 shooting from the floor, with a team-best six rebounds as 18th-ranked Marquette slipped by Rutgers, 81-76, at the RAC.
Jerel McNeal posted 16 points for the Golden Eagles (14-2, 3-0 Big East), winners in six straight games. Dominic James added 15 points with six assists.
Mike Rosario scored 22 points for the Scarlet Knights (9-7, 0-3), who dropped their fourth in a row, all to ranked opponents.
Corey Chandler chipped in with 19 points and seven boards while JR Inman posted a game-high eight rebounds in the loss.
Earl Clark finished with 22 points and nine rebounds, as 23rd-ranked Louisville opened its Big East slate with a 71-57 win over South Florida.
Edgar Sosa added 12 points for the Cardinals (10-3, 1-0 Big East), who have won two in a row since a loss to UNLV on New Year's Eve.
Louisville had opened Big East play with a loss in each of the past four seasons, but this season began league play with a road win.
However, the Cardinals did so against the only team in the Big East -- which has nine teams ranked in the AP Top 25 -- with a losing record.
South Florida (5-9, 0-2) has lost four of its last five games overall, and two in a row, after opening its Big East schedule last Friday with a loss to Syracuse.
Dominique Jones had 11 points and five boards in the loss for the Bulls, while Augustus Gilchrist also chipped in 11 points.
Hansbrough Sets Scoring Record in Victory
Top-ranked North Carolina waited for Tyler Hansbrough to make history, then cruised to its latest lopsided victory.
Hansbrough scored 20 points Thursday night, breaking North Carolina's career scoring record, and the Tar Heels beat visiting Evansville, 91-73.
Hansbrough, the reigning national player of the year, passed Phil Ford for the record midway through the first half.
Ford finished his career in 1978 with 2,290 points. 
Hansbrough now has 2,301.
Hansbrough needed 9 points coming in and set the record with a bank shot over two defenders with 7 minutes 41 seconds to go.
After the game, the university showed a video montage of Hansbrough's career highlights, and he briefly addressed the crowd.
``I never dreamed I'd be here and be the all-time leading scorer, ``Hansbrough said as he stood alone at midcourt.
``This is a great honor to be here and to represent you guys every night in this uniform.''
Ty Lawson added 16 points for the Tar Heels, and Danny Green had 14, including the 1,000th of his career.
Shy Ely had 23 points for the Purple Aces (7-2).
Tyler Hansbrough scored 20 points to break North Carolina's career scoring record and help the top-ranked Tar Heels remain unbeaten with a 91-73 victory over Evansville on Thursday night.
The reigning national player of the year finished 7-for-14 from the field and had nine rebounds for North Carolina (10-0), which shook off a slow start and stretched the lead to double figures shortly after Hansbrough passed Phil Ford for the record midway through the first half.
Ford, now an assistant coach with the NBA's Charlotte Bobcats, finished his career in 1978 with 2,290 points.
Hansbrough, who needed nine points coming in, tied Ford on a jumper from the left wing with 14:05 left in the first half.
He set the record by muscling in a bank shot over two defenders with 7:41 to go.
Ty Lawson added 16 points for the Tar Heels, while Danny Green had 14, including the 1,000th of his career.
Shy Ely scored 23 points for the Purple Aces (7-2).
Hansbrough broke UNC's career scoring record the Carolina way
During the spring of 1977, North Carolina coach Dean Smith invited his star guard Phil Ford, who had just completed his junior season, into his office.
Smith told Ford that he had done some research on where Ford would be selected in the upcoming NBA draft. Based on that information, he recommended to Ford that he leave school.
Ford didn't even have to think about it.
He told Smith right away that he wasn't interested.
``At the time, a lot of people weren't doing that, so going pro wasn't something I had even considered at all,'' Ford says.
``The financial situation was different back then as well.
At the time, my parents were teachers, so getting my degree was very important to me.
The opportunity wasn't worth me not getting my degree.''
Last April, Tyler Hansbrough faced a similar decision, but under much different circumstances.
Hansbrough plays in an era when not only is it common for undergraduates to turn pro, but in some circles a player is considered a failure if he stays past his junior year.
Needless to say, he faced a financial opportunity much greater than the one Ford confronted three decades ago.
Hansbrough spent two full weeks torturing himself over the impending decision.
When Hansbrough finally told Roy Williams he wanted to return for his senior year, he felt like the weight of the world was off his shoulders.
He was so relieved that he didn't even leave the weight room when Williams asked him to come to his office so they could craft a press release.
``It was a stressful process,'' Hansbrough said in mid-October.
``You're thinking about what you're going to do with the rest of your life.
Every time I thought about leaving, I thought about how much I'd miss coming home, living with my teammates and doing a lot of the fun things we do.
I just felt like coming back would be the best situation for me.''
In considering that life decision, it's doubtful Hansbrough gave much thought to the chance he would have to become North Carolina's alltime scoring leader if he returned.
Still, given the century's worth of tradition that has reigned in Chapel Hill, it was no small feat that Hansbrough accomplished Thursday night, when he broke Ford's school career scoring mark with less than eight minutes to play in the first half of North Carolina's game against Evansville
North Carolina has established itself as the gold standard of college basketball, and in the soft-spoken, hard-charging, 6-foot-9 power forward from Poplar Bluff, Missouri, this proud program has a worthy standard bearer.
Ford is correct when he says that people aren't appreciative enough of Hansbrough's skills, but there is no doubt that what sets this young man apart is the intensity with which he plays.
If Ford was a classical symphony, Hansbrough is a heavy metal rock concert, powering, jostling, banging, and always, always out-hustling his opponent en route to the basket.
It is instructive that while Hansbrough remains ninth on the ACC's alltime scoring list, he is already the league's career leader in free throws attempted.
If he stays healthy, he will likely leave North Carolina as the school's alltime rebounds king.
More than anything, though, Tyler Hansbrough deserves this record because he came back to school.
This is not to disparage players like Michael Jordan, Antawn Jamison and Rashad McCants who might have had a shot at Ford's mark had they stayed.
But at a place like North Carolina, which embodies team play, the scoring record should belong to a four-year player.
Hansbrough would probably not have been a top-five draft pick had he left, but it's unlikely he will signifcantly improve his draft status by playing another year.
Also, at the time Hansbrough made his decision he was assuming that at least one of his fellow undergraduates, and as many as three of them, would be turning pro, diminishing the Tar Heels' chances of winning a championship.
Hansbrough came back anyway, and for all the right reasons.
Ford also points out that because freshmen were not eligible to play varsity ball from 1954-73, a huge swath of mega talents who suited up for UNC didn't have the chance to hold onto this record -- including the man Ford passed, Lenny Rosenbluth, who still holds the school's record for career scoring average (26.9) and is fourth in points scored.
Hansbrough is sixth on the school's career scoring average list at 20.2.
Still, it takes a special individual to eclipse a record that has stood at a place like North Carolina for 30 years.
Ford remembers little about the night he passed Rosenbluth.
He believes he broke the record late in the first half, the game was not interrupted, and neither he nor Rosenbluth had much to say about it.
In fact, Rosenbluth wasn't even there that night.
When I asked Ford if he still has the game ball, he said he thought he might, but he has moved so much in recent years (he worked as an assistant coach for the Detroit Pistons and New York Knicks before joining the Charlotte Bobcats last year) that he thinks the ball may be packed away somewhere.
``To be honest, I was just happy to get it over with,'' Ford says.
``I didn't want anything distracting from the team.''
If the circumstances were different than they were in 1978, the central tenets of the Carolina Way have endured, from Rosenbluth to Ford to Hansbrough.
While offering his congratulations to Hansbrough, Ford is quick to add that the career scoring record is the least important mark at North Carolina.
``We never cared who scored the ball,'' he says, ``as long as someone with the Carolina jersey got the ball in the basket.''
Tyler Hansbrough would be the first to agree, even as he jostles and bangs his way towards history.
Hansbrough breaks 30-year-old UNC scoring mark
Forward Tyler Hansbrough broke North Carolina's all-time scoring record in Thursday's game against Evansville.
Phil Ford's school mark of 2,290 points set in 1978 held strong amongst a plethora of talented Tar Heels over the years, but Hansbrough, who came back for his senior season after being crowned the National Player of the Year, moved into the top spot with a tough leaner in the lane with two Purple Aces defenders hanging on him with 7:42 left in the first half.
The game was stopped and Ford was on hand to congratulate Hansbrough at half-court.
The Missouri native suffered through a shin injury earlier in the season that forced him to miss four games.
In the five games he played before Thursday's action, Hansbrough averaged a team-high 22.8 points to go with 7.2 rebounds.
In 113 career games prior to Thursday, the forward has logged 20.2 points and 8.6 rebounds in just under 31 minutes an outing, while doing a lot of damage at the free throw line with nearly nine attempts per game.
Hansbrough, who has an outside shot at edging Duke great J.J. Redick for the all-time ACC scoring record (2,769 points), has succeeded in just about every statistical category, though he is still searching for the elusive fifth national title for the program, which moved to 10-0 after its 91-73 drubbing of Evansville.
Hansbrough finished the game with 20 points and nine rebounds.
Hansbrough breaks UNC career scoring record
Phil Ford stood at midcourt, waiting for Tyler Hansbrough to take the microphone and address the home crowd.
As the reigning national player of the year walked up, Ford playfully bowed in reverence before giving him a hug.
Now even the famed point guard who flawlessly ran Dean Smith's ``Four Corners'' offense is looking up at Hansbrough as the storied program's all-time leading scorer.
Hansbrough scored 20 points Thursday night to break Ford's 30-year-old mark and help top-ranked North Carolina beat Evansville 91-73, a game that was completely overshadowed by the 6-foot-9 senior's record pursuit.
He needed just nine points coming in, making the record an almost certainty considering that he's failed to reach double figures just six times in his career.
But that didn't mean Hansbrough was oblivious to all the attention about a record that had stood through the careers of names like Michael Jordan, James Worthy and Antawn Jamison.
``I'm usually not nervous before games, and I was a little nervous before tonight just because I felt like there was a lot of pressure,'' said Hansbrough, who sat between Ford and coach Roy Williams during the postgame news conference.
``One thing for me, I didn't want us to strictly focus on trying to break a scoring record.
We had a game and I was trying to do whatever I could to help the team.''
Hansbrough finished 7-for-14 from the field and had nine rebounds for North Carolina (10-0), which shook off a slow start and stretched the lead to double figures against the Purple Aces (7-2) shortly after Hansbrough passed Ford midway through the first half.
Ford, now an assistant coach to fellow Tar Heel alumnus Larry Brown with the NBA's Charlotte Bobcats, finished his career in 1978 with 2,290 points.
``I think everyone who knows me knows how much I love this program and to be a small part of this historic moment for Tyler is a dream come true for me,'' Ford said.
``I wouldn't have missed it for the world.
``It's an honor to be compared in the same breath with Tyler.
When I look at how hard he plays and how he listens to Coach Williams, as a player, that's what I tried to do.''
Hansbrough tied Ford on a jumper from the left wing with 14:05 left in the first half, then set the record by muscling in a bank shot over James Haarsma and Pieter van Tongeren with 7:41 to go.
As soon as the record-setting shot went through the net, officials briefly stopped the game to allow Ford, Williams and athletics director Dick Baddour to present Hansbrough with the game ball.
Students who carried small signs saying ``Phil Ford 2,290'' on one side turned it around to reveal ``Tyler 2,291 +'' on the other.
Hansbrough waved to acknowledge the roaring crowd and handled the historic moment with his typically reserved demeanor, though he seemed eager to get back to the game and away from the focus being on him.
After the game, the school showed a video montage of Hansbrough's career highlights that included congratulations from several former players.
That's when Hansbrough took the microphone from Ford and emotionally addressed the crowd.
``I never dreamed I'd be here and be the all-time leading scorer,'' Hansbrough said as he stood alone at midcourt.
``This is a great honor to be here and to represent you guys every night in this uniform.''
It was a moment that fellow senior and roommate Bobby Frasor said showed how much Hansbrough appreciated the record even though he didn't want to dwell on it in recent days.
``I've never seen him tear up or choke up like that,'' Frasor said.
``But Tyler really does care about all this stuff and he knows what he accomplished is pretty special.''
Still, the Tar Heels seemed a little tight and the home crowd anxious to see Hansbrough set the record early.
But in the minutes afterward, the Tar Heels settled down and outscored Evansville 22-10 the rest of the half to take a 46-28 lead.
It lightened the mood enough that Williams - who said he was counting down a player's points in his head for probably the first time - was able to tease Hansbrough on the bench after he missed a two-handed dunk on his first shot following the record.
``I said, 'Boy, I'm really glad that's not the basket that would've broken the record,''' he said with a laugh.
The Tar Heels maintained a comfortable margin the rest of the way, cracking the 90-point mark for the seventh straight game.
Hansbrough left the game for good with the Tar Heels leading 83-58 with 5:33 to play.
He still has a chance this season to pass Sam Perkins for the program's career rebounding record and break the Atlantic Coast Conference career scoring mark set by Duke's J.J. Redick in 2006.
``Whatever Tyler gets, he deserves,'' Evansville coach Marty Simmons said.
``I've been a big fan of his since he was in high school.
It's good to see guys that work the hardest be rewarded the most.''
Ty Lawson added 16 points for the Tar Heels, while Danny Green had 14, including the 1,000th of his career.
Shy Ely scored 23 points to lead Evansville, which was off to its best start since going 10-1 in 1981-82.
The Purple Aces were playing the No. 1 team for the first time since 1980 and just the third time ever.
Authorities say a 35-year-old New Bedford man stabbed his ex-girlfriend and his own mother to death during a bloodbath inside his mom's apartment and left the bodies to rot for days.
Gary Gomes, 35, was arrested yesterday and will be arraigned today in New Bedford District Court on two counts of murder and one count of kidnapping in connection with the homicides, according to the Bristol District Attorney's Office.
The bodies of Robyn Mendes, 48, Gomes' ex-girlfriend, and Gomes' mother, Catherine Gomes, 61, were found by police and firefighters yesterday in a second-floor apartment on Independent Street, said DA spokesman Gregg Miliote.
Both women had been stabbed to death and their bodies had been there for ``days,'' Miliote said.
Catherine Gomes lived in that apartment, he said.
Police and firefighters were called to the address after neighbors reported a strong smell of natural gas.
A gas stove had been left on and a space heater was running, Miliote said.
Gomes was arrested at a Philip Street apartment yesterday where Mendes lives, Miliote said.
Police say Gomes had allegedly barricaded himself in a room with another person.
Miliote said Gomes was on probation when he was arrested.
The Standard-Times of New Bedford is reporting today that Gomes has a lengthy criminal history.
He had just been released from the Bristol County House of Correction in late 2008 after serving time on a 2006 conviction of assault with intent to murder, the newspaper reported.
Robyn Mendes was the victim in that case.
In 2005, he was charged with assault and battery on Mendes with a dangerous weapon, according to court records, which indicate he grabbed her by the throat, threw her down, then held a knife to her throat and told her, `` You're never going to leave me,'' the newspaper reported.
He was sentenced to 2 years, with 9 months to serve in that case.
A man with a long history of domestic violence has been accused of stabbing his mother and a former girlfriend to death and leaving their bodies in an apartment for several days.
The unlit stove in the Independence Street apartment had been left on full blast, authorities said, filling it with enough natural gas to cause a significant explosion.
The body of Katherine Gomes, 61, and Robyn Norma Mendes, 48, were discovered on Tuesday when police and firefighters responded to calls about the smell of natural gas, according to the Bristol district attorney's office. A space heater had been left turned to high, but it did not ignite the gas.
The man, Gary Gomes, 35, is expected to be arraigned today in New Bedford District Court on two counts of murder and one count of kidnapping.
Gomes was arrested on Tuesday after investigators said they found him barricaded in a room in Mendes's apartment on Philip Street with her 12-year-old daughter.
He was with the girl for at least several hours before police arrived, according to Gregg Miliote, a spokesman for the Bristol district attorney.
Gomes has been incarcerated at least three times for violent crimes against women in the last four years and at one point was held for 90 days without bail as a danger to society, according to court records.
The alleged fatal stabbing would be at least his third attack against Mendes.
In 2005, Gomes was convicted of beating Mendes, holding a knife to her throat, and telling her, ``you're never going to leave me,'' according to court records. 
Gomes served 9 months of a 2-1/2 year sentence.
He was released in 2006 and attacked Mendes again, dragging her into the woods.
Police rescued her with the aid of dogs, according to court records.
Mendes went back to prison for 2-1/2 years and was recently released.
In 2004, Gomes was charged with stealing a $500 guitar from his sister, Jean.
Gomes ran into Jean and his mother a few days later and he attacked his sister, according to court records.
``Defendant became violent and began to choke the victim with both hands around her neck,'' the records state.
The New Bedford man arrested last night on charges of double homicide killed his mother and ex-girlfriend, according to police and prosecutors.
The suspect, Gary Gomes, 35, of New Bedford, has a lengthy record of domestic abuse, including convictions for kidnapping and attempted murder.
He was currently on probation after his latest release from criminal custody.
The victims in the case have been identified as Robyn Mendes, 48 - an ex-girlfriend of Mr. Gomes - and Catherine Gomes, 61, the defendant's mother.
Gregg Milliote, spokesman for the Bristol County District Attorney's Office, said both women were stabbed multiple times at the Independent Street apartment in which they were found.
Ms. Gomes was the tenant at the apartment.
Following his arraignment in New Bedford District Court today, Mr. Gomes was ordered held without bail.
At the arraignment, prosecutor Aaron Strojny said Ms. Mendes was stabbed multiple times while in bed.
``I (heart) you'' was written in blood on the wall and the suspect's ID was found on a pillow, he said, and alleged the suspect later dressed Ms. Mendes and applied makeup.
Ms. Gomes' body was found under a mattress in a different room.
She had last been seen Saturday morning, prosecutors said, and when her employer called the apartment later that day to inquire why she had not reported to work, a man who identified himself as Gary said his mother had gone away for a few days.
Mr. Gomes was found Tuesday night barricaded in a dwelling on Phillips Road in the North End where Ms. Mendes lived.
Ms. Mendes' 12-year-old daughter was also in that dwelling at the time.
Police say Gomes had been at that location for ``a few hours'' before his arrest.
They found a knife, which they identified as the murder weapon, behind a bookshelf.
Mr. Milliote said prosecutors believe Mr. Gomes intended to kill one other person last night, although he wouldn't say who that person was or what evidence led prosecutors to believe that.
Mr. Gomes had been released from the Bristol County House of Correction in late 2008 after serving time on a 2006 conviction of assault with intent to murder.
Ms. Mendes was the victim in that case.
In 2005, he was charged with assault and battery on Ms. Mendes with a dangerous weapon, according to court records, which indicate he grabbed her by the throat, threw her down, then held a knife to her throat and told her, ``You're never going to leave me.''
He was sentenced to 2 1/2 years, with 9 months to serve in that case.
Court records also indicate a previous arrest in which Mr. Gomes was accused of assault and battery on his sister after she accused him of stealing her guitar.
His mother was a witness to that incident.
Ms. Mendes had obtained restraining orders against Mr. Gomes in 2005 and 2006, according to court records.
The victims' bodies were discovered inside the Independent Street apartment Tuesday afternoon after the building's landlord detected the odor of natural gas emanating from the second floor.
Police said that after smelling gas, the landlord, who has not been identified, sent his adult son upstairs to investigate.
The son entered the apartment and found the bodies, police said.
The gas stove was running with no flame, police said, and an electric heater had been turned on in the apartment.
Gary Gomes of New Bedford, Massachusetts, accused in the deaths of two women found in a city apartment, appeared in court today.
Police say the landlord's son found the bodies yesterday after entering the second-floor apartment to investigate an odor of gas.
35-year-old Gomes faces two counts of murder after his mother and his ex-girlfriend were found stabbed to death inside a New Bedford home yesterday afternoon.
Gomes was arrested last night on charges of murder and kidnapping.
61-year-old Kathryn Gomes and 48-year-old Robin Mendes are the victims.
Police believe finding Gomes so quickly may have saved other lives in this case.
A 35-year-old New Bedford man is awaiting a double murder arraignment after police arrested him on charges he killed his mother and ex-girlfriend.
Police have identified the victims as 61-year-old Katherine Gomes, mother of the suspect, and 48-year-old Robyn Mendes.
Gary Gomes was arrested late Tuesday night at 2088 Philip Street.
The D.A.'s office says Gomes was barricaded inside with a third person.
He has been charged with two counts of murder, and one count of kidnapping.
Gomes is scheduled to be arraigned in New Bedford District Court Wednesday.
The bodies of the two women were discovered on the second floor at 24 Independent Street Tuesday afternoon, after someone of the first floor smelled natural gas.
An eyewitness says the gas stove had been turned on.
The deaths of two women found in a New Bedford home on Tuesday have been ruled homicides.
Gary Gomes, 35, of New Bedford pleaded not guilty to two counts of murder and one count of kidnapping. 
He was ordered held without bail and sent to Bridgewater State Hospital for evaluation.
Gomes was found barricaded in a room on Philip Street.
The victims have been identified as Gomes' mother, Katherine, 61, and his former girlfriend, Robyn Mendes, 48.
An odor of natural gas led to the discovery of the bodies in an apartment at 24 Independent Street.
A landlord sent his adult son to an upstairs unit of the multi-family house at about noon on Tuesday.
The man discovered the bodies and called 911.
An arraignment has been scheduled for Wednesday morning for a New Bedford, Massachusetts man accused of murdering two women.
Gary Gomes, 35, will face murder and kidnapping charges after police found the bodies of two women -- 68 and 48-years-old -- inside an Independent Street apartment.
Neighbors had complained about a possible natural gas leak, which led them to the scene.
When police arrested Gomes on Tuesday night, he was barricaded inside the apartment with an unidentified person.
New Bedford Police said they will release more details about the investigation on Wednesday afternoon.
The identities of the victims has not yet been released.
A New Bedford man has been arrested in the slayings of two women whose bodies were found in an apartment after the building's landlord smelled natural gas.
The Bristol District Attorney's office said just after midnight Tuesday that 35-year-old Gary Gomes was arrested at another house where he was found barricaded with a third person.
Gomes faces arraignment in New Bedford District Court on Wednesday morning on two murder charges and one kidnapping charge.
The names of the women killed, who were 61 and 48 years old, have not been released.
Police Lt. Jeffrey Silva said the landlord's son found the bodies after entering the second-floor apartment on Tuesday afternoon to investigate the odor.
District Attorney Sam Sutter is expected to discuss the case at a news conference already planned Wednesday afternoon to discuss developments in a 2003 murder case.
The mother of a 10-year-old girl killed by a stray bullet on an Albany street last year said she heard a loud sound before her daughter cried out ``Mommy, mommy, I've been hit,'' and then stumbled down the steps of their apartment.
Shondell McAllister on Tuesday recalled screaming ``Somebody help me, my daughter's been shot.''
McAllister was the first witness called in the trial of 16-year-old Jermayne Timmons, who is accused of firing the deadly shot from an intersection down the street.
McAllister described to jurors in Albany County Court the hectic scene on May 29 as she lay her daughter, Kathina Thomas, on the sidewalk while she bled from a gunshot wound in her back.
After running to find help, McAllister pushed her way back to Kathina through emergency workers, only to be told her youngest daughter was already dead.
Prosecutor David Rossi said Timmons is charged with intentional murder because he intended to kill someone, although Kathina wasn't the target.
In opening statements Tuesday, public defender Peter Lynch said then-15-year-old Timmons was at the scene of the shooting and had a gun, but isn't the one who fired the fatal shot.
Lynch said his client had a .32-caliber revolver, while autopsy results concluded that Kathina was killed by a .45-caliber bullet.
Timmons, who was arrested 12 days after the shooting, faces a maximum sentence of 15 years to life in prison if convicted.
He's charged with two counts of second-degree murder, one count each of first- and second-degree manslaughter, and criminal possession of a weapon.
According to authorities, the teenager told police he was with a group of people down the street from Kathina's home when they ran into a rival group and Timmons' fired a shot at them.
The bullet missed its intended target and traveled about a block before hitting Kathina.
Timmons told police he fired when he thought he saw someone in the other group reach for a gun.
He said the gun he used was kept hidden under a shed and used by ``everyone in the neighborhood,'' and said he and his friends then rode away on the bikes and he put the gun back.
No gun has been recovered.
Prosecutors are bringing the case against Timmons without a murder weapon, and Rossi noted Tuesday that the gun wasn't available because the defendant had gotten rid of it.
Witnesses for the prosecution said a shell casing found at the intersection where the fatal shot was fired matched the bullet removed from Kathina's body.
Testimony in the murder trial of an Albany teen accused in the shooting death of young Kathina Thomas continued for the second day on Wednesday.
The trial against 16 year-old Jerymayne Timmons started a bit late after one juror was dismissed because of a family medical emergency.
Another delay in the trial was an altercation inside the courtroom.
The Albany County Sheriff's Department arrested one gentleman who refused to leave the courtroom after being asked to.
The man claimed someone had pushed and shoved him inside.
Once the trial resumed, Timmons' 16 year-old best friend took the stand and talked about the community gun described in a police statement.
He said the .32-caliber gun was nicknamed ``Shaq'' referencing the Shaquille O'Neal's jersey number.
While on the stand he told jurors that Timmons had asked him to tell police they were together until about 9 p.m. on the night of the shooting.
The teen did tell police that originally, and later confessed that he had only been playing basketball with him until about 5: 00 on the night of May 29th.
Jurors also heard testimony from a State Police ballistic expert, the emergency room doctor who treated Kathina, and the medical examiner who performed the autopsy.
A key witness against teenage murder suspect Jermayne Timmons identified him Tuesday as the gunman who killed 10-year-old Kathina Thomas in May, then twice admitted he lied in his testimony.
Elijah Coleman, 21, told jurors in Albany County Court he and two acquaintances went to West Hill on May 29 to ``put in some work'' and ``start trouble.''
A member of the trio was shot in the foot by rivals on an earlier occasion, he said.
They rode bikes to First and Judson streets, he testified, and Timmons, now 16, was armed with a .45-caliber handgun he had picked up under a trash can at the Ida Yarbrough apartments in Albany.
After a face-off with some rivals who ``wanted to fight,'' he testified, Timmons pulled the trigger.
``Jermayne fired the shot,'' he said.
Kathina, a Guyana native in Albany less than 16 months, was slain in front of her First Street home, near the corner of North Lake Avenue.
While not disavowing Timmons was the shooter, Coleman then testified that his third friend, whose shooting they were avenging, actually had shot himself in the foot earlier. 
Upon cross-examination, Coleman then gave a second contradiction, saying he had seen - and never had seen - the .45-caliber gun Timmons allegedly was carrying.
``So which is it?'' Deputy Public Defender Peter Lynch asked Coleman, who in turn said he had seen the gun before.
He admitted he was lying.
When asked about the friend being shot in the foot, he then answered, ``I don't know.''
At one point, Lynch asked Coleman, ``You just lied to this jury when you told them that, correct?''
``Yes,'' he responded.
During one of the exchanges, Assistant District Attorney David Rossi asked Coleman, ``Are you gonna switch it every time you're asked the question?''
Coleman also said that he gave false statements before the case went to trial.
He testified Tuesday that he came forward to clear his name in early June, saying he did not shoot the young girl.
Meanwhile, Coleman testified that he believed the defendant's name was ``Jermayne Taylor,'' yet did identify him in court.
When asked by the prosecution to recall what he was asked before coming to court, he responded he said it was to tell the truth.
Rossi laid out the prosecution's case earlier Tuesday in a packed courtroom before Judge Stephen Herrick.
He said Timmons and the two acquaintances rode bikes to an area of West Hill known as ``Little Miami,'' the reason being, ``It's hot - lots of action in that area.
The defendant knew that.''
Rossi said Timmons and his two sidekicks were engaged in a staredown with youths at the corner.
He said Timmons aimed and missed his target, instead striking the 10-year-old girl less than two seconds later.
``As that little girl lay bleeding to death on the sidewalk, this defendant pedaled off and got rid of the evidence,'' Rossi said.
The gun has not been recovered.
Among prosecutors' evidence not yet revealed in court is an alleged statement and apology note Timmons gave police.
Lynch did not deny his client was at First and Judson with a loaded handgun when Kathina died - or that he fired the weapon.
``As that little girl lay bleeding to death on the sidewalk, this defendant pedaled off and got rid of the evidence,'' Rossi said.
The gun has not been recovered.
Among prosecutors' evidence not yet revealed in court is an alleged statement and apology note Timmons gave police.
Lynch did not deny his client was at First and Judson with a loaded handgun when Kathina died - or that he fired the weapon.
He said it was a .32-caliber revolver, not a .45-caliber handgun like the one that killed the girl.
``Because he was there, because he did fire a gun, he's it,'' Lynch said.
``He's the patsy.''
The prosecution's first witness was Kathina's mother, Shondell McAllister, who fought back emotions to recall the night her child died.
She found herself in a crowd that surrounded Kathina outside their home.
McAllister said she had to force her way through the people to speak with authorities as they, too, flooded First Street.
``I said, 'I'm her mother. ...
That's my baby,''' she said.
An official looked at her and said: ``I'm very sorry.
She's dead.''
To which she replied,
``I already know she's dead.''
McAllister explained how she and her four children moved to Albany from Guyana in January 2007 and to First Street in September of that year.
She recalled her daughter being on the front steps with, among others, a 1-year-old baby.
After Kathina was shot, she exclaimed, ``'Mommy, Mommy, I got hit.
Somebody hit me in my back.'''
``I said, 'Oh, my God, somebody help me.
My daughter has been shot.'''
The mother fought tears later Tuesday when images of her daughters post-shooting medical treatment were shown in court.
Several members of the victim's family and that of Timmons were in court to watch the proceedings.
Timmons faces up to 15 years to life if convicted of second-degree murder.
Testimony continues today.
Emotional testimony and at times lies are what jurors heard Tuesday in the trial of Jermayne Timmons, the teen accused of shooting and killing 10-year-old Kathina Thomas last May in Albany.
Prosecutor David Rossi began opening statements, talking about what allegedly led Jermayne Timmons to the West Hill neighborhood on May 29 and what led him to allegedly fire the bullet that struck Kathina Thomas seconds after it was fired from more than a block away.
Rossi telling the 7 woman, 5 man jury, ``As that little girl lay bleeding on the sidewalk, the defendant, Jermayne Timmons, pedaled his bike away and got rid of the evidence.''
He also told the panel that it will not be one witness to make the case, but all of them -- a line whose meaning would soon come into play.
Public defender Peter Lynch admitting that Timmons had a gun but then dropping a bombshell, saying that while this case has many facts not in dispute, ultimately it is undisputed that Kathina Thomas died from a gunshot wound from a .45 caliber ... but Jermayne Timmons had a .32
Peter Lynch/Timmons' Attorney: ``I'm not going to be offering any out-of-court comments on the testimony as we're proceeding.''
Kathina Thomas' mother Shondell McAllister was the first prosecution witness, emotionally describing the shooting scene, and her daughter screaming, ``Mommy, mommy, I got hit.
Something hit me in my back'', then saying ``save me, save me mommy'', while her mother told her to stop talking.
The afternoon session began with two of the witnesses District Attorney David Soares' office has asked the media not to identify by name.
One was with Timmons that night and described him retrieving the so-called community gun and seeing him shoot it, but also admitted that he lied three times to police and also admitted to lying several times in his testimony.
The district attorney says this does not hurt their case.
David Soares/Albany County District Attorney: ``The issues that are in play in the courtroom right now will bear themselves out.
There's a jury that was chosen to listen to the evidence that's presented and they will evaluate the testimony of everyone who takes the stand and testifies.''
The jury also heard the 911 call of the shooting, and heard from police officers who responded to the call, as well as one of the paramedics who treated Kathina.
Last May, a stray bullet killed 10-year-old Kathina Thomas as she played on the front steps of her home on Albany's First Street
Her death sparked outrage, and even prompted the community to come together to get guns off Albany streets.
Now the case is back in the spotlight as the 16-year-old accused of firing the fatal shot, Jermayne Timmons, goes to trial.
More than 100 potential jurors walked into the Albany County Courthouse Monday.
Inside, men and women from all walks of life were slowly eliminated, answering questions such as ``had you heard, seen or read anything about the death of Thomas?''
Such a query would be difficult thing to say ``no'' to, given all the media attention that the 10-year-old's death and Timmons' subsequent arrest brought.
By 5:00pm Monday, selection was winding down for the day as five were already picked for the jury.
Timmons remained at the courthouse along with defense attorney Peter Lynch and Albany County District Attorney Dave Rossi.
``The evidence in this case is gonna' show factually that Jermayne is not the person who caused [Thomas'] death,'' Lynch told local media Monday.
However, Lynch has a tough job ahead of him in proving that his client did not pull the trigger and, in the end, kill Thomas.
This, when police have released an alleged confession from Timmons, and a letter of apology that he is said to have written to the girl's mother that reads, ``I am so sorry that the gun I shot is the gun that could have takeing (sic.) your baby girl away from you,''
King provided an explanation, saying, ``The so-called apology note was posed more in the question of if [Timmons], in some way, could have been responsible, he would have been apologetic for it,''
None of Thomas' family members were present in the courthouse Monday, only Timmons' friends and relatives. 
Also absent were those who are expected to be called on as witnesses.
In an unprecedented move, Albany County Assistant District Attorney Dave Rossi asked the media to keep the identities of certain witnesses quiet.
``If we start seeing names in the paper or on the news on day one, I think it's gonna' make it more difficult for us to have witnesses in the seat on day two, three and four,'' he said.
One of the witnesses that can be talked about is Jermayne Timmons' own mother, who is expected to take the stand.
Jury selection will likely go on until sometime Tuesday.
It was more than seven months ago when that errant bullet killed Kathina Thomas.
The 10-year-old was shot on the night of May 29th while she was playing outside her First Street home.
Less than two weeks later, Jermayne Timmons was arrested and charged with the shooting.
It was discovered shortly after the arrest that Timmons had written an apology letter to the mother of Kathina Thomas, saying the bullet was not meant to hit the girl.
In response to the fallout over Thomas' death, and further gun violence in Albany, District Attorney David Soares announced a gun buyback program in mid-June, offering up gift cards to anyone who brought in a gun.
CNN medical reporter and Grady hospital neurosurgeon Dr. Sanjay Gupta has been approached by the Obama administration to fill the post of U.S. Surgeon General, CNN officials confirmed Tuesday.
I confirmed yesterday that Obama has offered the job and that Gupta had all but officially accepted.
Got it up on the Web site at 2:36 p.m., mere moments after filing the story.
Cyberspeed comes in handy sometimes.
CNN, where I host a weekly program, didn't report it until 3:59, but the blogs went crazy--lead story on HuffPost, top of Drudge's page, then the NYT and others.
Gupta wouldn't comment to me--while not denying the story--but confirmed on his Twitter feed that he ``has been approached by the Obama administration about the U.S. surgeon general's post.''
Everyone's digital these days.
It's interesting that Obama was so intent on recruiting him that he met with the ``House Call'' host for 2 1/2 hours on Nov. 25.
He seems to want an administration of stars in the Hillary mode.
Gupta doesn't have a Panetta problem--he operates inside people's heads, after all--and has always been drawn to health policy, since a stint in the Clinton White House.
Dr. Sanjay Gupta, a neurosurgeon and chief medical correspondent for CNN, has been offered the post of Surgeon General by President-elect Barack Obama, according to sources.
Gupta, 39, has reportedly accepted the job, according to the Washington Post, and is already working out the details of moving his family from Atlanta to Washington.
Barack Obama has asked the CNN medical correspondent Dr Sanjay Gupta to join his fledgling administration as the US surgeon general, according to reports.
According to washingtonpost.com, the 39-year-old doctor is ``the Obama team's first choice'' to become America's most senior public health official.
Although Gupta has not commented on the matter, the Post claims that he wants the job and is undergoing final vetting.
CNN has confirmed Gupta has been approached by the president-elect's transition team.
Barack Obama to Name Dr. Sanjay Gupta Surgeon General: Onion headline or actual news?
According to The Washington Post's Howard Kurtz, it's fact, and as long as the CNN doc can accustom himself to making White House money rather than cable-news money, he's expected to accept.
President-elect Barack Obama's reported choice for surgeon general, CNN medical correspondent Sanjay Gupta, could bring a dose of star power to a job that hasn't had that much clout in decades.
Dr. Sanjay Gupta, a neurosurgeon and CNN's chief medical reporter, is the leading contender to become the next surgeon general, a pick that will give the moribund office a higher profile but one that has received a mixed reaction among public health advocates.
President-elect Barack Obama has asked neurosurgeon and CNN medical correspondent Dr. Sanjay Gupta to be U.S. surgeon general, a senior Democrat said on Tuesday.
Gupta has been ``the Obama team's first choice'' for the job, which would make the TV personality America's top doctor, said the Democrat who is familiar with efforts by Obama to staff his pending administration.
The Washington Post's online service, washingtonpost.com, first reported that Gupta had been offered the job, traditionally the U.S. top spokesman on matters of public health.
In a rich and symbolic recognition to India's sterling contribution to the US health care system, the US President-elect has asked Dr Sanjay Gupta, CNN's well-known medical correspondent and a neuro-surgeon of repute to be the country's surgeon general.
News that Barack Obama may name Dr. Sanjay Gupta of Emory University and CNN as his Surgeon General has caused a spasm of celebrity reporting.
Reports that President-elect Barack Obama had approached CNN's medical correspondent, Dr. Sanjay Gupta, to be the next Surgeon General inspired a parlor game among people who have too much free time (a k a media types):
Like you, I did a Scooby-Doo (or was it Astro?) ``whuuuuhhh??'' double-take when I spotted Sanjay Gupta's smiling mug on a cable news channel not named CNN yesterday, being mentioned as a candidate -- the leading one, we must assume -- for U.S. Surgeon General.
CNN's management confirmed yesterday that Dr Gupta had been approached by the Obama team.
CNN management said: ``Since first learning that Dr Gupta was under consideration for the surgeon-general position, CNN has made sure his on-air reporting has been on health and wellness matters and not on healthcare policy or any matters involving the new administration.''
U.S. president-elect Barack Obama has asked neurosurgeon Sanjay Gupta, CNN's chief medical correspondent, to serve as the country's surgeon general, CNN reported Tuesday.
CNN reporter Sanjay Gupta, a neurosurgeon who is among the nation's best-known physicians, is under serious consideration to be the next surgeon general, Democratic and network officials said Tuesday.
So in choosing Gupta, the TV star and neurosurgeon, President-elect Barack Obama seems to be reaching back to the era when C. Everett Koop was the straight-talking surgeon general advocating for the public's health.
As the WSJ notes, Gupta as a journalist is already a public figure who informs the nation about health.
Since CNN learned of Gupta's candidacy, the cable network has made sure his on-air reporting hasn't touched health-care policy or other subjects involving the new administration, the WSJ reports.
Chargers WR Jackson will play vs. Steelers
An arrest for suspicion of driving under the influence will not affect the playing status of San Diego Chargers wide receiver Vincent Jackson for Sunday's divisional playoff game at Pittsburgh.
Jackson was arrested on the DUI charge early Tuesday morning by the California Highway Patrol.
However, the fourth-year wide receiver likely will not face disciplinary action until the 2009 season.
An NFL spokesman on Wednesday said the league will await a determination by the court before considering disciplinary action against Jackson.
Along with the misdemeanor DUI allegation, California Highway Patrol Officer Brad Baehr said Jackson was cited for driving on probation for a prior DUI.
Jackson issued a statement released through the team.
``I was stopped by an officer,'' he said.
``I don't think any charges will be filed as a result of the stop.
In the event they are, I look forward to clearing my name and proving my innocence.''
Baehr said he was not aware of the particulars of the previous DUI charge and that results of Jackson's blood test are pending.
Jackson had his finest season in 2008 with with 59 receptions for 1,098 yards and seven touchdowns for the AFC West champions.
``We're aware of the off-the-field issue involving Vincent,'' team general manager A.J. Smith said in a statement.
``Obviously we're disappointed.
We take these issues very seriously.
Moving forward, we will monitor the situation and have no further comment.''
Chargers' Jackson arrested on suspicion of DUI 
But after being arrested for suspicion DUI earlier this week, he has bigger worries than his role in the Chargers' offense.
10News in San Diego is reporting that Jackson was arrested by the California Highway Patrol early Tuesday morning after failing sobriety tests.
CHP Officer Brad Baehr said Jackson was on probation for a previous DUI arrest.
The Chargers will not discipline Jackson at this time, but it's almost a guarantee that the NFL will step in and suspend him for several games at the start of this season.
However, unless you hear otherwise, Jackson will be playing in this week's divisional playoff at Pittsburgh.
Those in postseason leagues (like our SalCap game or our 3-for-All game ) should avoid Jackson, but not just because of his recent troubles with the law.
He was held without a catch for the second time all year last week, and this week he faces Pittsburgh's top-ranked pass defense (156.9 yards allowed per game).
In San Diego's first meeting with the Steelers this season, Jackson was held to just two catches for 25 yards.
Jackson's recent run-in with the law effectively puts an end to his keeper value for next season.
Jackson arrested on DUI charge
Despite his arrest on suspicion of driving under the influence early yesterday, Chargers receiver Vincent Jackson will play in Sunday's AFC divisional playoff game at Pittsburgh.
Jackson, 25, was driving east on state Route 52 near Interstate 805 just after 2:30 a.m. when he was pulled over for an observed traffic violation, California Highway Patrol Officer Brad Baehr said.
Jackson faces the misdemeanor DUI allegation as well as charges that he was driving on probation for a prior DUI in June 2006, Baehr said.
The results of a blood test are pending.
Jackson proffered his innocence in a statement released yesterday afternoon.
``This morning I was stopped by an officer,'' Jackson said in the statement.
``I don't think any charges will be filed as a result of the stop.
In the event they are, I look forward to clearing my name and proving my innocence.''
The arrest will not affect Jackson's status for Sunday's game.
The NFL's collective bargaining agreement gives the league, not teams, authority to punish players for alcohol and substance abuses.
Any discipline by the league would be meted out for the 2009 season, several sources said.
A suspension certainly is possible.
The NFL's substance-abuse policy states: ``Discipline for a second or subsequent offense is likely to be a suspension, the duration of which may escalate for repeat offenses.''
Jared Allen, then with Kansas City, was suspended for the first four games of the 2007 season after being charged with DUI twice in one year.
The NFL later reduced his suspension to two games.
Chargers players had the day off yesterday.
General Manager A.J. Smith issued the following statement on Jackson's arrest:
``We're aware of the off-the-field issue involving Vincent.
Obviously, we're disappointed.
We take these issues very seriously.
Moving forward, we will monitor the situation and have no further comment.''
Jackson was driving a 2008 GMC Sierra registered to him, Baehr said.
He was booked into county jail and was released by 6 a.m., Baehr said.
Jackson, in his fourth season, caught a career-high 59 passes and led the team with 1,098 yards, also a career high.
His seven receiving touchdowns were also a career best and second on the team.
Earlier this week, Smith called Jackson a ``true professional'' and ``ultimate team player'' for how hard Jackson played even while not catching any passes.
``You win championships with players like Vincent Jackson,'' Smith said.
The general manager has put an emphasis on character and avoiding off-the-field issues.
The Chargers have not had any arrests become public this season and have been relatively trouble-free in recent years.
In 2006, linebacker Steve Foley was shot by an off-duty Coronado policeman who suspected Foley of driving under the influence.
Foley pleaded guilty to misdemeanor drunken driving and was placed on five years' probation.
In July, he settled a lawsuit against the city of Coronado for $5.5 million.
Jackson's contract runs through 2009, and he is among the hottest young receivers in the league.
What becomes of this incident, combined with the previous DUI, could affect Jackson's long-term future with the Chargers.
Smith has let go a number of players who have had off-the-field troubles.
While none was as productive or possessed the upside of Jackson, Smith did last February release tackle Shane Olivea just two years after signing Olivea to a contract that guaranteed him $9 million.
Olivea later underwent treatment for an addiction to pain killers.
``You're a Charger one year at a time,'' Smith has often said.
Recently, speaking of the lack of incidents involving his players, Smith said, ``It's very important if you want to be a Charger you do the right things on and off the field.''
The Chargers leave Friday for Pittsburgh, where they will face the Steelers at 1:45 p.m. Sunday.
Chargers receiver arrested for DUI 
San Diego Chargers receiver Vincent Jackson was arrested on suspicion of drunk driving on Tuesday morning, five days before a key NFL playoff game.
Police apprehended Jackson at about 2:30 a.m. and booked him for the misdemeanour before his release, making for a long night with a playoff looming on Sunday at Pittsburgh against the Steelers
Jackson enjoyed the best of his four NFL seasons in 2008 with 59 catches for 1,098 yards and seven touchdowns.
``We're aware of the off-the-field issue involving Vincent,'' Chargers general manager A.J. Butler said in a statement.
``Obviously we're disappointed.
We take these issues very seriously.
Moving forward, we will monitor the situation.''
Charger says he's innocent of DUI
Wide receiver Jackson says he doesn't think charges will be filed
San Diego Chargers wide receiver Vincent Jackson was arrested yesterday on suspicion of drunken driving.
Jackson failed sobriety tests shortly after 2 a.m. on state Route 52 in San Diego, said California Highway Patrol Officer Ray Scheidnes.
He said he didn't know Jackson's blood-alcohol level.
An officer stopped Jackson after spotting the player braking abruptly, speeding and weaving in a 2008 GMC Sierra, said Highway Patrol Officer Brad Baehr.
Jackson was on probation for a previous DUI arrest, he said.
The player was taken to the San Diego County jail and later released.
Jackson, in a brief statement released through the team, said he didn't think charges would be filed against him.
``In the event they are, I look forward to clearing my name and proving my innocence,'' he said.
A gun owned by Indianapolis Colts star Marvin Harrison was used in an April shooting, but investigators still cannot determine who pulled the trigger, the city's chief prosecutor said yesterday.
Five of the six bullet casings found at the North Philadelphia shooting scene came from Harrison's weapon, but investigators have conflicting witness accounts of who fired it, Philadelphia District Attorney Lynne Abraham said.
No charges have been filed in the April 28 shooting and the investigation remains open.
Bruce Smith - the NFL's career sacks leader - Rod Woodson, Shannon Sharpe and John Randle are among the 15 finalists for induction into the Pro Football Hall of Fame, the only first-year eligible players to make the final round this year.
Joining them will be two contributors - former commissioner Paul Tagliabue and Buffalo Bills owner Ralph Wilson - as well as two senior nominees selected last August by the Senior Committee - former Atlanta defensive end Claude Humphrey and former Dallas wide receiver Bob Hayes.
Between four and seven candidates will be elected in the balloting that will take place on Jan. 31, the day before the Super Bowl.
A former New England Patriots lineman and high school football coach in Walpole, Mass., has been released on bail as he awaits trial on charges he raped a 15-year-old girl.
Daniel Villa posted $7,500 (U.S.) bail yesterday and was fitted for an electronic monitoring bracelet.
The conditions of Villa's bail include staying away from children under 16.
CHARGERS' RECEIVER ARRESTED 
San Diego Chargers wide receiver Vincent Jackson was arrested yesterday on suspicion of drunken driving.
Jackson failed sobriety tests shortly after 2 a.m. local time on state Route 52, California Highway Patrol Officer Ray Scheidnes said.
Jackson was on probation for a previous similar arrest, he said.
Jackson, in a statement released through the NFL team, said he didn't think charges would be filed against him.
``In the event they are, I look forward to clearing my name and proving my innocence,'' he said.
Chargers' Jackson arrested on suspicion of DUI 
Chargers wide receiver Vincent Jackson was arrested early yesterday on suspicion of drunken driving.
Jackson failed sobriety tests shortly after 2 a.m. on state Route 52 in San Diego, said California Highway Patrol Officer Ray Scheidnes.
He said he didn't know Jackson's blood alcohol level.
Jackson was on probation for a previous DUI arrest, Highway Patrol Officer Brad Baehr said.
He was taken to the San Diego County jail and released.
San Diego's Jackson is arrested on suspicion of drunk driving 
He allegedly fails sobriety tests after being stopped on San Diego freeway.
He releases statement saying he doubts charges will be filed and looks forward to proving his innocence.
San Diego Chargers wide receiver Vincent Jackson was arrested Tuesday on suspicion of drunk driving.
Jackson failed sobriety tests shortly after 2 a.m. on State Route 52 in San Diego, a California Highway Patrol officer said.
Jackson, whose blood-alcohol level was unknown, was on probation for a previous DUI arrest.
The player was taken to the San Diego County Jail and released.
Chargers General Manager A.J. Smith said he was aware of Jackson's ``off-the-field issue.''
Jackson, in a statement released through the team, said he didn't think charges would be filed against him.
``In the event they are, I look forward to clearing my name and proving my innocence,'' he said.
Chargers' Jackson arrested on suspicion of DUI 
San Diego Chargers wide receiver Vincent Jackson was arrested on suspicion of driving under the influence early Tuesday morning.
According to the San Diego Union-Tribune, Jackson was pulled over on state Route 52 just past 2:30 a.m. in the Clairemont section of San Diego, following an observed traffic violation.
He was booked and later released.
Jackson could be facing misdemeanors on the alleged DUI itself in addition to violating probation for a prior DUI charge.
Jackson released a statement through the team later Tuesday.
``Yesterday I was stopped by an officer.
I don't think any charges will be filed as a result of the stop.
In the event they are, I look forward to clearing my name and proving my innocence.''
A fourth-year pro out of Northern Colorado, Jackson enjoyed a breakout year for the Chargers this season.
He set career-highs of 59 receptions, 1,098 yards and seven touchdowns.
San Diego knocked off the Indianapolis Colts, 23-17, in last Saturday's AFC Wild Card matchup after posting a 52-21 thumping over division rival Denver in a regular season finale that decided the AFC West champion.
The Chargers are getting set to take on the Pittsburgh Steelers Sunday in an AFC Divisional playoff tilt.
SAN Diego Chargers receiver Vincent Jackson has been arrested on suspicion of drink- driving five days before a key NFL playoff game.
Police arested him in San Diego at 2.30am and booked him before releasing him.
The Chargers are due to meet Pittsburgh Steelers in a playoff match on Sunday.
Victory in that game would see them meet either Tennessee or Baltimore for a spot in next month's Super Bowl.
Jackson is enjoying the best of his four NFL seasons in the current campaign with 59 catches for 1098 yards and seven touchdowns.
``We're aware of the off-the-field issue involving Vincent,'' Chargers general manager AJ Butler said in a statement.
``Obviously we're disappointed.
We take these issues very seriously.
Moving forward, we will monitor the situation.''
2 leaders of polygamist group arrested in Canada
Two top leaders of a polygamous community in western Canada have been arrested and charged with practicing polygamy, British Columbia's attorney general said Wednesday
Attorney General Wally Oppal said Winston Blackmore is charged with marrying 20 women, while James Oler is accused of marrying two women.
``This has been a very complex issue,'' Oppal said.
``It's been with us for well over 20 years.''
Blackmore, long known as ``the Bishop of Bountiful,'' runs an independent sect of about 400 members in the town of Bountiful.
He once ran the Canadian arm of the Utah-based Fundamentalist Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints, but was ejected in 2003 by that group's leader, Warren Jeffs.
Oler is the bishop of Bountiful's FLDS community loyal to Jeffs.
Even though many of the town's residents are related or have same last name, followers of the two leaders are splintered and are not allowed to talk with each other.
FLDS members practice polygamy in arranged marriages, a tradition tied to the early theology of the Mormon church.
Mormons renounced polygamy in 1890 as a condition of Utah's statehood.
Last June, Oppal appointed a special prosecutor to look into allegations of criminal abuse at Bountiful despite two earlier legal opinions that said it would be difficult to proceed with criminal charges for polygamy itself.
Blackmore openly acknowledges having numerous wives and dozens of children but has said his community abhors sexual abuse of children.
Oppal said some legal experts believe polygamy charges will not withstand a constitutional challenge in Canada over the issue of freedom of religion.
``I've always taken the position that's a valid offense in law,'' Oppal said.
``And if someone says that it's contrary to their religion, let a judge make that decision.''
The FLDS, with an estimated 10,000 members, is headquartered in Colorado City, Ariz., and Hildale, Utah.
In 1947, a small group moved just across the border into Lister, British Columbia.
The newcomers dubbed the pristine spot at the base of a snowy mountain range Bountiful.
Besides an estimated 1,000 Canadians living in Bountiful, the U.S. Embassy estimates there are about 300 Americans there who are loyal to Blackmore and 200 others who follow Jeffs, who is in jail awaiting trial in Arizona on four counts of being an accomplice to sexual conduct with a minor.
Polygamy arrests made in Canada
Two leaders of polygamous factions in Bountiful, British Columbia, have been arrested, Canadian authorities announced.
Jim Oler, 44, and Winston Blackmore, 52, have been charged under the criminal code with practicing polygamy, Attorney General Wally Oppal said in a statement.
British Columbia's Royal Canadian Mounted Police have scheduled a news conference this afternoon.
The men were arrested this morning, said Sgt. Tim Shields, a media relations officer for the RCMP.
The men were arrested this morning, said Sgt. Tim Shields, a media relations officer for the RCMP.
Their first court appearance is scheduled for Creston Provincial Court on Jan. 21.
Oler, accused of having two wives, is charged with ``practicing polygamy'' between Nov. 1, 2004, and Oct. 8, 2008.
Blackmore, alleged to have 19 wives, is charged with ``practicing polygamy'' between May 1, 2005, and Dec. 8, 2006.
Oppal said a special prosecution into allegations of criminal misconduct in the community of Bountiful, a self-named community near Creston, led to the arrests.
``The arrests are the culmination of an intensive, seven-month charge assessment review by special prosecutor Terrence Robertson,'' who explored whether the men were in ``a conjungal relationship with more than one individual at a time,'' Oppal said.
He stressed the prosecution is independent of the criminal justice branch and the Government of British Columbia, pointing out Robertson is an independent special prosecutor.
He declined to comment on the specifics of the case.
RCMP officers in Creston began investigating allegations of polygamy and sexual exploitation in Bountiful in the fall of 2005, Shields said in a statement.
The community, with a population of approximately 1,000, follows the practices of the polygamous Fundamentalist Church of Jesus Christ on Latter Day Saints.
That sect's traditional base is Hildale, Utah and Colorado City, Arizona, but its outposts include the Yearning for Zion Ranch in Eldorado, Texas.
Texas officials raided the ranch last April and temporarily removed 439 children.
The Canadian investigation focused on the two men in positions of authority, Shields said.
It was completed in September 2006 with a report to Crown Counsel, which recommended charges of polygamy and sexual exploitation.
A follow-up investigation began in September and uncovered additional evidence supplied to Robertson, the special prosecutor, in November.
In early December, he advised the RCMP he had approved one charge of polygamy against the two men.
The charges were sworn on Tuesday.
The polygamous Fundamentalist Church of Jesus Christ of Latter Day Saints is led president Warren S. Jeffs, now serving a sentence for being an accomplice to rape for conducting an underage marriage.
He faces similar charges in Arizona and Texas.
While the doctrine tying plural marriage to exaltation in heaven is rooted in early Mormon theology, the mainstream Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints disavowed polygamy in 1890.
The issue of polygamy has fueled a long debate in Canada.
After the initial probe into Bountiful, attorneys said the Canadian government could find no witnesses on sexual-assault allegations because investigators were told that everyone consented to the acts, and allegations of sexual exploitation of young women could not be substantiated.
B.C. attorney general confirms charges laid against top two polygamist leaders
Two top leaders of the controversial polygamous sect in Bountiful, B.C., have been arrested and charged with practising polygamy.
B.C. Attorney General Wally Oppal confirmed that Winston Blackmore and James Oler were arrested Wednesday.
Oppal said Blackmore is alleged to be married to 20 women, while Oler is accused of committing polygamy by being married to two women.
``This has been a very complex issue,'' he told The Canadian Press.
``It's been with us for well over 20 years.
The problem has always been the defence of religion has always been raised.''
Oppal said some legal experts have believed that a charge for practising polygamy wouldn't withstand a Charter of Rights challenge over the issue of freedom of religion.
``I've always disagreed with that,'' he said.
``I've always taken the position that's a valid offence in law.
And if someone says that it's contrary to their religion let a judge make that decision.''
He said he's pleased a prosecution will proceed, providing some clarity to whether the law will be upheld by the courts.
Oppal said in 2005, when he was appointed attorney general, that he was concerned about the polygamy issue in Bountiful ``because of the exploitation of women and children.''
The community had come under investigation in the past but Oppal said he asked RCMP to reopen the investigation shortly after he was elected.
Sgt. Tim Shields told reporters that Creston RCMP began an investigation into allegations of polygamy and sexual exploitation in the fall of 2005.
That investigation was completed in September 2006 and recommendation was made to Crown for charges to be laid.
A follow-up investigation began last September and the two men were arrested this morning and taken to the RCMP detachment in Cranbrook, B.C., Shields said.
The men were expected to appear in court Wednesday afternoon.
Last June, Oppal appointed a special prosecutor to look into allegations of criminal abuse at Bountiful, saying renewed public concerns compelled him to act.
That came despite two earlier legal opinions that it would be difficult to proceed with polygamy charges.
Officials at the Mormon Hills School in Bountiful, where Blackmore is the superintendent, said he was arrested Wednesday.
About 800 people live in the community in southeastern B.C., where members of the Fundamentalist Church of Jesus Christ of Latter Day Saints practice multiple marriage.
The sect is a breakaway offshoot of the Mormon church, which renounced polygamy more than a century ago.
Blackmore, who is the leader of one of two groups within the community, openly admits to having numerous wives and dozens of children but has said the community abhors sexual abuse of children.
However, Blackmore has refused in previous interviews to discuss allegations that teenaged girls in the community marry older men or that others are sent to polygamous groups in the United States.
Oler is the leader of the other group in the community, which has long been divided.
The issue of polygamy in British Columbia came up again last year after more than 450 children were apprehended by child-welfare authorities from a sister polygamous community in Texas.
At least one of the girls in that case was from Bountiful, refocusing the spotlight on a community that has existed in relative obscurity in B.C.'s Kootenays, not far from the U.S. border.
And polygamist leader Warren Jeffs, the sect's prophet in the U.S., is behind bars south of the border.
He was convicted in Utah as an accomplice to rape and faces trial in Arizona on other charges related to the marriages of members of sect there.
After the special prosecutor was announced, Blackmore accused Oppal of religious persecution.
``It cannot possibly be about polygamy,'' Blackmore wrote in an email to The Canadian Press last June.
``It must be about his own religious bias and now he wants the Liberal government to persecute some of the citizens that they have an obligation to serve and protect.''
Blackmore has said he has tried to meet with Oppal in the past, but that the attorney general has refused.
Canadian authorities filed charges on Wednesday against the leader of a group that openly practices polygamy in British Columbia and has links to U.S. polygamist communities, local media reported.
Winston Blackmore and another member of the Fundamentalist Church of Jesus Christ of Latter Day Saints (FLDS) were arrested for violating a little-used law against polygamy, the Vancouver Sun reported on its website, citing court documents.
Prosecutors and police refused to comment on the reports, but have scheduled a news conference in Vancouver to discuss legal action involving two people from the religious community in Bountiful, British Columbia.
Blackmore, 52, was not available for comment.
The FLDS, an offshoot of the mainstream Mormon Church, also has communities in the United States, where its leader and self-proclaimed prophet, Warren Jeffs, has been convicted on charges of forcing underage women to marry older men.
British Columbia Attorney General Wally Oppal appointed a special prosecutor in June to investigate laying charges against the FLDS, which is believed to have about 700 members living in southeastern British Columbia.
Oppal had to use a special prosecutor because the province's regular prosecution service had been openly reluctant to press polygamy charges on the grounds that the law might be ruled unconstitutional as a violation of religious rights.
Blackmore has challenged authorities in the past to file charges against him, and has denied any criminal wrongdoing within the community.
Two leaders in the polygamous community of Bountiful, B.C., have been charged with practising polygamy under the Criminal Code.
Winston Blackmore, 52, and James Oler, 44, were arrested by RCMP on Tuesday, Attorney General Wally Oppal said at a news conference Wednesday.
Oler is the bishop of the Fundamentalist Church of Jesus Christ of Latter Day Saints, while Blackmore is the former FLDS bishop who was ousted in 2002 after a power struggle with the sect's prophet Warren Jeffs.
The two men were to appear in court Wednesday after an ``intensive'' seven-month investigation, Oppal said.
``Mr. Blackmore it is alleged that he has committed polygamy with approximately 20 people,'' Oppal said.
``And as far as Oler is concerned it is alleged that he has committed polygamy with two women.''
Blackmore has been charged with ``practising polygamy'' on May 1, 2005 and Oler has been charged with the same crime on Nov. 1, 2004, according to provincial court files.
``I am pleased a prosecution will be proceeding, as it will provide legal clarity as to the constitutionality of section 293 of the Criminal Code (concerning polygamy),'' Oppal said in a statement.
News of the charges was welcomed by Audrey Vance, co-chair of Altering Destiny Through Education, which is based in Creston, B.C., not far from Bountiful.
Vance has lobbied for charges against Bountiful residents.
``We all know this is a cult and we have to do something to address this because in Canada women do have equal rights,'' she said in an interview Wednesday.
Blackmore, who has had 26 wives and more than 100 children, is outspoken in his belief that the Charter of Rights and Freedoms protects his religious practice of polygamy - a tenet that was set out by Mormonism's founder Joseph Smith, but was denounced by the mainstream church in 1890.
At a polygamy summit in 2006, Blackmore admitted that he had had ``several'' very young ``wives'' including one who was under 16.
He repeated that when he was interviewed by CNN's Larry King.
Blackmore lost his role as the Bountiful bishop after his disagreement with Jeffs, the church's prophet who has been convicted of being an accomplice to the rape of a minor in Utah and is currently in jail in Arizona facing similar charges there.
Jeffs and other senior FLDS members have also been charged in Texas with offences related to the so-called ``spiritual marriages'' to under-aged girls.
Blackmore now leads a breakaway group that lives in the southeastern corner of B.C. and is the head of the Mormon Hills School Society, which runs a government-funded, independent school.
Over the years, Blackmore amassed a multi-million-dollar business empire that included a post-and-pole company, logging operations and a large farm.
Little is known about Oler, a mechanic.
He has never spoken to the media and there are few photos of him.
However, people within the community have confirmed that Oler has at least three wives, several of whom were in their teens when they were assigned to him in placement marriages by Jeffs.
Bountiful polygamous leaders charged
RCMP Sgt. Tim Shields and Attorney-General Wally Oppal announced Wednesday that the RCMP arrested two Bountiful residents, Winston K. Blackmore, 52, and James Oler, 44, on charges of polygamy.
The arrests are the culmination of the most recent seven-month charge assessment review by special prosecutor Terrence Robertson.
Shields said both Oler and Blackmore were arrested Wednesday morning without incident by eight plainclothes RCMP officers in unmarked vehicles.
Both men are currently in the Cranbrook RCMP detachment lockup, but are expected to be released once they appear before a justice of the peace Wednesday afternoon.
The polygamy charge against Blackmore involves 20 individuals, while the charge against Oler involves only two.
Blackmore leads about half the Bountiful commune, while Oler leads the other half.
Last June, Oppal hired Robertson to investigate whether charges should be laid against the openly polygamist members of the Bountiful commune, where older men routinely are married, legally and common-law, to much younger women.
Oppal instructed B.C.'s Criminal Justice Branch to review the latest developments in an ongoing police investigation and reconsider criminal charges, after two previous prosecutors warned such charges could trigger a Charter challenge based on freedom of religion.
Oppal has stated his intention to punish any transgressions of laws to protect children.
Blackmore recently accused Oppal of religious persecution for pursuing the police investigation.
RCMP MAKE ARRESTS IN BC POLYGAMOUS COMMUNITY
POLICE HAVE MOVED IN AND ARRESTED AT LEAST TWO MEN FROM THE RELIGIOUS COMMUNITY OF BOUNTIFUL IN THE BC INTERIOR.
BC ATTORNEY GENERAL WALLY OPAL ISSUED A STATEMENT TODAY SAYING THAT TWO MEN, WINSTON BLACKMORE AND JAMES OLER, HAD BEEN ARRESTED ``ON CHARGES OF POLYGAMY PURSUANT TO THE CRIMINAL CODE.''
OPAL SAYS THE ARRESTS ARE THE PRODUCT OF A SEVEN-MONTH CHARGE ASSESSMENT REVIEW BY SPECIAL PROSECUTOR TERRENCE ROBERTSON.
OPAL POINTS OUT THAT THIS PROSECUTION IS INDEPENDENT OF BOTH THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE BRANCH AND THE BC GOVERNMENT.
CRITICS HAVE SAID IT WOULD BE DIFFICULT TO PURSUE POLYGAMY CHARGES AGAINST MEMBERS OF BOUNTIFUL FOR FEAR THAT CRIMINAL PROSECUTION COULD VIOLATE THEIR RELIGIOUS FREEDOMS.
Polygamous leaders arrested in Canada, ordered to surrender passports
Two leaders of polygamous groups with ties to Utah have been arrested in Canada, charged with practicing polygamy.
One of the wives of former Fundamentalist LDS Church leader Winston Blackmore confirmed his arrest Wednesday.
``It's for polygamy,'' she said, declining to give her name but telling the Deseret News she was one of Blackmore's wives.
She also said FLDS bishop Jim Oler was also arrested.
The criminal charges were filed Tuesday in Creston, British Columbia.
In Canada, polygamy is illegal.
The Royal Canadian Mounted Police said they began their investigation in 2005 and revisited it earlier this year after a special prosecutor recommended charges.
The prosecutor recommended polygamy and sexual exploitation charges but British Columbia attorney general Wally Oppal opted to only pursue polygamy charges, noting that Blackmore has 20 wives and Oler has two.
``The defendants should raise any constitutional issues,'' Oppal said, in response to questions about polygamists' religious freedoms claims.
Oppal denied that the prosecution was political, despite the former attorney general for British Columbia and several special prosecutors declining to pursue charges against anyone in the fundamentalist enclave of Bountiful.
Both Blackmore and Oler were to be released from RCMP custody late Wednesday pending a future court appearance.
They were ordered by a judge to surrender their passports, check in with RCMP authorities, not leave British Columbia and perform no ``celestial marriages,'' said RCMP Sgt. Tim Shields.
A spokesman for the FLDS Church did not immediately return a call seeking comment.
News of the charges stunned many.
``I'm shocked.
I really am,'' said Mary Batchelor, the director of the Utah-based pro-polygamy group Principle Voices.
``I'm amazed they are actually doing that.''
Batchelor said she had been in contact with some of Blackmore's wives, whom she said were understandably upset.
Blackmore was a bishop in the Utah-based FLDS Church until he was excommunicated in 2002.
The fundamentalists who live in Bountiful, British Columbia, split with some following Blackmore and others remaining in the FLDS Church led by Warren Jeffs.
Oler was a bishop in Bountiful, the FLDS enclave there.
The attorney general of British Columbia has been probing the polygamous communities on allegations of sex abuse, human trafficking and forced marriages.
Several special prosecutors were appointed to give opinions on prosecuting polygamy laws in Canada.
In an e-mail to the Deseret News in 2006, Blackmore acknowledged being the subject of a Canadian police inquiry.
``Since we are not hiding we are not hard to find,'' he wrote.
``It is hard to think that Canada, the home of free lovers and legalized same-sex marriages, not to mention legal wife-swapping clubs, could waste their time on people who live like we do.''
2 polygamous leaders arrested in Canada
The leader of a polygamous communtity in western Canada who has admitted having numerous wives and dozens of children was arrested Wednesday and charged with practicing polygamy, according to court documents and local officials.
Winston Blackmore, long known as the Bishop of Bountiful, runs an independent sect of about 400 in Bountiful, British Columbia.
Blackmore once ran the Canadian arm of the Utah-based Fundamentalist Church of Jesus Christ of Latter Day Saints, but was ejected from the sect in 2003 by its leader, Warren Jeffs.
Last June, British Columbia Attorney General Wally Oppal appointed a special prosecutor to look into allegations of criminal abuse at Bountiful, despite two earlier legal opinions that said it would be difficult to proceed with criminal charges for polygamy itself.
Blackmore openly admits to having numerous wives and dozens of children but has said the community abhors sexual abuse of children.
According to a court document filed in nearby Creston, Winston Blackmore is facing a charge of practicing polygamy.
Officials at the Mormon Hills School in the community, where Blackmore is the superintendent, said he was arrested Wednesday.
Indonesia's West Papua province was hit by a magnitude 6.1 earthquake today, the latest powerful tremor to shake the region where five people were killed and hundreds injured at the weekend when buildings were destroyed.
The quake struck off the coast at 7:48 a.m. local time, 75 kilometers (50 miles) west of the region's main city of Manokwari, the U.S. Geological Survey said in an alert.
There were no immediate reports of damage or casualties and no tsunami alert was issued.
A United Nations assessment team was dispatched to the province after two quakes, measuring 7.6 and 7.4, struck west of Manokwari Jan. 4.
At least five people were killed, 250 others injured and more than 800 homes destroyed by those temblors, according to the UN.
About 14,000 people fled their homes at the weekend after a local tsunami warning was issued, the UN said on its Web site.
The Indonesian government has transported relief supplies, including food, medicine, tarpaulins, generators and water purification equipment to the affected areas.
Two three-story hotels in Manokwari, a city of 160,000 people, collapsed in the Jan. 4 quakes and buildings were also damaged in the town of Sorong, according to the World Health Organization.
Manokwari's Rendai Airport was also temporarily closed on security and safety concerns, the WHO said.
Indonesia lies in a zone where the Indo-Australian, Eurasian, Philippine and Pacific plates meet and occasionally shift, causing earthquakes and sometimes generating tsunamis.
There have been hundreds of earthquakes in Indonesia since a 9.1 temblor in 2004 caused a tsunami that swept across the Indian Ocean, devastating coastal communities and leaving more than 220,000 people dead in Indonesia, Sri Lanka, India, Thailand and other countries.
A strong earthquake rattled Indonesia's West Papua province Wednesday just days after a powerful quake levelled buildings and killed one person, the United States Geological Survey said.
The 6.1-magnitude quake was the latest in a series of dozens of powerful tremors to have hit the region since 7.6 and 7.5 magnitude quakes that struck off the provincial capital Manokwari on Sunday.
Wednesday's shallow quake hit at 7: 48 am (2248 GMT Tuesday) just off the coast, some 75 kilometres (50 miles) west of Manokwari.
Officials had been put on alert to deal with more devastation to the area -- where thousands of people have been living in tents since Sunday's quakes -- but no damage or injuries had been reported, provincial disaster chief Rahimin Kacong was quoted by AFP as saying.
The quake was accompanied by smaller quakes with a magnitude over 5.0 off Kupang in East Nusa Tenggara Province and Ternate in North Maluku province, Indonesia's seismological agency said.
Around 14,000 people flooded into camps on high ground in the aftermath of Sunday's quakes fearing deadly waves after authorities issued and then withdrew a tsunami alert.
Many refugees have returned home but some remain too fearful to go back Kacong said.
``We already told people to return to their houses following the meteorological office report saying that the frequency of aftershocks has reduced,'' he said.
Hundreds of government and private buildings have been damaged by the Sunday quakes, as well as seven bridges, two of which have collapsed.
The tremors have re-awakened bitter memories of similar deadly quakes that hit Manokwari in 2002, as well as the Asian tsunami that killed 168,000 people in Indonesia's Aceh province and Nias island in 2004.
THOUSANDS of frightened residents flooded makeshift refugee camps in Indonesia's West Papua province today after two powerful earthquakes flattened buildings and killed at least one person.
Residents camped out in yards and streets outside their homes, and there were some 14,000 refugees across the province, many of whom had fled to higher ground, officials said.
``For the time being there are 14,000 refugees,'' Governor Abraham Atururi said, adding that 17 camps had been set up for the displaced in the provincial capital Manokwari.
As aid started to arrive, hundreds of aftershocks continued to rattle the coastal city which was hit by the 7.6 and 7.5 magnitude quakes early on Sunday, cutting power and prompting a brief tsunami warning.
Atururi said a 10-year-old girl was killed and at least 40 people were injured in the earthquakes, which rekindled bitter memories of similar deadly quakes that hit the town in 2002.
Hundreds of government and private buildings were damaged in the quake, as well as seven bridges, two of which collapsed, he said.
Four central government ministers arrived by plane bringing 1.5 billion rupiah ($A195,900) in aid and to survey the damage, officials said.
Two tonnes of medicine was also flown in by the health ministry to Manokwari's airport.
In Manokwari, many residents were camping outside their homes, but thousands from low-lying areas refused to leave camps on higher ground out of fear of a tsunami.
``I'm half-dead in my tent.
I want to go home but I'm scared of a tsunami,'' said fisherman's wife Mapahai, 35, who fled with her husband and six children.
``Two of my children are sick, I'm also sick.
We haven't received any medicine yet,'' she said.
Indonesia's Meteorology and Geophysics Agency (BMG) said Papua had been hit by 842 aftershocks over a period of 29 hours after the first quake, including 54 aftershocks stronger than five on the Richter scale.
``It keeps on shaking,'' Papua BMG spokesman Mujahidin said.
Some 168,000 people were killed in Indonesia's Aceh province and Nias island by the 2004 Asian tsunami, making it the worst hit country.
A series of powerful earthquakes has shaken Indonesia's remote eastern province of Papua, briefly triggering fears of a tsunami, officials have said.
A young girl was killed and dozens of others were seriously injured in the quakes, which also sent small tsunamis into Japan's southeastern coast.
Panicked residents fled to higher ground as the first earthquake measuring 7.6 magnitude struck on Sunday about 135 kilometers from the main city of Manokwari, according to the US Geological Survey.
Power supplies were cut and commercial flights were cancelled after cracks appeared on the runway of the city's airport.
Hengky Tewu, a hospital director, said a 10-year-old girl was killed at home when a wall collapsed and crushed her head.
At least 50 people were hospitalised for broken bones and head wounds while 300 others were given outpatient treatment, Henri Sembiring a local health official, said.
One of the tremors with a 7.3 magnitude was felt 1,300 kilometers away in northern Australia, but no damage was reported.
Indonesia's National Disaster Coordination Agency said about 135 homes and other buildings were badly damaged or toppled in the quakes.
Residents in Manokwari - a jumble of low-lying brick and cement structures home to 167,000 people - remained wary of aftershocks, with many staying outdoors in case fresh tremors caused more buildings to collapse.
The Indonesian health ministry and World Vision Indonesia, a relief agency, have said they will be sending in aid teams and emergency kits including canned food, blankets and basic medical supplies.
Papua, located about 2,955 kilometers east of the country's capital, Jakarta, is among the nation's least developed areas.
In December 2004, a massive undersea quake off the western Indonesian province of Aceh triggered a giant tsunami that left at least 230,000 people dead and missing in a dozen countries facing the Indian Ocean.
Indonesia straddles a chain of fault lines and volcanoes known as the Pacific ``ring of fire'' and is prone to seismic activity.
The powerful quakes in Papua in easternmost of Indonesia on Sunday have led over 14,000 people taking shelters in tents, destroyed hundreds of buildings, killed one person and injured dozens others, local disaster management agency said on Monday.
Head of the agency Captain Manrosan, who goes with a single name like many Indonesian, told Xinhua by phone from Manokwari of Papua's main city that eight people had suffered from serious injury and 261 other got minor injury.
Manrosan said that the 7.7 magnitude quake damaged 42 government office buildings, 2 roads, 14 hotels, over 1,600 houses, 40 religious building including churches and mosques, 8 bridges, and 4 school buildings.
``Up to the midday Monday, the latest data of the fatality is only one person,'' he said, ruling out speculation about the rumor of several deaths.
The Manokwari Hospital said that most of those seriously wounded now were treated at an emergency unit at the hospital.
``Most of them have broken bones, caused by the smashed of the debris of the buildings,'' Doctor Sokal Pirg of the unit told Xinhua by phone from the hospital.
Evacuees still lived in tents and relatives' houses which were at higher grounds and far from sea for fear of possible tsunami, said Manrosan.
The quake has totally stop electricity supply at the city, but now some of them have resumed, said Manrosan.
The quake, with epicenter was about 85 miles (135 kilometers) from Manokwari and occurred at a depth of 22 miles (35 kilometers), is followed by tremors, triggering fears among the displaced persons to return homes.
``We are still scared of further strong quakes,'' said Nora Nursita, a resident at Manokwari, over phone.
Aids for the victims have been delivered from the local administration and Jakarta, said Manrosan.
Up to Monday, tremors keep shaking Papua, particularly Manokwari city which is home by over 170,000 people.
Indonesian have recently launched an early tsunami warning system across the country to prevent a repeat of the 2004's massive death caused by tsunami.
The catastrophe four years ago devastated Indian Ocean community and killed more than 230,000 people, over 170,000 of them in Aceh at northern tip of Sumatra Island of Indonesia.
Indonesia, with over 230 million population and 17,000 islands, sits at a vulnerable zone so called ``the Pacific Ring of Fire'' where two continental plates, stretching from the Western Hemisphere through Japan and Southeast Asia, meet that cause frequent volcanic movements.
A series of powerful earthquakes rocked Manokwari, the capital of West Papua, on Sunday, killing four people, injuring dozens and destroying hundreds of buildings.
One 7.3-magnitude tremor was felt as far away as Australia and sent small tsunamis into Japan's southeastern coast, the Associated Press reported.
The first quake, magnitude 7.6, struck at 4:43 a.m. local time about 135 kilometers from Manokwari at a depth of 35 kilometers, the U.S. Geological Survey said.
Dozens of aftershocks followed.
At least four people died in Papua, where the runway of the airport nearest the epicenter was split by the force, President Susilo Bambang Yudhoyono told reporters.
``I've instructed emergency steps be taken to help our brothers and to restore power and other vital utilities,'' Yudhoyono said.
Among the dead was a 10-year-old girl, identified as Yolanda Mandofi, whose head was crushed, said local hospital director Hengky Tewu.
``Our ambulances are picking up two more,'' he said.
Another 19 patients at the hospital were treated for broken bones, cuts, crush wounds and other injuries.
Papua police chief Maj. Gen. Bagus Ekodanto said he had received reports that a hotel and a rice warehouse had been ``destroyed'', but he did not know if anyone had been killed in the incidences.
A search for victims was under way.
Several stories of the Mutiara Hotel in the main city Manokwari collapsed, said Ina, a nurse at a navy hospital, adding that she had already treated 20 quake victims.
The quakes also reportedly damaged the Kalidingin hotel.
Electricity was cut off to the coastal city of population 167,000, where people fled their homes in the dark fearing a tsunami, said Hasim Rumatiga, a local health official.
The quakes forced thousands of people to take refuge, including in military fields in the city, said Manokwari Military Commander Col. Inf. Irham Waroiham.
About 1,000 residents had taken shelter in a military field, 500 in a navy field, 500 in the yard of the Manokwari regent office and 7,000 others in Masni district, which lies just outside of Manokwari city.
The Meteorology and Geophysics Agency had issued a tsunami alert, but it was revoked within an hour after it was determined the epicenter of the main quake had been within the mainland.
Quakes centered well within the mainland do not pose the threat of a tsunami to Indonesia, but can still spread large waves to neighboring countries, such as Japan.
Japan's Meteorological Agency said tsunamis 10 to 40 centimeters in height swept into towns along the coast.
The quakes were also felt in Sorong regency.
The regency police spokesman Snr. Comr. Agus Rianto told The Jakarta Post the quakes had damaged 18 houses, injuring 11 residents.
The latest quakes in Manokwari occurred on Oct. 10, 2002, the largest recorded at magnitude 7.6, killing three people.
Another strong quake hit in 1996, triggering enormous waves that hammered into the north coastal area of Papua, as well as Sorong, Biak and Manokwari.
A series of earthquakes killed a 10-year-old girl and injured dozens Sunday in remote eastern Indonesia and briefly triggered fears of another tsunami in a country still recovering from such a disaster in 2004.
One of the quakes -- a 7.3-magnitude tremor -- was felt as far away as Australia and sent small tsunamis into Japan's southeastern coast.
Residents near the epicenter in Papua province rushed from their homes in search of higher ground shortly after the first 7.6-magnitude quake struck, afraid that huge waves might wash over the island.
The epicenter was about 85 miles from Papua's main city of Manokwari and occurred at a depth of 22 miles, the U.S. Geological Survey said.
It was followed by dozens of aftershocks.
An earthquake with a preliminary magnitude of 4.4 struck in Sonoma County this morning near The Geysers, according to the U.S. Geological Survey.
The earthquake struck at about 9:30 a.m. and had a depth of 2.7 miles, according to the USGS.
The quake was centered about two miles from The Geysers and 13 miles east of Cloverdale.
Earlier this morning, an earthquake with a preliminary magnitude of 2.0 struck near The Geysers, according to the USGS.
The earthquake struck at about 7:30 a.m. and had a depth of 1.4 miles, according to the USGS.
A 4.2 magnitude earthquake shook a remote area of eastern Sonoma County on Sunday morning, the largest in a flurry over the weekend, according to the U.S. Geological Survey.
The temblor occurred at 9:27 a.m., 13 miles east of Cloverdale and 2 miles southeast of The Geysers, where geothermal forces by more than 20 power plants are harnessed to provide energy for several North Bay counties.
According to the USGS, the area has no fault, but the pumping of water from plants into the ground periodically induces small temblors.
The size of Sunday morning's earthquake caught the attention of people in Cobb, a small community along Highway 175 in Lake County, 4 miles east of The Geysers.
``Shaking isn't uncommon here, but this was a pretty good jolt,'' said James Gaskell, manager of Hardester's grocery.
The only products to fall off shelves were Q-Tip boxes and mayonnaise, but ``our wine rattled pretty good.''
Down the road at Brick Oven Pizza, which opens for breakfast on weekends, ``it caught our attention,'' said Geri Angel, a waitress.
``We have teacup rattlers all the time, but pans were swinging for this one.''
A powerful earthquake centered near The Geysers shook not just communities on Cobb but startled residents in other parts of the county and even in other states.
The 4.2-magnitude earthquake was recorded at approximately 9:27 a.m. Sunday, according to the US Geological Survey, which originally had rated the quake as 4.4 in magnitude.
The US Geological Survey report listed the epicenter as two miles east southeast of The Geysers, four miles southwest of Cobb and four miles west of Anderson Springs, at a depth of 2.7 miles.
At 9:32 p.m., it was followed by a 2.0-magnitude centered quake two miles east of The Geysers and four miles southwest of Cobb, at a depth of two-tenths of a mile, according to the US Geological Survey.
Five more small quakes measuring between 1.0 and 1.9 on the Richter scale were reported in the following half-hour.
Altogether, 23 quakes occurred Sunday in and around The Geysers, Anderson Springs and Cobb, including the big quake and six smaller ones that happened before it, US Geological Survey records show.
Residents of Cobb, Kelseyville and Hidden Valley Lake told Lake County News that they felt the quake.
It was described as having a rolling-type movement.
No one reported damage although one person said she was nearly knocked out of her chair while sitting at the computer.
Cobb resident Roger Kinney initially reported that the quake lasted about 10 seconds, with it coming on quickly, followed by violent shaking before it dissipated and was followed by a second shockwave five seconds later.
He said it's the largest quake he's felt since moving to the area two and a half years ago.
The US Geological Survey received reports from people from around Lake County who felt the quake - including Middletown, Hidden Valley, Lakeport, Spring Valley, Clearlake and Cobb.
Numerous residents of Santa Rosa, Healdsburg, Napa and San Francisco also reported feeling it.
There were even reports from as far away as South Lake Tahoe, Vacaville and Las Vegas.
The last earthquake measuring 3.0 or above occurred on Dec. 30, three miles east of The Geysers at a depth of 1.1 miles. 
It measured 3.0 on the Richter scale, as Lake County News has reported.
A light earthquake has struck Northern California, and there are no reports of injuries or damage.
The U.S. Geological Survey says the 4.4-magnitude temblor on Sunday at 9:27 a.m. was centered 23 miles north of Santa Rosa, and two miles from The Geysers.
The BBC says little-known actor Matt Smith will take over the title role in the long-running sci-fi series ``Doctor Who.''
The show has been running for 45-years, and the fans of the show will always remember the ten actors who played Doctor Who before Smith, his name will now join that exclusive list.
Each actor has brought something unique to the role, so Smith will have his work cut out.
Matt Smith has time to come to terms to the task ahead, as current Doctor Who, David Tennant will not leave the BBC show until the end of 2009.
Smith will play the time lord in 2010.
Do you think Smith will make a great Doctor Who?
Relatively unknown actor Matt Smith was named as the next face of TV's most famous time traveller.
On Saturday it was announced that the actor to play the eleventh Doctor was none other than Matt Smith. 
``Who?'' asked people entirely appropriately.
On Saturday, the 26-year-old was handed the keys to the Tardis when he was unveiled as the 11th Doctor Who, replacing David Tennant, who steps down later this year.
Matt, who has stage and TV credits, will take up the role in 2010.
This weekend Doctor Who fans finally learned who would play the eleventh Doctor after David Tennant leaves the role.
Matt Smith will take up steering the TARDIS and saving the universe when the series returns for its fifth season.
With young British actor Matt Smith stepping into Doctor Who's title role, Wired.com takes a look back at the 10 actors who have previously portrayed sci-fi TV's most enduring hero.
Tennant has now been voted one of the most popular Doctors of all time and is handing his sonic screwdriver over to actor Matt Smith.
Of course, there has been a media frenzy, with practically every national tabloid screaming ``Who??''.
But the casting of Smith is a stroke of genius: he will not bring any ``star personality'' with him that perhaps a ``name'' would have, but he seems utterly committed, and I have to say he does have an other-worldly look to him.
When Matt Smith stepped into Doctor Who's title role as the 11th Doctor this weekend, he went from British character actor to potential entertainment legend.
Smith, 26, who played a young political researcher in the show, will become the biggest star of all after winning the role of the 11th Doctor.
Speaking to The Guardian, Buchan said his old co-star would make an excellent Doctor Who.
``It's a sublime bit of casting.
He's got that huge hair, a twinkle in his eye - Matt's the king of geek chic.
He is possibly going to be one of the best Doctors we've ever had.''
A relative unknown will take over the title role of Doctor Who in the British science fiction television show, making him the 11th time lord in 45 years to travel across the universe in the Tardis time-ship.
Matt Smith, 26, will make his debut in 2010, replacing David Tennant, who leaves at the end of this year.
He is the youngest actor to play the part.
Smith has previously appeared on TV, in films and the theatre and is best known for appearing in the BBC's The Ruby in the Smoke.
When the 26-year-old unknown was unveiled as the 11th Doctor on Saturday evening, it took most viewers by surprise.
Just hours after little-known actor Matt Smith was named as the new Doctor in the BBC Wales hit show, speculation mounted that a star name would accompany him on his time-travelling adventures.
26-year-old Matt Smith has been cast as the next incarnation of the Doctor.
Users on the Facebook Doctor Who forum that I frequent mostly had the same reaction: ``Who's Matt Smith?''
The guy is relatively unknown and the skeptics wondered if the right person was chosen.
After all, everyone speculated that Paterson Joseph, who had appeared on a couple episodes of the show, was going to be the next Doctor and here we get some no-name.
Bettie Page, the pin-up model whose seductive photographs in magazines titillated and outraged Americans in the 1950s, has died, her agent said.
She was 85.
``With deep personal sadness I must announce that my dear friend and client Bettie Page passed away at 6:41pm PST this evening (0241 GMT Friday) in a Los Angeles hospital,'' her agent Mark Roesler said Thursday in a statement.
Page suffered a heart attack nine days earlier and never regained consciousness.
``She captured the imagination of a generation of men and women with her free spirit and unabashed sensuality,'' Roesler said.
Page, with shoulder-length jet-black hair and bangs, combined sweetness and sexuality in a series of now-legendary posters and photographs in the 1950s, including as one of the inaugural centerfolds in Hugh Heffner's new magazine Playboy, which named her ``the model of the century.''
The nice-naughty image -- a sweet and beguiling smile matched with a curvacious figure and Page's propensity for burlesque films and bondage images -- proved highly combustible on the eve of America's sexual revolution.
In the late 1950s Page became one of the most photographed women in the world, and her popularity soared even as she left the limelight nearly half a century ago.
Page later said she was puzzled by her effect on pop culture.
``I have no idea why I'm the only model who has had so much fame so long after quitting work,'' she told the Los Angeles Times in 2006.
In her old age, she refused to be photographed, preserving her mythic status.
``I want to be remembered, as I was when I was young and in my golden times ...
I want to be remembered as the woman who changed people's perspectives concerning nudity in its natural form.''
Born in 1923 in Nashville, Tennessee, Bettie Mae Page was one of six children from an impoverished family.
After earning her university degree, she worked as a secretary and aspired to Hollywood stardom but never made it as an actress.
A screen test at 20th Century Fox went badly, with a producer offering her a break in return for sexual favors -- she refused.
Filmmaker and aviator Howard Hughes also doggedly pursued Page but she rebuffed him as well.
``I never returned any of his calls,'' she once said.
``I guess people will say I made a mistake.
But sex is part of love, and you shouldn't go around doing it unless you are in love.
I certainly didn't.''
She posed for her first pin-up photos in 1947 and by the 1950s provocative pictures of her in bikinis or sexy lingerie were wildly popular, tacked up on the walls of locker rooms, student halls, offices and military barracks.
Although the pictures -- which sometimes played on bondage themes -- seem tame by contemporary standards, they raised alarms in a more conservative era, prompting US senators to investigate pornography.
Page was subpoenaed to appear before a senate committee headed by prominent Democrat Estes Kefauver but in the end never had to testify.
For Page, the bondage photos were harmless fun.
``But honestly, who could take any of this seriously?'' she said years later, according to her official website.
``I never understood how anyone believed those poses were sexy.
To be tied up?
I don't get it.''
By 1958, at the peak of her fame, Page vanished from public view and her modeling days ended.
She became a born-again Christian but struggled with marital problems and suffered from depression and violent mood swings.
In 1992, she left a California mental hospital having been diagnosed as a paranoid schizophrenic.
In the 1990s, a lawyer who later became her agent, Mark Roesler, used Page's famous images for a lucrative licensing and merchandising deal that helped her financially and renewed her fame.
The merchandise, including a clothing line, along with a film in 2005,
``The Notorious Bettie Page,'' helped introduce her to a new generation in the United States and abroad.
``She was reclusive and private, so without intending to be, without quite understanding how, her modeling work made her a pivotal figure in the sexual revolution that began in the 1950s,'' Roesler said.
Bettie Page, the 1950s pinup and bondage model who provided more than a half-century of inspiration for everybody from Madonna to the Suicide Girls to artist Olivia De Berardinis (as well as having her image used on all sorts of merchandise), died yesterday in Los Angeles at the age of 85.
Born in Nashville, Page left her job as a schoolteacher and secretary to begin a career in modeling in 1950.
Throughout the 50s, she appeared clad in leopard print bikinis, black leather, and wielding whips in publications like Wink and Titter.
In 1955, she appeared in a Christmas spread for Playboy.
She had appeared in thousands of photos when she abruptly walked away from her career at the age of 35.
In 1995, Page was summoned to testify before the U.S. Senate at anti-pornography hearings.
She moved to Florida shortly thereafter, became a born-again Christian, suffered a nervous breakdown, and was diagnosed as a schizophrenic.
But her legend grew over the years, as her image kept reappearing in popular culture.
She was the inspiration for a character in Dale Stevens' 1982 comic series The Rocketeer, and the 1991 movie based on the series had actress Jennifer Connolly in the Page-inspired role.
Artist Olivia De Berardinis also immortalized Page in several paintings, which have become popular tattoos among modern day rockabilly and goth girls.
Page learned of her career resurgence after being released from a mental hospital in 1992.
Bettie Page T-shirts, posters, watches, wallets, and more were hot-sellers, and although Page refused to have her picture taken the last two decades of her life, she embraced her legacy and occasionally did meet-and-greet signings at events throughout the U.S. and gave her blessing to an official Web site, www.bettiepage.com.
Page had been hospitalized for the past three weeks for pneumonia.
She was scheduled to be released December 2, but suffered a heart attack.
Her health never recovered, and she passed at away at 6: 41 last night.
A number of sites have already posted tributes to Page.
You can check out the tributes in the L.A. Times, at MTV.com, and also at Page's official site.
Bettie Page, the 1950s pin-up queen and pop culture icon who died on Thursday, will be remembered for her indomitable influence on style, fashion, and sexual expression.
But as Bettie's biographer -- and the only one with whom she ever cooperated -- I can tell you that the underground bondage queen also had the unlikely effect of thematically shaping a series of biographical and highly feminist novels about powerful women in history.
In 1991, intrigued by the resurgence of Bettie's image in venues as diverse as rockabilly clubs, nostalgia rags, and S&M fashion gone mainstream, I wrote a cover story for the L.A. Weekly, ``In Search of Bettie Page.''
For nine months, I had tracked down anyone who had ever known her or photographed her.
But Bettie herself, the object of much speculation, remained elusive.
Most people thought she was dead.
Then, as fate would have it, someone gave Bettie, who was living in anonymity and seclusion, a copy of the article.
Imagine the shock -- a seventy-something senior citizen who ran away from it all forty years prior, suddenly finds that she is famous again.
But she liked it.
Though she did not want to re-enter the public arena, Bettie sent me a letter praising the piece, calling us ``kindred spirits.''
Soon, with co-author James Swanson, I embarked on the adventure of writing her biography, sitting down with her for hundreds of hours while she told us her story.
At the time, I was also trying to work out how to tell the stories of women in history who had been either dropped from the record or misinterpreted through the sexist lens of their biographers.
I was to start with Kleopatra (the original Greek spelling), a victim of Roman propaganda remembered for the men with whom she slept rather than for her diplomacy, leadership, and the fact that she had mastered nine languages.
How to present the stories of women who had been victimized without writing a victim story, I kept asking myself?
How to give women in history who had been reduced to their sexuality the full breadth of their experience without diminishing or demeaning their sexuality?
So here was Bettie Page, a woman known only for her sexuality, who had been sexually abused by her father, sexually violated by a gang of strangers, and emotionally battered by a husband.
In the years since she had gone underground, Bettie had become a born-again Christian working for the Billy Graham Crusade.
Surely she would repudiate the work she'd done as a pin-up and bondage model.
Surely she saw herself as a victim of the patriarchy that hijacked her beauty and sensuality and exploited it for its own gratification.
Surely I was about to meet a woman who considered herself a victim.
I was wrong.
Despite her more unfortunate experiences, Bettie never presented herself as a casualty of sexual abuse, and she never used that, or her religious beliefs, which were strong, to renounce the work she'd done as a model.
Moreover, she never denounced sexual expression.
``God created us naked,'' she said by way of explaining her total lack of inhibition in the buff.
She purported that bondage modeling ``was such fun,'' even at times ``hilarious,'' except for when the elaborate gear became uncomfortable.
And sex itself, she assured me on many occasions, was for her, always pleasurable and joyful.
Though she had at times suffered at their hands, she never expressed bitterness toward men.
I know women who are resoundingly more hostile than Bettie Page just for having suffered a few bad dates.
No, Bettie was not going to allow anyone or anything to diminish the joy she experienced when she put that corset on (or took it off) and felt her full-blown sexual power.
Since the publication of Bettie Page: Life of a Pin-Up Legend, I have published four historical novels with strong female characters.
Each, in her own way, was a victim, either of the era in which she lived and its laws, or of individual abusers, or of the general abuses and oppressive nature of the culture at large.
Despite the enormous consciousness-raising of the last few decades, we still see attempts to diminish today's female powerbrokers women like Hillary Clinton or Sarah Palin by sexualizing them.
Yes, in our porn-saturated society, people are still trying to shame women for -- what?
Having sexual attributes?
At least we can point to one woman, Bettie Page, who wouldn't have it.
Bettie's obits paint a bleak picture of her later years.
But I found that, despite her trials, she had retained a zest for life and always took pleasure in memories of the work that she'd done.
I hope that Bettie is remembered for her sexual joy, and for the gleeful spirit she brought to sexual imagery, whether she was frolicking on the beach or being ball-gagged and spanked, rather than for being a victim.
A female friend of mine said this morning, ``Bettie Page did more for sexual expression than Alfred Kinsey.'' Amen, sister.
For all the countless (and valuable) mountains of scholarly and feminist writing that have influenced my thinking and my portrayal of women, I still look to a lady who said it all by looking into the camera and defying anyone to tell her she was bad or wrong.
Amen to you, too, Bettie.
Rest in peace.
Yesterday in Los Angeles, pin-up icon Bettie Page succumbed to complications from a heart attack  suffered almost three weeks ago.
Few women in modern history have incited such lust and reverence in men and women alike.
To the rockabilly culture, she embodied the ideal woman - voluptuous and healthy, with that leveling sneer.
She seemed to dare you to not stare at her.
Her hairstyle launched a thousand girls to slice off their bangs and get out the black dye.
Literally tens of thousands of women are walking around today as perfect Bettie clones of all shapes and sizes.
With her nude photoshoots, the bondage angle and her defiance in the face of censorship, she was a precursor to the '70s feminist movement - '50s punk rock in heels and garters.
Page has been the inspiration for dozens of songs all across the musical landscape, but it was the rockabilly guys that took to her the most; not to mention female-fronted bands like the Horrorpops or even pop's Katy Perry.
Even Amy Winehouse's look in the beginning was a derivative of Page.
She was the wholesome face of America's kinky secret -- even if no one saw that face for half a century.
Bettie Page, the notorious Southern gal-turned-dominatrix-turned pin-up-queen-turned born again Christian, died Thursday at age 85.
The details of her death are known:
She had been hospitalized in Los Angeles for four weeks due to pneumonia, only to suffer from a heart attack.
Far less is known of her life -- at least the last five decades of it.
In 1957, Page disappeared from the flash of the cameras and the public spotlight.
She'd found religion, became a recluse, and lost contact with friends and associates.
But in the short time she donned panties and garters, brandished a whip and a whip-smart attitude, she was the queen of kink.
Page, you see, was to erotica what Elvis was to rock 'n' roll.
No, she wasn't the first pin-up.
She wasn't even the best looking.
But she had ``that thing'' that could take what was once a dark art form into the American mainstream.
Unlike Elvis, though, Page never got bloated.
She checked out in her prime.
She didn't even allow to have her photo taken.
She remained frozen in time.
Yet, her image continues to strut its black stilettos through pop culture.
``Bettie Page'' remains short-hand for a haircut, an image and a cult that includes everyone and everything -- from designer Vivienne Westwood to rockabilly hounds to hot-rodders, comic books, Madonna, Goths, neo-burlesque performers and devil-may-care types.
The Nashville, Tenn., girl never imagined she'd ever stir such a fuss.
``She looked so fresh and wholesome,'' said Bunny Yeager, whose photographs of Page appeared in virtually every men's magazine in the nineteen fifties.
``She wasn't trying to be seductive; she was the girl next door.''
One big difference between Page and most neighbors, said Yeager:
``She felt more comfortable in the nude than in clothes.''
Her story of unintentional notoriety began in 1950, when she boarded a Greyhound bound for Manhattan.
Within months, her innocent face and curvy body made her the hit of the ``camera-club circuit.''
``Back then, you'd have a bunch of guys with cameras travel by bus to private houses to photograph girls,'' Yeager said.
An aesthetic was born, one that mixed mundane suburbia with raw sexuality.
By 1952, Page was breaking taboos, posing with a ball strapped in her mouth, whip in hand and devilish look on face -- in photos and movies that featured stripping, spanking and faux lesbianism that straddled burlesque and pornography.
Page was hardly tawdry, though, Yeager said.
``She was so at ease, so wholesome.''
The traits made a Page a natural in natural settings captured by Yeager, who met Page in 1954.
Yeager's shots of her in a jungle swimsuit with two cheetahs are '50s exotica par excellence: a mix of the innocence and the wild that shot through the veins of American sexuality, not to mention pin-up art, hot-rod aesthetics and tiki culture.
Playboy magazine not only featured Page pictorials; it adopted her ``girl next door'' charm as its manifesto.
Page's good-girl-bad-deed notoriety turned her into a Marilyn Monroe with black, wicked hair.
Too wicked for the U.S. government, which condemned photos of her taken by Irving Klaw as ``obscene and lewd.''
The controversy drove Page from modeling and into the arms of Jesus.
``One night while walking the beach she saw a neon cross on a church and walked inside,'' Yeager said.
She never walked out: Page became born again, moved to California, and disappeared from the pages and the public eye.
But her image never stopped titillating.
You see it in rock clubs, roller derby games, fashion shows.
And you see it in an America's own sexual conflicts -- a nation with a Puritanical past and a closet full of sin.
Even in death, Bettie Page is the missing link between the two.
Pinup icon Bettie Page died Thursday evening at a hospital in Los Angeles after having suffered a heart attack on Dec. 2 and spending time on life support, according to her official site.
Page was born on April 22, 1923, in Nashville, Tenn.
She began modeling in 1950 when she met New York City police officer and photographer Jerry Tibbs.
According to Page's official website, by 1951 she was appearing in the men's magazines Eyefull, Wink, Titter, and Beauty Parade.
In 1955, Hugh Hefner asked Page to pose in a Playboy centerfold, a move that would help her seal her popularity and financial security decades later.
Page ended her modeling career in 1957 after turning to Christianity.
Despite never posing in sexually explicit poses (only nude photos), Page became an unwitting sex symbol and a face of the sexual revolution in the nineteen sixties.
Her popularity rose again in the early 1990s but her insecurities kept her out of the spotlight.
She wanted her fans to remember her as she was in her heyday.
Adding to her bewilderment was the fact that this new popularity surge happened while Page was institutionalized in a Southern California mental facility after attacking a woman with a knife.
When she was released in 1992, she found herself in the spotlight again, thanks in part to a movie called The Rocketeer, which played off of pulp fiction characters of the 30s and 40s, including the image of Bettie Page.
In spite of her renewed popularity, Page wasn't receiving any royalty payments from her images.
Page signed on with agent James Swanson, who in turn set her up with Curtis Management Group, who fought to get her the pay she deserved.
Page came out of hiding in 2003 when she agreed to be photographed for Playboy.
This was her last public photograph.
Several biographies have been made, including her official biography Bettie Page:
The Life of a Pin-up Legend, and a biography by Richard Foster called The Real Bettie Page:
The Truth about the Queen of Pinup.
A movie called ``The Notorious Bettie Page'' was released in 2005, which told the pinup's story between the 1930s and the nineteen fifties.
Today, women still love to emulate her old-fashioned look, specifically her long black hair with bangs and red lipstick. Some people feel as if these women are unoriginal and failed to find an identity of their own, while others see this as the ultimate form of flattery.
Page was survived by her sister Joyce Wallace of Georgia, and her brother Jack Page, who lives in Nashville, Tennessee.
Bettie Page, the raven-haired pin-up whose naughty-but-nice romps with whips, garters and high heels titillated a generation of young men in the post-war years, has died at the age of 85 after suffering a heart attack earlier this month and slipping into a coma.
Her career, which some claim laid the foundations for the sexual revolution that swept America in the 1960s, started almost by accident after she discovered that posing for amateur photographers in provocative poses and risque attire made her more money than secretarial work.
Ms Page's fame was set after she was adopted by Irving Klaw and his sister, Paula, in 1951.
The couple ran a Manhattan mail order business offering dirty pictures.
Later, she was featured by Playboy as a centrefold, including a 1955 image of her winking under a Santa hat.
``Bettie was one of the magazine's early Playmates, and became an iconic figure, influencing notions of beauty and fashion,'' Hugh Hefner, the magazine's founder, said on hearing of her death.
``Her passing is very sad.''
Ms Page disappeared for decades at the end of the Fifties, suffering serial broken marriages and devoting herself to Christianity.
Even in her twilight years she suffered bouts of depression and ill health but was rediscovered in the late nineteen eighties.
She would occasionally make public appearances to sign photographs of herself as popular interest in her suddenly took off again.
To her astonishment, Ms Page has recently attained cult status.
Madonna, Uma Thurman and Demi Moore are among contemporary stars who have at some time adopted Bettie Page poses, while in 2006 a movie, The Notorious Bettie Page, featured Gretchen Mol in the title role.
Ms Page had been admitted to hospital originally for treatment for pneumonia and was set to be released and sent home on 2 December when she suffered her heart attack.
A representative said she never recovered consciousness and died late on Thursday.
``She captured the imagination of a generation of men and women with her free spirit and unabashed sensuality,'' her agent, Mark Roesler, said yesterday.
``She is the embodiment of beauty.''
Even though she conceded to the occasional public event, she never agreed to having her photograph taken again.
``I don't want to be photographed in my old age,'' she said in 1998.
``I feel the same way with old movie stars.
It makes me sad.
We want to remember them when they were young.''
After her early career peaked, Ms Page became exhibit number one in a congressional hearing into so-called immoral activities in Washington.
The controversy prompted her disappearance from public view.
It was while living in Florida that she had her born-again experience and committed herself to the church and to the ministry of the Rev Billy Graham.
In her later years, she defended the trade she pioneered.
``I never thought it was shameful.
I felt normal.
It was better than pounding a typewriter eight hours a day, which gets monotonous,'' she told Playboy in 1998.
As for being featured undressed, that seemed fine too.
``God approves of nudity,'' she said.
``Adam and Eve in the Garden of Eden, they were naked as jaybirds.''
Bettie Page, whose trademark raven hair and risque lingerie and bondage pin-up photos made her a cult favorite, died Thursday night at a Los Angeles hospital - nine days after suffering a heart attack.
She was 85.
Page was born Betty Mae Page in Nashville, Tennessee on April 22, 1923.
Smart and ambitious as a teenager, she was the salutatorian of her high school graduation class and was voted ``Most Likely to Succeed.''
She earned a scholarship to attend George Peabody College, where she studied acting.
Page's famous pin-up days lasted from 1951-1957, where her slinky, curvy and scantily-clad or nude body graced magazines including Wink, Beauty Parade, Twitter and Playboy.
The Heff crowned Page Playmate of the Month in January of 1955.
The same year she was also named, ``Miss Pinup Girl of the World.''
Her photo and film work often depicted Page in pin-up, bondage or sadomasochistic themes, including the iconic (and highest selling) images of the model shown gagged and bound in a web of ropes from the Leopard Bikini Bound film.
Heffner told the AP on Thursday, ``I think that she was a remarkable lady, an iconic figure in pop culture who influenced sexuality, taste in fashion, someone who had a tremendous impact on our society ...
She was a very dear person.''
Page married twice; the first marriage to Navy man Billy Neal lasted from 1943 to 1947, and her second to Armond Walterson in 1958 to 1963.
After the collapse of her second marriage, she suffered a nervous breakdown and soon after became a born-again Christian.
After attending Bible school, she wanted to serve as a missionary but was turned down because she had been divorced.
Instead, she worked full-time for evangelist Billy Graham's ministry.
Bettie's life and photos enjoyed a revival of interest in 1976 with the publishing of the book, A Nostalgic Look at Bettie Page.
Page was also celebrated in the 2006 HBO movie, The Notorious Bettie Page, starring Gretchen Mol.
Bettie Page, the 1950s pin-up model who helped set the stage for the 1960s sexual revolution, has died.
She was 85.
Her agent, Mark Roesler, said Page died yesterday at a Los Angeles hospital after suffering a heart attack on December 2. 
She never regained consciousness.
Page, who became religious and suffered depression in later life, spending years in a mental institution, inspired the 2005 film The Notorious Bettie Page.
She became a cult figure for magazine photographs of her bikinis and see-through lingerie, which were tacked on walls across the US.
After resurfacing in the 1990s, she occasionally granted interviews but refused to allow her picture to be taken.
``I don't want to be photographed in my old age,'' she said in 1998.
``I feel the same way with old movie stars ...
It makes me sad.
We want to remember them when they were young.''
Her photos included a centrefold in the January 1955 issue of the then fledgling Playboy magazine, as well as controversial sadomasochistic poses.
The latter helped contribute to her mysterious disappearance from the public eye, which lasted for decades and included years during which she battled mental illness and became a born-again Christian.
Playboy founder Hugh Hefner said:
``She was a remarkable lady, an iconic figure in pop culture who influenced sexuality, taste in fashion, someone who had a tremendous impact on our society.
She was a very dear person.''
Roesler said Page had been in hospital for three weeks with pneumonia and was about to be released when she suffered the heart attack on December 2.
Her career began in October 1950 when she took a break from her job as a secretary in a New York office to take a walk along the beach at Coney Island.
An amateur photographer named Jerry Tibbs admired the 27-year-old's firm, curvy body and asked her to pose.
Looking back on the career that followed, she told Playboy in 1998:
``I never thought it was shameful.
I felt normal.
It's just that it was much better than pounding a typewriter eight hours a day.''
Nudity didn't bother her, she said, explaining:
``God approves of nudity.
Adam and Eve in the Garden of Eden, they were naked as jaybirds.''
They cut her hair into the dark bangs that became her signature and posed her in spiked heels and little else.
She was photographed with a whip in her hand, and in one session she was spreadeagled between two trees, her feet dangling.
``I thought my arms and legs would come out of their sockets,'' she said later.
Moralists denounced the photos as perversion, and senator Estes Kefauver of Tennessee, Page's home state, launched a congressional investigation.
Page quickly retreated from public view, later saying she was hounded by federal agents who waved her nude photos in her face.
And she said she believed that, at 34, her days as ``the girl with the perfect figure'' were nearly over.
She moved to Florida in 1957 and married a much younger man, after an early marriage to her high school sweetheart had ended in divorce.
Her second marriage also failed, as did a third, and she suffered a nervous breakdown.
Born on April 22, 1923, in Nashville, Tennessee, Page said she grew up in a family so poor ``we were lucky to get an orange in our Christmas stockings''.
Famous 1950s pin up star Betty Page has died in Los Angeles, aged 85.
The iconic model known for her provocative poses was credited for helping to pave the way for the sexual revolution of the nineteen sixties.
She was admitted to hospital last month suffering from pnuemonia, and last week suffered a heart attack and never regained consciousness.
Her agent Mark Roesler siad: ``With deep personal sadness I must announce that my dear friend and client Bettie Page passed away at 18:41 this evening (02:41 GMT Friday) in a Los Angeles hospital''.
``She captured the imagination of a generation with her free spirit and unabashed sensuality ... 
She is the embodiment of beauty''.
Hugh Hefner was reported as saying about Page:
``I think that she was a remarkable lady, an iconic figure in pop culture who influenced sexuality, taste in fashion, someone who had a tremendous impact on our society''.
Page was married three times but had no children.
Legendary pinup queen Bettie Page died of pneumonia at the age of 85 in a Los Angeles, California, hospital Thursday, a week after suffering a heart attack, according to her agent.
Pinup queen Bettie Page was credited with helping to usher in the sexual revolution.
``She captured the imagination of a generation of men and women with her free spirit and unabashed sensuality,'' said agent Mark Roesler in a written statement.
``She is the embodiment of beauty.''
Page, said to be one of the most photographed people of the past century, became a recluse in recent decades.
Yet, her images continued to be used around the world to market Bettie Page action figures, clothing lines and other merchandise.
``Her popularity as an underground, guilty pleasures phenomenon has continued to soar despite the fact that the reclusive Page disappeared almost a half century ago, leading many to believe that one of the most photographed individuals of the 20th century was already dead.''
Roesler said.
The Web site, BettiePage.com, logs about 20 million hits a month, Roesler said.
A TVGuide.com poll recently placed Bettie Page as the ``ultimate sex goddess,'' outscoring others such as Marilyn Monroe.
Page was born to a poor family in Tennessee on April 22, 1923.
While her birth certificate spelled her name ``Betty,'' she changed the spelling later in life to ``Bettie.''
At a time when few women pursued a college education, Page earned a bachelor of arts degree in education from Peabody College in Tennessee in 1944, according to her official biography.
Her teaching career, however, was hampered by her looks, she said.
``I couldn't control my students, especially the boys,'' she is quoted as saying.
After her modeling career ended, Page returned to Peabody College to work on a master's degree, the bio said.
Her Southern drawl and a refusal to sleep with a Hollywood producer hampered her acting career, according to her bio.
``I didn't like his looks,'' Page said.
``I wouldn't have gone to bed with him anyway.
He was a creep.
He drove off in his big car and scolded me,
'You'll be sorry.'
I wasn't.''
Page said she regretted not accepting studio boss Jack Warner's offer of another screen-test, but it came while she was trying to save her marriage to her first husband, Billy Neal.
Her modeling breakthrough began after she divorced Neal in 1947 when she met a police officer whose hobby was photography.
He suggested the black bangs, which became her trademark, her bio said.
Not long after, her images were everywhere, gracing magazine covers and locker pin-ups.
Page wore nothing but a Santa hat in Playboy's January 1955 centerfold.
Playboy founder Hugh Hefner said her appearance in his magazine's first year was a milestone.
``She became, in time, an American icon, her winning smile and effervescent personality apparent in every pose,'' Hefner said.
``A kinky connection was added by Irving Klaw's spanking, fetish and bondage photos, which became part of the Bettie Page mystique,'' Hefner said.
``They were playful parodies that are now perceived as the early inspiration for Madonna's excursions into the realm of sexual perversion.''
Perhaps the most memorable photos of Page were her bondage poses, which she said were all pretend.
``I never understood how anyone believed those poses were sexy,'' she later said.
``To be tied up?
I don't get it.''
``She was a remarkable woman, truly someone that changed the social norms, not only here in this country, but also around the world,'' Roesler said.
``While Jackie Robinson was changing the racial attitudes, Bettie Page was changing our attitudes on sex.
She became a James Dean type of 'rebel' figure as she allowed people to be less inhibited and look at sex in a different way.''
Saucy photos of Paige in skimpy clothing or none at all helped to lead the way for the sexual revolution of the nineteen sixties.
Page suddenly disappeared from the scene in 1958.
It was only decades later revealed that she re-emerged to explain that she underwent a religious conversion and moved to Florida.
Her life took a dark turn starting in 1978 after her third marriage failed, Roesler said.
Page went through ``some mental instability, violent mood swings, and serious trouble with the law'' and was eventually diagnosed as a paranoid schizophrenic, according to her bio.
Page reappeared in public in December 2003 for Playboy's 50th anniversary party, where she made a grand entrance with Anna Nicole Smith.
It was the only time in the past 50 years that Page allowed her photograph to be taken, Roesler said.
A private funeral service is planned for Tuesday.
Page will buried at Westwood Cemetery in Los Angeles, just a few feet away from Monroe.
Bettie Page, the 1950s pinup girl whose natural looks and risque fetish poses triggered a cult following four decades after she turned her back on modeling, has died.
She was 85.
Page died late yesterday in a Los Angeles hospital after suffering a heart attack more than a week ago, her agent Mark Roesler said in a statement.
``She captured the imagination of a generation of men and women with her free spirit and unabashed sensuality,'' said Roesler. 
``She is the embodiment of beauty.''
The busty ``Dark Angel'' from Tennessee was one of the most- photographed women of her era, striking a chord with men's camera clubs and sparking outrage in Congress for her nude snapshots.
Page's image, complete with black hair bangs and naughty smile, appeared on magazine covers, playing cards, wallpaper and comic books in the 1990s, inspiring retrospective tributes from celebrities such as Madonna, Demi Moore and Uma Thurman.
The college-educated beauty queen who disappeared from the public eye after 1957 was unaware of her renewed popularity until ``Entertainment Tonight'' broadcast a television segment about her almost 40 years later.
She had disowned her glamour lifestyle after becoming a born-again Christian in 1959, and later battled mental illness in Florida and California.
``Bettie Page is the last great icon of the 1950s,'' James Swanson, co-author of ``Bettie Page:
The Life of a Pinup Legend,'' said in a 1996 interview with NBC's Real Life program.
``Like James Dean and Marilyn Monroe, she brought something modern to the era.
She's like the girl next door, the greatest American pin-up and that's why she's eternal.``
Early Years
Bettie Mae Page was born on April 22, 1923, in Nashville, Tennessee.
The second of six children, she helped raise her younger siblings while the family traveled around the U.S. in search of work.
Page's mother placed her daughters in an orphanage after divorcing her husband, who was sentenced to two years in an Atlanta penitentiary for stealing a policeman's car.
At the age of 10, Page began to mimic actresses and perform songs for the other girls at the orphanage before her mother, who worked as a hairdresser during the day and in a laundry at night, reclaimed her children after a year.
Page took refuge from her traumatic family life in local community centers, where she learned to cook, sew and study hard enough to top her class at high school.
She was a member of the drama club, helped edit the school newspaper and was voted ``The Most Likely to Succeed.''
She won a $100 scholarship to Peabody College in Nashville, where she graduated with a Bachelor of Arts degree in education.
Three Husbands
In February 1943, she married Billy Neal, the first of her three husbands, and moved to San Francisco, where she had her first modeling assignment for a local furrier.
While Neal served in the Mariana Islands during World War II, Page lived in Nashville, Miami and Port au Prince, Haiti.
In 1947, she filed for divorce and moved to New York.
Three years later while walking on Coney Island, she met police officer Jerry Tibbs who had an interest in photography and assembled Page's first portfolio.
Tibbs introduced her to camera clubs, men's hobbyist groups that sometimes acted as a front for erotic photography, and Page's career took off.
She then appeared in publisher Robert Harrison's girlie magazines Wink, Flirt and Beauty Parade.
In January 1955, she was the centerfold model in Hugh Hefner's fledgling Playboy magazine, one month before actress Jayne Mansfield appeared as the publication's Playmate.
``She had a saucy innocence that is both contemporary and provocative, and also nostalgic,'' Hefner said.
Media Mogul
Page, who claimed she ignored media mogul Howard Hughes's request for a screen test in 1955 because she didn't want to sleep with him, also studied acting under Herbert Berghoff at Sea Cliff Summer Theater on Long Island.
The apprenticeship helped her gain parts in New York stage productions and on television, once appearing on ``The Jackie Gleason Show.''
Some of her most celebrated snapshots were taken in 1954 during a session with photographer Bunny Yeager at the Africa USA wildlife park in Boca Raton, Florida.
They included nude poses with two cheetahs and scenes in a leopard-patterned jungle outfit that she made herself.
Her ``Dark Angel'' image stemmed from bondage and fetish sessions for Irving Klaw's Movie Star News.
Klaw, who paid $80 for four hours' work at his studio in Greenwich Village, New York, required sadomasochistic shots to meet the demand of high- profile, educated clients.
His sister Paula created the sets and helped Page develop the fetish image.
'Very Sweet'
``Paula was one of the nicest women I've ever known in my life,'' Page said.
``Only Paula was allowed to tie us up.
She was very gentle, caring and considerate.
She never tied any ropes too tight.
She was very sweet.''
A Congressional investigation initiated by Tennessee Senator Estes Kefauver in 1955 called Page as a witness and put Klaw out of business, though he had no case to answer because his models were never nude.
The evidence of obscenity had included more- explicit poses that Page had done for camera clubs after a drinking session one night at a party.
The Congressional probe is said to have contributed to her decision to give up modeling.
Throughout the 1960s, Page attended Bible schools in Los Angeles, Chicago and Oregon, helping teenage mothers and visiting jails.
Her breakdown in 1972 after divorcing third husband Harry Lear led to four months' treatment in Florida's Jackson Memorial Hospital and 20 months in Patton State Hospital in San Bernardino, California.
She also had numerous run-ins with the law, including a charge of assault with a deadly weapon after brandishing a knife at her landlady who didn't provide Page with rent receipts.
Pop-Culture Revival
Page's pop-culture revival emanated from artwork by Robert Blue and Olivia de Berardinis, who drew on her fantasy and fetish work.
David Stevens also featured Page in ``The Rocketeer'' comics from the early 1980s, prompting an avalanche of similar publications based on her persona.
In later years, she lived in California and collected royalties from her work as a model after signing with Curtis Management Group.
In 2005, Time Warner Inc. and HBO Films released ``The Notorious Bettie Page,'' a feature film starring Gretchen Mol as Page.
Page avoided the camera lens after her modeling years, though she was photographed with Hefner at Playboy's 50th anniversary celebration in 2003.
``I want people to remember me as I was,'' she said in a Playboy interview in 1998.
Page was divorced three times and had no children.
Bettie Page, one of entertainment's original sex kittens, the 1950s pin-up queen who many credit with having paved the way for the sexual revolution of the following decade, passed away Thursday, December 11, at age 85.
Bettie Page died Thursday of pneumonia at a Los Angeles area hospital, longtime agent Mark Roesler said.
She had suffered a heart attack earlier in December and never regained consciousness.
He said he and Page's family agreed to take her off life support.
Roesler described her as ``the embodiment of beauty,'' and enthused that she ``captured the imagination of a generation of men and women with her free spirit and unabashed sensuality.''
Bettie Page's signature raven-black long hair, her bangs, the red lipstick, her full, seductively rounded body and her provocative poses made her into a bona fide pin-up queen in the nineteen fifties.
Her fame endured throughout the decades, even after she retreated from the spotlight and struggled with mental illness, moved around the country and became a born-again Christian.
She was born Betty Mae Page on April 22, 1923 in Nashville, Tennessee, in an impoverished family with six children.
Despite being confronted with an abusive father who eventually went to prison and having to live in orphanages at times, Page grew up a great fan of Hollywood movies and was successful in school, as salutatorian of her high school graduating class.
Her classmates voted her ``Most Likely to Succeed.''
She received an arts degree with Peabody College in Nashville and started modeling in the 1940s after moving to San Francisco with her first husband.
They divorced in 1947 and Page continued her modeling work in New York.
As chance would have it, photos from a shoot with Miami photographer Bunny Yeager ended up in the pages of Playboy.
This would forever change Page's life, as she became on of the two-year-old magazine's first centerfolds in the January 1955 issue.
Kneeling before a Christmas tree, wearing a Santa hat and a playful wink (and that's all) and holding a Christmas tree ornament, Playboy founder Hugh Hefner described the layout as ``a milestone in the history of the magazine.''
A few years later, Page modeled in bondage and sadomasochistic poses.
This caused great controversy, as the photographs were criticized by some as perversion and a congressional investigation was launched into pornography.
By the late 1950s, Bettie Page had virtually disappeared from the public eye, having retreated to focus on her own personal life.
She became a born-again Christian and worked for Billy Graham's ministry, among others.
She married two more times yet both unions failed.
Beginning with the 1970s, she battled mental illness and was diagnosed as paranoid schizophrenic.
During her retreat from the spotlight, Page was completely oblivious of the fascination she had ignited in the public.
She made a comeback almost two decades later, signing memorabilia at conventions and occasionally granted interviews.
She refused to have her photograph taken.
Page had no children.
A private funeral service will be held Tuesday, Dec. 16, at Westwood Memorial Cemetery.
Many people were shocked and saddened to learn that beloved pin-up icon Bettie Page passed away yesterday in Los Angeles after lingering in a coma for a week following a heart attack.
She was 85.
Personally, I wasn't surprised because I thought she died several years ago.
Page is best known by her fans for her risque bondage films and pictures, and her infamous sense of style, which continues to influence everyone from mortician Goth girls to rockabilly cholas in my high school to Dita Von Teese, who's complete act is utterly ripped off from her.
To me, she'll always be the kooky, naive Christian portrayed by Gretchen Mol in The Notorious Bettie Page.
But more than that, she was trailblazer for sexy unconventional women everywhere.
Without her, the Suicide Girls wouldn't exist, although it's questionable whether that's a real loss.
I chose the above picture to memorialize her because everyone loves monkeys.
RIP Bettie!
I'll drink a martini and listen to a Cramps song in your memory tonight.
After weeks of speculation about what would be introduced at Macworld, Apple Inc. took the wraps off of updated iTunes and iLife software and unveiled a 17-inch MacBook Pro on Tuesday.
The Cupertino, Calif.-based company (NASDAQ:AAPL) said iTunes songs will now have three-tiered pricing: 69 cents, 99 cents and $1.29, depending on how new or desirable the songs are judged to be.
All songs offered on iTunes Plus will be free of digital rights management software.
Users of the popular iTunes service will now also be able to download music over WiFi and 3G networks on the iPhone.
Apple claims that its new MacBook Pro is the thinnest and lightest 17-inch notebook computer available.
Its new battery can run for up to eight hours on a charge and can be rechagred up to 1,000 times, the company said.
The new notebook is expected to ship in late January with a price tag of $2,799 for the base model that will have 4 gigabytes of RAM and a 320 gigabyte hard drive.
The new version of iLife includes changes to its photo, movie and music software.
The updated iPhoto lets users tag photos according to who is in them or where they were taken.
The Places feature either picks up the tag from a camera's GPS system or the information can be put in manually.
The new iPhoto software also supports photos tagging at social networking sites Facebook and Flickr.
The second revamped iLife offering unveiled at Apple's keynote Tuesday morning was a new version of iMovie, which allows new drag-and-drop editing features, video stabilization, built-in themes and animated travel maps.
ILife's new version of Garageband music software adds HD video tutorials for guitar and piano taught by pop stars including Sting and Norah Jones.
Apple also rolled out an updated version of iWork that includes a new online service that lets users share documents over the Web.
Delivering the keynote address at the Macworld trade show was Apple's top marketing executive, Philip Schiller, who spoke in the place of CEO Steve Jobs.
On Monday Jobs ended weeks of new speculation about his health with an open letter saying that he has a hormonal imbalance that has caused him to lose weight.
Last month Apple said Jobs wouldn't be making his highly-anticipated annual appearance at the show, a report that renewed rumors about his health that surfaced when he appeared gaunt earlier in the year.
While Apple's final keynote address at the annual MacWorld convention in San Francisco didn't contain the iPhone-related announcements many had hoped for, we were given all of the details on Apple's latest revamp to their largest and most powerful MacBook Pro.
Apple's senior vice president of Worldwide Product Marketing, Philip Schiller, delivered the address and detailed the major revisions to the 17'' MacBook Pro.
First off, the 17'' MacBook Pro will be, as Apple puts it, ``the world's thinnest and lightest 17-inch notebook,'' coming in at less than an inch thick (0.98'' to be precise ) and with an overall weight of 6.6 pounds.
Like it's smaller siblings that were given a facelift back in October, the new 17'' MacBook Pro will utilize an aluminum unibody design that brings the behemoth notebook into the new, ``greener'' future.
The new 17'' MacBook Pro achieves EPEAT Gold status that identifies the device as an environmentally responsible solution.
As part of its EPEAT Gold status, the new 17'' model is reportedly free of many of the harmful toxins found in comparable notebooks that have adverse effects on the environment during disposal.
As part of the new MacBook family, the 17'' MacBook Pro incorporates an arsenic and mercury-free glass LED-backlit display.
But beyond the environmental improvements, the biggest news regarding the latest MacBook Pro is its revolutionary battery system.
Through the use of advanced chemistry, intelligent monitoring, adaptive charging technology, and a multi-cell design that Apple claims achieves three times the industry standard in battery life.
The new battery system will deliver eight hours on a single charge and can be recharged up to 1,000 times in a single lifespan.
On the performance side, the 17'' MacBook Pro has similar performance specs to previous MacBook Pro models.
The processor, memory, and drive specs on the new model are as follows:
The new model incorporates all of the usual MacBook Pro luxuries, such as built-in iSight, three USB ports, mini-display port output, a FireWire 800 port, and ExpressCard/34 support.
Similar to the other MacBook models, the trackpad has been updated to incorporate Apple's new multi-touch gestures and buttonless design.
The new 17'' MacBook Pro will come in one default configuration with a MSRP of $2,799, however, users will be able to upgrade their notebook with Apple's built-to-order program.
Optional upgrades include a 8GBs of DDR3 memory, a 320GB hard drive, a 128GB or 256GB solid state drive, and various display output alternatives.
If the glass LED-backlit display causes too much glare for you, Apple also offers an anti-glare display on the 17'' MacBook Pro for $50 extra.
The new 17'' MacBook Pro will be shipping at the end of this month.
Apple's big announcement at Macworld yesterday was not a new iMac, Mini or netbook, all of which had been rumoured, but a battery.
The firm announced a widely expected refresh of its 17in MacBook Pro, with a battery that the firm said will offer eight hours of operation, but which is not removable from the case.
The battery, based on conventional lithium polymer technology commonly found in laptops and mobile phones, has been integrated into the case to make the device thinner while increasing battery life, according to Apple senior vice president of marketing Phil Schiller.
Apple has also introduced a separate chip that monitors the power used by each cell and adjusts the charging current accordingly, which the firm says extends the life of the battery.
The Macworld crowd did not let out its characteristic whoops of excitement when Schiller announced the battery, even when he said that its capacity for 1,000 full recharges - three times the average achieved by other notebooks - would give the average battery a five-year life.
However, one Mac customer from the show floor was sceptical of the claims.
``Apple says five years, but for some it might only be two or three,'' he said.
``Look at the way guys like us travel.''
Apple will offer a p135 take-back and replacement service for the battery.
The keynote was decidedly low-key this year, being Apple's last following a decision to pull out from the IDG-run show.
Other than the MacBook Pro, the company concentrated on enhancements to its iWork package, including a beta version of iwork.com.
The service lets users share iWork files, including those in Microsoft Office format, and to comment on each other's work.
Glaringly absent at Macworld were refreshes of the now ageing Mac Mini and the iMac desktop lines.
Apple on Tuesday launched a refresh of the 17-inch MacBook Pro, giving the company's largest laptop an eight-hour battery life, a faster Intel (NSDQ:INTC) processor, and better graphics capabilities.
The upgraded product was the only hardware announcement at the opening Macworld keynote, which was delivered by Phil Schiller, senior VP for worldwide product marketing at Apple.
Breaking with tradition, the company announced late last month that co-founder and chief executive Steve Jobs would not kick off the trade show.
In addition, Apple stunned the industry by saying this year would be its last appearance at Macworld.
The absence of Jobs led many analysts to believe that Apple would not make any major product announcements, and the prediction turned out to be correct, particularly in terms of hardware.
The MacBook was the only Apple computer to get an upgrade, which is sure to disappoint fans who had also hoped for updates to the company's Mac Mini and Apple TV.
Apple observers had expected the refresh of the 17-inch MacBook Pro, given that it was left out of Apple's notebook event in October, when the company launched updates of the 15-inch and 13.3-inch systems.
But while some analysts said the larger laptop could get a big speed boost with an Intel quad-core processor, Apple stuck with an Intel dual-core chip, which has been upgraded to a 2.66-GHz Core 2 Duo processor with 6 MB of on-chip L2 cache.
Buyers also have the option of a 2.93-GHz Core 2 Duo processor.
But the most innovative feature in the upgrade is a new battery that Apple claims will last up to eight hours on a single charge and can be recharged up to 1,000 times, which means up to a five-year lifespan.
RivalsDell (Dell) and Hewlett-Packard (NYSE:HPQ) last year introduced laptops with similar battery life on a single charge.
The Apple battery achieves its better performance by using custom-designed lithium-polymer cells that are 40% larger than the previous generation.
However, to fit the battery in the system, Apple has made it nonremovable, which may turn off some potential buyers.
Because of the extended lifespan of the battery, Apple says the MacBook is more environmentally friendly than the previous generation, since the power supply doesn't have to be replaced so often.
The notebook is less than an inch thick, weighs 6.6 pounds, and features a light-emitting diode screen with a $50 anti-glare option.
In addition, the system comes with an Nvidia GeForce 9400M integrated graphics processor and a discrete Nvidia 9600M GT processor.
Switching to the latter gives better graphics performance at the expense of about an hour of battery life.
With a 17-inch MacBook Pro update unveiled at today's Macworld 2009 keynote, Apple has finally brought an entire line of Mac portables into view.
The largest member of the MacBook family now comes with a faster front-side bus and processor, Nvidia graphics, DisplayPort interconnect with HDCP content protection, LED-backlit glossy display, and all of it wrapped up inside Apple's unibody aluminum enclosure with glass trackpad.
For the first time ever, Apple is also offering a 256GB SDD upgrade, while creative pros get to order anti-glare display version of the computer.
But everybody was expecting this.
What was never dreamed of is eight hours of battery life that powers this beast - up from five hours before.
The added juice comes from a 40% larger battery and a chip inside that ``talks'' to each cell and adjusts the current accordingly.
This results in three times the number of charges and lifespan of the industry standard.
The rumor mill was way off this year when it predicted a $600 Mac netbook or iPhone nano as Apple's ``one more thing'' for Macworld 2009.
Instead, Apple's vice president of worldwide marketing Phil Schiller, appointed by Steve Jobs to deliver the keynote presentation in his absence, saved the new 17-inch MacBook Pro as the company's last surprise.
Apple calls the 17-inch MacBook Pro the ``world's lightest and thinnest 17-inch notebook,'' and it isn't exaggerating.
The computer is just 0.98-inches thin and weighs 6.6 pounds. The 17-inch MacBook Pro represents a marriage of all the technologies used to build other unibody Macbooks and a large 17-inch display for applications that require lots of screen real estate, like video editing and graphics design on-the-go.
The machine features LED-backlit glossy display that lights up instantly when the lid is open, unlike warm up time required for the LCD cells.
It also features built-in iSight camera and 1920 x 1200 resolution - that's 78 percent more pixels than the 15-inch MacBook Pro and enough to display full 1080p HD content with room to spare.
In addition, it has a 700:1 contrast ratio and 60% greater color gamut.
As was expected, the machine now relies exclusively on Mini DisplayPort interconnect with HDCP copy protection technology, and it comes with glass trackpad and illuminated keyboard, all wrapped in a sturdy unibody alluminum enclosure.
The new 17-inch MacBook Pro includes an ultra-thin, widescreen glossy 1920 x 1200 display with 78% more pixels than the 15-inch MacBook Pro and a 60% greater color gamut that delivers desktop-quality color in a notebook.
The LED-backlit display has brilliant instant-on performance, uses up to 30% less energy and eliminates the mercury found in industry standard fluorescent tube backlights.
A faster 1066 MHz front-side bus and newer generation of Intel Core 2 Duo processor with 6MB shared L2 cache, clocked at 2.66 GHz, bring an evolutionary speed increase over the previous model.
The notebook ships with 4GB of 1066 MHz DDR3 SDRAM, expandable to 8GB; onboard graphics is the same (Nvidia GeForce 9400M and 9600M GT combo) as used in the 15-inch unibody MacBook Pro models.
The latter discreet chip comes with 512MB GDDR3 video memory and can be turned on to boost graphics performance when needed, albeit at the expense of battery.
But when it comes to battery, the lithium polymer one inside the 17-inch MacBook Pro squeezes up to 8 hours of runtime.
Apple said it created 40% larger environment-friendly battery without taxing computer's sleek form factor.
The battery features adaptive charging technology and comes with a chip inside that talks to each cell to adjust the current accordingly, resulting in a three times the charges and lifespan of the industry standard.
``We've developed new battery technology that is better for the user and better for the environment,'' said Apple CEO Steve Jobs.
``Apple's advanced chemistry and innovative technology deliver up to eight hours of use on a full charge cycle and up to 1,000 recharges.''
The company claims that a ``properly maintained'' battery in this notebook will retain 80% or more of its original capacity during a lifespan of up to 1,000 recharge cycles.
Connectivity options include wireless 802.11n networking courtesy of the built-in AirPort Extreme card, a Bluetooth 2.1 + EDR module and Gigabit Ethernet.
The machine also has one FireWire 800 port for connecting video cameras and other professional audio and video equipment, three USB 2.0 ports, audio line in and out ports, each supporting both digital and analog, and ExpressCard/34 expansion card slot.
Storage features include 320GB SATA HDD running at 5400 rpm, with Apple's Sudden Motion Sensor that prevents head to scratch platter surface if the machine is suddenly dropped, and a slot-load 8X SuperDrive with double-layer support.
Apple will start shipping the new 17-inch MacBook Pro at the end of the month for $2,799.
Today may be Apple's last Macworld Expo appearance but Apple came bearing gifts.
At today's keynote event, Apple introduced a collection of new and refreshed software and hardware products to show off on stage.
Apple's first hardware announcement at Macworld today introduced the 17'' MacBook Pro.
Built on the precision unibody enclosure, the Pro was launched as the ``world's thinnest 17'' notebook,'' at only 0.98 inches thick, and also the ``world's lightest,'' weighing in at 6.6 pounds
Its LED backlit display supports a 1920x1200 pixel resolution.
Other features include a 60% greater color gamut, a 700:1 contrast ratio, improved viewing angles, and (thankfully) a matte screen option as well as a glossy option.
The antiglare option will cost an additional $50.
The $2799 17'' Pro, which is due to ship in late January, offers 3 USB 2.0 ports, FireWire 800, a mini display port, an express card, a glass trackpad, and up to a 2.93 GHz dual core processor.
The unit supports up to 8GB of DDR3 memory and offers a 320 standard HDD.
A 256 SSD drive is optional.
Apple considers the updated battery its most innovative new feature.
According to Schiller, it offers the longest battery life ever, with up to 8 hours of use on a single charge for the 9400M (7 hours on the 9600 GT) and up to 1000 charges in a lifetime.
Importantly, Apple managed to include these improvements without changing the size or weight of the laptop.
The embedded battery uses lithium polymer technology and lasts ``three times longer than the industry standard'' in terms of number of charges over that lifetime.
An embedded chip in the battery adjusts the power to cells within the battery through ``adaptive charging.''
The new battery is also environmentally green.
iTunes goes DRM-free
Today Apple announced that it was breaking its $0.99 per track model and dropping DRM for 8 million songs.
The fixed price track gave way to three price tiers: $0.69, $0.99, and $1.29 per song.
Apple also expanded the iPhone music store from WiFi only to 3G service.
Phil Schiller, Apple's Senior Vice President of Worldwide Marketing, stood in for a recuperating Steve Jobs and kicked off the show with a new $79 version of iLife 09 ($99 for a family pack), which is due to ship at the end of January.
iLife is Apple's suite of consumer photo, movie, and web applications.
iPhoto '09 gained a suite of new features like ``Faces'' for organizing photos based on facial recognition, ``Places'' for integrating Google Maps and viewing photos based on their geo-tags, syncing with Facebook and uploading to Flickr, new slideshow themes that can be saved out to iTunes as movies, and more.
iMovie was refreshed with several new features including a precision editor, dynamic themes and animated travel maps.
iMovie chief architect Randy Ubillos demonstrated the updated software, showing how to edit audio with a new advanced drag and drop system.
Of particular note is iMovie 09's video stabilization feature.
This automatically corrects for jitters and shakes, enhancing hand-held movie camera footage.
GarageBand 09 debuted a new ``Learn to Play'' feature that helps users master the guitar or piano with an interactive video instructor.
The nine (free) basic lessons get end-users up to speed with instruments, and then celebrity artists offer how-to lessons on specific songs.
Celebrity lessons cost $4.99 per lesson and can be purchased from the in-application store.
This offers an entirely new revenue stream for Apple that will certainly appeal to the new RockBand generation.
Apple's iWork represents their office suite of tools, including the Keynote presentation tool, the Pages word processor, and the Numbers spreadsheet tool.
Keynote '09 introduces updated transitions using Apple's new ``Magic Move'' technology, which offers finer control of objects in slide presentations.
The updated Keynote also adds new themes and transitions for text and charts.
An iPhone application, ``Keynote Remote,'' augments presentations.
In vertical mode, the remote app shows your slides and notes together.
In horizontal mode, it mimics the Photos application on the phone, allowing you to flick from one slide to the next.
The Pages '09 update introduces full screen viewing, letting you block out other items on your computer and focus on the task on hand.
You will not be interrupted by incoming mail or iChat IMs when using full screen mode.
Dynamic outlines are another new feature, providing a way to organize your writing with drag and drop.
You can switch back and forth between the standard page view and the outline view, letting you move sections around and then return to editing them.
The Pages refresh offers 40 new templates, including newsletters, posters, fliers, certificates, and business correspondence.
Numbers '09 also received a refresh, which focused on expanding features requested by customers.
Among other updates, Numbers introduces table categories, easier formula creation, and advanced chart options.
The refreshed Numbers now supports mixed chart types, multiple axes, trend lines and error bars.
Apple also introduced better Pages/Numbers integration with live updates.
When users change a Numbers spreadsheet, it automatically updates in any Pages document it's cross-linked to.
Numbers also introduces presentation templates to enhance the visual appeal of its documents.
iWork '09 ships today and will cost $79 for a single license, $99 for a family pack and $49 with a new Mac.
For users who have held off on buying Leopard, Apple introduced a new Mac Box Set.
This set bundles Leopard, iLife and iWork for $169. It's due to ship in late January, when iLife '09 ships.
Apple announced a new collaborative site called iWork.com that's built around iWork.
Launching in Beta, iWork.com lets users share documents and collaborate online with each other.
Users can and edit documents as well as comment on them.
The site supports multiple formats for downloads and sharing and is fully integrated into iWork applications.
You can upload documents directly from Pages and other iWork applications by clicking the iWork.com button.
The service will become fee-based after leaving beta, but is free for the duration of the beta.
Apple CEO Steve Jobs unveiled the company's new high-end notebook line during the special event being held at Apple's headquarters in Cupertino, Calif.
The new MacBook Pro will feature two graphic chipsets, the Nvidia GeForce 9400M embedded on the motherboard and the Nvidia GeForce 9600M as a discrete part.
The graphics deliver 32 parallel graphics cores and 125 gigaflops of graphics performance. Jobs said that using the 9400M you get five hours of battery life and four hours with the 9600M.
Apple tests indicate the new graphics are five times faster than the integrated graphics of the current designs.
The MacBook Pro will also come with a newly designed trackpad.
The multitouch glass trackpad has a 39 percent larger tracking area than before, according to Jobs.
The entire trackpad will act as button, rather than having a separate button like the previous notebooks.
Apple has also added to its arsenal of multitouch gestures, adding four-finger gestures with the latest release.
All of the connectors are on the left side of the MacBook Pro and features a unibody enclosure.
Apple designer Jonathan Ive explained that Apple learned a lot when making the MacBook Air and used that knowledge to design the new MacBook Pro.
Of course, the MacBook Pro will have all the features you've come to expect from an Apple notebook like like backlit keyboards, magnetic latch, motion sensor, speakers, iSight and microphone.
Apple is also adding a mini display port on the new models.
A slot-loading SuperDrive will be on the right-hand side of the MacBook Pro.
At less than an inch thick the new MacBook Pro will come in two models.
For $1999 you get a 15.4-inch 2.4GHz Intel Core 2 Duo with 3MB L2 cache, an LED-backlit display and 2GB 1066 MHz DDR 3 memory, both Nvidia cards, a 250GB hard drive and the slot-loading SuperDrive.
The other model costs $2499 and comes with 2.53GHz processor, 6MB L2, 4GB of memory, 512MB on the Nvidia 9600M GT, 320GB hard drive.
The previous generation 15-inch MacBook Pro also came in two models: a 2.4GHz and a 2.5GHz Intel Core 2 Duo.
Those systems came with a 200GB and 250GB hard drive respectively.
Although not discussed in detail today, the 17-inch MacBook Pro was also updated-not a complete makeover as with the 15-inch MacBook Pro, but more of a minor update.
The system continues to use the same chassis design as before, and doesn't have the glass-touch trackpad.
One key change is that the old native screen resolution of 1680 x 1050 has been discontinued-every 17-inch MacBook Pro now comes with the 1920 x 1200 screen, in either (standard) glossy (no-cost option) matte form.
While CPU speeds remain the same (2.5GHz stock, and $250 for an upgrade to 2.6GHz), RAM has been increased from 2GB to 4GB (the maximum possible), and the hard drive size has increased to 320GB from 250GB.
The standard drive is still a 5400rpm model, with (as before) the option of a 320GB 7200rpm drive.
New to the 17-inch MacBook Pro, however, is an optional 128GB solid-state drive, as used in the updated MacBook Air.
The MacBook Pros are shipping today.
Apple Inc on Tuesday (Jan 6) introduced what it claims to be the world's thinnest and lightest 17-inch laptop with a new unibody aluminium enclosure and a built-in battery said to deliver up to eight hours of use and a lifespan three times longer than conventional laptop batteries.
It also announced a revamp of its iLife suite of digital lifestyle software at the Macworld Expo trade show here, in particular the iPhoto photo management software which now comes with face detection technology and built-in support for Facebook.
Consumers can also teach themselves to play musical instruments with the new version of GarageBand music creation software.
Conspicuously missing from this year's expo is the company's iconic CEO Steve Jobs, who is recuperating from a health problem.
His place as keynote presenter was taken over by vice-president of worldwide product marketing Phil Schiller.
In a two hour-long keynote, Schiller showcased the star attraction of the expo, the top-of-the-line 17-inch Apple MacBook Pro that now features a design similar to Apple's two other laptops, the 13-inch MacBook and the 15-inch MacBook Pro.
Its body, carved out of a single block of aluminium, measures just 2.5cm thick.
The laptop weighs less than 2.99kg.
A high resolution, low power consumption LED-backlit display and a large button-less trackpad made of glass has now made its way into the laptop as well.
A new built-in battery powers the laptop for eight hours on a single charge.
Touted as the greenest notebook family, the new MacBook Pro's battery allows up to 1,000 recharges for more than three times the lifespan of conventional laptop batteries.
The typical lifespan for laptop batteries is about three years.
The new 17-inch MacBook Pro will retail in Malaysia for RM10,099.
iPhoto, one of five digital lifestyle software in the iLife 09 suite now, has new features called Places and Faces.
Places automatically imports photo location data from a GPS-enabled camera or an Apple iPhone, while with Faces, iPhoto automatically scans photos to detect people's faces and when names are assigned to those faces, iPhoto will find more pictures of that person.
Taking things a step further, a button in iPhoto enables not just convenient publishing of photos on photo sharing websites such as Facebook and Flickr, but also to detect even more faces on the Internet.
Calling them ``really powerful'', Schiller demonstrated how these features help organise thousands of photos.
The updated GarageBand 09 allows budding musicians to learn to play the piano and guitar at their own pace.
Basic Lessons allow newbies to learn the fundamentals while a feature called Artist Lessons has original artists including John Fogerty, Colbie Caillat, Norah Jones and Sting showing how to play their hit songs.
``iLife has become one of the reasons people buy a Mac today.
There's nothing like it on any other computing platform,'' said Schiller.
Priced at RM299 for single user, iLife 09 will ship end of January.
Also announced at Macworld were updates to the company's iWork office productivity suite.
Called iWork 09, the three software that makes up the suite, namely Keynote, Pages and Numbers have received new themes, sophisticated transition effects and a quick way to group and summarise data.
iWork 09 is available immediately for RM299.
The ``one more thing'' announcement -- Jobs' trademark way of announcing something unexpected -- was reserved for a new three-tier pricing for Apple's iTunes online music store which is not available in Malaysia.
Jobs, who survived a pancreatic cancer in 2004 and appeared to be losing weight throughout 2008, on Monday (Jan 5) wrote a personal letter addressed to the Apple community, saying doctors have pinpointed hormone imbalance as the reason for his illness.
``The remedy for this nutritional problem is relatively simple and straightforward, and I've already begun treatment,'' he wrote, adding that he would remain as Apple's CEO and expects to be back in shape by Spring this year.
The only hardware release at Macworld Expo 2009 was a predictable unibody upgrade for the 17-inch MacBook Pro, which Apple reports will have an eight-hour battery life.
Eight hours is surely impressive for such a large, powerful notebook. 
But this news is nonetheless underwhelming for several reasons.
Some thought Apple was strategically waiting so it could ship the 17-inch MacBook Pro with a low-cost, quad-core processor.
Intel released such a chip just recently, and APC suspected this CPU would appear in Apple's top-of-the-line notebook.
But much to our disappointment, the 17-incher is shipping with a plain ol' dual-core (Core 2 Duo) chip.
True, at 2.66 GHz it's slightly faster than the other MacBook Pros.
But there are hardly any substantial changes to justify the longer wait for this notebook.
Apple was able to beef up the MacBook Pro's battery by taking advantage of the generous amount of space available in the notebook's enclosure.
This battery is also non-removable, which Apple said was necessary to use as much space as possible.
Apple also claims the new MacBook Pro's battery is more environmentally friendly because it lasts five years and has fewer toxins.
Looks like our Apple source, and several others in various blogs, were incorrect about the rumor of a new Mac Mini launching at Macworld.
We'll look into the reasons why and provide an update soon.
For me the new, unibody MacBook Pro 17-inch (PN MB604LL/A) is probably the most exciting thing announced here at Macworld Expo.
Not only because I'm more of a hardware guy but also because I'm a MacBook freak.
So, where to start?
The MBP has three compelling new features.
The new MBP17 has a matte screen option.
Can I get a Hallelujah?!
I've been a staunch critic of glossy displays in MacBooks, and I'm not the only one.
It appears that Cupertino is finally listening.
The unibody MacBook Pro 17 is the first in the new form-factor MacBooks to offer a configuration with a matte screen Apple calls ``antiglare.''
It's a $50 option though, which is a bit of a slap in the face.
If I'm spending $2,800 on a notebook computer you'd think that Apple would throw in the matte screen option.
But at least it's available, which is excellent.
The question that remains is if the matte screen option will trickle down to the MBP15 and even the MB13.
Representatives in the Apple booth didn't know the answer when I asked them today.
The new MBP17 can support up to 8GB of maximum RAM (and has 4GB standard) which is a huge step in the right direction.
If you can get past the 8GB $1,200 sticker price, that is.
I'm sure that the RAM price is so high because the new 17 ships with two, 2GB 1066MHz DDR3 SDRAM modules and both have to be removed and replaced with two, 4GB modules to get to 8GB.
Prices will eventually come down and 8GB is an attractive option for memory hungry applications and anything to do with virtualization.
The MBP17's fixed battery is a bit of a scandal.
It's as if Apple didn't learn its lesson with the MacBook Air and iPhone batteries.
After watching the video by the battery engineers during today's keynote, I'm partially convinced.
Their justification is that fixed batteries save a lot of room previously occupied by connectors, latches and doors.
A fixed battery can use more internal real estate in the enclosure to store power - goes the refrain. As a result the MBP17 fixed battery holds 40 percent more energy and will last up to 8 hours on a charge (7 hours when using the faster NVIDIA 9600M GT chip) according to Apple.
I'm curious about the real-world run times though.
Most companies base their battery benchmarks on perfect world conditions and it will be interesting to see how long the new battery really lasts.
The third USB port is a welcome addition but it comes at the expense of a dedicated FW400 port on the previous model.
Solid State Drives (SSDs) are now available as 128MB (+$500) and 256MB (+$900) options.
In case you're wondering, a maxed out MBP17 configuration (2.93GHz, 8GB, 256GB SSD and anti-glare) will set you back $5,250. 
Start saving your nickels and dimes, kids.
I'm going to wait and see if the anti-glare screen trickles down to the MBP 15-inch before diving in, although the 8GB of RAM is attractive.
Israel's assault on Gaza has exacted the bloodiest toll of civilian lives yet, when the bombing of UN schools being used as refugee centres and of housing killed more than 50 people, including an entire family of seven young children.
The UN protested at a ``complete absence of accountability'' for the escalating number of civilian deaths in Gaza, saying ``the rule of the gun'' had taken over.
Doctors in Gaza said more than 40 people died, including children, in what appears to be the biggest single loss of life of the campaign when Israeli bombs hit al-Fakhora school, in Jabaliya refugee camp, while it was packed with hundreds of people who had fled the fighting.
Most of those killed were in the school playground and in the street, and the dead and injured lay in pools of blood.
Pictures on Palestinian TV showed walls heavily marked by shrapnel and bloodstains, and shoes and shredded clothes scattered on the ground.
Windows were blown out.
Hours before, three young men who were cousins died when the Israelis bombed Asma elementary school in Gaza City.
They were among 400 people who had sought shelter there after fleeing their homes in Beit Lahiya, in northern Gaza.
Abed Sultan, 20, a student, and his cousins, Rawhi and Hussein Sultan, labourers aged 22, died.
Abed Sultan's father, Samir, said the bodies were so mangled that he could not tell his son from the cousins.
``We came to the school when the Israelis warned us to leave,'' he said.
``We hoped it would be safe.
We were 20 in one room.
We had no electricity, no blankets, no food.
``Suddenly we heard a bomb that shook the school.
Windows smashed.
Children started to scream.
A relative came and told me one of my sons was killed.
I found my son's body with his two cousins.
They were cut into pieces by the shell.''
The UN was particularly incensed over targeting of the schools, because Israeli forces knew they were packed with families as they had ordered them to get out of their homes with leaflet drops and loudspeakers.
It said it had identified the schools as refugee centres to the Israeli military and provided GPS coordinates.
Israel accused Hamas of using civilians as cover, and said the Islamist group could stop the assault on Gaza by ending its rocket attacks on Israel.
The Palestinian authority president, Mahmoud Abbas, last night delivered an impassioned plea to the UN security council to act immediately to stop the Israeli operation, which he described as a ``catastrophe'' for his people.
Israel has agreed a ``humanitarian corridor'' to allow Palestinians to get essential goods.
The rising casualty toll, more than 640 Palestinians killed since the assault began 12 days ago, gave fresh impetus to diplomatic efforts.
The White House offered its first hint of concern at Israel's actions by calling on it to avoid civilian deaths.
The president-elect, Barack Obama, broke his silence by saying he was ``deeply concerned'' about civilian casualties on both sides.
He said he would have ``plenty to say'' about the crisis after his swearing in.
Gordon Brown said the Middle East was facing its ``darkest moment yet'' but hoped a ceasefire could be arranged soon.
Explaining its attack on al-Fahora school, the Israeli military claimed that a mortar was fired from the playground, and it responded with a single shell whichkilled known Hamas fighters; the resulting explosion was compounded because Hamas ``booby-trapped the school''.
Two Hamas militants were among the dead, both part of a rocket-launching cell.
The head of the UN Palestinian refugee agency, John Ging, said three shells landed at the perimeter of the school.
``It was entirely inevitable if artillery shells landed in that area there would be a high number of casualties,'' he said.
He said UN staff vetted those Palestinians who sought shelter at the school.
``So far we've not had violations by militants of our facilities,'' he said, though responding to questions he accepted there had been clashes between Hamas and the Israeli army in the area.
Earlier in the day, Ging visited Gaza's hospital and was shocked at the scale of civilian casualties.
``What you have in this hospital is the consequences of political failure and the complete absence of any accountability for actions that are being taken.
It's the rule of the gun now, and it has to stop,'' he said.
At least 12 of one family, seven children aged from one to 12, three women and two men, were killed in an air strike on their house in Gaza City.
Nine others were believed trapped.
Israel continues to insist most of those killed by its forces are Hamas and Islamic Jihad fighters - although its assertion it is going to extraordinary lengths to target only ``terrorists'' has been undermined by a tank firing on a building used by Israeli troops, killing four of them, on Monday.
Another soldier was killed yesterday as Israeli forces continued their push into Gaza City.
Tanks and troops also moved on the southern town of Khan Yunis.
The invasion has yet to achieve what Israel says is its goal of stopping rocket attacks.
Hamas fired more than 30 into Israel yesterday, one to within 20 miles of Tel Aviv at Gadera, wounding a baby.
The de facto Hamas prime minister in Gaza, Ismail Haniyeh, issued a statement from hiding, saying that the Gazans would defeat Israel.
``[Israel] has failed to force the population to surrender,'' he said.
No militants were inside a United Nations-run school attacked by Israeli forces in Gaza, leaving 40 people dead, the UN says.
Christopher Gunness from the UN Relief and Works Agency said an initial investigation left him 99.9 per cent sure there were no militants at the school.
About 1000 people were sheltering in the school after having been hounded from their homes by warfare, he said.
Mr Gunness slammed the Israeli attack on the school.
``Of course it's appalling,'' he told ABC Television from Jerusalem.
``This fighting has to stop.''
``Enough people, among them women and children, have died.''
Mr Gunness said civilian deaths were an inevitable consequence of attacking a crowded place like Gaza.
``Imagine a situation where someone says we're going to plan a massive air bombardment, but it'll be pinprick and surgical, on downtown Sydney,'' he said.
The United Nations on Wednesday denied Israel Defense Forces claims that there were Palestinian militants in the Gaza school bombed by Israel on Tuesday.
Christopher Gunness of the UN Relief and Works Agency (UNRWA) said the organization is 99.9 percent certain there were no militants or military activity in its school.
That does not necessarily contradict Israel's claim that the militants were operating close by, Gunness said.
Gunness put the death toll of the shelling at 40, and added that the agency wants an impartial investigation of witnesses, Israeli military photographs or any other evidence.
The IDF on Tuesday released video footage from 2007 showing Palestinian militants firing from the school compound and carrying a rocket launcher with them as they flee the scene.
SEVENTEEN hours after the attack on one of his schools killed 40 Palestinians seeking shelter from Israel's war on Hamas, the United Nations' director of operations in Gaza, John Ging, was certain of at least one thing ``We have established beyond any doubt that the school was not being used by any militants,'' Mr Ging told The Age last night.
``They were innocent people.''
Speaking by phone from the UN's Relief and Works Agency in Gaza, Mr Ging struggled to contain his anger at the attack that has also left more 50 people with serious injuries, 10 of whom remain critical.
Israel has demanded that Hamas be prevented from rearming as a main condition for a ceasefire.
When the Israeli attack came on the Prep C girls school in the Jabaliya camp at 3.45pm on Tuesday, Mr Ging said about 350 Palestinians were inside, using the school as a shelter.
``The reason they were in the school is because the Israelis had told them to go there,'' he said.
``They were doing exactly as they had been told.''
To ensure there was no confusion about the school's location, Mr Ging said the United Nations gave specific GPS co-ordinates to Israeli Defence Forces commanders.
But after receiving reports that mortar shells had been fired at Israeli units from within the school grounds, the commanders decided to strike back.
``They shot back to save their own lives,'' said Israeli Defence Forces spokesman Ilan Tal.
Three tanks shells exploded just outside the school grounds, causing pandemonium inside.
``As you can imagine, this was a very distressing attack,'' Mr Ging said.
``It has killed 40 people, and some of those who were injured may yet die.
``Now we need to know how this happened.
A full, transparent and independent inquiry has to be held to determine exactly how this occurred.''
The Israeli Defence Forces maintained that mortars had been fired from the school.
In a statement released by spokesman Captain Benjamin Rutland, it said it had incontrovertible evidence to support its version of events.
``This is not the first time that Hamas has fired mortars and rockets from schools, in such a way deliberately using civilians as human shields in their acts of terror against Israel,'' the statement said. 
Brigadier-General Avi Benayahu said the Israeli Defence Forces had established that Hamas terror operatives were among the dead at the school, and had proof of a mortar battery cell that had been firing in the area.
``Hamas operatives Imad Abu Askhar and Hassan Abu Askhar were among terrorists that were identified to be killed,'' he said.
The attack on the school has caused widespread shock across Israel, intensifying pressure on Prime Minister Ehud Olmert to reach a ceasefire.
After 13 days of bombardment of Gaza from the air, land and sea, which has claimed more than 660 lives, the past few days of fighting have been among the bloodiest in the history of the Israel-Palestinian conflict.
Five Israeli soldiers lost their lives on Wednesday, four from friendly fire, bringing to 10 the number of Israelis who have been killed.
Just before midnight on Tuesday, three Gazans were killed when Israeli forces attacked another UN school in Gaza City.
Earlier that day, a shell hit a house in the Beach refugee camp, killing at least seven members of one family.
Shelling of houses in the Bureij refugee camp left at least five dead and 16 injured.
United Nations Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon today spoke out against Israel's ``totally unacceptable'' attacks against three clearly-marked United Nations schools, where civilians were seeking refuge from the ongoing conflict in Gaza, with a senior official calling for an independent inquiry into the incidents which claimed dozens of lives.
More than two dozen schools run by the UN Relief and Works Agency for Palestine Refugees in the Near East (UNRWA) are serving as temporary shelters to more than 15,000 Palestinians whose homes have been destroyed or who are fleeing the violence.
The agency's education programmes have been suspended since the start of Israeli air attacks on Gaza, which Israel says it launched in response to rocket attacks by Hamas militants, on 27 December.
Civilians ``are seeking sanctuary in UNRWA schools because they have no other place to go and are not able to flee the Gaza Strip,'' Mr. Ban said in a statement.
Some 30 people were killed and 55 others injured, five of them critically, when three artillery shells landed at the perimeter of a school, which usually serves as a girls' preparatory school, in the Jabaliya refugee camp, according to John Ging, UNRWA's Director of Operations.
Also in Jabaliya, a boys' school was attacked but it was empty, he said.
Last night, three Palestinians, who had sought refuge in a small co-educational UN school in Gaza City, died when a missile hit the building's toilet facilities.
The three men who were killed were ``Gazans who had fled their home earlier that day,'' the UNRWA official said, adding that they thought ``they would be safe in a UN school in Gaza City.''
These attacks reinforce the urgent need for a ceasefire to end the mounting casualties, he said, demanding an independent investigation into these attacks.
``I sincerely hope that for the sake of those that have died, that it would not have been in vain.''
In a separate incident, seven UN staff were injured, three seriously, along with three patients, when a strike on a nearby building caused significant collateral damage to a UNRWA health centre.
``The location of all UN facilities have been communicated to the Israeli authorities and are known to the Israeli army,'' the Secretary-General said.
After earlier strikes, Israel's Government had been warned that its operations were endangering UN facilities.
``I am deeply dismayed that despite these repeated efforts, today's tragedies have ensued,'' he said.
The Israeli attacks against UN sites housing civilians seeking refuge are ``totally unacceptable and must not be repeated,'' Mr. Ban stressed.
``Equally unacceptable are any actions by militants which endanger the Palestinian civilian population.''
These events highlight the dangers posed by continued and stepped up fighting, he said, reiterating his call for an immediate ceasefire.
Mr. Ban will speak further about the latest developments in Gaza and southern Israel during a public meeting this evening of the UN Security Council, chaired by French Foreign Minister Bernard Kouchner.
The Council had met behind closed doors on Saturday after Israel expanded its week-old air strikes into a ground offensive into Gaza, but reached no formal agreement regarding the violence and worsening humanitarian situation.
Brussels condemns Israeli bombing of UN school
Pressure to obtain a ceasefire in Gaza has been mounting, with the EU warning Israel it was ``destroying'' its image, while Israeli forces on Tuesday (6 January) killed at least 40 people during an attack on a United Nations-run school in Gaza.
The Israeli attack on the Fakhora school in the northern town of Jabaliya, which also wounded around 100 people, was the deadliest single strike of the offensive so far and the third UN school to come under fire within 24 hours.
The bombing has drawn international condemnation, with the EU calling it ``completely unacceptable.''
``We think the attack is completely unacceptable and strongly condemn the fact that civilians were hit while sheltering themselves from the violence,'' said Cristina Gallach, spokesperson of EU foreign policy chief Javier Solana.
John Ging, the head of the UN Relief and Works agency, through which most EU aid to Gaza is distributed alongside the Red Cross and Red Crescent condemned the attack as ``horrific'' and suggested Israel knew it was targetting a UN facility.
``We have provided the GPS co-ordinates of every single one of our locations,'' he told the BBC.
``They are clearly marked with UN insignia, flags flying, lights shining on the flags at night.
It's very clear that these are United Nations installations.''
The Israeli military however argued Hamas fighters had fired mortar shells at their forces from the school and they had to return fire.
In the aftermath of the school attack, Tel Aviv decided to allow the establishment of a ``humanitarian corridor'' into the Gaza Strip, premier Ehud Olmert's office said last night.
Christopher Gunness, spokesman for the UN Relief and Works Agency (UNRWA) described the situation on the ground to the EUobserver.
Some 1 million Gazans are currently without electricity, another 250,000 are without running water, and every hospital is running on emergency generators.
UNRWA hands out food to 750,000 people daily, but Mr Gunness warned that they will run out of food ``in days, rather than weeks'', and there was no food distribution on Tuesday at all.
Tzipi Livni, the Israeli foreign minister said several times last week that there is no humanitarian crisis in the occupied territory, and the Israeli ambassador to the EU yesterday told this website that Ms Livni had explained to the EU peace delegation on Monday:
``Everything is being done and will be done to avoid a humanitarian crisis.''
The UN's Mr Gunness disagreed with the minister:
``There is a humanitarian crisis already, so she's not managed to avoid one.''
``It's impossible to do our jobs. The reason we had to cancel food distribution today is because our trucking contractor had two relatives killed by the Israelis.
There was a wake organised but then that was attacked too.
It's just too dangerous for them to be driving around.''
``During the period of relative calm of about five-six months following the 19 July truce, we regularly asked to get aid in, but Israel didn't give permission.''
On 19 June 2008, a six-month Egypt-brokered truce agreement was reached between Hamas and Israel.
Tel Aviv however broke the cease-fire on 4 November 2008, when Israeli troops raided the Gaza Strip and killed six Hamas gunmen.
At the time, Israel claimed Hamas was planning to use a tunnel to capture Israeli soldiers.
The truce completely broke down on 20 December, when Hamas officially announced that they would not be extending the cease-fire, and began launching rockets targetting southern Israel once again.
Meanwhile, Egypt has put forward a truce plan that would include an immediate ceasefire, as well as meetings in Cairo between leaders of Israel and ``Palestinian factions,'' news wires report.
Details of the proposal are not known yet, but its main focus is to halt the violence and secure borders between Gaza and Israel, as well as Gaza and Egypt - so as to limit arms smuggling from Egypt into the Gaza Strip.
According to the BBC, both Palestinian Authority President Mahmoud Abbas and the US have backed the proposal.
Israel has said it would look into the suggestion.
``I am very sure it will be considered ... we take it very, very seriously,'' Gabriela Shalev, Israel's ambassador to the UN, was quoted as saying by Reuters.
More than 600 Palestinians have been killed so far in the 12 days of the Israeli offensive into Gaza, and around 3,000 have been wounded.
Palestinian health ministry officials say at least 195 of the victims are children.
Israel has so far lost seven soldiers and four civilians in the conflict.
The EU has also warned Israel that the offensive was tarnishing its image, German news agency DPA reports.
``We have come to Israel in order to advance the initiative for a humanitarian ceasefire and I will tell you, Mr President, that you have a serious problem with international advocacy, and that Israel's image is being destroyed,'' EU foreign affairs commissioner Benita Ferrero-Waldner told Israeli President Shimon Peres during the visit of an EU delegation in the region.
But Mr Peres retorted that Israel was fighting other wars and a public image one was not among them.
``Europe must open its eyes.
We are not in the business of public relations or improving our image.
We are fighting against terror, and we have every right to defend our citizens,'' he told an EU ministerial delegation, AFP reports.
An Israeli mortar strike that killed about 40 Palestinians sheltering in a UN school Tuesday brought new urgency to diplomatic efforts to end Israel's military onslaught in the Gaza Strip, as the UN Security Council met to discuss the crisis.
With the conflict now having taken more than 600 lives and aid agencies warning of a deepening humanitarian crisis in Gaza-where large areas are without power and water
Israel said early Wednesday that it would suspend attacks in some areas so a ``humanitarian corridor'' could be created to deliver vital supplies.
The Israeli army said the UN school in the Jabaliya refugee camp was hit when troops responded to a mortar attack from the grounds and that the dead included a number of Hamas militants.
A military spokesman said he had no information on whether troops had identified the hundreds of civilians in the school compound before they returned fire.
The carnage appeared to intensify international efforts to arrange a cease-fire after 11 days of a punishing Israeli offensive against Hamas, just as deadly strikes on civilians in previous conflicts with guerrillas in Lebanon raised pressure on Israel to halt hostilities.
In the 2006 Lebanon war, 28 Lebanese civilians were killed in an Israeli bombing in the village of Qana, and a shelling that killed more than 100 Lebanese sheltering in a UN compound in the same village hastened the end of a major Israeli assault on Hezbollah in 1996.
At the Security Council on Tuesday, French Foreign Minister Bernard Kouchner urged support for a cease-fire plan announced in Egypt by President Hosni Mubarak and French President Nicolas Sarkozy.
U.S. Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice welcomed the initiative but told the council that any agreement must halt rocket attacks from Gaza and arms smuggling into the Hamas-ruled territory.
Israel has insisted that any truce must ensure that Hamas cannot re-arm.
The mortar strike in Jabaliya was the second attack on a school run by the UN Relief and Works Agency, or UNRWA.
In an earlier airstrike, three cousins who had taken refuge with hundreds of other people in a UN school were killed.
An Israeli army spokesman said he had no information about the incident.
Shifa Hospital, Gaza's main medical center, said 42 people were killed in the Jabaliya school, where more than 300 Palestinians had taken shelter from fighting around their homes.
The UN said earlier that it had confirmed 30 dead and 55 wounded, 15 critically.
``There's nowhere safe in Gaza,'' said John Ging, the head of UNRWA in Gaza, after the first school was hit.
``Everyone here is terrorized and traumatized.''
The UN said some 14,000 Palestinians displaced from their homes were in emergency shelters.
UNRWA spokesman Christopher Gunness said that the schools hit were clearly marked with a UN flag and that the GPS coordinates of all UN installations in Gaza had been given some time ago to the Israelis.
He said UNRWA wants an impartial probe of the Israeli strike that could also determine whether militants had used the school for a mortar attack.
Israeli Foreign Minister Tzipi Livni told reporters she was unfamiliar with details of the Jabaliya incident but ``unfortunately, [Hamas militants] are hiding among civilians.''
Mohammad Awad, hospitalized with shrapnel wounds in the legs and face, said he had come to the school with his family after his house was destroyed in the bombing of a neighboring home of a Hamas leader.
He said he and other men had been sitting in the schoolyard when shells hit the compound.
``I saw bodies flying and people torn to pieces,'' he said.
Majed Hamdan, an Associated Press photographer, said that at the local hospital, ``I saw women and men-parents-slapping their faces in grief, screaming, some of them collapsed to the floor.
They knew their children were dead.''
Umm Ibrahim, a hospitalized woman, said she had lost an 8-year-old daughter and two sons, 11 and 14. She said she had come to the school after a phone warning from the Israelis that the family house would be struck because one son was a Hamas militant.
``We escaped death in our house, but it pursued us to the school,'' she said.
``What can we do?
Where should we go?''
In an earlier Israeli strike in the Zeitoun neighborhood of Gaza City, at least 12 members of the extended Daya family were killed when their house collapsed after it was hit by missiles, medical officials and a surviving relative said.
Other family members were missing and feared dead in the rubble.
The army said it was checking the report.
The civilian death toll in Gaza increased dramatically today, with reports of more than 40 Palestinians killed after missiles exploded outside a UN school where hundreds of people were sheltering from the continuing Israeli offensive.
Two Israeli tank shells struck the school in Jabaliya refugee camp, spraying shrapnel on people inside and outside the building, according to news agency reports.
The medical director of the hospital in Jabaliya told the Guardian 41 bodies had been brought in so far and more could be on the way.
Reuters journalists filmed bodies scattered on the ground amid pools of blood and torn shoes and clothes.
In addition to the dead, several dozen people were wounded, hospital officials said.
The Israeli military said it was looking into the reports.
A United Nations official in Gaza said the school was clearly marked with a UN flag and its location had been reported to Israeli authorities.
John Ging, director of operations in Gaza for UNRWA, the United Nations Relief and Works Agency, said that three artillery shells landed at the perimeter of the school where 350 people were taking shelter.
``Of course it was entirely inevitable if artillery shells landed in that area there would be a high number of casualties,'' he said.
Asked whether there were Hamas militants in the area at the time of the attack, Ging said it was the scene of clashes ``so there's an intense military and militant activity in that area.''
He said UN staff vetted Palestinians seeking shelter at their facilities to make sure militants were not taking advantage of them. ``So far we've not had violations by militants of our facilities,'' he said.
Ging called for an independent investigation of the strikes near UN facilities.
``I saw a lot of women and children wheeled in,'' Fares Ghanem, a hospital official told the Associated Press.
``A lot of the wounded were missing limbs and a lot of the dead were in pieces.''
Majed Hamdan, an AP photographer, who rushed to the scene shortly after the attacks , said many children were among the dead.
``I saw women and men parents slapping their faces in grief, screaming, some of them collapsed to the floor.
They knew their children were dead,'' he said.
``In the morgue, most of the killed appeared to be children.
In the hospital, there wasn't enough space for the wounded.''
Elsewehere, at least 12 members of an extended family, including seven young children, were killed in an air strike on their house in Gaza City.
The bodies of the Daya family were pulled from the rubble of a house in Gaza city's Zeitoun district after it was hit by two Israeli missiles.
The dead included seven children aged from one to 12 years, three women and two men.
Nine other people were believed to be trapped in the rubble.
Hours earlier, three young men - all cousins - died when the Israelis bombed another UN school, the Asma primary school in Gaza City.
They were among about 400 people who sought shelter there after fleeing their homes in Beit Lahiya in northern Gaza.
The UN, which said the school in Jabaliya was clearly marked, said it was ``strongly protesting these killings to the Israeli authorities and is calling for an immediate and impartial investigation''.
``Where it is found that international humanitarian law has been violated, those responsible must be held to account.
Under international law, installations such as schools, health centres and UN facilities should be protected from attack.
Well before the current fighting, the UN had given to the Israeli authorities the GPS co-ordinates of all its installations in Gaza, including Asma elementary school.''
The killings take the total toll in Palestinian lives since the Israelis launched their assault on the Gaza Strip 11 days ago to above 600.
Doctors at Gaza hospitals say that at least one-fifth of the victims are children and a large number of women are among the dead.
Israel continues to insist that the bulk of those killed are Hamas and Islamic Jihad fighters, although its claim to be going to extraordinary lengths to target only ``terrorists'' has been undermined by one of its own tanks firing on a building being used by Israeli troops, killing four.
The sharp spike in the number of civilian casualties came as Israeli troops and tanks moved into Gaza's second largest city, Khan Younis, for the first time today, supported by intensive artillery strikes as the military pledged to press on with its attack.
In a separate attack earlier in the day, three Palestinians were killed in an air strike on another school run by Unwra, the UN relief agency.
Nine Israelis, including three civilians hit by rocket fire, have been killed in the conflict.
At least five rockets fired from Gaza landed in Israel today, including one that hit the town of Gadera, 17 miles from Tel Aviv, police said.
A three-year-old girl was wounded.
The heaviest fighting has been in northern Gaza, with witnesses reporting wave after wave of bombing strikes across the north of the territory accompanied by gunfire from helicopters and artillery from land and sea.
Thousands of Palestinians have been ordered to leave their homes or forced to flee the fighting.
In Shajaiyeh, east of Gaza City, Israeli troops seized control of three apartment blocks and set up gun positions on the rooftops.
Residents were locked in their homes and soldiers confiscated their mobile phones, neighbours said.
Three of the four Israeli soldiers killed by friendly fire died when a tank mistakenly fired on a building where the soldiers had taken up positions.
There was heavy artillery fire to cover the evacuation of 24 soldiers who were injured, including the commander of the Golani infantry brigade, one of Israel's key fighting forces.
Israel's defence minister, Ehud Barak, said his country's troops would continue their operation despite mounting Palestinian casualties and growing international calls for a ceasefire.
``Hamas has so far sustained a very heavy blow from us, but we have yet to achieve our objective, and therefore the operation continues,'' Barak said.
The Israeli foreign minister, Tzipi Livni, said the offensive was intended to change permanently the shape of Israel's conflict with Hamas.
``When Israel is targeted, Israel is going to retaliate,'' she said.
Israel has rejected calls for a ceasefire.
The military said it had bombed more smuggling tunnels across the border with Egypt, in the south, and hit more than 40 other sites across Gaza including buildings storing weapons and rocket launching areas.
In Gaza, Mahmoud Zahar, the most senior leader of Hamas in the strip and a hardliner in the movement, appeared on the party's al-Aqsa television station and gave a defiant speech threatening attacks not only in Gaza but elsewhere.
``The Zionists have legitimised the killing of their children by killing our children.
They have legitimised the killing of their people all over the world by killing our people,'' Zahar said.
He urged Hamas fighters to ``crush your enemy''.
Another Hamas figure, a recognised military spokesman called Abu Ubaida, said thousands of Hamas fighters were waiting in Gaza to take on the Israeli military, and that rocket attacks would increase.
More than 40 were fired into southern Israel yesterday, including one that landed in an empty kindergarten, which, like all schools near the Gaza border, has been closed since the conflict began.
Israeli police said a total of 520 rockets had been fired in the past 11 days of fighting.
Israeli troops are now deployed in and around the major urban areas of Gaza, particularly to the north, in Beit Hanoun, Beit Lahiya and Jabaliya. 
Using leaflets, telephone calls and radio announcements, they have ordered residents in many areas to leave their homes, forcing at least 15,000 Palestinians to flee to safety elsewhere.
At least 5,000 are staying in 11 different UN schools and shelters.
The UN said more than 1 million Gazans were still without electricity or water and that it was increasingly difficult for staff to distribute aid or reach the injured.
It said more industrial diesel was needed to reopen the strip's sole power plant, which has been shut for a week.
Ten transformers have been damaged in the fighting.
More wheat grain is needed for food handouts, and the UN said Karni, the main commercial crossing, should be reopened to allow it in.
Four ambulances and three mobile clinics were destroyed when bombs hit the headquarters of the Union of Health Care Committees in Gaza City.
John Holmes, the UN emergency relief coordinator, said Gaza represented an ``increasingly alarming'' humanitarian crisis, and that the territory was running low on clean water, power, food, medicine and other supplies since Israel began its offensive.
Israeli leaders claim there is no humanitarian crisis.
THE UN has disputed claims that Hamas militants fired mortars from the Gaza school that has suffered the deadliest attack of the war with Israel.
Three shells hit Fakhura, a girls elementary school in the Jabalya refugee camp in northern Gaza, at about 3pm on Tuesday (12am yesterday), according to UN Relief and Works Agency spokesman Christopher Gunness.
At least 43 people were killed and 55 wounded in the school, where hundreds of Palestinians had sought refuge from the fighting, pushing the Palestinian death toll above 680 since the conflict began on December 27.
Two people were killed when an artillery shell hit a UN school in the southern city of Khan Younis.
Three people also died in an air strike on another UN school in Gaza City's Shati refugee camp in the centre of the strip.
The carnage appeared to intensify international efforts to arrange a ceasefire - just as deadly strikes on civilians in previous conflicts in Lebanon raised pressure on Israel to halt hostilities.
Israel moved quickly to explain the attack on the Jabalya school, saying its forces had been fired on first.
The casualties included Hamas militants Imad and Hassan Abu Askar, both of whom had fired mortar shells at troops from the school, military officials said.
However, John Ging, the top UN refugee official in Gaza, said UN staff and Palestinian families in the school compound had been screened for weapons, and he disputed Israel's claim that mortars were fired from inside.
``As far as we are concerned, that is not true, but if Israel has evidence of that they need to provide it to an independent inquiry,'' Mr Ging said.
He added: ``There's nowhere safe in Gaza. 
Everyone here is terrorised and traumatised.''
Speaking after an initial investigation last night, Mr Gunness denied militants were at the school:
``We are 99.9 per cent sure that there were no militants or militant activities in the school and the school compound.''
Mr Gunness said earlier that schools were clearly marked with a UN flag and that the GPS co-ordinates of all UN installations in Gaza had been given some time ago to the Israelis.
He said UNRWA wanted an impartial probe of the Israeli shelling that could also determine whether militants had used the school for a mortar attack.
Mohammad Awad, in hospital with shrapnel wounds to the legs and face, said he had come to the school with his family after his house was destroyed in the bombing of a neighbouring home of a Hamas leader.
He and other men had been sitting in the schoolyard when shells hit the compound.
``I saw bodies flying and people torn to pieces,'' he said.
Umm Ibrahim said she had lost an eight-year-old daughter and two sons, 11 and 14.
She had come to the school after a phone warning from the Israelis that the family house would be struck because one son was a Hamas militant.
``We escaped death in our house, but it pursued us to the school,'' she said.
``What can we do?
Where should we go?''
Although Israel said its return fire landed outside the school, witnesses described a series of blasts, which Israeli officials said suggested militants had rigged the building with explosives.
``We face a very delicate situation where Hamas is using the citizens of Gaza as a protective vest,'' said military spokesman Brigadier General Avi Benayahu.
The incident renewed questions about Israel's ability to wage a precision war in densely populated Gaza even as its forces pushed deeper into the narrow coastal territory.
Heavy clashes continued in the north yesterday and airstrikes across the densely populated coastal strip.
An airstrike in the Gaza City neighbourhood of Zeitun, where much of the heavy fighting has taken place since ground forces invaded on Saturday, left one armed militant dead and three wounded, medics said.
Clashes were continuing in Zeitun, and there were reports of airstrikes on the southern cities of Khan Younis and Rafah.
One rocket made the deepest strike yet into Israel - about 32km from Tel Aviv.
T-Mobile is bolstering its smartphone portfolio by picking up Research In Motion (NSDQ:RIMM)'s next-generation BlackBerry Curve.
The Curve 8900 is the latest refresh of the popular Curve line, and it's the thinnest full-QWERTY BlackBerry ever.
The smartphone also takes some design cues from the BlackBerry Bold, and it has a titanium-colored finish with chrome highlights.
The handset should be able to multitask smoothly, as it's powered by a 512-MHz processor. Like other BlackBerry handsets, the Curve 8900 should have strong messaging capabilities.
Users can get personal and corporate push e-mail from up to 10 accounts, and there's built-in instant messaging.
Some users may be disappointed that the new Curve cannot use T-Mobile's growing 3G network, but the EDGE connection is more than capable of sending and receiving e-mails on the go.
There's also integrated Wi-Fi, and the Curve 8900 can be used for unlimited Wi-Fi calling with T-Mobile's HotSpot Calling service.
``With rich multimedia capabilities, exceptional mobile e-mail and messaging features, enhanced Web browsing, a premium phone, and easy access to social networking communities, including Facebook, Flickr, and MySpace.com, the BlackBerry Curve 8900 helps you make the most of a busy lifestyle that spans well beyond normal business hours,'' said Mark Guibert, VP of RIM's corporate marketing, in a statement.
The handset will come with built-in GPS that can be used for location-based searches and navigation.
The Bluetooth version 2.0 can be used to pair headsets, as well as for stereo Bluetooth headphones.
It packs a 3.2-megapixel camera that also can be used to record video.
RIM has been making strides with its multimedia capabilities, and the Curve 8900 is no exception.
The handset will be able to play multiple types of audio, and video should look crisp with the display's 480-by-360 resolution.
Users will not have to worry about running out of storage space, as the smartphone comes with a microSD slot that's expandable up to 16 GB.
T-Mobile said the new Curve will be available in February, but the company did not give a price.
T-Mobile has officially announce that they will launch the new RIM BlackBery Curve 8900 sometime in mid-February.
Previously, the date of February 11 was leaked..
The BlackBerry Curve 8900 has a full-QWERTY keyboard, GPS, Wi-Fi and 512MHz processor.
It looks like the device does not support 3G but does have world quad band support.
The 3.2-megapixel camera has image stabilization, digital zoom, flash and the ability to record video and play video, a music player, a 3.5mm stereo headset jack and headset, and a hot-swappable microSD/SDHC memory card slot with a 256MB card inserted that accept up to 16 GB.
T-Mobile customers can get mobile coverage and unlimited nationwide Wi-Fi calling with T-Mobile's Unlimited HotSpot Calling.
T-Mobile USA has just confirmed the numerous rumors that it will introduce the latest model in the BlackBerry Curve series next month.
``With rich multimedia capabilities, exceptional mobile email and messaging features, enhanced Web browsing, a premium phone and easy access to social networking communities, including Facebook, Flickr, and MySpace.com, the BlackBerry Curve 8900 helps you make the most of a busy lifestyle that spans well beyond normal business hours,'' said Mark Guibert, vice president, corporate marketing, Research In Motion.
An Overview of the BlackBerry Curve 8900
The BlackBerry Curve 8900 -- formerly known as the Javelin -- will have a full QWERTY keyboard and a 2.44-inch, HVGA + (480 by 360 pixel) display.
It will be the thinnest and lightest BlackBerry with a full keyboard.
This quad-band GSM smartphone will not have 3G, but it will include Wi-Fi b/g and Bluetooth.
It will support T-Mobile's Unlimited HotSpot Calling service -- which uses Wi-Fi VoIP -- as well as unlimited nationwide calling to five people with the myFaves service.
This smartphone will also have a 512 MHz processor, GPS receiver, a 3.2 MPx camera, and a 1400 mAHr battery.
It will include a microSD card slot and be bundled with a 256 MB card.
More information on the BlackBerry Curve 8900 is available on RIM's website.
T-Mobile USA says it will release this smartphone some time next month. Rumors say that the debut could be as early as Feb. 11.
Pricing for this model is not yet known.
Rumors have been floating for weeks now and we knew the 8900 would be coming sometime in early '09 and tonight T-Mobile has made it official.
However, the 8900 aka Curve II aka Javelin will not be hitting store shelves on the 11th or 18th according to the press release.
T-Mobile is being coy and saying it's coming sometime this month.
It could happen on those dates, but T-Mobile isn't confirming anything today.
No word on price either.
1Official specs after the jump:
RIM and T-Mobile USA have finally gone official with the BlackBerry Curve 8900, just one day after the smartphone was seen in one of T-Mo's retail stores.
So now we know for sure that the new Curve will be commercially available starting February, although an exact release date and a price were not given yet.
The 8900 is the thinnest BlackBerry ever built (only 13.5 mm), and it's also among the best looking smartphones to come form RIM.
Add Wi-Fi, GPS, a 3.2MP autofocus camera and a nice 480 x 360 pixels display to that and you have a really cool handset.
The only thing that the Curve 8900 is missing is 3G, but since T-Mobile doesn't have a nationwide 3G coverage yet, I guess this is not such a big problem.
While waiting for the new Berry to be available, you can enter a T-Mobile contest here, and maybe you'll win one for free.
Following Research In Motion's BlackBerry Bold and BlackBerry Storm entry into the U.S. smartphone market, T-Mobile's BlackBerry Curve 8900 is the thinnest and lightest QWERTY device of the burgeoning BlackBerry line of smartphones.
The new device features built-in GPS and Wi-Fi supporting voice and data in addition to the now usual smartphone lineup of a Web browser, music player and camera.
T-Mobile USA plans it own exclusive BlackBerry with the introduction of the BlackBerry Curve 8900 in February.
AT&T already has its own deal with BlackBerry maker Research In Motion to offer the BlackBerry Bold, while Verizon features the BlackBerry Storm as a smartphone.
The new hybrid, quad-band Curve 8900 is the thinnest and lightest QWERTY device of the burgeoning BlackBerry line of smartphones.
In addition to the popular keyboard, the device features built-in GPS and support of location-based services, built-in Wi-Fi 802.11b/g supporting voice and data, and support for T-Mobile's unlimited hot spot calling service.
In addition, the device has a 3.2-megapixel camera, a music player and a hot-swappable microSD/SDHC memory card slot with a 256MB card.
The new Curve also comes with support for memory cards up to 16GB.
As a quad-band world phone, the BlackBerry Curve 8900 supports international roaming, extending the ability to stay connected while traveling abroad.
RIM claims the 8900's screen is the highest resolution available on a BlackBerry smartphone.
The device also comes with a 512MHz next-generation processor, although T-Mobile plans to wed the device to its 2G EDGE network.
Like other high-end BlackBerrys, the Curve 8900 has enhanced Web browsing and access to social networking communities, including Facebook, Flickr and MySpace.
Neither RIM nor T-Mobile has announced U.S. pricing plans for the Curve 8900, but the device, which is already on the market in Canada, sells over the Internet at prices ranging from $500 to $550.
On Monday, we reported on rumors that T-Mobile would release the RIM BlackBerry Curve 8900 on February 11, and while the date has not been confirmed, the carrier did go ahead and make the official product announcement on Tuesday.
Yes, the BlackBerry Curve 8900 will make its way to T-Mobile some time in February and is being touted as the thinnest and lightest full QWERTY BlackBerry to date.
As expected, it will have integrated Bluetooth and GPS and we now know it will have built-in Wi-Fi as well as support for T-Mobile's Unlimited HotSpot Calling service.
Unfortunately, there is no 3G love.
There are plenty of other highlights, though, including a 3.2-megapixel camera, a 3.5mm headphone jack, a microSD/SDHC expansion slot (supports up to 16GB cards), and a 512MHz processor.
Pricing and an official release date were not released, but customers can sign up for alerts on T-Mobile's Web site.
T-Mobile USA, Inc. and Research In Motion today announced that T-Mobile will offer the BlackBerry Curve 8900 to customers in February.
The announcement confirms rumors from December.
The 8900 is the thinnest full-QWERTY BlackBerry smartphone yet.
Like its predecessor, the 8320, the 8900 is fully-featured with connectivity options including a built-in GPS and WiFi, something that users of T-Mobile's Unlimited HotSpot Calling service should be excited about.
Of course, the Curve 8900 has an impressive list of features of its own.
It has been upgraded with a 3.2-megapixel camera with image stabilization and video compatibility.
It sports a 512MHz processor and at 480 x 360, its the highest resolution screen available on a BlackBerry.
It supports microSD cards up to 16GB (Like the new SanDisk memory cards announced today).
Last, the Curve's Quad-band radio, with support for international roaming, should please the jet-setter.
Look for it next month at T-Mobile retail stores, authorized dealers, and online.
T-Mobile USA will launch Research In Motion's BlackBerry Curve 8900 in February, further strengthening its smartphone lineup in 2009.
The quad-band global phone has a full QWERTY keyboard and built-in GPS and WiFi capabilities.
It also has 3.2-megapixel camera, a music player, a 3.5mm stereo headset jack and a microSD slot capable of holding up to 16GB.
The device, along with the Shadow II and rumored Samsung Memoir, which will carry an 8-megapixel camera, beefs up the carrier's smartphone portfolio as it looks to expand its 3G UMTS network into 2009.
T-Mobile has not released a specific launch date or pricing information.
T-Mobile has announced it will be carrying the BlackBerry Curve 8900 smartphone this February ... although it will not offer 3G data service.
U.S. mobile operator T-Mobile has officially announced it will be offering the BlackBerry Curve 8900 smartphone this February.
Billed as RIM's lightest and thinnest QWERTY keyboard-equipped smartphone, the BlackBerry Curve 8900 features a 3.2 megapixel camera (plus an additional front-facing 400 by 352-pixel video camera for video calls), SDHC/microSD card support for up to 16 GB of storage, integrated Wi-Fi 80211b/g wireless networking, and GPS support.
The Curve 8900 also packs a 2.44-inch 480 by 360-pixel color LCD display, and includes a handsfree speakerphone as well as Bluetooth wireless device support.
According to RIM, the unit offers up to 5.5 hours of talk time and as much as 15 days of standby time.
T-Mobile has not revealed an official release date or pricing information for the BlackBerry Curve 8900, although the unit will work with T-Mobile's unlimited HotSpot Wi-Fi based calling service.
However, the 8900 will not offer 3G connectivity: users will have to paddle along on GSM/GPRS and EDGE connectivity.
Of course, the phone will include BlackBerry software, including full HTML Web browsing, BlackBerry Maps, an enhanced media player, as well as access to corporate communications system and we hear the device will even make phone calls.
Well that was a neat little progression: Early suspicions, followed by a purported internal leak, capped with an official announcement.
T-Mobile will be adding the BlackBerry Curve 8900 to their lineup come February.
The press release doesn't get any more specific than that, but seems to lend authority to the previous leak, which indicated that the 18th would be the day.
T-Mobile today announced the BlackBerry Curve 8900, the thinnest and lightest full-QWERTY BlackBerry smartphone.
The BlackBerry Curve 8900 features a titanium-colored finish with chrome highlights.
It combines a compact design with a full-QWERTY keyboard, 512MHz processor for fast and responsive performance, and built-in GPS and Wi-Fi (802.11 b/g) connectivity.
The smartphone has a 3.2-megapixel camera with image stabilization, digital zoom, flash and the ability to record video and play video.
It also features a music player with a 3.5mm stereo headset jack and headset.
Included with a 256MB memory card, consumers can purchase extra memory for the hot-swappable microSD/SDHC slot (with support for memory cards up to 16GB).
The quad-band BlackBerry Curve 8900 supports international roaming.
Customers can get unlimited nationwide Wi-Fi calling with T-Mobile's Unlimited HotSpot Calling service.
``The new BlackBerry Curve 8900 features a compact and refined design that looks and feels great,'' said Mark Guibert, Vice President of Research In Motion.
``With rich multimedia capabilities, exceptional mobile email and messaging features, enhanced Web browsing, a premium phone and easy access to social networking communities, including Facebook, Flickr and MySpace, the BlackBerry Curve 8900 helps you make the most of a busy lifestyle that spans well beyond normal business hours.''
The new BlackBerry Curve 8900 smartphone from T-Mobile is anticipated to be available in February at T-Mobile stores and online.
Research in Motion today announced that T-Mobile USA will start selling the new BlackBerry Curve 8900 smartphone to its customers.
Dubbed as the thinnest and lightest QWERTY BlackBerry, the Curve 8900 will feature built-in GPS with support of location-based services, WiFi with voice and data support, a 3.2 megapixel camera with digital zoom, image stabilization and flash, video recording and playback, a music player, a 3.5mm stereo headset jack and a microSD/SDHC memory card slot with a 256MB card included in the box.
All this running on 512MHz processor.
T-Mobile is expected to launch the BlackBerry Curve 8900 smartphone in mid-February.
Price has not been revealed.
Both chipmakers are bullish about combining, but a key issue for them will be convincing skeptics they should join together in the first place
Advanced Micro Devices (AMD) Chief Executive Hector Ruiz waxed metaphorical as he described his company's acquisition of ATI Technologies (ATYT).
Chipmaker AMD, hoping to gain a leg up on a resurgent rival Intel (INTC), on July 24 ended months of speculation by saying it would buy graphics chipmaker ATI for about $5.4 billion.
``We will move from being neighbors to being a family,'' Ruiz told analysts on a conference call.
The two companies have long partnered in the competitive market for chips that run personal computers and consumer electronics.
But under the same roof, the companies will focus on innovations that are particularly attractive to corporate and mobile-computing customers, Ruiz believes.
The enlarged chipmaker will combine AMD's strength in fast-computing power with ATI's specialty in delivering detailed graphics onto a single, low-cost chip.
But the problem with families-especially those formed by multibillion-dollar corporate mergers-is that they often end up dysfunctional.
Promised cost savings and sales increases don't always pan out, and integration of disparate cultures and operations is frequently fraught with value-destroying rifts.
Maybe that's why Intel and Nvidia (NVDA), the companies' two biggest rivals, found a lot to smile about on July 24, the day the deal was announced.
``I thought it was just impossible to get a gift like this,'' crowed Nvidia CEO Jen-Hsun Huang, in an interview with BusinessWeek.com.
ATI is ``basically throwing in the towel, leaving us as the only stand-alone (graphics chip) company in the world.''
Intel, the world's largest graphics-chipmaker, declined to comment specifically on the deal.
But company execs have noted Intel continues to improve its own graphics chipsets and that it expects to deliver platforms of products, like Centrino, that AMD cannot easily match.
Investors weren't too sure how happy the AMD and ATI family will turn out to be, either.
AMD shares fell almost 5% on July 24, to $17.40, extending recent declines fueled by concern AMD will be the biggest loser amid an escalating PC industry price war.
``The assumption of a significant amount of new debt and the need to address integration issues at a time when AMD has been seeking to step up its competitive pressure in a fierce environment with Intel is likely to weigh on AMD's share,'' Lehman Brothers semiconductor analyst Tim Luke noted in a report.
Indeed, AMD and ATI could be distracted from their core businesses for months as they combine into a company with $7.3 billion in annual sales and 15,000 employees sprawled through Canada, California, and Texas.
Credit-rating agency Fitch Ratings lowered its outlook on AMD's debt to negative from positive on concern the chipmaker's debt-to-capital ratio will jump to 37% from less than 10% because of a $2.5 billion term loan it is using to partially finance the deal.
The merger also could lock ATI out of the business of supplying graphics chipsets to Intel-based PCs, worth about $90 million a year in revenue.
ATI chipsets connect to Intel's processor through what's known as a front side bus, which serves as a highway for transferring data.
But AMD, under a different licensing deal with Intel, is not allowed to use that front side bus.
``We are evaluating the deal, and have got a lot to figure out how it would fit in with our existing agreements with both ATI and AMD,'' Intel spokesman Chuck Mulloy says.
And while ATI and AMD are busy ironing out their new relationship, Intel and Nvidia are rolling out some heavy-hitting chips of their own.
Intel and its PC partners on July 27 begin shipping for the first chips in a brand-new PC architecture called Core 2 Duo (see BusinessWeek.com, 7/24/06, ``Intel Sharpens its Offensive Game'').
First up will be desktop chips, followed closely by new energy-sipping chips for notebook PCs.
Core 2 Duo is expected to wrest the performance crown in the mainstream PC market from AMD for the first time in more than two years.
AMD will not get a chance to grab it back until mid-2007, when it is fully ramped on a new manufacturing process.
Meantime, Nvidia is prepping to deliver a new high-end graphics chip later this year that company executives herald as the biggest leap forward in nearly a decade.
After a high-profile delay in delivering a new chip in 2001, Nvidia has been steadily taking market share from ATI in the lucrative market supplying screaming-fast graphic cards to the discriminating gaming community.
AMD says there's plenty of reason to be bullish on the deal.
The company has its sights on markets where Nvidia and Intel are not as strong.
AMD President Dirk Meyer hopes to use ATI's chipset business to develop an energy-sipping combo processing and graphics chip that can be paired with software partners to deliver a platform better able to compete with Intel's new vPro offering.
Intel has won early praise from software companies and large businesses for vPro, which bakes security and virtualization directly into the chip.
With vPro, tech administrators managing thousands of PCs could partition parts of the system from workers-a feature that could keep viruses from rapidly spreading across corporate networks.
And ATI's growing business of providing graphics chipsets to cell-phone makers Nokia (NOK) and Motorola (MOT) also will give it up a leg up over Intel, he said.
Intel recently sold its cellular chip business to Marvell Technology (MRVL) for $600 million.
``Customers want to get better mobile offerings and more stable commercial offerings, but they want to know that we're still going to offer them the ability to choose,`` Meyer says.
Even if relations between AMD and Nvidia turn frosty and ATI loses Intel's business, AMD executives predict a combined offering would bring in an additional $300 million in revenue in the PC realm alone for every share point gained against Intel.
Still, not everyone's sold. Pip Coburn, founder of tech advisory firm Coburn Ventures, notes AMD has pinned its success on a range of variables.
``I don't want six reasons,'' Coburn says,
``I want two reasons, two good reasons.''
AMD's Meyer says he knows the company has some heavy lifting ahead.
``The integration task is going to require focus,'' he says.
The biggest job, however, may be convincing skeptics this family was worth forming in the first place.
RBC Capital Markets downgraded ATI Technologies to ``sector perform'' from ``outperform'' after Advanced Micro Devices announced its intention to buy the Canadian graphics chip-maker for $5.4 billion on Monday.
Even though the takeover looks fairly valued, RBC analyst Steve Arthur said there is limited upside to the offer unless competing bids are made for ATI.
For now, Arthur said AMD's takeover deal, which is expected to close in the fourth quarter, effectively offers his one-year price target of $21 now.
That price target was set prior to the takeover bid and factored in ATI's gross margin leverage, capital expenditure strength, a competitive product lineup and the launch of Microsoft (nasdaq: MSFT - news - people) Windows' new operating system, Vista, which would be a ``net positive'' for graphics-chips vendors.
Without a competitive bid to drive shares higher, ATI is unlikely to outperform, warranting a ``sector perform'' rating in the analyst's view.
Arthur said a competitive bid is possible but the two most-likely bidders, Intel (nasdaq:INTC - news - people) and Nvdidia, face prohibitive anti-trust challenges. Combined, ATI and Intel would have 68% overall market share in PC graphics, while an ATI-Nvidia partnership would effectively capture 100% of the discrete graphics market.
Other counteroffers could be made by Texas Instruments (nyse: TXN - news - people) and Broadcom (nasdaq: BRCM - news - people), which, according to Arthur, wouldn't so much face anti-trust challenges as they would compatibility challenges.
ATI a potent weapon for AMD in clash with Intel
The pitched battle for supremacy in the chip-making market reached a critical phase yesterday with Advanced Micro Devices (AMD) in Sunnyvale, Calif. announcing its decision to acquire Canadian graphic cards manufacturer ATI Technologies (ATI).
The imminent purchase of ATI, analysts say, is the most vital element in AMD's concerted campaign to dethrone the mighty Intel Corp.
AMD agreed to buy Markham, Ont-based ATI for around $5.4 billion in cash and stock, the companies announced Monday.
The acquisition, which is subject to shareholder and regulatory approvals, would turn AMD into one of the world's largest providers of graphics chips.
``You won't see it tomorrow, but the merger will potentially put AMD on a more equal footing with Intel,'' said Michelle Warren, an analyst with Evans Research in Toronto.
Another Canadian analyst noted that the merger was likely to bring significant benefits to both companies.
AMD would round out its graphics processing unit portfolio, said Eddie Chan, lead analyst, mobile and personal computing at research firm IDC Canada in Toronto. ATI, he said, also blends in well AMD's LIVE! convergence platform.
``ATI has a strong product portfolio that covers components for such offerings as mobile phones, wireless products, digital TV, and high definition TV.''
On the flip side, AMD allows ATI to hitch a ride on the integrated chip bandwagon.
Discrete graphics components have been suffering over the years as the market moves on to integrated chips such as those sold by Intel, said Chan.
``A tie-up with AMD allows ATI to move towards integrated solutions or the so-called system-on-a-chip platform.''
The marketing message from ATI executives too is all about the 'mutual benefits' of the proposed acquisition.
Adrian Hartog, senior vice-president for consumer products at ATI, characterized the alliance as a growth opportunity for both companies.
It is generally expected that the merged company will harness ATI's strong R&D track record. 
In a list released late last year of Canada's top 10 R&D spenders, ATI Technologies was in position 5.
The company spent $389.1 million in R&D in 2004, an increase of 18.3 percent.
The list was released by Toronto consulting firm Research Infosource.
The ATI research team has a proven capacity to turn major new products out every 12 to 18 months.
``Bringing these two companies together will allow us to transcend what we have accomplished as individual businesses,'' said Hector Ruiz, chairman and chief executive officer (CEO) of AMD in a statement.
``All of our product lines will benefit.''
Earlier, AMD revealed plans to build a highly efficient dual-core notebook processor, set for release in the second half of 2007.
AMD enjoys considerable strength in the server and consumer computing industry while ATI is considered a leader in the computer gaming arena.
Warren said recent years have seen these disparate markets move closer to each other.
For instance, ATI's Shader Model 3.0, which allows more complex shading and more realistic image rendering, is finding traction in the enterprise space with companies that are heavy computer-aided drafting (CAD) users, including customers in the automotive, aerospace and animation spaces.
Hartog said the purchase of ATI by AMD will involve 'some changes' but he downplayed any potential lay-offs from among the company's more than 3,000 employees.
``Ontario has one of our largest R&D teams and that arrangement will continue.
We are not anticipating any immediate lay-offs,'' Hartog said.
Any acquisition raises the issue of employment stability, said Warren, but AMD would be wise to allow ATI to continue operating as it does.
``There is a strong chance ATI will be given a measure of autonomy because it has great strength in its area.''
Warren said the alliance also ``steps up'' ATI's competition with rival Nvidia of Santa Clara, Calif. Apart from ATI, AMD also turns to Nvidia for graphics components.
``Depending on the contract, it is possible that Nvidia's access to AMD chips will be limited,'' said Warren.
If that happens, Evans Research analyst Michelle Warren said, ``it will open the doors for Nvidia to search for new options and possibly talk with Intel. 
However, Hartog said there will be no move to constrain Nvidia's supply.
``Nvidia will continue to be AMD's partner.
Both ATI and AMD are committed to open platform systems,'' he said.
``In fact that is what differentiates us to our partners and customers.''
Advanced Micro Devices Inc. shook up the personal computer industry by buying ATI Technologies Inc. for US$5.4-billion yesterday, opening up a new front in the battle with Intel Corp. to control the computer chip market.
The deal, which had been anticipated for over a year, gives AMD high-end graphics technology and bolsters the company's strategy to overtake Intel as the dominant supplier of chips that power personal computers and other devices.
As well, Intel has been a buyer of ATI's graphic chips and that relationship looks to be in jeopardy.
``This reconfigures the market and puts AMD in an amazingly new strong position,'' said Jon Peddie, an independent chip analyst in San Francisco.
The buy should also expand AMD's manufacturing capability, as well as integrate microprocessors and graphics engines in a single chip.
The acquisition is set to be wrapped up by year's end.
Advanced Micro Devices (NYSE:AMD) announced the largest acquisition in its history Monday, paying about $5.4 billion to acquire graphics chip specialist ATI Technologies.
The acquisition will let AMD expand its position in the commercial desktop and mobile computing markets, two areas where the company has not had much success.
In addition to accelerating the company's x86 processor market share battle with Intel (NSDQ:INTC), the acquisition will expand AMD's access to manufacturing capacity and will lead to products that will integrate both microprocessors and graphics engines in a single chip in future releases.
The startup manages large-scale Web infrastructures to prevent downtime related to configuration changes March Madness 2008 Was Carried In Full On The Internet, On Demand Thanks To The Technology Innovations of CBS Sports and CBS Interactive GM's tech leader talks about consolidating, re-engineering, upgrading the company's application infrastructure.
``Together we intend to create a processing powerhouse,'' said Hector Ruiz, chairman and chief executive of AMD, during a teleconference to announce the deal.
``We are confident the companies will integrate well together.
We believe that as technology advances, integration is not only inevitable, but also advantageous.''
Beginning next year, the companies will market ``customer-centric platforms'' using AMD and ATI technologies that will include all existing product offerings.
Beginning in 2008, AMD plans to introduce platforms that integrate general purpose processors and graphics engines to meet specific media, data, and graphic requirements, says Dave Orton, president and chief executive of ATI.
Bob Rivet, CFO of AMD, says the acquisition is expected to be completed by year's end.
The purchase is a combination of $4.2 billion in cash and 57 million shares of AMD stock.
AMD's current area of greatest strength is providing processors that address the server and consumer desktop market, Rivet says.
Bringing ATI's graphics technology in-house will allow AMD to better address the commercial desktop and laptop markets, he says, two areas where AMD currently has a smaller presence.
While overall sales of x86 processors currently totals about $30 billion annually, AMD is primarily addressing only a segment that totals about $13 billion, Rivet says.
By expanding more into commercial desktop and laptop markets, AMD will be able to grow its overall x86 market share.
Rivet says that each percentage of market share gained equates to about $300 million in revenue.
Ruiz says the acquisition ``opens up a broad array of options for expanding our capacity infrastructure'' by providing AMD with an expanded relationship with some of the largest semiconductor foundries in the world.
Currently AMD utilizes internal manufacturing capacity, as well as capacity from Chartered Semiconductor Manufacturing. 
ATI, however, has manufacturing relationships with two of the other largest foundries in the world, Taiwan Semiconductor Manufacturing and United Microelectronics.
The acquisition of ATI by AMD will now provide computer makers and customers with another choice for integrated microprocessor and graphics processor platforms, says Bruce Shaw, director of worldwide commercial marketing for AMD.
Currently only Intel offers an integrated platform.
Although AMD will be providing integrated platforms, it will continue to support the use of third-party graphics products, such as those from Nvidia, in combination with its processors, Shaw says.
AMD has no plans to reduce the ATI product line or back away from markets it addresses, such as cell phones, where AMD has little or no presence, he said.
ATI is expected to continue to operate out of its headquarters in Markham, Ontario, and layoffs are expected to be minimal.
Graphic Talk About Nvidia
Addressing a deficiency of its own and further upping the competitive tension between it and chief rival Intel (nasdaq: INTC - news - people), Advanced Micro Devices (nyse: AMD - news - people) intends to acquire graphics chipmaker ATI Technologies (nasdaq: ATYT - news - people) in a $5.4 billion deal.
Is Intel below $19 too cheap to last or still above what the chipmaker's worth?
The question for many is where that leaves Nvidia Corp. (nasdaq: NVDA - news - people), now the sole independent graphics chip maker addressing each of the computing, mobile communications and display markets.
We think not too much worse off than before the deal, and believe shares in the company remain a compelling way to play growth in gaming- and media-oriented computing.
Our view of the Advanced Micro Devices/ATI Technologies deal is that it's the last major move AMD needed to make to match Intel's breadth in the processor market (now that Intel has shed its communications processor business).
Intel has had for some time the ability to integrate graphics capabilities into its offerings for PC makers, resources for which AMD has had to rely on other folks, including both ATI and Nvidia.
The AMD/ATI combination now trumps Intel's strategy by adding the capacity to package higher-end chips for gaming and complex graphic manipulation.
We're not sure that's a huge game-changer for ATI in its ongoing match against Nvidia, though.
We doubt AMD would shut out Nvidia's ability to integrate with its core processors, as any such move might lessen the attractiveness of AMD's core products to that crowd.
Taiwan Semiconductor Manufacturing Co. (TSMC) shares rose yesterday after two of the world's largest chipmakers said their merger would not create a negative impact on the Hsinchu-based foundry, dispelling investors fears.
TSMC stock traded on the TAIEX closed at NT$53.8 yesterday, up NT$0.9 from the previous trading day.
Yesterday Advanced Micro Devices Inc. (AMD), a leading global CPU maker, announced its purchase of Canada-based graphics chips maker ATI Technologies Inc. in a US$5.4 billion deal that many said would help AMD compete more effectively with Intel Corp., its largest-in-the-world rival.
Analysts also said the merger would cause a reshuffle in the global PC industry, affecting chip foundries - including TSMC - that manufacture Intel-based graphics chips for ATI on an original equipment manufacturing basis.
ATI, the largest maker of computer graphics chips for notebook computers, outsources the manufacturing of its chips, while Advanced Micro has facilities to produce some of its own processors.
In a news conference announcing the merger held in Taipei yesterday, Henri Richard, executive vice president of AMD, urged investors not to worry as ATI's relations with TSMC and its rival United Microelectronics Corp. would not change.
He said ATI and its suppliers use the so-called CMOS manufacturing technology, which is different from what AMD uses.
UMC yesterday closed at NT $18, up NT $0.05.
Some analysts however expressed the concern that the merger would impact TSMC in the long run, as loss of ATI orders would cause TSMC to see its capacity utilization lowered by 20 to 30 percent.
TSMC, the world's largest maker of customized chips, said itself Monday night it will continue to manufacture for ATI.
``As part of AMD, ATI's business will continue to operate in a fabless business model and maintain its strong foundry partnership with TSMC,'' the company said in an e-mailed statement.
The company said it had held discussions with ATI, without providing details.
The merger, meanwhile, is also expected to create an impact on Taiwan's chipset manufacturers.
Via, a manufacturer of AMD-based chipsets, yesterday saw its shares drop NT$0.65 to close at NT$24.05.
Altogether the TAIEX rose 31.36 points yesterday to close at 6,390.99.
AMD's ATI acquisition will not affect India operations
India will figure prominently in AMD's $5.4bn acquisition of ATI Technologies, as both the semiconductor giants have their operations in the country.
AMD has its design centre in Bangalore while ATI's R&D unit is located in Hyderabad.
Though the exact contours of the merger and its implications in India are not known, both are expected to maintain their existing portfolios of operations as both concentrate on different segments.
``The combination will create a processing powerhouse by bringing AMD's technology leadership in microprocessors together with ATI's strength in graphics, chipsets and consumer electronics,'' AMD said in a statement.
ATI Technologies India MD Dasaradha R Gude told ET that the combination would drive growth and the Indian operations would also be expanded.
``Our work is complementary to each other and does not overlap.
With this merger, we would also be able to address bigger markets,'' he said.
The AMD statement said, ``We cannot speculate on the implications of the merger for another 90-120 days, till the time integration is complete.''
Can EDS Remain Vendor-Neutral Under HP` s Thumb?
Will EDS remain open-minded about obtaining products and services from other vendors?
Industry analysts contacted by eWEEK generally say they believe that Hewlett-Packard's forthcoming $13.9 billion acquisition of Electronic Data Systems? announced officially on May 13 is a good move for both companies, although there will be the usual integration snafus over vendor neutrality issues, business lines, culture shock and layoffs.
Analysts have also said it is a good move overall for customers and potential customers, because the combined company will offer them a greater palette of products and services from which to choose.
A combined HP-EDS will certainly put a new kind of pressure on IT services leader IBM.
IBM's $54 billion-per-year Global Services arm-by far the largest in the world-will start to feel the heat from the combined HP-EDS entity, which will start out at a net worth of $38 billion per year.
For high-end enterprise IT services before this merger, the market consisted of IBM and everybody else.
IT Swiss army knife is all can openers
The biggest unanswered question on people's minds involved vendor neutrality for EDS and its current customers.
EDS for years was a sort of IT Swiss army knife in that it used whatever products and services from other vendors were needed to complete its job correctly and within budget constraints.
With its impending new ownership by one of those key vendors, that picture may change.
``We don't know what will happen with EDS' vendor neutrality,'' Rick Sturm, founder and president of Enterprise Management Associates, told eWEEK.
Overall, my take is that this transaction sounds great in theory, but there many potential pitfalls.
This is one of them.
For example, EDS has largely standardized on management software from CA.
Will they migrate to HP software now?
That would take a long time and a lot of money,'' Sturm said.
``On the other hand, it doesn't make sense to help support a competitor with license and maintenance fees.
That is just one small point regarding neutrality.''
EDS, in fact, has a large current contract with CA for network and systems management in direct competition to HP's OpenView.
CA had no immediate comment May 13.
At least initially, Sturm said, there will be little noticeable impact on customers from the deal.
``There will probably be some service impacts once the organizations truly merge and consolidate resources,'' he said.
``[HP CIO] Randy Mott has been driving data center consolidation and standardization.
I expect that effort will be renewed with EDS.
Disruptions are inevitable with such migrations.''
Hewlett-Packard is negotiating to buy technology services provider Electronic Data Systems in a deal that could help the world's largest personal computer maker snap up more data management and consulting contracts.
Palo Alto-based HP and Plano, Texas-based EDS confirmed the talks yesterday shortly after The Wall Street Journal reported a deal could be reached as early as today.
Citing unnamed people familiar with the matter, the Journal said HP will pay $12 billion to $13 billion - a price that translates to $24 to $26 per share.
The companies declined to comment beyond their confirmation of the talks.
EDS shares soared $5.27, or nearly 28 percent, to finish yesterday at $24.13.
HP shares dropped $2.49, more than 5 percent, to close at $46.64 as investors fretted over the deal's logistics.
HP ended January with nearly $10 billion in cash.
With a market value of about $115 billion, HP could easily use its own stock to finance the purchase.
Like many corporate marriages, bringing together HP and EDS could trigger cultural clashes that ruin the union, said AMR Research analyst Dana Stiffler.
``Palo Alto versus Plano wrangling will destroy any short-medium-term benefit unless there's a strong integration road map,'' she predicted.
If the deal is completed, it would be HP's biggest acquisition since it bought Compaq Computer Corp. for $19 billion in 2002.
HP has been trying to expand its technology consulting and data management business for years, hoping to challenge rival IBM's leadership in the lucrative field.
In 2000, HP attempted to buy PricewaterhouseCoopers' consulting division before those discussions unraveled.
IBM wound up buying PricewaterhouseCoopers' consulting arm instead.
The demand for technology consulting and customer support services has steadily grown during the past two decades as the automation of corporate America and the rise of the Internet prompted more businesses to hire outside help to help ensure all the computer software and hardware runs smoothly.
IBM's technology services division brought in revenue of $54 billion last year, accounting for half of the company's total sales.
Combined, EDS and HP's technology services division had about $39 billion in revenue last year.
Acquiring EDS also could yield more government work for HP, which had about $500 million in prime federal contracts in fiscal 2007.
EDS is far better connected, with deals worth about $2.5 billion - putting it among the top 10 among government technology contractors.
Combined, HP and EDS still would lag significantly behind government contractors such as Lockheed Martin Corp. and Boeing Company.
EDS earned $716 million on $22.1 billion in revenue last year.
The Texas company has been linked with possible deals previously, including a reported interest by Deutsche Telekom late last year and Dell before that.
None of the companies ever confirmed reports that they were talking.
Former IBM salesman H. Ross Perot left IBM to start EDS in 1962 and practically invented the business of running other companies' computer systems, now called information-technology or IT services.
Perot sold EDS to General Motors for $2.5 billion in 1984 and eventually became so disillusioned with how that deal worked out that he sold his remaining EDS shares to the carmaker so he could start a rival service bearing his name.
GM spun off EDS as an independent company in 1996 and remained its largest customer.
EDS was riding high at the start of the decade, despite the dot-com bubble's bursting.
But in late 2002, earnings shortfalls led to investor lawsuits, a Securities and Exchange Commission investigation, the ouster of the chief executive and a sharp drop in the stock price.
The company lost $1.7 billion in 2003, but it gradually righted itself under CEO Michael Jordan, a retired CBS and Westinghouse CEO who was hired to lead a turnaround.
Jordan fixed some money-losing contracts, including a multibillion-dollar deal to build a communications network for the Navy and Marine Corps, and began cutting costs by sending thousands of jobs to low-cost countries such as India.
Hewlett-Packard bets EDS will fuel hot streak
With its second-largest deal, computer giant hopes to grab bigger share of the $550 billion technology-services market
Riding a hot streak that has doubled its stock price in three years, Hewlett-Packard is rolling the dice on a $13.2 billion acquisition of technology services provider Electronic Data Systems.
The all-cash deal, announced Tuesday, represents HP's biggest gamble under the leadership of Mark Hurd, who was hired as chief executive in March 2005 to turn around the maker of personal computers and printers.
Hurd has relentlessly cut costs while demanding better execution from the company's remaining workers. 
Meanwhile, HP has recovered from a nagging financial hangover that was exacerbated by the biggest acquisition in its 69-year history -- the $19 billion purchase of Compaq Computer, completed in 2002 over strident shareholder objections.
Hewlett-Packard's purchase of Electronic Data Systems could mean tougher competition for IBM and its 10,500 Triangle employees.
HP estimates that the deal, when completed, will give it about 7 percent of the technology services market, compared with IBM's 10 percent share.
That means that if things go well long term, HP could catch Big Blue in the business of providing technology services such as data management, information technology outsourcing and consulting, said Morningstar equity analyst Rick Hanna.
``While IBM is a clear No. 1 now ... HP-EDS is a real player and potentially a long-term threat,'' Hanna said.
In the short term, IBM has little to worry about, Hanna said, given its clear leadership in technology services, which accounts for about 60 percent of its revenue.
Now HP will try to show that it learned from its mistakes by making the second-largest deal in its history pay off more quickly.
Investors are worried that HP is taking an unnecessary risk on EDS, whose disappointing profit margins had caused its stock to drop by about 30 percent in the past year.
HP shares sagged $2.56 Tuesday to finish at $44.27.
``It appears to be a very daunting deal,'' said American Technology Research analyst Shaw Wu.
The $25-per-share sale price represents a nice payoff for EDS stockholders, who will receive a nearly 33 percent premium compared with the company's share price before news of the HP talks leaked out Monday.
EDS shares added 26 cents to close at $24.34 Tuesday.
Including EDS' net debt, HP values the acquisition at $13.9 billion.
Based on EDS' nearly 530 million common shares, restricted stock units and options, the sales prices works out to $13.2 billion.
That represents about one-fourth of the $50 billion increase in HP's market value since Hurd joined the company.
HP prizes EDS because it wants to become a much bigger competitor in technology services -- a wide-ranging category that includes running computer data centers, stitching together software programs and consulting on special projects for business and government clients.
Big Blue to Meet Its Match in HP-EDS
The repercussions from the merger of Electronic Data Systems (EDS Quote - Cramer on EDS - Stock Picks) with Hewlett-Packard (HPQ Quote - Cramer on HPQ - Stock Picks) will ripple broadly throughout the tech industry.
H-P announced Tuesday that it will buy the outsourcing services company for $13.9 billion.
The deal will be bad ``for anyone that doesn't have H-P or IBM (IBM Quote - Cramer on IBM - Stock Picks) on their business card,'' said IDC analyst Bob Welch.
Even IBM, the leader in the global services and outsourcing business, will ultimately feel the pressure. Gartner puts the worldwide market for IT services in 2007 at $748 billion.
With $54 billion in services revenue, IBM had 7.2% of the market. 
At $22 billion, EDS had 3%, while H-P had 2.3%.
And the merger could throw a wrench into EDS's Agility Alliance, a group of vendors that regularly coordinate to supply hardware, networking, software and services to EDS's outsourcing clients.
The partnership has been very effective for EDS and its partners, Welch said.
HP and EDS combined would be about the same size as IBM Global Services.
Industry sources have confirmed to eWEEK that Hewlett-Packard will acquire Electronic Data Systems for about $13 billion.
The announcement may come as early as May 14, the source told eWEEK.
HP acknowledged the news first earlier May 12.
``There can be no assurances that an agreement will be reached or that a transaction will be consummated,'' HP said in a statement.
``HP does not intend to comment further until an agreement is reached or discussions are terminated.''
EDS's response came about an hour later, also in the form of a statement.
In response to market rumors, Electronic Data Systems Corporation announces that it is in advanced discussions regarding a possible business combination transaction with Hewlett-Packard Company.
The company does not intend to comment further unless and until a definitive agreement has been entered into.
There can be no assurance that a definitive agreement will be entered into, ``the EDS statement read.
The impending deal would make the newly merged company worth about $22 billion and put it on a level with IBM, the largest IT services company in the world.
EDS is the world leader in outsourced IT services; 
HP provides outsourced services too, but focuses mostly on hardware, software and associated services.
Impact of EDS merger on South Charleston unclear
It's too early to tell what impact - if any - Hewlett-Packard Co.'s decision to acquire Electronic Data Systems Corp. will have on EDS' operations in South Charleston, an EDS spokesman said.
Earlier this month Hewlett-Packard unveiled a bid of nearly $14 billion bid to purchase EDS.
EDS has about 50 employees in Building 6000 at the South Charleston Technology Park.
The workers manage the federal Department of Housing and Urban Development's computer network of more than 18,000 users in more than 80 locations.
EDS won the 10-year contract in 2003.
Bill Ritz, EDS spokesman, pointed out that Hewlett-Packard's acquisition of EDS still needs the approval of regulators and EDS' stockholders.
``The deal is supposed to close sometime in the second half of 2008,'' Ritz said.
``Until it closes, both companies are competitors and it will be business as usual.
We will continue to put our customers first and serve them and help them compete in the global marketplace.''
Any cuts in staff are pure speculation at this point, Ritz said.
``A lot of work still needs to be done,'' he said. 
``We need to let this play out and keep the focus on our customers and remember we are separate companies now.''
Hewlett-Packard's CEO says he believes the EDS acquisition will make the company's service offerings stronger.
Hewlett-Packard CEO Mark Hurd believes that the $13 billion acquisition of Electronic Data Systems will help build out HP's enterprise services offerings and ``accelerate'' the company's reach into new accounts, he said.
In a May 20 conference call with reporters to announce HP's 2008 second-quarter financial earnings, Hurd offered his thoughts on the upcoming acquisition of EDS.
While Hurd could not say when the deal would close, he noted that HP is already looking at ways to integrate its software and services portfolio with EDS' business.
Hurd implied that HP will streamline costs to make the acquisition profitable for shareholders as soon as possible.
Several analysts have said they believe that HP, through its acquisition of EDS and other companies, is looking to build a services division that will create an all-in-one shop for building state-of-the art data centers.
Scott Peterson has been found guilty of first-degree murder, a verdict that means he could be executed if these same jurors vote as the ``conscience of their community'' that he deserves to die for his crimes.
So Scott Peterson was convicted because he's a liar and a cheat and a fink and because his famous lawyer was unable to come up with a plausible explanation for why Laci Peterson's body washed up where it washed up.
In fact, he was convicted in part because defense attorney Mark Geragos offered so many explanations for Peterson's conduct and Laci's disappearance that prosecutors were able to make jurors laugh about the implausibility of them all.
In essence, the jury concluded that the circumstances surrounding Laci Peterson's disappearance and death could not reasonably be explained in any other way but that Scott Peterson wanted her dead so he could continue and perhaps expand his secret life with Amber Frey.
Peterson was found guilty because jurors believed he had a motive to kill his wife and that Peterson's conduct -- before, during and after Laci Peterson's disappearance -- was too suspicious to be purely coincidental.
On November 12, a jury in Redwood City, California, convicted Scott Peterson of first-degree murder in the death of his wife, 23-year-old Laci, and second-degree murder in the death of his 8-month-old unborn son, whom the couple were planning to name Conner.
Laci disappeared from the couple's home in Modesto, California, 23 months ago.
The bodies of Laci and Conner later washed up in the San Francisco Bay, near where Scott told police he had gone fishing the day his wife disappeared.
Dozens of people in Laci Peterson's hometown who were donating blood in her memory applauded when they heard a jury's decision to execute Scott Peterson for the murder of his pregnant wife
Laci Peterson's loved ones have ``a hole in their hearts that will never be repaired,'' a prosecutor told jurors today as he asked them to send convicted double-murderer Scott Peterson to his death for killing his wife and unborn son.
The jury convicted the 32-year-old Peterson on Nov. 12 of first-degree murder for killing his wife and second-degree murder for the death of his unborn son.
Peterson, 32, was convicted of two counts of murder in the deaths of his wife, Laci, and her fetus.
The case first captured the nation's attention when Laci Peterson disappeared from her Modesto home the day before Christmas 2002 and has engrossed the country ever since.
Unlike on Nov. 12, when sobs filled the air as Peterson was found guilty of murdering his wife and their unborn child, there was an almost surreal stillness in the courtroom while the death  recommendation was announced.
Peterson was convicted Nov. 12 of first-degree murder for the death of Laci Peterson and second-degree murder for the death of their unborn son just before Christmas 2002.
The same jury that recommended Peterson's penalty  found him guilty of the first-degree murder of his wife and the second-degree murder of his unborn child.
A jury found Scott Peterson guilty Friday of killing his pregnant wife, Laci, and their unborn child in the saga of suburban adultery and betrayal that transfixed much of the nation for nearly two years.
Peterson, a 32-year-old fertilizer salesman from Modesto, showed no emotion, staring stonily at the jury box as the foreman announced a finding of first-degree murder in the death of Laci and second-degree murder in the death of their near-term son, whom the couple had named Conner.
Upon learning of his death sentence, Scott Peterson sat defiantly still and tight-jawed, the same vacant expression he wore throughout a murder trial in which he never spoke.
Maurice Cheeks is out as Philadelphia 76ers head coach.
General manager Ed Stefanski announced Tony DiLeo, the team's assistant general manager and senior vice president, will take over as the head coach for the remainder of the season.
Stefanski fired Cheeks with the Sixers floundering at 9-14 and in the basement of the Eastern Conference's Atlantic Division.
As recently as a season ago, when speaking about Cheeks' new contract extension, Stefanski said, ``we are excited about the future under this direction.''
That changed dramatically on Saturday.
``I made the decision because I felt we were not progressing the way we wanted to progress,`` said Stefanski.
``I feel on the floor we weren't executing the philosophy that we want to have as Sixers basketball.
I told Mo we needed to go in a different direction and make a change.
He was very gracious about it.
He's a Sixer and is rooting for us to turn this around.''
This past offseason, the Sixers bolstered their youthful, athletic roster with frontline cornerstone Elton Brand, who is leading the team in scoring (15.9) and rebounding (10.0) but is significantly short of his career scoring average and has already missed time this season due to injury.
The expectations were high for a team that won 40 games and took Detroit to six games in the Eastern Conference quarterfinal round last season.
Cheeks did not meet them.
Friday night's 88-72 loss in Cleveland, the team's eighth in 10 games, was apparently the last straw. Cheeks is the fifth NBA head coach to be fired this season.
``I believe in this team.
We are better than this,`` said Stefanski.
``We are going to make it better.
We will find a way to improve on this team.``
The member of the Sixers' 1982-83 NBA championship team started his head coaching career in Portland, where he finished with a 162-139 mark and a pair of playoff appearances.
He guided a transition in Philadelphia from the Allen Iverson era and won more games than expected last season behind a rising star, Andre Iguodala, a young frontcourt led by Samuel Dalembert and a veteran presence at point guard, Andre Miller.
Miller is averaging 15.5 points per game this season, but Iguodala is averaging just 14.9 points per contest, a drop of five points per game from last season.
Dalembert is down almost five points per game (5.8 ppg) and just over two rebounds (8.0) per contest.
DiLeo is in his 19th season with the Sixers basketball operations department.
He spent four seasons as the team's director of personnel (1999-2003) before being promoted to senior VP and assistant GM in September 2003.
The Philadelphia 76ers fired coach Maurice Cheeks on Saturday, one day after the team continued its slide with a season-worst offensive effort, dpa reported.
Expected by many to be one of the top teams in the Eastern Conference, the 76ers have opened 9-14 with eight losses in their last 10 games, including Friday's dispirited 88-72 setback at Cleveland.
Cheeks was replaced on an interim basis by assistant general manager Tony DiLeo, a long-time member of the team's front office. DiLeo will coach the Sixers in Saturday's game at Washington and is expected to remain coach for the rest of the season.
A year ago, the Sixers fired president Billy King and replaced him with Ed Stefanski, who gave Cheeks a one-year contract extension through the 2008-09 season and another one-year extension earlier this year, after Philadelphia used a second-half surge to make the playoffs for the first time since 2005.
``Decisions of this nature are never easy, and this was particularly difficult due to the great amount of respect I have for Maurice Cheeks,'' Stefanski said.
``However, at this time I felt that it is in the best interest of this team to make a change while there is still time to accomplish the goals we set forth for ourselves at the start of the season.''
In the off-season, Stefanski landed free agent forward Elton Brand and reinked young stars Andre Iguodala and Louis Williams to long- term deals.
The addition of Brand was supposed to transform Philadelphia into a contender.
However, Brand and Iguodala have had difficulty getting their games to mesh.
Cheeks has had disagreements with starting centre Samuel Dalembert, benching him for long stretches.
The team heard boos in Wednesday's home loss to Cleveland.
A Philadelphia fixture who spent his first 11 seasons as a player with the 76ers and had his number-10 jersey retired by the club, Cheeks is 122-147 in three-plus seasons as head coach in the City of Brotherly Love.
Cheeks came to Philadelphia from Portland, where he was 162-139 with two postseason appearances in three-plus seasons.
DiLeo has never been an NBA coach.
He was a scout and assistant coach before moving into management as director of player personnel in 1999. 
He became assistant GM in 2003.
DiLeo played and coached for 10 seasons in West Germany and was named coach of the year in 1987 in the top West German league.
``Tony DiLeo has a wealth of basketball knowledge and coaching experience - both in the NBA and on the international level - and is familiar not only with our current group of players but the style of play we are striving to attain on a consistent basis,'' Stefanski said.
Cheeks is the fifth coach fired this season, after PJ Carlesimo of Oklahoma City, Eddie Jordan of Washington, Sam Mitchell of Toronto and Randy Wittman of Minnesota.
There is speculation that Stefanski may reach out to Jordan, as the two worked together with the New Jersey Nets earlier this decade.
Maurice Cheeks has been fired as head coach of the Philadelphia 76ers following the club's disappointing 9-14 start to the season.
The Sixers have dropped their last three and are just 2-8 in their last ten after high expectations following an offseason that brought Elton Brand to Philly.
Cheeks had signed an extension to his contract in September that was guaranteed through next year but the club felt they needed to make a change to reverse their fortunes.
Assistant general manager Tony DiLeo will replace Cheeks as the interim head coach and he is expected to hold the position through the year.
Philadelphia fans had expected the 76ers to be a contender this year following a playoff appearance one year ago and then adding Brand.
Never before in NBA history have coaches fallen this early in the season in such numbers.
Now, Maurice Cheeks became the NBA's fifth coaching casualty of the season.
On Saturday, Cheeks was fired as head coach of the Philadelphia 76ers.
With the off-season acquisition of Elton Brand, the 2008-09 season was supposed to be a good one for the Sixers.
Unfortunately, it hasn't played out that way to date.
Despite leading the team in scoring, Brand has not yet lived up to expectations and the rest of the team also has struggled.
The Sixers have a record of 9-14 and had been expected to be a playoff contender in the Eastern Conference.
According to the Associated Press, the dismissal came hours before the 76ers were to play at home Saturday night, with DiLeo now making his coaching debut against Washington.
DiLeo has spent 19 seasons with the 76ers.
He was promoted to senior vice president/assistant general manager in 2003.
Cheeks was one of more the popular players in 76ers history and was starting his fourth season as coach.
GM Ed Stefanski had given Cheeks two contract extensions in the past season, but the slow start was enough to cost him his job.
Philadelphia 76ers management had enough of the NBA team lurking near the bottom of the Eastern Conference standings and fired head coach Maurice Cheeks on Saturday.
Assistant general manager Tony DiLeo was named interim coach.
``Decisions of this nature are never easy, and this was particularly difficult due to the great amount of respect I have for Maurice Cheeks,'' team president and general manager Ed Stefanski said.
``However, at this time I felt that it is in the best interest of this team to make a change while there is still time to accomplish the goals we set forth for ourselves at the start of the season.''
The 76ers dropped their third game in a row on Friday, an 88-72 setback to Cleveland, and occupy last place in the Atlantic Division with a 9-14 record.
Cheeks would become the fifth NBA coach fired this season, along with P.J. Carlesimo (Oklahoma City), Eddie Jordan (Washington), Sam Mitchell (Toronto) and Randy Wittman (Minnesota).
The former 76ers point guard for much of the 1980s came back to the city to assume coaching duties prior to the 2005 season.
Last season he led the club to their first postseason berth in four years.
Cheeks has an overall record of 284-286, which includes nearly four years as coach of Portland.
Stefanski had given Cheeks two contract extensions in the past season, but the slow start was enough to cost him his job.
The Sixers have hardly resembled last season's up-tempo group that advanced to the playoffs, despite the addition of free agent Elton Brand.
DiLeo has spent 19 seasons with the 76ers and was promoted to senior vice president and assistant general manager in 2003.
Prior to joining the organization he had amateur coaching experience.
Philadelphia host the Washington Wizards on Saturday.
The Philadelphia 76ers fired Coach Maurice Cheeks Saturday morning after a disappointing 9-14 start to the 2008-09 season.
The Sixers had a three-game losing streak going into Saturday night's contest against Washington, and more had been expected from a team that signed free-agent forward Elton Brand to a five-year, $80 million contract in the off-season.
``I made the decision because I felt we were not progressing the way we wanted to progress,'' said general manager Ed Stefanski at a news conference.
``I feel on the floor we weren't executing the philosophy that we want to have as Sixers basketball.''
Stefanski said Tony DiLeo, the team's assistant general manager and senior vice president, will coach the team the rest of this season.
Excluding Brand's 15.9 points and 10 rebounds, the team's stars have not played up to past standards.
Andre Miller is averaging 15.5 points per game, Andre Iguodala 14.9 points, a drop of five points per game from last season, while Samuel Dalembert is down almost five points per game with his 5.8 points and just over two rebounds.
Cheeks compiled a 162-139 record in three-plus seasons and coached the 76ers to 40 regular-season victories in 2007-08 before a six-game loss to Detroit in the Eastern Conference quarterfinals.
He is the fifth NBA head coach fired this season, joining Oklahoma City's P.J.Carlesimo, Washington's Eddie Jordan, Toronto's Sam Mitchell and Minnesota's Randy Wittman.
Maurice Cheeks was fired Saturday as coach of the Philadelphia 76ers, who are slumping at 9-14 a year after making the playoffs.
Assistant general manager Tony DiLeo was appointed coach for rest of the season.
The dismissal came hours before the 76ers were to play at home, with DiLeo making his coaching debut against Washington.
Team president Ed Stefanski said he met with Cheeks, describing the former 76er star as a ``gentleman throughout'' and a ``class act.''
``I felt we were not progressing the way we had wanted to progress,'' Stefanski said.
``I didn't feel on the floor we were executing the philosophy we wanted to have as Sixers basketball.''
Cheeks was one of more the popular players in 76ers history and was starting his fourth season as coach. Stefanski had given Cheeks two contract extensions in the past season, but the slow start was enough to cost him his job.
Cheeks became the fifth NBA coach fired this season following P.J. Carlesimo (Oklahoma City), Eddie Jordan (Washington), Sam Mitchell (Toronto) and Randy Wittman (Minnesota).
A message left on Cheeks' cell phone was not immediately returned.
DiLeo has spent 19 seasons with the 76ers.
He was promoted to senior vice president/assistant general manager in 2003.
His son, T.J. DiLeo, is a guard for Temple and he said after the Owls' 88-72 win over No. 8 Tennessee that he was excited his father had a chance to coach.
``I think it's unfortunate for Mo, he's a great coach, but my dad is ready to step in, ``DiLeo said.
``This caught us by surprise.
We had no idea.''
DiLeo said he hadn't talked to his father yet, but noticed one missed call from him on his cell phone.
Cheeks led the 76ers to the playoffs last year for the first time while he was coach.
Philadelphia was one of the surprise teams in the East last season, and the 76ers anticipated a deep run in the playoffs this year.
They signed Elton Brand to a five-year deal worth nearly $80 million last summer, but they have struggled with him in the lineup and have lost eight of 10.
Last season, the 76ers lost in the first round to Detroit.
After an 18-30 start, Philadelphia won 18 of its next 23 games and wound up at 40-42, the sixth seed in the Eastern Conference.
Stefanski rewarded Cheeks with two contract extensions in seven months that would have taken him to the end of next season.
Instead, with the team on a three-game losing streak and last in the Atlantic Division, he didn't even last until the end of the calendar year.
Cheeks also coached at Portland.
He played 15 seasons in the NBA, the first 11 with Philadelphia, and retired in 1993.
An outstanding defensive player, Cheeks played in four All-Star games and was a member of the 76ers' championship team in 1982-83.
His No. 10 jersey hangs in the rafters.
Philadelphia 76ers President and General Manager Ed Stefanski announced that the team has relieved Maurice Cheeks of his head coaching responsibilities.
Cheeks will be replaced on an interim basis by Sixers Senior Vice President and Assistant General Manager Tony DiLeo, who will remain in the position through the end of the 2008-09 season.
``Decisions of this nature are never easy, and this was particularly difficult due to the great amount of respect I have for Maurice Cheeks,'' Stefanski said.
``However, at this time I felt that it is in the best interest of this team to make a change while there is still time to accomplish the goals we set forth for ourselves at the start of the season.
``Tony DiLeo has a wealth of basketball knowledge and coaching experience - both in the NBA and on the international level - and is familiar not only with our current group of players but the style of play we are striving to attain on a consistent basis.''
DiLeo is in his 19th season with the Sixers organization and was in his fifth as the team's Senior Vice President and Assistant General Manager.
During his tenure with the Sixers, DiLeo has been involved in every aspect of the team's basketball operations.
In his role as Senior Vice President and Assistant General Manager, DiLeo was responsible for assisting Stefanski with player procurement via his evaluation of amateur and professional talent while supervising the team's draft efforts and overseeing the college and professional scouting systems.
Prior to that, DiLeo spent four seasons as the Sixers Director of Player Personnel (1999-2003) and has served as an Assistant Coach under Larry Brown, Jim Lynam, Fred Carter, John Lucas and Doug Moe.
DiLeo has extensive experience in international basketball as both a player and a coach.
He coached the former West German men's and women's teams from 1979-90, winning nine national titles in that country's top division, earning Coach of the Year honors in 1987.
Additionally, he was selected as the West German federation National Coach from 1981-85 and during that time, wrote and published the European Basketball Handbook, a guide designed to acclimate American players overseas.
A star at Cinnaminson (N.J.) High School, DiLeo went on to play at Tennessee Tech and LaSalle University, where as a junior he was named first-team Academic All-American and went on to graduate maxima cum laude from the LaSalle School of Business.
Cheeks was named the 21st head coach in team history on May 23, 2005.
In just over three seasons at the helm for Philadelphia, Cheeks compiled a mark of 122-147 (.454).
Last season, Cheeks guided the Sixers to the NBA Playoffs for the first time since the 2004-05 season, after starting the year with an 18-30 record.
The Sixers went on to win 18 of their next 23 games, becoming just the sixth team in NBA history to go over .500 after being at least 12 games below .500 at some point during the same season.
In 2006-07, Cheeks helped rally the Sixers from a 5-19 start to make a push for the playoffs with a 35-47 record.
Philadelphia increased their winning percentage to .519 in games played after January 1, compared to a winning percentage of just .267 during the first two months of the year - the biggest improvement by any team in the league during that span.
The Sixers also tied for the eighth best winning percentage after the All-Star break (18-11; .621).
In his first season as head coach of the Sixers, Cheeks guided the team to a 38-44 mark and fell just two wins shy of reaching the post-season.
On April 18 of that year, he earned the 200th win of his coaching career.
Cheeks record as an NBA head coach with both Portland and Philadelphia stands at 284-286 (.498).
Not because Mo Cheeks was long for the job with the Philadelphia 76ers.
Like all coaches not in the upper stratosphere of the coaching hierarchy -- your Phil Jacksons and Gregg Popoviches -- he was only as good as his last 10-game stretch, only as secure as how well his star was playing.
But the 76ers, while underachieving at 9-14 when Cheeks was fired Saturday morning, were not an embarassment when they went on the court, not a disjointed bunch that clearly was no longer listening to or playing for its coach.
This wasn't P.J. Carlesimo (Oklahoma City) or Eddie Jordan (Washington), whose team's putrid won-loss records sank any chance they had of survival.
This wasn't Sam Mitchell (Toronto), whose differences of opinion with his general manager about his team's personnel were too big to overcome.
This wasn't Randy Wittman (Minnesota), whose fan base was staying away in droves as the paying public grew indifferent to the on-court product.
The timing of this move by team president and general manager Ed Stefanski was a head-scratcher.
``It's not 100 percent on the coach,'' a source with knowledge of the 76ers' thinking said Saturday afternoon.
``But at the same time, we didn't seem to have a plan.''
Stefanski named assistant general manager Tony DiLeo coach for the rest of the season.
DiLeo has a good reputation as a coach, spending time over the last two decades on the Sixers' bench as an assistant and in Europe as a head coach.
But unless circumstances change dramatically, Jordan -- who became close with Stefanski while both were in New Jersey earlier this decade -- will be the odds-on favorite to get the job permanantly.
Many league execs still think quite highly of Jordan, and none of the players who matter in Washington threw Jordan under the bus after he was fired.
Cheeks' coaching moves have frequently been criticized over the years, both in Philadelphia and in Portland.
But he lost his job this time not only because of Xs and Os, but because so many of the 76ers' players that blossomed under him last season, including center Sam Dalembert, forward Andre Iguodala and guard Lou Williams, struggled to get going this season.
And the moves Cheeks made, like benching second-year forward Thaddeus Young and elevating guard Willie Green, haven't produced enough dividends.
``Ed just wasn't seeing any progress,'' the source said, and Stefanski expected more from a team that had signed free agent Elton Brand to an $82 million deal and re-signed core players Iguodala and Williams for $80 million and $25 million, respectively.
``We weren't progressing at the rate [Stefanski] thought we should, and he thought it was time for a move,'' the source said.
Yet Stefanski cannot escape criticism, either.
Bringing Brand in was the signing coup of the NBA offseason, to be sure.
But in doing that, Stefanski changed the team's footprint.
The Sixers are still a very good transition team.
But when the game slows down, having to cater to Brand leaves the lane clogged.
Last season, Iguodala, Young and Williams had driving room when Philly ran its halfcourt sets, and Dalembert showed occasional decent low-post play.
But now, Brand is the man in the paint, forcing everyone else out on the perimeter.
Left to fend for himself on the weakside, Dalembert's numbers have plummeted, and Williams has just begun to play well.
Brand is recovered from the Achilles' injury that kept him out of all but eight games last season with the Clippers, but he's been slowed by a bad hamstring, and his offensive numbers (15.9 points, a career-low .436 from the floor) have been unspectactular.
No matter what the stats say, Philly looks and plays slower this season.
And Stefanski didn't get a big-time shooter who could stretch the court and take pressure off of Brand inside.
Veterans Donyell Marshall and Kareem Rush, signed later in the summer by Philly, don't strike much fear into opposing teams.
The result is Philly's 93.3 scoring average, 28th in the league (only Charlotte and Oklahoma City have scored 100 points fewer times than Philadelphia's six), and .314 percentage behind the three-point line, 26th in the league.
``Everybody zones them,'' an Eastern Conference executive said Saturday.
The Sixers had just scored one of their more impressive victories eight days ago, rallying from a double-digit deficit in the second half to win on the road at Detroit.
True, they had bad losses early to the Bobcats and Timberwolves, and lost a home-and-home to the Cavaliers on Wednesday and Friday.
But last we checked, Cleveland was 20-3, owner of an 11-game win streak and the only remaining undefeated team at home this season.
The Cavs are rolling, and losing to them is no embarassment.
Another league source with knowledge of the team's thinking said Saturday that the Cleveland losses played no role in Cheeks's firing.
Cheeks received his second one-year contract extension in less than a year last September, taking him through the 2009-10 season.
While Stefanski didn't hire Cheeks (that was former president Billy King, whom Stefanski replaced early last season), Stefanski and Cheeks had quickly established a solid, working relationship with one another.
Cheeks quickly acquiesced last year when Stefanski asked him to give more time to the team's younger players, getting Young and young vets Rodney Carney and Williams bigger minutes.
The transition transformed the team, as the 76ers went on a 19-7 run last spring, turning opponents over and becoming deadly in transition.
They rode their hot streak into the playoffs, where they stretched Detroit to six games before succumbing in the first round.
They weren't a finished product, though, and it was no secret that Brand was Stefanski's target, just as he'd been King's ultimate target.
After a brief dalliance with Atlanta free agent Josh Smith, So Stefanski cleared as much cap room as possible, sending Carney and center Calvin Booth to Minnesota, and then struck, getting Brand to spurn his former team, the Clippers, as well as the Warriors, for the Sixers' $80 million offer--the ``Philly Max,'' as Brand later called it.
After keeping Iguodala and Williams, all the heat was on Cheeks.
Saturday, he became the latest coach--one-sixth of the league's head men already gone in little more than five weeks--to succumb to the pyre.
Maurice Cheeks became the fifth NBA head coach to be fired this season, after the Philadelphia 76ers notified the former point guard of his dismissal Saturday morning.
Expected to contend for a division title after the addition of Elton Brand, the Sixers (9-14) are instead last in the Atlantic after losing eight of their last 10 games.
An 88-72 road loss to the Cavaliers in Cleveland Friday was apparently the last straw, though the team has not enjoyed a winning season under Cheeks in his previous three years at the helm.
They had been on the verge of a resurgence as December started, improving their record to 7-6 before hitting a slump to fall to dead last in the division.
Assistant general manager Tony DiLeo was appointed interim coach as the Sixers get ready for a game against Washington Saturday night.
Cheeks is 284-286 lifetime, including four years in Portland.
The Sixers have disappointed this season, just 9-14 despite the inspired 2007-08 run (which culminated in taking two of six against the Pistons) and the pick-up of dominant pivot Elton Brand over the summer. 
If you don't know by now: you disappoint in the NBA, you get canned.
Today, Maurice Cheeks became the fifth coach fired within the first quarter of the season.
At this point, the emotional roller coaster of the NBA season seems much more telling to any particular coach's fortunes than overall performance.
Reggie Theus, long in danger, pulled off a huge upset of the Lakers on Tuesday.
He's expected to stay safe barring a basketball apocolypse (or a bad loss to the Knicks tonight).
Marc Iavaroni of Memphis got a win at an opportune time this week.
Sure, it was over the Thunder ... but whatever. 
(Also, his owner is being cheap right now.)
Cheeks had an opportunity to turn things around this week with a home-and-home against the Cavaliers, a team many picked the Sixers to eclipse this season.
The Cavs won the set by a combined 24 points and have the league's second-best record.
While fellow fired coaches Eddie Jordan and Sam Mitchell seem assured of another top job as soon as next year, Cheeks surprisingly figures to land closer to the Randy Wittman/P.J. Carlesimo pile.
Many felt Cheeks was the victim of a regime change and not his own failure in Portland; as such, he seemed like a safe pick for the Philly job (especially considering his history in the town).
But although there has been change in the Sixers' front office (current GM Ed Stefanski didn't hire Cheeks, in other words), this sacking is more tied to the team's failure.
You fail 1.5 times in today's NBA, you might be done for a while. Cheeks is smooth and well-liked, so he could get a gig soon enough.
But it seems more likely that he'd get back on the bench as an assistant or move to a college program
The Eastern Conference standings have claimed another coach, with Philadelphia 76ers head man Maurice Cheeks joining the ever-growing list of coaches who are no longer employed.
The 2008-09 season was supposed to be a good one for the Sixers, who claimed the summer's top free agent prize in Elton Brand and then assured that their big three would be together long-term by re-signing Anre Iguodala.
Unfortunately, it hasn't played out that way to date.
Currently sitting at 9-14 on the season, the only thing stopping Philly from being complete buried in the standings is that so many Eastern Conference teams are struggling, as well.
Despite their poor start and their current three-game losing streak - likely to end tonight as the team takes on the Wizards - the Sixers are still just two games in the loss column behind the eighth seed in the East.
Cheeks marks the third Eastern Conference head coach to get fired this season, following in the footsteps of the Toronto Raptors' Sam Mitchell and the Washington Wizards' Eddie Jordan.
Cheeks will be succeeded by Assistant GM Tony DiLeo.
Stephen A. Smith has reported that the Philadelphia 76ers have parted ways with coach Maurice Cheeks.
The 76ers have a record of 9-14 and had been expected to be a playoff team in the Eastern Conference.
With its acquisition of free agent Elton Brand the lineup seemed to be become more solid especially in the middle.
But Brand has not found his rhythm in the offense and his numbers have been disappointing.
Some have said that instead of being the missing piece, that not unlike the Phoenix Suns, the team has missed its run and gun offense from last season.
When Philly landed a playoff spot near the bottom of the East's pile this past spring and then surprised the Pistons by taking the first two games from them in Detroit before losing the next four straight, there were high hopes for .500 + season and an upgrade in the playoff seedings.
With Brand's arrival the hope turned into what fans thought was a reality.
Never before in NBA history have coaches fallen this early in the season in such numbers.
Veteran players know all too well that the security their union has fought for has created an imbalance of power on teams that don't have a proven winner in the coaching seat.
When a player is paid tens of millions of dollars by a franchise, he is in the driver's seat and if it comes down to a contest between that player and a coach who hasn't won a title or hasn't won a title in a long while, it's not hard to know who has to go.
Don't cry for Cheeks on the financial front. He has a guaranteed contract through the end of the 2009-2010 season.
Chris Weitz is in negotiations to helm ``New Moon,'' the sequel to Summit Entertainment's vampire breakout ``Twilight.''
Weitz comes on board to helm the second installment in Stephenie Meyer's four-book series after Summit and ``Twilight'' director Catherine Hardwicke failed to reach a deal on the new movie.
The Weitz move prompted a carefully calibrated campaign of reassurance on the part of creators.
Meyer penned a letter that sought to calm fans nervous about the midstream switch.
``I'm sad that Catherine is not continuing on with us for 'New Moon,' she wrote in a letter on her Web site, but then noted that, with Weitz:
``Torches and pitchforks aren't going to be necessary.''
The director ``is excited by the story and eager to keep the movie as close to the book as possible,'' she wrote.
``He is also aware of you, the fans, and wants to keep you all extremely happy.
It's rare for the director of a successful first picture not to continue on with the sequel.
There have been conflicting reports about Hardwicke's departure, with some noting creative and other differences.
Summit has said it was a matter of scheduling.
Weitz has not helmed a girl-oriented project before but has been involved in movies that encompass elements featured in `` Twilight,'' producing the teen-aimed coming-of-age tale ``American Pie'' and directing the fantasy adventure ``The Golden Compass.''
Still, the director was taking few chances.
``I promise to remain responsive to your hopes and fears,'' he wrote in his own letter to fans Saturday. 
``I thank you for this opportunity and for your faith.''
Weitz said he had been ``in a whirlwind romance'' with the series over the past few days, and, in a particularly careful phrasing, said he is ``very grateful to have received (Meyer's) permission to protect 'New Moon' in its translation from the page to the screen.''
Both Weitz's and Meyer's letters represent rare attempts to communicate with fans on issues often left mostly to the industry, and speak both to the intense insider interest of fans as well as the importance of that group to the franchise's success.
Summit a week ago had faced a public-relations challenge when some fan bulletin boards began to worry about Hardwicke's departure.
Robert Pattinson and Kristen Stewart will star in ``Moon,'' while Melissa Rosenberg is writing the picture which, like the first, centers on the ordinary teenager Bella and the vampire Edward but adds Jacob, a werewolf character who figured less prominently in the first film.
The budget for ``Moon'' is expected to be slightly higher than the first in the franchise, with a release likely for late 2009 or early 2010.
It's official: Chris Weitz is taking over the director's chair for the ``Twilight'' sequel ``New Moon.''
``Twilight`` author Stephenie Meyer confirmed the news on her official website Saturday morning in a post designed to calm the rising anguish among fans who loved the first film adaptation.
After bidding a fond farewell to ``Twilight'' director Catherine Hardwicke, Meyer went on to praise Weitz and to let fans know that ``torches and pitchforks are not going to be necessary.''
On the one hand, Weitz has shown his skill at adapting popular modern novels for the screen -- ``About a Boy,'' from the Nick Hornby novel, won Weitz and co-scripters Paul Weitz and Peter Hedges an Oscar nomination for best adapted screenplay.
On the other hand, Weitz also directed last year's ``The Golden Compass,'' which was an expensive mess that failed to capture the fan base of the book.
Summit Entertainment announced today that filmmaker Chris Weitz has been hired to direct the second film in the studio's TWILIGHT film franchise.
The film, NEW MOON, is based on the second book in author Stephenie Meyer's blockbuster book series.
The announcement was made by Erik Feig, Summit's President of Production.
Weitz, an Academy Award(R)-nominated writer, director and producer, has a proven track record working with a broad range of material dealing with youth- oriented characters, fantasy and action.
As such, he has the potential to bring alive in NEW MOON the dimensions and depth that fans will demand in the next installment.
Feig stated, ``We love Stephenie Meyer's fantastic TWILIGHT series.
Thinking long and hard about how to turn NEW MOON into the amazing movie we know it will be, and working with Stephenie Meyer to find the right candidate, we are thrilled to announce Chris Weitz as director of the film.
Chris very much understands the world of NEW MOON and has the skill set required to bring the book to glorious life as a movie.
We think he will be an excellent steward of Stephenie Meyer's vision.''
``I am honored to have been entrusted with shepherding NEW MOON from the page to the screen,'' said Weitz.
``The extraordinary world that Stephenie has created has millions of fans, and it will be my duty to protect on their behalf the characters, themes and story they love.
This is not a task to be taken lightly, and I will put every effort into realizing a beautiful film to stand alongside a beautiful book.''
Weitz previously penned ABOUT A BOY, which led to an Academy Award Nomination for Best Adapted Screenplay in 2002, and adapted and directed THE GOLDEN COMPASS (2007), which was nominated for two Academy Awards and won the Academy Award for Best Visual Effects.
Additionally, Weitz co-wrote the 1998 animated film ANTZ and went on to produce the major box office success AMERICAN PIE and executive produced the film's two theatrical sequels.
Weitz also produced IN GOOD COMPANY starring Dennis Quaid and Topher Grace and executive produced AMERICAN DREAMZ starring Hugh Grant, Dennis Quaid and Mandy Moore.
In NEW MOON, Bella Swan (Kristen Stewart) is devastated by the abrupt departure of her vampire love, Edward Cullen (Robert Pattinson) but her spirit is rekindled by her growing friendship with the irresistible Jacob Black.
Suddenly she finds herself drawn into the world of the werewolves, ancestral enemies of the vampires, and finds her loyalties tested.
Production on NEW MOON is scheduled to begin in the coming months and the studio is planning to release the film towards the end of 2009 or early 2010.
Feig will oversee NEW MOON for the studio along with Summit Entertainment's Director of Production Gillian Bohrer.
Weitz is represented by WMA and by Alex Kohner of Morris, Yorn, Barnes & Levine.
About the TWILIGHT film series
The TWILIGHT film series stars Robert Pattinson and Kristen Stewart and tells the story of 17-year-old Bella Swan who moves to the small town of Forks, Washington to live with her father, and becomes drawn to Edward Cullen, a pale, mysterious classmate who seems determined to push her away.
But neither can deny the attraction that pulls them together ... even when Edward confides that he and his family are vampires.
The action-packed, modern day vampire love story and blockbuster success the first film in the series entitled TWILIGHT was released in theatres on November 21st grossing $69.6 million domestically during its first weekend.
To date the film has grossed over $142 million domestically.
About Summit Entertainment LLC
Summit Entertainment is a worldwide theatrical motion picture development, financing, production and distribution studio.
The studio handles all aspects of marketing and distribution for both its own internally developed motion pictures as well as acquired pictures.
Summit Entertainment, LLC also represents international sales for both its own slate and third party product.
Summit Entertainment, LLC plans to release 10 to 12 films annually.
SOURCE Summit Entertainment
Chris Weitz, who directed ``The Golden Compass,'' is negotiating to direct the cinematic sequel to ``Twilight,'' industry sources say.
While Summit Entertainment will not confirm Weitz is attached to the vampire series, The Hollywood Reporter said Friday he is the current candidate to direct ``New Moon.''
``Moon,'' like ``Twilight,'' is based on the four-book series written by Stephenie Meyer.
The movies follow a romance between a vampire and a mortal woman.
``Moon'' will be adapted for the big screen by Melissa Rosenberg with Robert Pattinson and Kristen Bell in the lead roles.
``Twilight'' director Catherine Hardwicke was unable to reach a deal to direct the sequel and her departure has been the topic of various rumors.
The Reporter said ``Moon,'' which is expected to have a larger budget than its cinematic predecessor, has been tentatively tabbed with a late 2009 or early 2010 release date.
There's a new dawn for Twilight.
Days after Catherine Hardwicke was ousted, despite having directed the vampire romance satisfactorily enough to pull in $140 million worth of business from fanggirls and average moviegoers alike, The Golden Compass director Chris Weitz is close to signing on for the blockbuster's sequel.
Following up on some recent Deadline Hollywood scoop, EW.com reports that Weitz has been tapped by Summit Entertainment to helm New Moon, based on the second book in Stephenie Meyer's phenomenon-inducing franchise.
``He's the quality-of-life-choice,'' a source said, perhaps referring to buzz that Hardwicke, while ultratalented, is rough to work with, while Weitz, who also codirected American Pie and scored an Oscar nod for copenning About a Boy, is known to be a pretty genial chap.
Summit says that no deal has been signed yet, but the official announcement could be coming as soon as this weekend.
The studio wants New Moon in theaters and Edward-loving butts in the seats in 2010, but has said it will not rush production before the script (the initial draft of which Hardwicke supposedly had problems with) is the best it can be.
``This is not a rush job,'' Summit CEO Rob Friedman told the Los Angeles Times' Big Picture blog.
``The movie only gets released when it's finished. I'd like it to be next year, but we're not going to put out a bad movie to hit a release date.''
Rumored to be the front runner earlier in the week, Entertainment Weekly has now confirmed that Chris Weitz will direct the sequel to Twilight, New Moon, replacing Catherine Hardwicke.
Hardwicke reportedly clashed with Summit Entertainment during Twilight's production and EW says Weitz landed the New Moon gig because he has a solid relationship with the studio, he's considered easy to work with and has experience with special effects.
In New Moon, the second novel in Stephenie Meyer's young-adult series, Bella (Kristen Stewart) recovers from the vampire attack that almost claimed her life.
She looks to celebrate her birthday with Edward (Robert Pattinson) and his family, however, a minor accident during the festivities results in Bella's blood being shed, a sight that proves too intense for the Cullens.
They decide to leave the town of Forks, Washington for Bella and Edward's sake. Melissa Rosenberg is writing the screenplay.
Weitz co-directed American Pie, Down to Earth and About a Boy with his brother Paul.
Last year he helmed The Golden Compass, based on the Philip Pullman novel, which didn't impress North American audiences but was a hit overseas.
New Moon is tentatively scheduled to open November 20, 2009.
Well ``New Moon'' has a new director.
And it's a man.
Chris Weitz will take on the sequel to ``Twilight''.
Chris Weitz the director of ``The Golden Compass'' and best known for his work with his brother Paul on ``American Pie'' is stepping up to do ``New Moon''.
Weitz has a good relationship with Summit Studios and is easy to work with.
He also has experience with special effects.
Of course though it's not official yet. December 14th the announcement will be made for the hiring decision.
Just in time to start the pre-production details for this highly anticipated sequel.
``Twilight'' has grossed more than 141 million already.
The last five days have been a wild rollercoaster ride for ``Twilight'' fans, as the film's director was told her services would no longer be required for the sequels, fueling speculation over her replacement, followed by a rumor about a supposed successor.
Now, it seems, a battle is going on between a studio saying there's no news to report and an entertainment magazine claiming Chris Weitz is getting behind the ``Twilight'' steering wheel.
``There will be a new director atop the 'Twilight' franchise: and he'll be a man,'' Entertainment Weekly's ``Hollywood Insider'' is reporting.
``Sources tell EW.com that Summit Entertainment is about to hire Chris Weitz ('The Golden Compass') as the shepherd for 'New Moon,' the second installment of Stephenie Meyer's best-selling 'Twilight' series.''
Although Weitz was indeed offered the high-profile gig, the ``American Pie'' filmmaker has spent much of the week contemplating his participation.
According to ``Twilight'' studio Summit Entertainment, the deal remains unconsummated.
``No, it is not official,'' a studio representative told MTV News on Thursday evening (December 11).
``We are not confirming anything at this point.
He is not signed on as the director.''
``We are not confirming,'' echoed a second representative.
Whether EW is hearing incorrectly from their sources or the studio is just biding time until it can make a proper announcement, this much seems certain: Catherine Hardwicke is moving on to future projects that will not involve teenage vampires, and a man is likely to take her place.
Twilighters have spent much of the week arguing with each other - and attempting to form protests and letter-writing campaigns - while debating whether they should speak out against the changes to their beloved franchise.
Whether they'll warm to Weitz is anyone's guess, but at least the filmmaker can always take solace in the fact that the fanbase similarly rebelled against Kristen Stewart and Robert Pattinson when they originally signed up for the film that would make them superstars.
The Golden Compass director Chris Weitz is expected to direct New Moon, the sequel to the hugely successful film Twilight.
According to EW, ``Weitz is best-known for his work with his brother Paul. 
The two directed and produced American Pie and then were nominated for an Academy Award for best screenplay for About a Boy, which they also co-directed.
Chris' first solo directing gig, The Golden Compass, didn't do well stateside but was a hit internationally.''
It was announced earlier this week that Twilight director Catherine Hardwicke and the movie studio Summit Entertainment were parting ways.
Wladimir Klitschko (52-3, 46 KOs) blasted a sluggish Hasim Rahman (45-7-2, 36 KOs) in Mannheim, Germany on Saturday night to retain the IBF, WBO and IBO world heavyweight titles.
After flooring Rahman in the sixth round with a left-right combo Klitschko wasted little time wrapping it up in the seventh with a big left-right-left series that led to the referee stepping in and stopping the fight at the 2:15 mark.
Rahman, a former heavyweight champion who shocked the world when he floored Lennox Lewis in 2001 for the title, showed absolutely no signs of life against Kiltschko on Saturday.
The final numbers showed Klitschko landing 178 of 369 punches thrown while Rahman connected on just 30 of 207 punches thrown.
Wladimir Klitschko defended his IBF heavyweight crown by stopping Hasim Rahman in the seventh round at SAP Arena on Saturday.
Klitschko, who has not lost in more than four years, hit the shorter Rahman at will throughout, and after landing a left-right-left combination against the cornered American, the referee stepped in to end the contest. Rahman didn't appear upset.
Klitschko had knocked down Rahman in the previous round with successive left hooks.
The technical knockout in Klitchsko's sixth defense of the IBF belt - and third this year - improved the Ukrainian-born fighter to 52-3 with 46 KOs.
Rahman, the two-time heavyweight champion who stepped in as a replacement opponent last month, struggled to get inside the taller Klitschko's reach, and dropped to 45-7-2.
The fighters started out fast and light on their feet, but it soon became apparent that Rahman was struggling to overcome the 3 1/2-inch height advantage enjoyed by the champion.
Rahman had to lean in drastically, and Klitschko easily fended off his punches.
Rahman did little more than lean on the ropes for a time and guard his face as Klitschko sought his opening.
Rahman looked reinvigorated in the fourth round, using his whole torso to make ambitious attacks, often connecting with Klitschko's body.
But he rarely landed blows above Klitschko's shoulders, and the consequences were clear when Klitschko dropped Rahman early in the sixth with two hard lefts to the side of his head.
Rahman got up but spent the remainder of the round in the corner, taking a sustained beating.
Another flurry at the opening of the seventh ended Rahman's challenge.
Klitschko also retained the minor WBO and IBO belts.
Klitschko was originally scheduled to face Alexander Povetkin (16-0), but the Russian pulled out with an ankle injury.
Rahman, who won the WBC and IBF belts from Lennox Lewis in 2001 and the vacant WBC belt in 2005, arrived in Germany on Monday and declared he was in top shape.
On the undercard, former heavyweight champion Riddick Bowe made a modest comeback with an eighth-round decision over Germany's Gene Pukall.
It was just the third fight in a decade for the 41-year-old American and his first in three years.
Bowe (45-1, 33 KOs) had been training in Germany since September in an effort to get his stamina up and his weight down.
The work paid off in the ring, where he kept up with the 33-year-old Pukall (14-13-2, 12KOs) and bested him with a stream of careful head shots.
Mannheim, Germany (Sports Network) - Wladimir Klitschko retained three heavyweight title belts by scoring a dominant seventh-round technical knockout of Hasim Rahman Saturday night.
The 32-year-old Klitschko (52-3, 46 KOs) won his 10th consecutive bout by flooring Rahman (45-7-2) once before referee Tony Weeks stopped the fight 44 seconds into the seventh round.
In a fight that was one-sided from the start, Klitschko retained his IBF, WBO and IBO versions of the heavyweight crown. 
Klitschko, who was coming off an 11th-round knockout of Tony Thompson in July, landed 178 punches to just 30 for Rahman.
Klitschko used his jab to his advantage, scoring consistently, and by the sixth round the 36-year-old Rahman, a former heavyweight champion, looked tired and clearly beaten.
In the sixth Klitschko landed a pair of left hooks to floor an off-balanced Rahman, who spent most of his time during the round on the ropes.
In fact, Klitschko landed 28 of his 68 punches thrown during the round, while Rahman connected on just 1-of-16 over those three minutes.
With Rahman getting pounded in the corner early in the seventh, Weeks called a halt to the fight.
Klitschko's Ukrainian brother, Vitali, is the current WBC heavyweight champion, but the siblings have ruled out fighting each other.
Wladimir Klitschko has held at least one major heavyweight belt since beating Chris Byrd for the IBF version in April 2006.
On the undercard, former heavyweight champion Riddick Bowe (43-1) scored an eighth-round unanimous decision over Gene Pukall (14-13-2).
The 41-year-old Bowe was fighting for the first time since 2005 and stepped into the ring for a professional bout for only the third time since 1996.
Bowe is most remembered for his three fights with Evander Holyfield and two tough bouts with Andrew Golota.
Wladimir Klitschko defended his IBF heavyweight crown with ease after stopping American Hasim Rahman after 44 seconds of the seventh round of their contest at the SAP Arena in Germany.
Heavyweight Champion, Wladimir Klitschko, 53-3, 47 KO's, easily dismantled former 2-Time Heavyweight Champion, Hasim Rahman, 45-7-2, 36 KO's, in the seventh round.
Rahman never gave himself a chance, standing on the outside and not ever getting any aggression going.
Two things were very apparent in this fight.
One, Rahman has nothing left, and two, Wlad is as good as he's ever been.
Throw out the fact that ``The Rock'' isn't what he once was. 
Nobody has ever dominated him this way, and really neutralized him from the start of the fight.
Klitschko used his great jab and distance fighting to stay out of harm's way and it's hard to think of any heavyweight outside of David Haye giving him any run for his money.
Chris Arreola has been named and hyped incredibly but would probably give an effort before being stopped in a round or two.
Alexander Povetkin might want to rethink his title shot because there doesn't seem to be a way for him to overcome all of the advantages that the champion has.
The weak heavyweight division doesn't seem to have much to offer the champion.
The two interesting fights that are out there for Wlad are a showdown with WBA Champion, Nikolay Valuev or a bout with David Haye.
Former Heavyweight Champion, Riddick Bowe, 43-1, 33 KO's, returned to the ring with an eight round decision win over Gene Pukall, 14-13-2, 12 KO's.
In 2005, Bowe barely escaped with a decision over Billy Zumbrun and all the signs were there that he should never step into the ring again.
When he beat and reportedly stabbed his wife, Bowe cited brain injury from boxing blows as the reason for his bad behavior, but now that brain damage has disappeared apparently and he is back in the ring and on the road to real injury should he face somebody that can fight a tad.
The only defeat on Bowe's record was a loss to Evander Holyfield in 1993, but it can be argued that he was well on his way to losing both fights with Andrew Golota in 1996 before the ``Foul Pole'' got himself disqualified with frequent and impressive low blows.
It was the only time that I have ever seen a three punch combo downstairs and was probably the first for Bowe.
It can even be argued that Bowe lost to Zumbrun.
The fact is that he shouldn't be in the ring at all but this is boxing and I'm sure that the former champion needs the money and that is why he is risking his life.
Ukraine's Wladimir Klitschko retained his WBO, IBF and IBO world heavyweight titles on Saturday with a technical knockout of Hasim Rahman in round seven.
The referee stopped the fight after Klitschko, 32, landed a series of punches to Rahman's head and the American retreated to the ropes, barely able to stand.
The Ukrainian had already knocked him down in round six.
``I thought I could land some punches earlier but it wasn't worth it because Hasim Rahman knew he was up against the best and he was really focused, you could see that,'' said Klitschko, who has been dubbed 'Dr. Steelhammer'.
``He really hung in there and it wasn't easy,'' he added after improving his record to 52 wins and three defeats.
Rahman was unable to get past Klitschko's left jab to land the kind of big punch that saw him beat world champion Lennox Lewis in 2001, when he knocked out the Briton with a right hook to record one of the biggest upsets in boxing history.
Rahman, 36, had never really regained that form.
He replaced Alexander Povetkin as Klitschko's opponent in October after the Russian pulled out of the bout with a foot injury.
In the first two rounds, Klitschko, brother of WBC champion Vitali, used his left jab to good effect, producing fast combinations and landing punches to the head.
Rahman looked uncertain and, frustrated at his inability to get past Klitschko's jab, he went to the ropes for much of the third round.
The crowd sensed the Hamburg-based Ukrainian was close to victory and began chanting ``Klitschko, Klitschko.''
Wladimir Klitschko retained his IBF, IBO and WBO heavyweight titles with a one-sided seventh-round stoppage of Hasim Rahman in Mannheim, Germany.
Klitschko dominated from the outset against the former two-time champion, who chewed leather from the start and barely landed a blow on the Ukrainian.
Rahman, who took the fight at late notice after mandatory challenger Alexander Povetkin pulled out through injury, looked a shadow of the fighter that floored Lennox Lewis to win the title in 2001.
The American looked clueless as Klitschko continually pounded his face with a sharp left jab that had Rahman back on his heels as early as the first session.
By the third round it was clear that Rahman had nothing to offer and he could not even offload the big right hand that won him so many fights in the past.
Klitschko had him on the canvas early in the sixth round with a double left hook and, as earlier in the fight, Rahman merely retreated to the ropes to take more snappy shots, rarely throwing anything meaningful in return.
And it came to a merciful end in the seventh, referee Tony Weeks saving 'The Rock' from further punishment just moments after warning his corner he would do just that if the challenger failed to show more intent.
Another clubbing left had Rahman off balance in a neutral corner and with further blows reigning down Weeks stepped in to wave it off.
The victory took Klitschko's record to 52-3 with a remarkable 46 wins by knockout, taking his unbeaten run to 10 since losing to Lamon Brewster in 2004.
``Hasim Rahman really took some punishment and I have to pay tribute to him,'' Klitschko said.
``I was surprised he stayed in there longer than I thought and I thought they would pull him out.''
The major heavyweight year ended much as it started, with Wladimir Klitschko owning the division against overmatched opposition, and with Hasim Rahman being nothing but a shell of the man that once shockingly knocked out Lennox Lewis.
Klitschko dominated Rahman over six-plus rounds, knocking him down in a horribly one-sided sixth round and then landing enough hard blows early in the seventh for referee Tony Weeks to step in and call an end to it.
That should just about do it for the 36-year old Rahman, who hasn't scored an impressive or notable win since 2005.
Since that win over Monte Barrett, Rahman has gone 4-2-1 with a no-contest, beating nothing but club fighters, and often not even looking good doing that.
He's had a long, strange career, and it looks like it's over at the top tier.
He was so thoroughly overmatched tonight and unwilling to fight Klitschko that he's clearly got nothing left as a top fighter.
Klitschko will move on and fight Alexander Povetkin, Chris Arreola or David Haye sometime in March or April, I'd wager, and he should be a heavy, heavy favorite against any of them.
Arreola was hurt by Travis Walker, Povetkin just doesn't strike me as capable of being a truly top-notch guy, and Haye was shaken by Monte Barrett a bit even though he did basically dominate.
I'd love to see Klitschko-Haye simply because I think Haye will make Wlad work.
I said during the fight that this was yet another case of Klitschko fighting up or down to his opponent.
Haye would make him fight up. 
Rahman had him fighting down.
The fight as also yet another example of why people crap on heavyweight fighting.
It wasn't interesting, wasn't competitive, and you clearly had one guy (Rahman) not in shape to fight for more than five rounds.
And worse than that, he didn't even fight.
In the sixth, he landed one punch.
He spent a lot of time laying on the ropes starting in the third round, barely punching at all.
The HBO team today was Lampley, Kellerman and Lennox, and they did their usual bit when they watch a heavyweight fight with Lennox in the booth, which means they made verbal love to Lewis while Lewis agreed with their assessment of him as better than everyone fighting today.
They're right, of course -- but we all know that.
There was even one round where Lennox decided, out loud, that he is better than Wladimir Klitschko.
As always, an interesting group that teaches me a lot about the fights I'm watching.
Wladimir Klitschko easily set aside the challenge of substitute Hasim Rahman, stopping the former heavyweight champion in seven rounds on Saturday in Mannheim, Germany.
Klitschko (52-3, 46 knockouts) retained his International Boxing Federation title for the fifth time in the process.
The six-foot-five Ukrainian-born champ was never threatened in the bout, controlling the distance with his jab and introducing some heavy right hands beginning late in the second round.
Rahman, 36, soon grew more intent on survival than winning and fell from three consecutive left hooks in the sixth.
Referee Tony Weeks elected to stop the bout early in the seventh when the American was offering no reply to Klitschko's thudding blows.
Rahman (45-7-2, 36 KOs) fell into the title shot five weeks ago when unbeaten Russian Alexander Povetkin suffered an ankle injury in training and couldn't face Klitschko.
The Baltimore, Md., native held portions of heavyweight title on two previous occasions, but hasn't beaten an elite opponent in several years.
He was undisputed champ for six months in 2001 after stunning Lennox Lewis by knockout in South Africa.
Lewis avenged the defeat later in that year with a one-punch knockout of his own.
Rahman would go on to win the vacant World Boxing Council in 2005 over Monte Barrett but lost it just over a year later to Oleg Maskaev.
The win over Rahman was the 32-year-old Klitschko's third of the year, following up a decision over Sultan Ibragimov and an 11th-round stoppage of Tony Thompson.
His older brother, Vitali, now holds the WBC title.
Wladimir Klitschko stopped Hasim Rahman in the seventh round to retain his IBF, IBO and WBO heavyweight titles at the SAP-Arena in Mannheim, Germany.
Rahman, who famously beat Lennox Lewis to become heavyweight champion of the world in 2001, barely landed a punch as the Ukrainian dominated the encounter from start to finish.
Klitschko's left jab caused problems for Rahman from the start and the American had to resort to holding the Kiev fighter to stem the tide of punches coming his way in the early rounds.
Rahman started to look in trouble in the third when he spent most of the round on the ropes as Klitschko landed several solid jabs on the American's chin.
Klitschko followed up a bruising fourth round with a series of jabs in the fifth that kept his opponent on the ropes.
Klitschko put his opponent on the canvas in the sixth with a flurry of left hooks.
Rahman got up after a seven count but spent the rest of the round on the ropes and only the bell saved him.
The champion finished the job 44 seconds into the seventh round when he followed up a left jab with a hook over the top to put Rahman in the corner before referee Tony Weeks stepped in to stop the fight.
Wladimir Klitschko defended his WBO and IBF heavyweight titles in Germany today with a lopsided victory over the American Hasim Rahman, winning by TKO in the seventh round.
Klitschko dominated the early rounds, repeatedly landing hard jabs that Rahman just couldn't answer.
In the third round Klitschko so thoroughly dominated that I scored it a 10-8 round even though Rahman never went down.
Klitschko eventually wore Rahman down enough to knock him to the canvas in the sixth round -- a round in which Rahman didn't land a clean punch at all.
Early in the seventh, Klitschko staggered Rahman, and the ref mercifully stopped it.
Klitschko and his brother Vitali are generally recognized as the two best heavyweights in the world, and although they'll never fight each other, I hope they'll start fighting better opposition than Rahman, who is well past his prime and appeared to be out of shape.
Mismatches like this one don't do much to advance heavyweight boxing.
Klitschko improved his record to 52-3 and is now on a 10-fight winning streak.
Rahman fell to 45-7-2 and is now 10-5-2 with one no contest since knocking out Lennox Lewis in 2001.
A bomb explosion at a bank killed a police officer and a state bomb disposal technician, and state police did not have any suspects, officials said Saturday.
``That person is dangerous and needs to be found as soon as possible,'' said Lt. Gregg Hastings of the Oregon State Police.
The explosion occurred Friday afternoon at a West Coast Bank branch in Woodburn, about 30 miles south of Portland.
The police went to check on a telephoned bomb threat received by a Wells Fargo bank branch in the center of town and found a suspicious device that turned out to be harmless.
But the police said the investigation led them to the nearby West Coast office where the bomb was found.
The police would not discuss a possible motive for the bombing.
Lieutenant Hastings said he did not know of any grudges against the West Coast Bank, a statement echoed by its president and chief executive, Robert Sznewajs.
``We're not aware of anything,'' Mr. Sznewajs said.
Police Capt. Tom Tennant and Senior Trooper William Hakim, both 51, died at the scene. Captain Tennant was a 28-year veteran of the Woodburn Police Department, and Trooper Hakim, a bomb technician, had been with the force for 11 years.
Woodburn's police chief, Scott Russell, 46, was injured.
Chief Russell, who has been with the Police Department for two decades, was in critical condition but stable at a Portland hospital.
State police said the inside of the bank was extensively damaged, and a female employee was treated at a hospital and released. Another bank employee was uninjured.
Lieutenant Hastings declined to describe the bomb in detail but indicated it was powerful.
A bank employee found the bomb in bushes outside, and it exploded after officers took it inside.
Lieutenant Hastings said he did not know why the officers took the bomb inside.
Federal authorities said Saturday that they were offering a $35,000 reward for information leading to an arrest and conviction in the case.
An explosion at a bank killed a police officer and a state bomb disposal technician, officials said Saturday, offering a $35,000 reward for information leading to an arrest and conviction in the case.
``That person is dangerous and needs to be found as soon as possible,'' said Oregon State Police Lt. Gregg Hastings.
The explosion occurred Friday afternoon at a West Coast Bank branch office in the agricultural town of Woodburn.
Police went to check on a telephoned bomb treat received by a nearby Wells Fargo branch bank and found a suspicious device, but that device turned out to be harmless.
But police said the investigation led them to the nearby West Coast office where the bomb was found by a bank employee in the bushes outside the building, and it exploded after officers took it inside.
Hastings did not know why the officers took it inside.
Police Capt. Tom Tennant and state Senior Trooper William Hakim, both 51, died at the scene.
Police Chief Scott Russell, 46, was injured and was in stable but critical condition.
The inside of the bank suffered extensive damage, and a female employee was treated at a hospital and released, police said.
Another bank employee was uninjured.
Police had no motive for the bombing and could offer no details about the bomb other than to say it was as powerful.
A Woodburn police officer and state police bomb squad technician were killed, while the city's police chief remained in critical condition after a bomb exploded late Friday at a Woodburn bank.
The FBI and ATF offered a $35,000 reward for information leading to the arrest and conviction of the person or persons responsible for the explosion and deaths, Oregon State Police said.
The explosion happened at the West Coast Bank on the Newberg 214 Highway just before 5:30 p.m., Marion County deputies said.
Officers were on the scene investigating a report of a suspicious device when the explosion occurred.
Woodburn Police Department Capt. Tom Tennant and Oregon State Police bomb technician Bill Hakim were killed in the blast.
Woodburn Chief of Police Scott Russell was listed in critical condition at OHSU and a female bank employee received minor injuries.
On Friday morning, a Woodburn-area Wells Fargo Bank received a threatening phone call from an unknown person.
Bank personnel notified Woodburn Police Department and the bank was evacuated while police investigated with the assistance of the FBI and an Oregon State Police bomb squad.
The investigation led to the West Coast Bank on Highway 214, just east of Interstate 5.
While investigators were in the area, a suspicious device detonated.
State police said the first device, discovered by police after the suspicious phone call, was determined not to be dangerous.
The second device, which was discovered by a bank employee, did detonate.
It was unclear to police whether the devices were related.
Highway 214 in Woodburn was to remain closed most of the weekend due to the explosion, police said.
Residents and commuters were encouraged to find other routes of travel in the area.
``This individual took the life of two police officers, critically injured the chief of police, and potentially could have taken the lives of bank employees inside,'' Oregon State Police Lt. Hastings said.
``If it takes a $35,000 reward, or if that reward grows, to break the case open then it's money well spent.''
Hakim became the second bomb technician in Oregon State Police history to be killed in the line of duty.
Marion County sheriffs described Hakim as a dedicated family man with wife and two teenaged children.
Woodburn Police Sgt. Jason Tlusty became emotional describing Capt. Tennant, who also was killed in the blast.
Tlusty described Tennant as an active community member ``who would do anything to help those in need.''
Twelve hours into the investigation authorities said it remained unclear whether the two devices were related.
A multi-agency investigation involving federal, state, county and city police agencies is investigating, coordinated by the Marion County Sheriff's Office working with an interagency team of investigators and the Marion County District Attorney's Office.
Anyone with information is asked to call the tip line at 800-800-3855.
A bomb exploded at an Oregon bank in Woodburn late Friday killing a police officer and a bomb technician.
According to Woodburn police an officer arrived at the West Coast Bank after receiving a call that a suspicious device had been spotted in bushes near the bank.
The bank was evacuated and the device was moved inside at which time the bomb exploded.
Earlier in the day a Wells Fargo Bank had been contacted by an individual and told that a bomb had been planted.
After a sweep of the area was made authorities determined no bomb had been present.
Shortly after, the West Coast Bank received a call with a similar warning.
A bomb exploded Friday at a West Coast Bank branch in Woodburn, Oregon, killing a Woodburn police officer and an Oregon State Police bomb squad technician, and critically injuring the Woodburn police chief.
Oregon State Police say a bomb explosion at a Woodburn-area bank killed a local police officer and a state bomb disposal technician.
The police said Saturday both were dead at the scene of the explosion the day before, but the police delayed announcing the death of 51-year-old Senior Trooper William Hakim so his family could be notified.
At a briefing, the police identified the Woodburn police officer who died as 51-year-old Capt. Tom Tennant.
Woodburn's police chief, 46-year-old Scott Russell, is in a Portland hospital, in critical condition.
State police say the inside of the West Coast Bank branch office was extensively damaged.
The police say they don't have suspects.
Bomb explodes at Woodburn bank, killing a police officer and OSP bomb technician.
A bomb exploded Friday at a West Coast Bank branch in Woodburn, killing a Woodburn police officer and an Oregon State Police bomb squad technician, and critically injuring the Woodburn police chief.
The bomb detonated around 5:30 p.m. at the bank in the 2500 block of Oregon 214.
The victims have been identified as Senior Trooper William Hakim of the Oregon State Police and Capt. Tom Tennant of the Woodburn Police Department, both described by colleagues this morning as dedicated professionals and family men.
Hakim is the second bomb technician to die in the line of duty in the history of the Oregon State Police, Hastings said. He leaves behind a wife and two children, a 16-year-old son and an 18-year-old daughter.
Tennant was promoted to captain four years ago.
He leaves behind a wife and three children, a 17-year-old son and two grown daughters.
Tennant's longtime colleague, Woodburn police Sgt. Jason Tlusty, was visibly shaken as he described his friend and coworker this morning.
Courtesy of The Woodburn IndependentScott Russell, Woodburn Police Chief
Woodburn Police Chief Scott Russell received critical injuries and was taken to OHSU Hospital, according to OSP Lt. Gregg Hastings.
A hospital representative said Russell, a 20-year veteran of the department with two daughters, is in an intensive care unit this morning.
Hastings this morning announced that the ATF and FBI are offering a $35,000 reward for information leading to the arrest of the individual responsible for the crime.
He described those responsible as ``very dangerous.''
``That person needs to be found as soon as possible,'' Hastings said during the somber press conference this morning.
A bank employee suffered non-life threatening injuries.
The other identities were not released.
Marion County deputy medical examiner Rodge Womack said police were concerned there might be a second bomb in the area; police dogs and a robot were combing the area late into the night.
An undetermined number of people living within a block of the bank were evacuated from their homes Friday, and a quarter-mile area around the crime scene was cordoned off.
The bank had been evacuated before the bomb detonated, according to West Coast Bank Chief Executive Robert Sznewajs.
The branch has been there for at least 10 years, he said.
The blast came several hours after someone made a threatening phone call to Wells Fargo around 10:30 a.m. Oregon State Police, the FBI and Woodburn police responded to the call.
Police did not provide much detail about what transpired between then and 5:30 p.m., when the bomb went off at West Coast Bank.
But according to Sznewajs, two bomb threats came into the two banks, which sit side by side on Oregon 214.
Police responded to both, but it was an employee who found a suspicious device under the bushes outside West Coast bank.
Sznewajs told The Statesman Journal that his bank for a call ``from an unknown person saying that we should look for one as well.
We called authorities, but they looked and found nothing.''
Sznewajs said that ``one of our people saw a device in the bushes around the branch and called authorities.
We looked at it and evacuated the branch and sent people away.''
He said authorities decided to move the device inside the branch and apparently scanned it -- and then it went off.
Sznewajs said he did not know whether the bomb went off on its own or as a result of the technicians' investigation.
After the blast, officers closed down a large swath of the commercial strip, populated by gas stations, fast food shops and strip malls.
Marion County Sheriff Russ Isham said the area will remain closed through the weekend, adding that he did not know if there could be additional bombs.
Police ask anyone with information to call the ATF at 800-800-3855.
Investigators for the FBI and the ATF were dispatched to the scene.
Police said early today that a multi-agency investigation involving federal, state, county and city police agencies has begun to identify suspects.
The blast shook up area residents.
Bob Currie, 66, a resident of Panor Senior Condominiums which overlooks the Wells Fargo branch, said that in the morning he saw a police car blocking the drive-up teller window and an FBI bomb technician checking a garbage can in the parking lot.
He said the Wells Fargo evacuated at 1:30 p.m. and he saw people leaving the bank from his balcony.
Later in the afternoon, ``I went back to my computer and all of a sudden heard this loud ka-boom.''
T.J. Simons, 17, who works at the 76 station on Oregon 214 about 500 feet from the bank, also heard the blast.
``At first I thought it was thunder, until I saw all the cops showing up.''
``It sounded like somebody tossing a Dumpster off a three-story building,'' said Jan Olson, who was smoking on her deck in the nearby Evergreen Estates apartment complex.
Senior Trooper William Hakim, a bomb squad technician with the Oregon State Police, and Capt. Tom Tennant of the Woodburn Police Department were killed when a bomb exploded at a West Coast Bank branch.
With just over a month remaining in office, the Bush administration loosened federal protection of plant and animal species threatened with extinction.
On Thursday, the Interior Department announced a change to Section 7 of the Endangered Species Act, which required federal agencies to consult with scientists at the Fish and Wildlife Service or the National Marine Fisheries Service to determine whether a project is likely to affect any listed species.
Under the new rule, federal agencies such as the Federal Highway Administration can in many cases simply check with their own personnel to determine if their activities will harm any of the 1,247 animal and 747 plant species listed as endangered or threatened.
``The rule strengthens the regulations so the government can focus on protecting endangered species as it strives to rebuild the American economy,'' said Secretary of the Interior Dirk Kempthorne.
It started with the polar bears
The rule change has its origins in a May announcement by the Interior Department that listed the polar bear as threatened because global warming is melting its habitat.
It was the first animal to be listed because of climate change.
In that announcement, Interior Secretary Dirk Kempthorne said that even though global climate change is the reason that the bear is on the endangered species list in the first place, that list is ``not the means, nor the method, nor the vehicle by which you can deal with global climate change.''
The Interior Department's press release cites a May editorial from the Washington Post that endorses this view:
That Mr. Kempthorne has to contort his agency to ensure that it doesn't get dragged into setting US climate policy is simply more proof of the need for such a policy, supported by the White House and ratified by Congress, that aims at sharply reducing greenhouse-gas emissions.
Though the polar bear deserves protection, the Endangered Species Act is not the means and the Fish and Wildlife Service is not the agency to arrest global warming.
The release quotes the second sentence of that paragraph.
So under the new rules, federal agencies that are undertaking a project need not check with Fish and Wildlife or National Marine Fisheries under these circumstances:
Where the action has no effect on a listed species or critical habitat, or
Where the action is wholly beneficial, or
Where the effects of the action can not be measured or detected in a manner that permits meaningful evaluation using the best available science, or
Where the effects of the action are the result of global processes and can not be reliably predicted or measured on the scale of species current range, or would result in an insignificant impact to a listed species, or are such that the potential risk of harm to a species is remote.
Reactions
Environmentalists are less than thrilled by this rule change. 
Andrew Wetzler, director of the Natural Resources Defense Council's Endangered Species Program, says his organization will probably sue:
``This administration has rejected anything with a whiff of science
so before sulking out the back door, they are going after rules that require Fish and Wildlife Service scientists to prevent harm to our last wild animals and places.
Despite today's feel-good statements, we remain convinced that these changes are illegal.
We will look at the final language when it is published tomorrow, but I think we will see them in court.''
Defenders of the Wildlife, who have filed suit along with Greenpeace and the Center for Biological Diversity, are similarly disgusted by the Bush administration's actions:
``This administration's disdain for wildlife and the environment has never been more clear than it is today,'' said Jamie Rappaport Clark, executive vice president of Defenders of Wildlife and former director of the Fish and Wildlife Service.
``For 35 years, the Endangered Species Act has helped save and recover imperiled wildlife on the brink of extinction.
Now, with this administration facing its last days, they are doing everything they can to cement their anti-environmental legacy before the Obama administration takes office.''
The US Chamber of Commerce welcomed the rule change.
Reversible?
Obama says that he intends to reverse the rule change, along with other ``midnight rules'' made in the waning days of the Bush presidency. 
But that may be easier said than done.
ProPublica, a nonprofit investigative news organization, notes that while last-minute rules that have not yet taken effect can be quickly reversed by Obama's appointees or by executive order, rules that are in force when he takes office cannot:
Rescinding a rule would require the new administration to restart the rulemaking process, which can take years and prompt legal challenges.
Another strategy that has been talked about lately - getting Congress to disapprove the rules through the Congressional Review Act - carries political risks and has been used only once before.
The new endangered species rule takes effect nine days before Obama's inauguration.
There is still a chance that the rule could be quickly reversed, however.
USA Today reports that Rep. Nick Rahall (D) of West Virginia, the chairman of the House Natural Resources Committee, says that he will likely invoke the Congressional Review Act, a rarely used law that gives Congress 60 days to review and overrule regulations issued by government agencies.
The Bush administration is reducing protections for endangered animals and plants.
Just six weeks before Democratic President-elect Barack Obama takes office, the current Republican administration is changing endangered species regulations.
Some mandatory, independent reviews that government scientists have performed for 35 years are being eliminated.
The scientists' advice from such reviews can delay or block dams, highways and other projects.
The new rules will take effect in about 30 days.
The rules also prohibit federal agencies from evaluating the effect on endangered species and the places they live from a project's contribution to increased global warming.
Obama has promised to reverse the new rules.
Congress also could overturn them.
The Interior Department yesterday finalized rules changing the way it administers the Endangered Species Act, enabling other government agencies to decide on their own whether a project would harm an imperiled species without an independent scientific review.
Interior Secretary Dirk Kempthorne called the move ``a clarification'' he considered essential in order to narrow the law's reach.
``The rule strengthens the regulations so the government can focus on protecting endangered species as it strives to rebuild the American economy,'' Kempthorne said, adding that agencies can bypass a review by either the Fish and Wildlife Service or the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration only ``in specific and limited instances where an action is not anticipated to harass, harm or kill a protected species.''
Dale Hall, who directs the Fish and Wildlife Service, said the change did not mean that agencies could build dams, roads or other projects without taking into account the consequences.
``The agency still has the full responsibility to make that decision and to defend that decision,'' Hall said, noting that the loss of an imperiled species, known as ``take,'' carries legal penalties.
``They're still liable for take, if take occurs.''
Hall said he was initially concerned about ``the compressed time frame'' in which the agency pushed through the rule change, which was unveiled in August, but he added that he didn't ``see any harm'' in Kempthorne's final decision.
Interior went ahead with the rule change one day after the Environmental Protection Agency dropped two other controversial rules changes, saying they had come along too late in President Bush's term. White House spokesman Tony Fratto said the reason was that the administration had ``publicly and clearly stated our intention'' to enact the endangered species measure well before a self-imposed deadline on eleventh-hour rule changes.
The agency received nearly 235,000 comments on the endangered species proposal, at least 208,000 of which were form letters decrying the rule.
Congressional Democrats and environmentalists sharply criticized the administration for the Interior Department action.
``As the Bush administration fades off into the sunset, it continues to take brazen pot shots at everything in sight, including America's landmark conservation law, the Endangered Species Act,'' said House Resources Committee Chairman Nick J. Rahall II (D-W.Va.), who said he would introduce legislation seeking to overturn the rule next year.
Separately yesterday, Interior issued a finding limiting the protections that could be invoked to protect polar bears, which were listed as a threatened species this year, on the grounds that the bears are already protected under the Marine Mammals Protection Act.
The finding means that the bears' protected status could not be used to block activities such as oil and gas development outside their Alaska habitat.
``We do not believe the science is there to make the causal link between activities in the lower 48 to the take of a polar bear,'' Kempthorne said.
``To finally admit that the science compels the listing of the polar bear as threatened due to global warming, but then deny it the protections the Endangered Species Act should provide, is nothing other than irresponsible and shameful,'' said Jamie Rappaport Clark, executive vice president of the advocacy group Defenders of Wildlife, adding that her group would sue to overturn the rule.
Interior Secretary Dirk Kempthorne announced major changes Thursday to the Endangered Species Act, causing environmental groups to charge that the `` midnight rules `` set to go into effect before President-elect Barack Obama takes office are intended to eviscerate the nation's premier wildlife-protection law.
The regulations eliminate a requirement that federal agencies seek review by government scientists before approving logging, mining and construction projects to make sure the activities don't endanger rare animals and plants.
In addition, the regulations say the law could not be used to protect polar bears, walrus, mountain frogs and other species vulnerable to the effects of global warming.
``The Bush administration is using this to go after our most imperiled wildlife and kick them when they are down,'' said Janette Brimmer, an attorney with Earthjustice, an environmental group.
``The act is our nation's most important law for protecting wildlife like wolves, grizzlies, salmon and lynx.''
Reid Cherlin, a spokesman for the Obama-Biden transition team, said, ``President-elect Obama will review all 11th-hour regulations and will address them once he takes office.''
Obama has said he does not favor changing the Endangered Species Act.
Kempthorne, at a news conference in Washington, said that he knew changes to the act would evoke controversy but that he is certain the new rules would clear up confusion over the law that had existed for years.
``Nothing in the regulation relieves a federal agency of its responsibilities to ensure that species are not harmed,'' he said.
Law covers 1,400 species
The law protects 1,400 species.
In the last eight years, there has been a slowdown in adding new plants and animals, building a backlog of hundreds of species waiting for scientific review and approval, including California's furry Pacific fisher and Sierra Nevada yellow-legged frog.
The Interior Department proposed the new regulations in May and since has received nearly 300,000 comments, the vast majority opposing the changes.
Hours after Thursday's announcement, three environmental groups, Greenpeace, Defenders of Wildlife and Center for Biological Diversity, filed a lawsuit in U.S. District Court in San Francisco seeking to halt regulations that they say are inconsistent with the act.
The regulations don't require federal agencies to seek consultation with U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service and National Marine Fisheries Service before approving projects, the lawsuit said.
In Congress, Rep. Edward Markey, D-Mass., called a hearing to review the regulations and said members would work to restore the act. Rep. Nick Rahall, D-W.Va., said members may try to eliminate the regulations by using a special congressional act that allows the review of newly adopted administrative rules.
Part of the new regulations prohibit regulators from taking into account the effects of greenhouse gases on habitats and on species.
Kempthorne said his legal advisers concluded that considering global warming a threat to the survival of the polar bear would require tracking emissions to a particular factory and determining how that would melt Arctic ice and harm the bear.
``That's completely wrong, and they're just making that up,'' said attorney Kassie Siegel of the Center for Biological Diversity, which is suing the federal government in an attempt to protect polar bears.
Federal agencies are supposed to look at sources of greenhouse gases from projects they approve, then analyze ways to reduce those emissions, Siegel said.
``There's no requirement to trace any molecule of DDT to the thinning of bald eagle eggs just as there's no requirement to trace any molecule of carbon dioxide to the death of any particular polar bear,'' she said.
In California, the requirement to consult with government biologists before construction projects is particularly crucial, said Mark Rockwell, California state representative of the Endangered Species Coalition, an alliance of 50 environmental, business, hunting and fish and religious groups in the state.
The U.S. Forest Service approves logging plans that might affect coastal coho salmon and steelhead, marbled murrelets and Pacific fishers on national forests.
The U.S. Army Corps of Engineers give permits for filling wetlands.
Without the requirement, there's no incentive for the agencies to seek consultation and a biological opinion, Rockwell said.
For example, the Bureau of Reclamation was forced by the current requirement to seek biological opinions on whether the amount of water being diverted from the southern part of the Sacramento-San Joaquin River Delta would hurt the delta smelt or harm chinook salmon.
Protections found lacking
Environmental groups challenged opinions that water flows for the fish were adequate, and won decisions agreeing that the protections were indeed lacking in the plans.
``It was the biological opinions that led to the challenges,'' Rockwell said.
``If you don't have an opinion, you have nothing to challenge.''
Under the new regulations, the federal agencies would have the discretion of deciding whether or not to ask for a consultation and opinion, Rockwell said.
The Bush administration issued two late-term regulations on Thursday that environmentalists say weaken federal protection for endangered species but that Interior Department officials defended as blocking a ``back-door'' attempt to regulate emissions that contribute to global warming.
Conservation groups sued to block the new rules, reigniting a fight over so-called midnight regulation that had seemed to die down a day earlier when the administration declined to impose looser air pollution rules that environmentalists had feared.
Previously, federal agencies were required to consult with scientists who specialized in particular species before proceeding with a project like a road or dam.
The project could not go forward unless the specialist certified that no harm would come to endangered plants or wildlife.
The rules announced Thursday would allow federal agencies to bypass those scientists in some cases if the agencies determined that the endangered species would not be harmed.
The revision was finalized after four months of deliberation and over the objections of what officials said were the bulk of nearly 235,000 public comments on the change.
The updated rules also bar agencies from stopping a project because its emissions might contribute to global warming.
Opponents call the change particularly objectionable for the polar bear, which has seen its habitat shrink as Arctic ice caps melt.
The government declared polar bears a threatened species this year.
Interior Secretary Dirk Kempthorne called the rule changes ``narrow'' and a ``common-sense'' approach to species protection.
He stressed that agencies could still consult with species scientists if they chose, and he reiterated his belief that climate change regulation is a ``wholly inappropriate use of the Endangered Species Act.''
Kempthorne acknowledged internal debate over the changes, but he and other administration officials said they tweaked the rule in response to public comments.
Environmental groups panned them anyway.
Janette Brimmer, an attorney with Earthjustice, said the administration was ``using global warming as a stalking horse to undo species protections on a broad scale.''
Andrew Wetzler, director of the Natural Resources Defense Council's endangered species program, was blunt:
``We will see them in court.''
Environmentalists have tussled with the administration in its waning days over oil and gas drilling leases near national parks and oil shale development across the western U.S.
They cheered Wednesday, however, when the Environmental Protection Agency said it would not revise two air pollution standards.
White House officials say they've worked hard to minimize the kind of end-of-term rulemaking that President Bill Clinton engaged in heavily.
Many of the late rules could be difficult for President-elect Barack Obama to overturn without in a lengthy process, though a little-used law could allow Congress to void them.
The House Select Committee on Energy Independence and Global Warming held a hearing on Thursday into Bush's late energy and environmental rulemaking.
Committee Chairman Rep. Edward Markey (D-Mass.) said the rules issued Thursday showed the administration was ``determined to use every last minute in office to wreak as much havoc as possible on our nation.''
Kempthorne, for his part, sounded keenly aware of timing issues in a conference call with reporters, when he noted he had 39 days left in office.
Asked if that gave him pause for issuing new rules, he replied:
``Do you think Eli Manning should have left the field five minutes before the end of the last Super Bowl?''
The US Interior and Commerce departments reported Dec. 11 final proposed changes to the Endangered Species Act, which Interior Secretary Dirk A. Kempthorne said were not as extensive as originally planned.
``The rule strengthens the regulations so the government can focus on protecting endangered species as it strives to rebuild the American economy,'' Kempthorne said.
``It has been revised since it was proposed in August because the public made suggestions we could use to improve it,'' he said.
The proposed changes are scheduled to appear in the Dec. 12 Federal Register.
``What we are doing is clarifying the threshold for consultation to occur.
If science cannot draw a direct causal link between an action and an effect on a listed species, as is currently the case for global processes like climate change, than consultation under the ESA is not necessary,'' Kempthorne maintained.
Congressional critics and environmental organizations immediately criticized the proposal.
``The Bush administration appears to be determined to use every last minute in office to wreak as much havoc as possible on our nation,'' said Edward J. Markey (D-Mass.), chairman of the House Select Committee on Energy Independence and Global Warming.
``Today's announcement that they will be removing fish and wildlife experts from key decisions to protect the safety of iconic animals like the polar bear from global warming's effects is absurd and a recipe for disaster,'' Markey said.
Andrew Wetzler, director of the Natural Resources Defense Council's endangered species program, commented,
``This administration has rejected anything with a whiff of science, so before skulking out the back door they are going after rules that require [US] Fish and Wildlife Service scientists to prevent harm to our last wild animals and places.
Despite today's feel-good statements, we remain convinced that these changes are illegal.
We will look at the final language when it is published tomorrow, but I think we will see them in court.''
Scope of exceptions
But Kempthorne noted that federal agencies would be required to follow existing consultation procedures except in specific, limited instances where a proposed action is not expected to have adverse impacts on any member of an ESA-listed species and would satisfy one of the following conditions:
It must be wholly beneficial, have no effect on a listed species or its critical habitat, have effects which could not be measured or detected in a manner that permits meaningful evaluation, or it must be the result of global processes that can not be reliably predicted or measured on the scale of the species' current range.
Agencies still would be able to voluntarily engage in the consultation process, the secretary emphasized.
He said the final proposed regulations contain fewer opportunities for agencies to proceed without consultation than what was originally envisioned.
Nothing in the proposals requires that a federal agency bypass consultation, nor does it preclude any federal agency from seeking the expertise of the Fish and Wildlife Service and the National Marine Fisheries Service or from taking advantage of expertise that may be available from state and local agencies, universities, nongovernment organizations, or other sources, according to Kempthorne.
Any federal agency may avail itself of expertise offered by FWS and NMFS in exactly the same manner as under current regulations if it determines it has any limitations to make determinations under the ESA or believes that it does not have the scientific expertise to make an accurate assessment of a project's impacts on listed species and critical habitat, he said.
Moreover, nothing in the proposals relieves an agency of its responsibilities to ensure that listed species are not harmed during completion of a federal action, regardless of whether consultation occurs or not, Kempthorne said.
In cases where an action agency determines that consultation is not required and harm to a listed species results, full civil and criminal penalties, as laid out by other sections of the ESA, remain in effect, he indicated.
WHEN PLANNING TO widen Interstate 90 through Snoqualmie Pass, state transportation brass, federal agencies and greens wisely opted to cut down on road (and people) kill, and to give peace a chance.
The result will be a series of wildlife overpasses and underpasses, and efforts to make Gold Creek a healthy home to the endangered bull trout.
The unspoken trade-off: No lawsuits will hold up or raise costs on work that benefits the economy, and eases the drive to and from Eastern Washington.
Before leaving the political stage, the Bush administration aims to kiss off this kind of modest use of intelligence. 
It is, said Rep. Jay Inslee, D-Wash., the Bushies' ``last sour note.''
Using the Christmas season for cover, the Interior Department on Thursday issued ``revised'' regulations designed to shield federal projects from review under the Endangered Species Act.
``I've been waiting and holding my breath for one last awful thing (Bush) would do to be remembered by, and he has done it,'' said Rep. Jim McDermott, D-Wash.
The administration ignored comments from 300,000 citizens and adopted a policy that would allow federal agencies to ignore one of the nation's basic environmental laws.
It would eliminate some requirements for independent review by scientists -- notably from the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service and National Marine Fisheries Service -- as agencies plan projects involving timber sales, road construction and oil leases.
New rules would also prohibit federal agencies from assessing how a proposed project would add to global warming or jeopardize species habitat.
``Nothing in this regulation relieves a federal agency of its responsibilities to ensure that species are not harmed,'' Interior Secretary Dirk Kempthorne told reporters.
Huh?
``If this rule had been implemented in years past, highway builders could have done what they wanted, without talking to the Fish and Wildlife Service.
We would probably not be seeing the improvements on I-90,'' said Rick McGuire of the Alpine Lakes Protection Society.
``The I-90 corridor has been a Berlin Wall between the northern Cascades and southern Cascades. 
If you don't make the means to cross a road like this, it's bad for wildlife.
And it's bad for people who hit wildlife.''
Inslee noted the administration's recent two-step maneuver in the Chukchi Sea off the north coast of Alaska.
The Fish and Wildlife Service formally listed the polar bear under the Endangered Species Act, due to the threat from global warming.
Ignoring the listing, the feds' Minerals Management Service proceeded to sell oil leases where the bears live.
The Bush administration finalized a retroactive justification on Thursday.
It created a ``special rule'' for polar bears, allowing oil and gas drilling, as long as oil companies obey the Marine Mammal Protection Act.
``Polar bears don't need a listing.
They need ice,'' said Inslee.
Inslee noted the role of the late Sen. Henry Jackson, D-Wash., who backed oil development in the Arctic and helped write the Endangered Species Act.
``Senator Jackson and others had the foresight and intelligence to say: Let us allow the expertise of government scientists to be tapped before decisions are made,'' Inslee added.
``That's what the consultation process does.
It has been used to good effect in our state.''
Critics of the Endangered Species Act often substitute anecdote for fact.
They've argued that consultation with government scientists means holdups and more work.
In a filing with the Interior Department, however, the Natural Resources Defense Council noted that no evidence of delay and cost was produced to support relaxing the law.
Quite the contrary.
The new policy nixes informal consultation between agencies intended to determine whether a project needs more formal and detailed environmental review.
The likely result will be ``erroneous findings'' by agencies, argued the NRDC.
What's the consequence?
Project opponents will get grounds to sue.
``We will look at the final (rule) language when it is published tomorrow, but I think we will see them in court,'' said Andrew Welzler of the NRDC.
Putting teeth back in the Endangered Species Act, and reversing the new rule, presents a tricky, time-consuming task for the Obama administration.
The makeup of Obama's environmental team has surfaced in recent days.
It is urban, and largely Eastern.
The incoming Environmental Protection Agency boss, Lisa Jackson, has worked as New Jersey's environmental commissioner.
Soon-to-be senior White House aide Carol Browner, an Al Gore protagonist, is from Florida.
Obama brass would be well advised to turn for help to the Pacific Northwest and Mountain West.
Our government leaders have dealt with tricky issues involving Endangered Species Act listings of Puget Sound salmon runs and orcas.
East Coast environmentalists, in high government posts, proved tone-deaf and clumsy when dealing with endangered species issues in the Clinton and Carter administrations.
What's needed now is political savvy, plus what George W. Bush, in his 2000 campaign, described as ``sound science.''
P-I columnist Joel Connelly can be reached at 206-448-8160 or joelconnelly@seattlepi.com. 
Follow politics on the P-I's blog at blog.seattlepi.com/seattlepolitics.
Just six weeks before President-elect Barack Obama takes office, the Bush administration issued revised endangered species regulations Thursday to reduce the input of federal scientists and to block the law from being used to fight global warming
The changes, which will go into effect in about 30 days, were completed in just four months. 
But they could take Obama much longer to reverse.
They will eliminate some of the mandatory, independent reviews that government scientists have performed for 35 years on dams, power plants, timber sales and other projects, a step that developers and other federal agencies have blamed for delays and cost increases.
The rules also prohibit federal agencies from evaluating the effect on endangered species and the places they live from a project's contribution to increased global warming.
Interior Department officials described the changes as ``narrow,'' but admitted that the regulations were controversial inside the agency.
Environmentalists viewed them as eroding the protections for endangered species.
Interior officials said federal agencies could still seek the expertise of federal wildlife biologists on a voluntary basis, and that other parts of the law will ensure that species are protected.
``Nothing in this regulation relieves a federal agency of its responsibilities to ensure that species are not harmed,'' said Interior Secretary Dirk Kempthorne in a conference call with reporters.
Current rules require biologists in the Fish and Wildlife Service and National Marine Fisheries Service to sign off on projects even when it is determined that they are not likely to harm species.
The rule finalized Thursday would do away with that requirement, reducing the number of consultations so that the government's experts can focus on cases that pose the greatest harm to wildlife, officials said.
But environmentalists said that the rule changes would put decisions about endangered species into the hands of agencies with a vested interest in advancing a project and with little expertise about wildlife.
Several environmental groups filed a lawsuit in federal court in San Francisco hours after the rule's announcement.
Jamie Rappaport Clark, a former director of the Fish and Wildlife Service and a vice president of Defenders of Wildlife, said Thursday that the changes target the ``absolute heart of the Endangered Species Act.''
Clark told a House hearing on the Bush administration's last-minute environmental regulations that these changes remove ``a system of checks and balances that provides an essential safety net for imperiled animals and plants.''
Between 1998 and 2002, the Fish and Wildlife Service conducted 300,000 consultations.
The National Marine Fisheries Service, which evaluates projects affecting marine species, conducts about 1,300 reviews each year.
The reviews have helped safeguard protected species such as bald eagles, Florida panthers and whooping cranes.
A federal government handbook from 1998 described the consultations as ``some of the most valuable and powerful tools to conserve listed species.''
The Bush administration worked diligently to get the change in place before Obama took over, corralling 15 experts in Washington in October to sort through 250,000 written comments from the public on the revisions in 32 hours.
Obama has said he would work to reverse the changes.
But because the rule takes effect before he is sworn in, he would have to restart the lengthy rulemaking process.
House Natural Resources Committee Chairman Rep. Nick Rahall, D-W.Va., said he would seek to overturn the regulations using the Congressional Review Act after consulting with other Democratic leaders.
The rarely used law allows Congress to review new federal regulations.
Congress has opposed similar changes to the endangered species protections in the past.
In 2003, the Bush administration imposed similar rules that would have allowed agencies to approve new pesticides and wildfire reduction projects without seeking the opinion of government scientists.
The pesticide rule was later overturned in court.
The Interior Department, along with the Forest Service, is currently being sued over the rule governing wildfire prevention.
In 2005, the House passed a bill that would have made similar changes to the Endangered Species Act, but the bill died in the Senate.
Oklahoma Sen. James Inhofe, the leading Republican on the Senate Environment and Public Works Committee, said in a statement the new regulations were ``common-sense changes to a law much overdue for reform.''
There are a handful of other environmental regulations still pending before Bush leaves office, including a rule to exempt large agricultural operations from reporting releases of ammonia and other hazardous air pollutants.
They must be finalized by Dec. 19 in order for them go into effect before Jan. 20.
In a related development, the Interior Department also finalized Thursday a special rule for the polar bear, a species that was listed as threatened in May because of global warming.
The rule would allow oil and gas exploration in areas where the bears live, as long as the companies comply with the Marine Mammal Protection Act.
The Bush administration on Thursday eliminated 35-year-old regulations in the Endangered Species Act that required an independent scientific review of proposed federal projects to determine whether they imperil protected plants and animals.
Instead, federal agencies undertaking projects like road and power plant construction or oil and gas drilling will make their own assessment.
Without the independent reviews, such projects could be accelerated.
As part of the changes announced by Interior Secretary Dirk Kempthorne in the final days of the Bush administration, the department finalized an interim rule that allows oil and gas drilling in polar bear habitat off Alaska's coast.
The rule change is designed to prevent the Endangered Species Act from being used to regulate greenhouse gas emissions, essentially making climate change policy.
Kempthorne, who characterized the new rules as a common-sense streamlining of bureaucratic processes, acknowledged that there was disagreement within the department regarding the rules, which take effect in 30 days.
Under current law, agencies must submit any plans that could harm species on the endangered list for review by scientists at the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, which enforces the Endangered Species Act.
The process has been criticized by home builders groups and the oil and gas industry for delaying costly projects.
The consultation requirement was intended as more than just a check and balance.
Jamie Rappaport Clark, executive vice president of Defenders of Wildlife and director of Fish and Wildlife under President Clinton, said the consultation process resolved the problem of ``mission conflict'' between agencies.
The Department of Defense, for example, might not understand why an endangered plant should be considered when expanding a bombing range.
``The problem is the agencies don't always properly consider, understand or protect species in their habitat because they are focused on the pursuit of their primary mission,'' Clark said.
``It's hard for the biologists to satisfy their responsibility to protect species if the agency perceives it affects their primary mission.''
President-elect Barack Obama said he would reverse the rule changes, as have some members of Congress. 
But that requires a lengthy rule-making process.
In the House, members can invoke the rarely used Congressional Review Act to overturn the regulations.
``These changes are going to result in more species being put in jeopardy,'' Clark said.
``But more importantly, we are not going to know what we don't know anymore.''
Officials said agencies would still be held liable if they approved projects that harmed threatened or endangered species.
Kempthorne also noted that any federal agency could choose to informally consult with the Fish and Wildlife Service at any time.
H. Dale Hall, director of Fish and Wildlife, said he had concerns about how fast the estimated 235,000 public comments were processed.
Staff assigned to the job spent eight hours a day tabulating the comments.
Working under strict time restraints, agency employees had nine seconds to read each letter, according to one calculation.
Officials said that more than 200,000 of the comments opposed the rule change.
Attempts to revise the Endangered Species Act have been rebuffed by Congress in recent years.
Sen. Barbara Boxer (D-Calif.) said Thursday's actions were another assault on the law.
``These midnight regulations are part of a continuing effort by the Bush administration to repeal our landmark environmental laws through the back door and weaken protections for our nation's endangered species,'' she said in a statement.
``I believe they are illegal, and if similar regulations had been in place, they would have undermined our ability to protect the bald eagle, the grizzly bear and the gray whale,'' Boxer said.
Environmental groups, which took the administration to court to force it to list the polar bear, vowed to continue the legal battle.
Three groups, the Center for Biological Diversity, Greenpeace and Defenders of Wildlife, filed suit in San Francisco hours after the changes were announced, arguing that the regulations failed to follow the public review process.
``The Bush administration has repackaged the same old lump of coal as a holiday present for the polar bear, and once again handed its friends in the oil industry a huge gift,'' said Kassie Siegel, climate program director at the Center for Biological Diversity and lead author of the 2005 petition to list polar bears.
``These regulations seem designed to drive the polar bear extinct.''
The rule regarding polar bears comes seven months after that animal became the first to be placed on the Endangered Species List primarily because of global climate change.
The melting of sea ice is threatening the polar bear with extinction.
This summer, scores of polar bears were observed swimming in open seas, far from land or ice floes.
But Kempthorne said that he wouldn't allow the 1973 law to be used as a ``back door for implementing climate-change policy.''
To that end, he clarified regulations addressing threats to polar bear habitat: greenhouse emissions from automobiles, power plants and other human activities.
The act requires federal agencies to designate habitat critical to the creature's survival, then protect it by strict enforcement.
Kempthorne said that according to his reading, court rulings require pinpointing a specific source of a threat to habitat -- something that he said was scientifically impossible.
That interpretation of the courts' opinions gives the government few options to protect polar bear habitat.
In a move environmental groups says strikes at the heart of the Endangered Species Act, the Bush administration on Thursday announced a new rule that would let federal agencies decide on their own whether their projects harm endangered species, instead of requiring them in many cases to get a second opinion from federal wildlife experts.
